When we entered office four years ago, there was a widespread feeling that American education was not meeting the high standard of excellence it had attained in the past. You gave voice to that feeling but, more than that, you provided leadership in developing solutions to the problems of our schools. As a result, there is a new dedication in America to achieving educational excellence.

This dedication exists not only at the Federal level but also, and more importantly, at the grassroots level. In communities all across America, parents, students and teachers are devoting their time and energy to making their local schools as good as they can possibly be. You have provided these citizen activists with a clear and inspiring example of effective leadership in Washington, and you have made sure that the Federal government listens and responds to their concerns. This achievement is one that will continue to bear good fruit for many years to come, and I want to thank you personally for a job well done.

I leave my position feeling that we are in the midst of a lasting and meaningful academic renewal that will benefit millions of learners in our nation's schools and colleges. It has been a pleasure to serve under your leadership in our quest for excellence in education.

The President today announced the appointment of Michael K. Deaver, Assistant to the President and Deputy Chief of the White House Staff, to be General Chairman of the 1985 Inaugural Committee. In that capacity, he will have supervisory responsibility for all Inaugural activities and will report directly to the President.

Access to Justice Act. The Act allows the award of attorneys' fees to certain parties who successfully litigate against the government unless the government demonstrates that its position is substantially justified or that special circumstances exist that make a fee award unjust. Because the Equal Access to Justice Act expired on September 30, 1984, legislation is needed to reauthorize the Act.

I am firmly committed to the policies underlying the Equal Access to Justice Act and will make the permanent and retroactive reauthorization of the Act a high legislative priority of the Administration in the next Congress. Where the Federal government has taken a position in litigation that is not substantially justified, and thereby has caused a small business or individual to incur unnecessary attorneys' fees and legal costs, I believe it proper for the government to reimburse that small business or individual for those expenses. The Equal Access to Justice Act thus serves an important salutary purpose that should become a permanent part of our government. Unfortunately, H.R. 5479 makes certain changes to the Equal Access to Justice Act that do not further the Act's basic purposes and that are inconsistent with fundamental principles of good government. The most objectionable of these provisions is the change the bill would make in the definition of ``position of the United States.'' Under this changed definition, the Act would no longer apply only to the government's position taken in the administrative or court litigation, but would extend to the underlying agency action. This would result in needless and wasteful litigation over what is supposed to be a subsidiary issue, the award of attorneys' fees, and would further burden the courts, which would have to hear the claims in each case not once, but twice. In addition, this change could also undermine the free exchange of ideas and positions within each agency that is essential for good government.

For example, this change would require courts in making fee determinations to examine the conduct of an agency even where that conduct is not at issue in the court's review of the merits of the case before it. This would mean that a fee proceeding could result in an entirely new and subsidiary inquiry in the circumstances that gave rise to the original lawsuit. This inquiry only could lead to far lengthier proceedings than required if the court is merely to examine arguments made in court, but also could lead to extensive discovery of how the underlying agency position was formulated, and who advocated what position and for what reasons at what time. In effect, every step of the agency decision-making process, at whatever level, could become the subject of litigation discovery. Such extensive discovery could inhibit free discussion within an agency prior to any final agency policy decision or action for fear that any internal disagreements or reservations would be the subject of discovery and judicial inquiry.

In addition, H.R. 5479 contains a provision that would require the United States to pay interest on any awarded attorneys' fees not paid within 60 days after the date of the award. As noted by the Comptroller General of the United States, this provision would give lawyers who have received awards under the Act more favorable treatment than any other group entitled to interest payments from the United States. I agree with the Comptroller General that to the extent any interest should be paid under the Act, it should be paid on the same basis as other interest payments made by the government on court judgments.

The Department of Justice, the Office of Management and Budget, and other concerned agencies have repeatedly expressed to the Congress their serious reservations about these and other provisions of H.R. 5479. I wholly support the prompt reauthorization of the Equal Access to Justice Act and believe that the reauthorization should be retroactively effective to October 1, 1984. In light of the permanent nature of a reauthorization, such a reauthorization should include modifications and improvements in the Act, which the Administration is willing to explore with the Congress.

Concurrently with this memorandum, I am issuing a memorandum to all agency heads concerning the Equal Access to Justice Act. This memorandum reaffirms my strong commitment to the policies underlying the Act and instructs agency heads to review the procedures of their agencies to ensure that agency positions continue to be substantially justified. Special attention is to be given to those agency positions that affect small businesses. In addition, each agency is to accept and assist in the preparation of fee applications which can be considered once the Act is reauthorized.

September 30, 1984, for all cases initiated after that date. While I strongly support the reauthorization of the Act and have worked closely with the Congress to that effect, I have today withheld my approval of the recently passed bill (H.R. 5479) reauthorizing the Act because certain of its amendments are unacceptable to the Administration. It is my hope and expectation that an acceptable reauthorization of the Act will be passed by the Congress early next year and that this reauthorization will apply retroactively to covered cases initiated on or after October 1, 1984.

First, agency heads shall ensure that the appropriate offices and personnel in their agencies understand that the Administration remains firmly committed to the policies underlying the Equal Access to Justice Act and that the failure to obtain an acceptable reauthorization of the Act this year should in no way be interpreted as a reduction in that commitment. In this regard, agency heads shall again review the procedures used by their agencies to ensure that agency positions are ``substantially justified'' within the meaning of the Act. Special attention shall be given to those agency positions that affect small businesses.

Second, agencies shall accept and retain on file any applications for awards of fees and expenses pursuant to section 203 of the Act (5 U.S.C. 504) and shall continue to provide an appropriate assistance in making such applications. Agencies will not, of course, be in a position to rule on these applications until the Act is reauthorized, but otherwise shall continue to accept such applications and provide necessary assistance as if the Act were in force.

Third, as for awards relating to judicial proceedings under section 204 of the Act, agencies shall continue to accept and retain on file any demands for settlement of claims for such awards even though such claims (for cases initiated on or after October 1, 1984) cannot be filed in court until the Act is reauthorized. Once the Act is reauthorized, such claims shall then be reviewed by the agency in accordance with the terms of the reauthorized Act.

The above measures will ensure that the policies underlying the Equal Access to Justice Act will continue in effect until the Act is reauthorized and that the protections afforded to litigants by the Act -- particularly to small businesses -- will not be denied during the period between the Act's expiration and its reauthorization.

I am very pleased to sign H.R. 2300. Rewarding the Government's dedicated high-level executives, managers, and supervisors for sustained top-notch performance, as this bill will allow us to do, is a key element of management improvement in the executive branch.

This bill responds to criticisms of the present system and strengthens and improves merit pay in a meaningful way. It is the product of a lot of hard work on the part of this administration and key members of both parties in the Congress with a strong interest in improving the system of paying and rewarding our managers and executives, including Senators Paul Trible and John Warner and Congressmen Frank Wolf and Bill Dannemeyer.

These changes will ensure that we recognize our very best performers with meaningful financial rewards, both through the annual performance appraisal process and through special awards. In addition, this new system will help pave the way toward applying these important changes in the incentive and reward system to the rest of the Federal white-collar work force in the near future.

Senior executives will find much in this legislation to cheer about, too, not least of which is a change that will enable them to receive all of a bonus or Presidential rank award, and not just the amount permitted under the pay ``cap.'' They will also have improved job security in case of reductions in force and will be given more notice than at present if they are to be reassigned to a different part of the country.

Finally, and very importantly, this measure contains significant changes that will improve equity for spouses under the Federal Government's employee retirement system. This set of changes embodies all of the major provisions of a bill that the administration submitted to the Congress. It permits former spouses of Federal employees to receive survivor benefits in accordance with orders from State courts. It also requires consent by a spouse before an employee can waive survivor benefits. These changes are similar to those enacted for private sector pension plans earlier this year with the active support of the administration.

This act represents another step in my continuing effort to revitalize our Nation's intelligence capability. Given the ever-increasing difficulty of ensuring the security of this nation, it is essential that we have an Intelligence Community capable of meeting these diverse challenges. In authorizing sufficient appropriations and in providing new administrative authorities that enhance the ability of our intelligence agencies to perform their missions, Congress has, with this act, provided the basis for maintaining and building our intelligence capabilities. This act ensures that the Intelligence Community can continue to stay firmly on the path of progress that we and the Congress have charted together.

I sincerely regret the inability of the Congress to resolve the issue of continuing certain activities in Nicaragua that are important to achieving U.S. policy objectives. The necessity of U.S. support for this program is beyond question. I am signing this act with every expectation that shortly after the next Congress convenes it will provide adequate support for programs to assist the development of democracy in Central America.

I am pleased to sign H.R. 6163, the Federal District Court Organization Act of 1984. This legislation accomplishes a number of key reforms that significantly improve the environment for technological innovation. By strengthening the rights of people who are willing to risk commercializing new ideas to reap their just rewards, this legislation encourages individuals to create and develop new technologies.

The most important provision in this act is the creation of a new form of intellectual property protection for semiconductor chip products. It is easy to copy chip designs. Innovators can invest tens of millions of dollars to create and market these semiconductors, while others can copy these designs at a tiny fraction of the cost. By creating penalties against copying, this legislation significantly enhances the incentives for firms to invest in new designs. Furthermore, the legislation includes a provision encouraging other countries to provide comparable protection for U.S. semiconductors sold abroad.

The stakes in this area are tremendous. Not only does the semiconductor industry annually ship about $14 billion of semiconductors, it also employs about 200,000 people. Perhaps most important, increasingly more powerful and cheaper semiconductors are at the heart of a wide range of technologies that have increased American productivity, competitiveness, and our standard of living.

The legislation also reaffirms certain basic principles of trademark law upon which all American businesses have traditionally relied to protect the marks enabling them to distinguish their products from others. Moreover, it extends the principle of contractor ownership of federally funded inventions to those made in government-owned, contractor-operated laboratories, which takes advantage of the private sector's ability to commercialize these inventions more effectively than the Government.

The Congress passed this legislation with strong bipartisan support. My administration strongly supported these provisions that strengthen intellectual property rights. This legislation takes a major step in spurring the creative genius of America's entrepreneurs.

It is with great pleasure that I sign into law H.R. 6224, the Saint Elizabeths Hospital and District of Columbia Mental Health Services Act. This legislation, which has been developed with the participation of the administration and the District of Columbia government and was passed by unanimous vote in both Houses of the Congress, will make Saint Elizabeths Hospital an integral part of the District's mental health delivery system.

Since its establishment by the Congress in 1855, Saint Elizabeths Hospital has provided care to military personnel and to District of Columbia residents. The hospital has played an historic role in American psychiatry and continues to provide care, treatment, and rehabilitation services to approximately 1,700 inpatients. Located on more than 300 acres, it includes programs for adults, child and adolescent services, a forensic unit, an Hispanic unit, and an array of support programs necessary to ensure quality care.

The patient population of Saint Elizabeths has undergone significant shifts. For almost 100 years, most patients were Federal beneficiaries. Today, however, almost 90 percent of the inpatients and virtually all of the 2,800 outpatients are residents of the District of Columbia.

The hospital has maintained accreditation in all of its programs since 1978, receiving full accreditation by the Joint Commission on the Accreditation of Hospitals in 1980 as well as commendation by that body for the quality of care provided.

Enactment of the District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act provided impetus to the growing concern over the appropriateness of the Federal Government's operating Saint Elizabeths primarily for the benefit of the District of Columbia.

The transfer that H.R. 6224 makes possible means that the hospital will be controlled and supported at the local level. This will provide the people of the District of Columbia with an effective mental health services delivery system and will be in keeping with the modern practice of comprehensive programs for mental health care.

As provided by this legislation, the District of Columbia's plan for structuring and operating the new system will be developed in close consultation with officials of Saint Elizabeths Hospital, labor-management advisory groups, and professional and community groups in the District. In addition, public hearings will be held and plans submitted to the Congress for review. Thus, there are guarantees that the new unified system will provide a continuum of care with the full range of services that do not currently exist in the District. The groundwork for a comprehensive community-based system of mental health services is now in place.

American inventive genius requires a patent system that offers our inventors prompt and effective protection for their inventions. The Patent Law Amendments Act of 1984 effects a number of improvements in the patent system to achieve this goal.

The bill provides inventors with a new, efficient mechanism to protect their right to use their inventions without the need to expend scarce resources to obtain a patent. This procedure offers great cost savings potential to Federal agencies, which are the single largest filers of U.S. patents.

It also closes a loophole in existing law which permitted copiers to export jobs and avoid liability by arranging for final assembly of patented machines to occur offshore. The act eliminates unwarranted technicalities in the patent law that threaten the validity of patents for inventions arising from corporate research teams.

Together with other provisions that enable the Patent and Trademark Office to streamline its operations, these provisions make our patent system more responsive to the needs of our inventors and industry. America must remain at the cutting edge of technology, and a strong and effective patent system is fundamental to this goal.

Innovation and Productivity. This Commission would be established to study the productivity of inventors employed by private companies and, more generally, to make recommendations for changes in U.S. laws to better foster innovation and productivity. I strongly believe that increased innovation is essential to our continued technological leadership. The White House Conference on Productivity and the President's Commission on Industrial Competitiveness have brought together experts from government, academia, and the private sector to evaluate the impact of Federal policy on innovation and productivity. Many of their recommendations have already been implemented. A new National Commission to address this issue would simply duplicate the work of these groups.

Employed inventors have contributed greatly to our country's competitiveness in high technology areas. Nevertheless, I believe that the private sector, rather than the Federal Government, is best able to decide on methods to stimulate increased productivity on the part of employed inventors.

Innovation and Productivity. The Commission would be composed of three Senators appointed by the President of the Senate; three Members of the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker; and three members appointed by the President, of whom one shall be an ``appropriate'' officer or employee of the United States, one shall be an employer who employs inventors, and one shall be an employed inventor. Such entities are severely destructive of the tripartite system of government established by the Constitution.

Although the Commission would appear to serve primarily legislative functions, this bill would place the Commission partly within the executive branch. I believe that creation of such a Commission, which is neither clearly within the executive branch, nor clearly within the legislative branch, tends to blur the functional distinction between the governmental branches that is fundamental to the concept of separation of powers. It would be more appropriate for the Commission to be composed either entirely of members selected by the legislative branch, if it is to serve primarily legislative functions, or entirely of members appointed by the President, if it is to serve the executive branch.

Mrs. Israel is president and chief executive officer of Judy's, Inc., a group of specialty fashion stores located in five States. She is also creator and president of Golden Goose Electronics Corp., an electronic system used by retailers. She received the Merchandising Award of the Year given by the textile industry and the Los Angeles Times Woman of the Year Award in 1964 in the category of industry and finance, civic and philanthropic.

Olympics. He received a gold medal in the men's overall title, a silver medal in the vault competition, and bronze medals for the rings and parallel bars. Mr. Gaylord has been in gymnastics for 11 years and is the originator of the "Gaylord Flip" on the high bar. He was a member of the American teams in the World Championships in 1981 and 1983. He won the all-around title in the NCAA Championships this past season.

The CIA IG and the IOB both conducted detailed and extensive inquiries into the conceptual motives and administrative procedures surrounding the preparation of this manual. Both bodies noted that despite portions which could be misinterpreted, the manual had worthy purposes: instilling in Nicaraguan freedom fighters the knowledge of how to promote understanding of their goals among the people and counseling them on appropriate behavior in dealing with civilians.

Both reports found that there had been no violation by CIA personnel or contract employees of the Constitution or laws of the United States, Executive orders, or Presidential directives. The IG report identified instances of poor judgment and lapses in oversight at lower levels within the Agency. Recommendations for corrective measures to strengthen management and oversight within the CIA were approved, as well as disciplinary action where lapses in judgment or performance occurred. The President has directed that Director Casey brief the appropriate oversight committees of the Congress on the findings and recommendations contained in the IG report.

Eva Robins, of New York, NY, will serve as Chairman. She is an arbitrator and has served as assistant director of labor relations for the Borden Co. and as deputy chairman of the New York City Office of Collective Bargaining.

State through which the service runs may request the President to establish a second emergency board if the dispute remains unresolved. Emergency Boards Nos. 205 and 206 were created in response to such a request made by Governor Cuomo. The parties will now submit their final offers to Emergency Boards Nos. 205 and 206 within 30 days, and the Boards will report their selection of the most reasonable offer within 30 days thereafter. During this 60-day period, and for 60 days after the submission of the report, the parties must maintain the status quo and refrain from engaging in self-help.

Senator Warner, thank you very much. And may I thank you, also, for the crucial personal support that you gave to the building of this memorial. I extend the thanks of the Nation, also, to all who have contributed so much to this fine cause.

Ladies and gentlemen, honored guests, my remarks today will be brief because so much has been said over the years and said so well about the loyalty and the valor of those who served us in Vietnam. It's occurred to me that only one very important thing has been left unsaid, and I will try to speak of it today.

It's almost 10 years now since U.S. military involvement in Vietnam came to a close. Two years ago, our government dedicated the memorial bearing the names of those who died or are still missing. Every day, the families and friends of those brave men and women come to the wall and search out a name and touch it.

The memorial reflects as a mirror reflects, so that when you find the name you're searching for you find it in your own reflection. And as you touch it, from certain angles, you're touching, too, the reflection of the Washington Monument or the chair in which great Abe Lincoln sits.

Those who fought in Vietnam are part of us, part of our history. They reflected the best in us. No number of wreaths, no amount of music and memorializing will ever do them justice but it is good for us that we honor them and their sacrifice. And it's good that we do it in the reflected glow of the enduring symbols of our Republic.

The fighting men depicted in the statue we dedicate today, the three young American servicemen, are individual only in terms of their battle dress; all are as one, with eyes fixed upon the memorial bearing the names of their brothers in arms. On their youthful faces, faces too young to have experienced war, we see expressions of loneliness and profound love and a fierce determination never to forget.

The men of Vietnam answered the call of their country. Some of them died in the arms of many of you here today, asking you to look after a newly born child or care for a loved one. They died uncomplaining. The tears staining their mud-caked faces were not for self-pity but for the sorrow they knew the news of their death would cause their families and friends.

Today we pay homage not only to those who gave their lives but to their comrades present today and all across the country. You didn't forget. You kept the faith. You walked from the litter, wiped away your tears, and returned to the battle. You fought on, sustained by one another and deaf to the voices of those who didn't comprehend. You performed with a steadfastness and valor that veterans of other wars salute, and you are forever in the ranks of that special number of Americans in every generation that the Nation records as true patriots.

Also among the service men and women honored here today is a unique group of Americans whose fate is still unknown to our nation and to their families. Nearly 2,500 of the names on this memorial are still missing in Southeast Asia, and some may still be serving. Their names are distinguished by a cross rather than the diamond; thus, this memorial is a symbol of both past and current sacrifice.

It's been said that these memorials reflect a hunger for healing. Well, I do not know if perfect healing ever occurs, but I know that sometimes when a bone is broken, if it's knit together well, it will in the end be stronger than if it had not been broken. I believe that in the decade since Vietnam the healing has begun, and I hope that before my days as Commander in Chief are over the process will be completed.

There were great moral and philosophical disagreements about the rightness of the war, and we cannot forget them because there is no wisdom to be gained in forgetting. But we can forgive each other and ourselves for those things that we now recognize may have been wrong, and I think it's time we did.

There's been much rethinking by those who did not serve and those who did. There's been much rethinking by those who held strong views on the war and by those who did not know which view was right. There's been rethinking on all sides, and this is good. And it's time we moved on in unity and with resolve -- with the resolve to always stand for freedom, as those who fought did, and to always try to protect and preserve the peace.

And we must in unity work to account for those still missing and aid those returned who still suffer from the pain and memory of Vietnam. We must, as a society, take guidance from the fighting men memorialized by this statue. The three servicemen are watchful, ready, and challenged, but they are also standing forever together.

And let me say to the Vietnam veterans gathered here today: When you returned home, you brought solace to the loved ones of those who fell, but little solace was given to you. Some of your countrymen were unable to distinguish between our native distaste for war and the stainless patriotism of those who suffered its scars. But there's been a rethinking there, too. And now we can say to you, and say as a nation: Thank you for your courage. Thank you for being patient with your countrymen. Thank you. Thank you for continuing to stand with us together.

The men and women of Vietnam fought for freedom in a place where liberty was in danger. They put their lives in danger to help a people in a land far away from their own. Many sacrificed their lives in the name of duty, honor, and country. All were patriots who lit the world with their fidelity and courage.

They were both our children and our heroes. We will never ever forget them. We will never forget their devotion and their sacrifice. They stand before us, marching into time and into shared memory, forever. May God bless their souls.

"Three Fightingmen" statue by sculptor Frederick Hart was dedicated at the ceremony. Following his remarks, the President signed documents transferring the Vietnam Veterans Memorial to the Federal Government.

Beginning more than 100 years ago, thousands of Luxembourgers made the difficult journey across the Atlantic to the shores of the New World. And most traveled far inland, and they played a vital role in settling the plains and forests of Minnesota, Illinois, Iowa, and Wisconsin.

It's literally true, Your Highness, that the people of America and Luxembourg are cousins; yet perhaps the strongest tie between us is the sturdy bond of common ideals and heritage, for Luxembourg and America share the glorious background of American -- or of Western history, I should say -- all the lessons that men learned during the centuries-long passage to civilization.

In the past, the people of Luxembourg and America have stood together and fought together in the name of human liberty. Your Highness, you yourself fought side by side with American soldiers at Normandy just 40 years ago. The American Third Army, under General George Patton, played a central part in the liberation of Luxembourg. And in a graveyard outside Luxembourg City, General Patton and more than 5,000 American troops are laid to rest.

North Atlantic Treaty Organization, of which we're both members. Your nation works tirelessly to keep the Western alliance strong by keeping it vigorous and, in particular, by promoting a firmly united Europe. Luxembourg hosts the European Investment Bank, the Secretariat of the European Parliament, and the Court of Justice.

Your Highness, our peoples are industrious and innovative. And despite the difficulties that often go with changing economic circumstances, we in America are seeing a sustained economic expansion, while you in Luxembourg are experiencing the growth of new industries and services.

Your Highnesses, Luxembourg is a proud and beautiful land, a country of lush forests and dramatic valleys, of rolling farmland and vigorous towns. It is our honor to welcome Luxembourg's beloved Grand Duke and Duchess to America. And it's our hope that while you're here, you will come to see some of our own nation's beauty and pride. May your time with us be joyful and rewarding.

The Grand Duke. Mr. President, ladies and gentlemen, the Grand Duchess and I are deeply moved by your so kind invitation, the warm welcome, and the numerous courtesies extended to us and to our party since our arrival in the United States.

In bitter times, when the independence of our small country was at stake, we found comfort and guidance from a great President whose determination and leadership ultimately led to the final victory and recovery of democracy and freedom.

It was indeed a long and painful way to go before the United States and Allied forces hit the beachheads of Normandy on June 6th, 40 years ago. The marble crosses, thousands in number, reminded us both, and the other heads of Allied countries assembled at the Normandy memorials in June, of their sacrifice. We pledge never to forget their example. And I assure you that this promise is shared by all my fellow Luxembourgers, linked by a particularly strong bond to the men who gave their utmost during the Battle of the Bulge. More than 5,000 rest forever in our soil, with one of the great American soldiers, General George S. Patton.

Restoring peace and democracy was certainly not an easy venture. It appeared, however, that preserving them would be even harder and more challenging and would certainly have been impossible without the commitment of the United States. The American engagement in Europe has provided the foundation for one of the longest periods of peace and prosperity our continent has ever enjoyed -- to a large extent, our countries, to build the European Community.

June 9th, 1982: ``Europe's shores are our shores. Europe's borders are our borders. We will stand with [you] in defense of our heritage of liberty and dignity.'' We thank you for this statement and are pleased to assure that the fundamental values of the Atlantic alliance remain unchallenged on both sides of the Atlantic.

The links of my country with America are manifold. They go back to the times more than a century and a half ago when many of my countrymen immigrated to the north and northwestern regions. We are very proud of the fact that our blood keeps circulating in American veins and that your country has been, also, built up by the labor of my compatriots. Yet these ties have deepened since the last war. For some decades now, the ties of political life and of military defense have steadily strengthened. For about 20 years, economic realities of every kind provide us with an American presence in Luxembourg.

Grand Duke Jean met with the President today. It was the first state visit from Luxembourg in over 20 years. This was of enormous significance to the Grand Duke, coming 1 day after the 20th anniversary of the Grand Duke's ascension to the throne.

Luxembourg has pursued a pro-U.S., pro-NATO foreign policy, and the President expressed to the Grand Duke his appreciation for Luxembourg's support in this effort. Luxembourg is an active member of the Atlantic alliance. It plays a pivotal role in our common security policies, particularly for logistics, reenforcement, and communications.

The Grand Duke and the President had met previously at Normandy in June, and this was of special significance to the Grand Duke, who was then a lieutenant in the Irish Guards and participated in the Normandy invasion.

The Grand Duke recalled his experiences with the American Army that liberated Luxembourg 40 years ago. And he noted that he is especially pleased to be able to spend time this week with the U.S. Army's Fourth Infantry Division at Fort Carson, Colorado, and this is the unit that he accompanied on the liberation of Luxembourg.

The President, on his part, reviewed our efforts to reestablish a productive dialog with the Soviets on all issues, and in arms control, in particular. The President provided the Grand Duke an idea of where we hope to go in the second Reagan term. And in addition, the Grand Duke indicated that the strong vote of confidence the President received from the American electorate will enable this administration to deal with the Soviets from a position of great confidence.

The Grand Duke noted that Luxembourg will assume the Presidency of the European Community in the latter half of 1985. And he noted that he would want his government to work closely with the U.S. in managing the U.S. economic community relations.

Mr. Belso is a partner in the Biro-Belso real estate firm in New Brunswick, NJ. He is vice chairman of the board of directors of the Magyar Savings & Loan Association and has been a member of the board of directors since 1965. He is former commissioner of the New Brunswick Human Rights Commission and former State-appointed commissioner to the New Brunswick Housing Authority.

Together, they learned local agriculture from the Indians, erected log cabins, and cleared farmland. Pushing their clearings to the foothills of the Alleghenies, they passed through mountain gaps and crossed the prairies together in covered wagons.

Women were partners in American life from the founding of our first settlements. Men and women together in family enterprises began to process food, weave fabrics, and market food and fiber. As the settlements became towns and then cities, and as agricultural jobs became more specialized, women remained partners in the maturing of the agriculture of our Nation.

Today, agriculture employs 22 million people who work with food and fiber in growing, harvesting, processing, transporting, and retailing. Women are active in farm management, finances, and community life and in establishing agricultural policy. They are also active in all phases of agribusiness and in agricultural processing and marketing. It is appropriate, therefore, that we set aside a week to recognize the role of women in this most basic of all industries.

I call on all Americans to participate in appropriate events to pay tribute to women in agriculture whose talents, hard work, and dedication significantly contribute to the production and marketing of the Nation's food supplies.

One of this Nation's greatest blessings is the abundant food supply on which we all depend each and every day of our lives. Our food stores, with row after row of wholesome, nutritious foods, display a sight so commonplace that Americans tend to forget the enormous effort involved in our complex system of food production, distribution, and marketing.

Our food supply depends upon the farmers who plant their crops and through hard work, faith, and patience, bring in a golden harvest. But it also depends on many people who live in towns and cities. It relies on those who provide farm equipment and production supplies for farmers, as well as on the processors who prepare the products for delivery throughout the Nation by a dependable network of transportation. Finally, we rely on the merchants who store and sell the agricultural products.

National Farm-City Week near Thanksgiving. As we give thanks for our food in this great land of freedom, let us also pause to salute the 23 million Americans who work directly in some essential task in agriculture, on farms, and in cities.

In Witness Whereof,  I have hereunto set my hand this thirteenth day of November, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-four, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and ninth.

Families have always stood at the center of our society, preserving good and worthy traditions from our past and entrusting those traditions to our children, our greatest hope for the future. At a time when many fear that the family is in decline, it is fitting that we give special recognition to those who are rebuilding families by promoting adoption.

More children with permanent homes mean fewer children with permanent problems. That is why we must encourage a national effort to promote the adoption of children, and particularly children with special needs. Through the Adoption Assistance and Child Welfare Act of 1980, some 6,000 children have been adopted who otherwise might not have been, and the number is growing. The recently enacted Child Abuse Prevention and Treatment Act will provide further assistance to couples who adopt children with special needs.

We must never forget those couples who know the anguish of prolonged waiting to welcome an adopted child into their home. One aspect of the tragedy of the 1.5 million abortions performed each year is that so many women who undergo abortions are unaware of the many couples who desperately want to share their loving homes with a baby. No woman need fear that the child she carries is unwanted. We must continue to promote constructive alternatives to abortion through the Adolescent Family Life program and by encouraging the efforts of private citizens who are helping women with crisis pregnancies.

National Adoption Week gives us an opportunity to reaffirm our commitment to give every child waiting to be adopted the chance to become part of a family. During this Thanksgiving season, let us work to encourage community acceptance and support for adoption and take time to recognize the efforts of the parent groups and agencies that assure adoptive placements for waiting children.

Yesterday the people of Luxembourg marked a great day in the life of their nation, the 20th anniversary of the ascension to the throne of His Royal Highness Grand Duke Jean. Your Highness, on behalf of all Americans, permit me to give you and your people our heartfelt congratulations.

Luxembourg possesses a thousand years and more of national history. It's a beautiful and a varied land, ranging from the forests and hills of the north to the fertile plains of the south. It's a prosperous country with a mighty steel industry and dozens of new industries and services gathering strength. And it's a nation of self-confidence and charm, with a gracious way of life based on an abiding love of family and freedom. Luxembourg is a proud and alluring country.

Yet Luxembourg acquires still greater strength and vitality as an active member of the family of nations. It was a founder of both the North Atlantic Treaty Organization and the European Community. In your free and fair world trade, Luxembourg has set an example for all nations to follow and shown the world that prosperity comes not with less but with more international trade.

Individual Luxembourgers have rendered outstanding diplomatic services. Robert Schuman, one of the leading advocates of a united Europe, was a native of your country. Joseph Bech was instrumental in bringing the European coal and steel community to Luxembourg in 1951. And men like Gaston Thorn and Pierre Werner have played memorable roles in world diplomacy.

Over the years, relations between Luxembourg and the United States have been those of close and abiding friends. We view with the deepest respect your contributions to NATO, including the registration of AWAC's aircraft and your splendid efforts during the Enforcer exercises. And we look forward to consulting closely with your government when Luxembourg assumes the Presidency of the Council of the European Community during the latter half of next year.

Your Highness, we in the United States are convinced that the Western world faces a future of strength and prosperity. In recent years, the Western allies have stood together against the bluff and bluster of our adversaries and become more firmly united than ever. And although all of us have passed through difficult periods of economic adjustment, many of our basic industries are becoming more efficient, and breakthroughs in high technology and other new fields are leading our nations into a time of sustained growth. For Luxembourg, America, and so many other free nations, today our future promises not stagnation and decline, but opportunity and hope.

War II. He had a winning personality, and before long, the good people of Eschweiler took him into their homes and hearts. They told him what life in the village had been like before the war and then during the Nazi occupation. And George, in turn, opened his heart. He told the people that he was an only son, told them all his hopes for when the war was over. And in those few weeks, a deep bond formed between the people of that ancient village and the amiable young Yankee.

Some time afterward, the people of Eschweiler learned that George had taken part in a fierce battle on the plains between Luxembourg and Belgium. It was called the Battle of the Bulge. And it cost George his life.

We are confident that this great nation, under your able leadership, will continue to give the necessary guidance to all the countries of the free world and encourage democracies in their endeavor to promote freedom.

The people of Luxembourg will never forget the generous help of their American friends, which twice preserved our freedom and our independence. Corresponding to our national motto, we wish to remain what we are. This is the reason why, after leaving Washington, I will visit Colorado Springs in order to pay tribute to the American Army and Air Force.

Mr. President, we all know relations between our two countries are excellent. I am convinced that we could improve them even more. As mutual understanding, upon which friendship is based, exists between us, there should be no difficulty to proceed successfully in this way.

May I add a special thanks to you, Mr. President, for having mentioned my 20th anniversary which took place yesterday on the 12th of November when I took over from my dear mother. It was really awfully kind of you to mention it this evening. Thank you again.

May I ask you now to rise for a toast to the President of the United States of America, to the well-being and the prosperity of the American people, and to the friendship between Luxembourg and the United States.

Despite our different political beliefs and perspectives on international problems, I am confident we can make progress on strengthening peace and resolving our differences through discussions and negotiations. We hope you will join us in the critical work needed to reduce international tensions and to create a safer world.

The President. Well, can I just say, Joe, you and Dale deserve a lot of credit for retrieving those satellites. You know, we've got a little gym here at the White House, and I pump a little iron whenever I get the chance. But I don't know about that satellite lifting; maybe that'll become a new high-tech Olympic sport.

Rick, you and Dave and Anna were a great team keeping the Discovery right in position and working the Canadian arm during the retrieval operation. I guess you may have been a little busier than on previous flights, since you've been taking on some cargo.

Astronaut Gardner. Mr. President, that man-maneuvering unit worked perfectly for both Joe on the first EVA and for myself on the second. The docking with the satellite and capture was exactly as we had trained to in simulators on the ground. It was a real pleasure doing it.

Astronaut Fisher. Oh, that I would, Mr. President. The experience is just everything I expected, even more. Seeing the world below us, it makes you realize just how we're all just part of this world. It's a truly incredible experience, and I'm going to recommend it very highly.

Well, I just want you all to know how proud we are of what you've achieved on this mission. Our space program has reached another important milestone with your successful retrieval of those two satellites. You've demonstrated that by putting man in space, on board America's space shuttle, we can work in space in ways that we never imagined were possible. Bless you all.

The President. Well, you shall have it. I have to go to work down here on Earth. And I know you'll be finishing up to head back here tomorrow, so, have a safe return, and, I might add, a soft landing with those valuable satellites on board.

Strong families are the foundation of society. Through them we pass on our traditions, rituals, and values. From them we receive the love, encouragement, and education needed to meet human challenges. Family life provides opportunities and time for the spiritual growth that fosters generosity of spirit and responsible citizenship.

National Family Week gives us a chance to honor families and to renew our commitment to the family strength that gives people the ability to withstand external influences and maintain their individual integrity. We should take this occasion to commend the loyalty family members show one another in facing the adversities as well as the joys of life together. And let us especially honor those Americans who, through adoption or foster care, have extended their families as centers of love and life to those in need of true family support.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this fifteenth day of November, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-four, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and ninth.

The United States and the Soviet Union have agreed to enter into new negotiations with the objective of reaching mutually acceptable agreements on the whole range of questions concerning nuclear and outer space arms. In order to reach a common understanding as to the subject and objectives of such negotiations, Secretary of State George P. Shultz and Foreign Minister Andrey Gromyko will meet in Geneva on January 7 - 8.

The Governments of the United States and Iraq have agreed to resume diplomatic relations, effective today. This agreement was concluded today between President Reagan and Deputy Prime Minister and Foreign Minister of Iraq, Tariq M. `Aziz. The two countries' diplomatic missions are upgraded as of this date from interest sections to Embassies, and their principal officers will hold the title of charge d'affaires, pending the appointment of Ambassadors.

Home care services, which are rapidly gaining acceptance throughout the Nation, allow the physically and mentally impaired who do not require skilled nursing home care to remain in their own homes, or to stay with their families, instead of being moved to an institution. Home care provides individualized support services to permit maximum independence for those in need of assistance.

Progress in medical science and the generally rising level of health care from birth are contributing to a greater number of people living longer. A corollary to this advance is an increase in chronic illnesses of the aged that require care over an extended period of time. Home care provides the assistance needed to help older Americans to maintain independence despite such illness. All Americans should commend those individuals who provide personal and health care in the home.

In Witness Whereof,  I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-sixth day of November, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-four, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and ninth.

Epidermolysis Bullosa, or ``EB,'' is a group of hereditary disorders in which the skin forms blisters after minimal injury or even simple pressure. Symptoms of the disease can resemble severe burns and can be very painful and debilitating. Mucous membranes of the mouth, eye, and gastrointestinal tract may be affected and lead to scarring, malnutrition, anemia, and even premature death.

Basic research is just beginning to reveal the underlying causes of EB. New research findings and new approaches to diagnosis and treatment are needed to eliminate this affliction. The Federal government and private voluntary organizations have developed a strong and enduring partnership committed to EB research in order to reduce or eliminate the disease and its painful consequences.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-sixth day of November, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-four, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and ninth.

On December 1, 1959, in Washington, D.C., the twelve nations then active in Antarctica pledged themselves to an imaginative experiment in international cooperation and understanding. The Antarctic Treaty, signed that day, reserves a major region of our planet exclusively for scientific research and other peaceful endeavors. The Treaty bans all military activities, including the testing of weapons in Antarctica, and prohibits nuclear explosions and the disposal of radioactive wastes there. It guarantees the freedom of scientific research and establishes a consultative mechanism to allow the Treaty system to meet new challenges and adapt to new circumstances. To achieve these objectives, it embodies unique conflict-avoidance provisions permitting countries which disagree over the legal status of Antarctica to work together harmoniously.

Now a quarter century later, we can all take pride in the accomplishments and vitality of this important treaty system. It has fully realized its objectives of maintaining Antarctica as an area free of conflict and devoted to peaceful international cooperation. Membership in the Treaty system has continued to expand and, within this system, effective steps are being taken to ensure that new activities in Antarctica are managed in a responsible fashion and do not threaten Antarctica's environment. The Antarctic Treaty represents an outstanding example of how countries with diverse political perspectives and interests -- East and West, North and South -- can work together for the benefit of all.

The Antarctic Treaty incorporates and extends to the realm of international relations the spirit of practical cooperation which scientists working in Antarctica have displayed from the earliest explorations onward. It is fitting, therefore, to commemorate the twenty-fifth anniversary of the Treaty by saluting the scientists and station personnel whose exciting and important work in Antarctica continue to reflect the universal ideals reflected in the Treaty. I commend your commitment to the search for knowledge and send my best wishes to all of you for a productive season.

In my State of the Union Address last January, I asked the Secretary of the Treasury to develop a plan to make our tax system more fair and more simple, with greater incentives for economic growth and with a broader tax base so that personal tax rates could come down, not go up.

Today I have received the Treasury study. I want first to thank Secretary Regan. He and his staff have worked long and hard to come up with a most comprehensive study of the modern American tax system, along with recommendations for improving it.

The report is lengthy and complex. All of us will need time to study the entire document. We are willing to listen to the comments and suggestions of all Americans, and especially those from the Congress -- its leaders and members of the tax writing committees. Secretary Regan has already briefed the Cabinet and some congressional leaders. Over the next several days he and his staff will be doing additional consultation.

At first glance, the Treasury study certainly proposes a simpler and fairer tax system, with lower rates for taxpayers and personal exemptions increased to $2,000. It is also something that I insisted upon: a tax simplification and not a tax increase in disguise.

I have asked Secretary Regan to make his study public at this time -- prior to my own decisions on exactly what simplifying legislation to propose to the Congress -- because I know that a task as difficult as overall simplification of our tax system will generate much debate, and I want all those interested in the subject to have the same information as we have.

Over the next few weeks, I intend personally to review the Treasury recommendations carefully, along with public and congressional reactions to them. I will present my tax simplification and reform plan to Congress early next year, when I hope we can move ahead in a bipartisan manner to benefit all Americans.

Since the advent of nuclear weapons, we have largely depended upon the threat of prompt nuclear retaliation to deter aggression. This approach has worked, and we, along with our allies, have succeeded in protecting Western security for more than three decades. At the same time, we are constantly searching for better ways to strengthen peace and stability.

On March 23, 1983, the President announced a decision to take an important first step toward investigating the possibility of an alternative future which did not rely solely on nuclear retaliation for our security. This involves an intensified research program aimed at establishing how we might eliminate the threat posed by nuclear armed ballistic missiles.

The Strategic Defense Initiative (SDI) is a research program consistent with all our treaty commitments, including the 1972 ABM treaty. The United States is committed to the negotiation of equal and verifiable agreements which bring real reductions in the nuclear arsenals of both sides. To that end, the President has offered the Soviet Union the most comprehensive set of arms control proposals in history. We are working tirelessly for the success of these efforts, but we can and must be prepared to go further. It is intended that our research efforts under the SDI complement these arms reduction efforts and help to pave the way to a more stable and secure world.

In the near term, SDI research and development responds to the massive Soviet ABM effort, which includes actual deployments and thus provides a powerful deterrent to a Soviet breakout of the ABM treaty. In the long term, SDI may be the means by which both the United States and the Soviet Union can safely agree to very deep reductions and perhaps someday even the elimination of offensive nuclear arms.

In short, through the SDI research program the President has called on the best scientific minds in our country to turn their collective talents toward the cause of strengthening world peace by establishing the feasibility of rendering nuclear weapons impotent and obsolete. In doing so, the United States seeks neither military superiority or political advantage. Our single purpose with this initiative is to search for ways to make the world a safer place.

The President. It's been both an honor and a pleasure to have Prime Minister Ratu Mara of Fiji and his wife as our guests. And this is an historic occasion. The Prime Minister is the first head of state from the nine independent Pacific island nations to pay an official visit here at the White House. The Fijian nation he so ably represents is a model of democracy and freedom, a tremendous example for all the countries of the developing world.

Fijians can be proud, indeed, that in their country people from diverse religious, racial, and cultural backgrounds live and work together in peace and freedom. This accomplishment -- and it is a great accomplishment -- is a tribute to your democratic institutions and to the character of your people. Mr. Prime Minister, when you return to your country, I hope you will convey to your citizens the deep respect and admiration of the American people.

Fijians are our brothers and sisters in the family of democratic nations. We share values that are at the heart of our societies, the most important of which is our abiding love of human liberty. That was underscored to many Americans who fought alongside Fijians in the Second World War during the Solomon Islands campaign, a turning point in the Pacific Theater. We stood together then in the cause of human freedom. That bravery is matched today by the magnificent commitment that your people have made to the cause of peace. Under your leadership, Mr. Prime Minister, Fiji has become a vital part of international peacekeeping missions in the Sinai and in Lebanon. And America knows all too well the price that peacekeepers sometimes pay. Your fallen heroes of peace have a place in our hearts.

The Fijian peoples' sense of decency in the conduct of international affairs has been expressed on many occasions in recent years. And we, again, have found ourselves standing shoulder to shoulder in our condemnation of the brutal invasion of Afghanistan and the deliberate shooting down of a civilian Korean airliner. Americans also deeply appreciate your support of our efforts to rescue our students and restore democracy to the people of Grenada.

And I've enjoyed this opportunity to get to know Prime Minister Ratu Mara. He is a man to look up to in many ways. Oxford-educated and deeply religious, a man of conviction and wisdom, he has provided exemplary leadership for his people in the crucial beginning stages of democracy.

His support of free enterprise and a market economy has enabled his people to enjoy stable economic progress. He has kept Fiji on a steady course and has always defended the principles on which his country was founded, principles that we Americans share. I'm particularly grateful for the sense of responsibility that he has demonstrated in the area of regional security. Having weighed his legitimate concern over nuclear issues against the defense needs of his country and the Oceania region, in 1983 Prime Minister Ratu Mara reopened Fiji's ports to all our American naval vessels. I know that such decisions are not easy and reflect a high degree of political courage. I applaud your statesmanship, Mr. Prime Minister.

I've thoroughly enjoyed our exchange of ideas today. The Prime Minister taught me the meaning of doing things the ``Pacific way.'' He represents a vital and dynamic way. He represents an area of the world that is becoming increasingly important to the United States. We want to work more closely with the people of Fiji and Oceania to help their region continue on a course of stable economic progress and democratic government, free from international tensions and rivalries.

Minister's visit has been a significant step forward. For this visit, and for sharing your insights, I give you my heartfelt thanks: vinaka. I look forward to working closely with you in the future, and, Mr. Prime Minister, the people of the United States wish you and your wife a pleasant visit in the United States and a safe journey home. Nisa moce.

The Prime Minister. Well, Mr. President, I'm very pleased, indeed, that it has been possible for you to find time in your busy schedule to meet me on this occasion and soon after your reelection to the Presidency. This is an indication of the warm ties of friendship between our two countries.

Our meeting and discussions this morning has brought our relationship onto a new and exciting level. There is now much greater understanding and appreciation of each other's views and aspirations. Our two countries have stood together for those common principles of justice, freedom, and fairplay.

World War. Our men fought side by side in the Pacific war in defense of our respective ways of life and shared values. Like your country, we stand for peace and appreciate determination to maintain peace and security everywhere.

We believe in peace, and we are ready to play our part in order to demonstrate that belief. That is why we are involved in UNIFIL and the multinational force and observers in Sinai. But as a small island nation -- and like others in the South Pacific and elsewhere -- we look to you and your country for support and guidance in many of our endeavors.

This outlook is both sensible and logical in view of your vast size and what appears to us to be a country of unlimited resource. Moreover, there is a basic similarity and broadly common origin of many of our economic and political institutions. All these go to help our people feel at home in each other's company and make dialog and communication between our two countries meaningful and enjoyable.

Peace Corps. They worked with us at different levels of our administration and with our people in rural areas. Your South Pacific AID program has been of considerable assistance to the development activities of the Fiji Government, voluntary organizations, and regional institutions in our country.

We are confident that your assistance will continue in the future, because we believe that you see it as part of your overall responsibility in our part of the world. And this is an effective guarantee for peace and stability in our islands.

Q. It's been suggested you have only 6 to 18 months to accomplish your agenda before your postelection honeymoon with the Congress ends. What is your strategy to capitalize on your victory with an even more recalcitrant Congress, particularly after the 1986 congressional elections? Doesn't this threaten the completion of the Reagan revolution?

The President. Well, I've never thought that the completion of what we've been trying to accomplish is going to be easy, particularly as long as there is in the House a definite majority of the other side. On the other hand, we have accomplished, I think, a great deal. We'd be much further ahead if we'd gotten all that we'd asked for from the very beginning, but we're going to keep right on with those things and see what we can do.

First of all, I think we have to go after some budget reforms. You realize there hasn't been a budget since I've been here -- and, I guess, even before I got here. The budgeting process is just a kind of a chaotic thing and, finally, you get a package of appropriation bills. Until we can have a budgeting process where you start out and set a figure as to what overall can be spent and, then, within that, negotiate out as to which program gets how much and arrive at a consensus on that, we're going to be in trouble.

We need to do that. We need the balanced budget amendment; we need the line-item veto if we're to do those things. We need economic growth for that. We've got to have the tax simplification program that we've been studying and working on. We've got to have such things as enterprise zones -- everything that will help stimulate the growth of the economy, because that is the sure way back to sensible running of the Government.

And we've got the -- it goes without saying -- the defense and the security assistance measures and so forth. That we have to have. That's the top priority of government in the sense that that's the main constitutional requirement, is the security of the people.

And what we're going to do is try to work with the leadership of the Congress. And I'm not sure that it is even more hostile or inimical. If it is, and if it simply tries to throw roadblocks, then, yes, we take our case to the people.

Q. Mr. President, the deficit has been described as a debt that the people, the American people, owe themselves. As such, does the deficit really matter, or has the slowdown in the economy forced you to reconsider whether growth can substantially reduce the deficit?

The President. Well, of course, we had this example this year in which some $20 billion came out of the deficit as it had been projected by ourselves for this present year, and that was almost entirely due to the economic growth. But when you say the deficit and does it really matter, well, for 50 years that's what the Democrats have been telling us, that it didn't, that we owed it to ourselves.

I think to look at just the deficit ignores the real problem. The deficit is a result. What you have to get at is the problem, and that is government is spending too much, and it's spending too big a share of the private sector -- that's why my opposition to those who think that the only answer to deficit spending is higher taxes. Well, we've done that in the past, and all it did was take the burden off the backs of those who wanted to spend more, so they could just go ahead and spend more.

So, we go back to what the classical economists used to say at the turn of the century, that when we had, as they put it, business cycles and hard times, it was usually when government spending crept up to above -- they never told you what the percentage was, but above a certain percentage of the gross national product, took that much more money out of the private sector. That's when you had hard times.

I don't think there's anyone that would suggest that at this point you could suddenly come back and say, ``Here, we're'' -- not without hurting an awful lot of people. What I think you have to do is look down the road and say, ``Let's aim at a target here that we're going to get this budget on a declining pattern.'' And then maybe you can't exactly foretell the day at which it would happen, but if you can get the spending level, the share of private level coming -- or even if it isn't coming down, if your budget continues to increase to meet needs and whatever inflation there is, but if it increases at a lower rate than it has been and if the growth of the economy you can bring up, those two lines are going to meet someday, and when they meet, you've balanced the budget. And as this one goes on past, you begin to get the surplus that you should use to reduce the national debt. And this is what we're trying to do.

The President. Oh, that one, yes. Well, you kind of got me. There on my desk is the printed version of the whole study of the Treasury Department. And no decisions have been made. We've just had a briefing of the Cabinet on it; everyone is now studying it. I think it has come with a recognition that there are some options in there, that it is not a hard and fast plan. And so, I want to study this.

And then, when you say about Congress -- we've got two tax proposals in Congress, and one from the Democratic side, one from the Republican side, not too far apart -- as I don't think this one is too far apart.

Well, I think that it shows that the climate is there, that if we get going -- and we want to take this up with the Democratic leadership; we also want to make it available to the public, to all the various groups out there, so that they understand what it is we're trying to do. And I think that with all of that pot there of three, you might say, proposals, I think we can come up with a plan that calls for simplification and lower tax rates in the areas that will make it more fair than the tax system is; certainly simplified.

And I know that there are some very interesting proposals the Treasury Department has come up with to do that with regard to easing the burden at the bottom, lowering the rates for everybody, and simplification, making it far more simple. For one thing, the going down to 3 tax brackets instead of 14 is a pretty good step.

Now it looks like there isn't a senior foreign policy post in the White House for a woman who dazzled them in Dallas, Jeane Kirkpatrick. How can you let her leave the Cabinet, and what will you offer her to induce her to stick around?

I've known about her feelings now about the U.N. job. But I don't know when she talks whether she is determined that she wants to return to her previous profession in the academic world or whether she is still interested in government. And believe me, I want to find something for her in government if I can, because I count on her a great deal, and I value her abilities and her great intelligence too much to just sit there and let her go if there's a way to keep her.

The President. I don't see anything there that would be worthy of her. So, I'm going to -- but it depends, first of all, on what are her desires -- what is it, how strongly does she feel about whether she wants to leave entirely.

The President. I did that to keep her there as long as she has. [Laughter] But I have to -- no, it's difficult for me, when someone really has served and done the job and you know that they've kind of had it, it's very difficult for me to try to persuade them to do it.

Q. Mr. President, why, after an overwhelming electoral victory, has arms control become such a high priority for you and that there's now a rush to the negotiating table? Isn't the ``evil empire'' evil any longer, or aren't you still concerned about the Soviet disdain for treaty obligations?

The President. I have been as critical as anyone of previous agreements in many instances where I thought somebody just made an agreement to have an agreement. I have all the quotes of Brezhnev and others with regard to detente and what they thought of it. I don't know whether you're aware that Mr. Brezhnev said that detente was serving their purpose and that by 1985, they would be able to get whatever they wanted by other means.

So, I have no illusions about them. But I do believe that the Soviets can be dealt with if you deal with them on the basis of what is practical for them and that you can point out is to their advantage as well as ours to do certain things.

Now, I think they have seen that if it's to be an arms race, if we are determined that we're not going to let them maintain or enlarge their superiority in weapons -- and they know our industrial power and might -- and they see that we're determined to not let them maintain or continue that lead, then, rather than an arms race, I think there's an advantage to them in saying, well, maybe we'd better find a different way. And believe me, I would not hold still for a deal that simply makes a deal.

Evil empire, the things of that kind, I thought -- I wasn't just sounding off; I figured it was time to get their attention, to let them know that I was viewing them realistically. And I think it's worked.

They -- you know, everyone says about the horrible relations between the two of us, but they haven't gained an inch of territory in these 4 years. And in the 4 years before, there was Afghanistan and there was Ethiopia and South Yemen, and there they were, advancing down through Africa. So, I don't think the relations have been all that bad.

Government of Nicaragua. How can you live with this restriction? And doesn't it send a message to the world that it might be risky to be a friend of the United States, as it was when President Carter was here?

The President. Well, this is one of the things where I think the Congress, up till now, has been shortsighted and, in fact, irresponsible with regard to that situation down there. And we know that there was a kind of a consensus of feeling just recently among them, when they believed, as we all did, that possibly that ship was bearing high-performance planes, MiG's, to Nicaragua. We don't know for sure that it wasn't. We can't prove that it was; we can't prove that it wasn't, because of some maneuverings that went on. But there are six more Russian ships, as nearly as we can count, that are on their way to Nicaragua now with more arms. I think that maybe, if they remember that feeling that they had with regard to the possibility of high-performance planes, that they will see that there is value in our carrying on.

What we have are revolutionaries that only a short time ago they and the Sandinistas were all on the same side, fighting the same revolution -- and fighting it ostensibly, and by their own claim, for democratic processes. Now, they got in and, a la Cuba under Castro, the one faction took over, has created a totalitarian Marxist state, and the others are still in the revolution, still trying for the democratic principles that they'd fought for in the beginning. And the very fact that the Sandinista element is continuing to support revolutionaries who are trying to overthrow a duly elected government, this is of itself of great interest to us.

The President. Well, we have let them and we've let the Soviet Union know that this is something we cannot sit back and just take, if they do that, because that is so obviously, then, a threat to the area. That's not -- well, their whole military today isn't defensive. Their whole military is greater than all the combined countries of Central America put together, and it's so obviously offensive in nature that we can't ignore that. And that would be just the crowning thing to have those high-performance planes representing a threat to the area and to the hemisphere. And we've made it plain that we're not going to sit by quietly and accept that.

The President. Yeah. I know they do things like that. And so, we're keeping watch on what's there. We're not going to raise Cain over a purely domestic type cargo, or anything of that kind, but we are in contact with the Soviet Union.

The President. No. We do know that in several of the ports where those ships have touched down, there have been evidence of those aircraft and crates that could contain them. And we want to know that after the ships leave, those aircraft are still there.

Q. Speaking of Libya, Mr. President, your administration's taken a strong rhetorical line against state terrorism. What are you going to do about Colonel Mu`ammar Qadhafi of Libya, the world's most prominent practitioner of terrorism?

The President. Well, again, it's one of those things that you can know and he can talk, but you couldn't go into court and prove that actually they were responsible for it, anymore than you could've a couple of other governments that we feel are apparently supporting terrorist movements.

So, what we do is try -- intelligence is the most important thing with regard to terrorism: Can you, in some way, find or get access to information that would let you know where and when operations are planned. Can you get information that really ties a terrorist group to a certain force or a certain government. Among the things that we're trying to do is if -- and we're having some reasonable success with getting together with the other nations to do what we did some years ago with regard to hijackings, so that we all pool our information; we all inform each other of everything that we know. And we take action so that there are no safe harbors for terrorists, that they can't cross a border and find that they won't be troubled.

The President. The other thing is when it comes to if you can't intercept -- punish, to retaliate, there again, you've got to be able to get some evidence as to where are the bases from whence come these terrorists that you could strike at. And at the same time, you have to recognize that you don't want to just carelessly go out and maybe kill innocent people. Then you're as bad as the terrorists.

The President. I think there what George Shultz said in his speech -- that caused a little hoopla for a time -- what he was saying to our people was that you must recognize that in this whole thing, if you're going to try to defend against terrorism, there are going to come some times when military action will be called for. And you need the public understanding of that and their awareness so that they will know it is necessary if you're to conquer this problem.

Now, South Africa is willing for Namibia to become independent, but not while on the northern border of Namibia sits Angola with the Cubans and the possibility remains of Namibia becoming another satellite of the Communist bloc. So, what he's back and forth negotiating is that -- for to create Namibia, for Angola to agree to remove the Cuban troops, and South Africa has agreed that they will move out, and they will be helpful in making this a state. And he's made quite a bit of progress.

For the first time, Angola has made a declaration that they are prepared to bring about the withdrawal. It's a negotiating matter. They want to phase it, and they have some conditions on doing this. And so, he has come back just recently, but he'll be going back again.

Q. Mr. President, the Syrians seem now to have become the serious focus in the Middle East, and with your September 1982 peace plan at least grievously wounded, if not dying, do you think it can be revived, or, if not, do you have another initiative that you're going to pursue there?

The President. Well, no, I think that was the proper course to take, and I think that it is a little closer than it's been for some time. The very fact now that King Hussein has recognized Egypt, which kind of strengthens Egypt's position as being accepted back in the Arab community even though it has the peace treaty with Israel -- the recognition the other day or the restoring of relations with Iraq is a step forward.

I think that there has been some trust built up by the moderate Arab States in the United States as an intermediary in trying to bring about -- see, we're not trying to negotiate the peace. They have to negotiate the peace. Syria is, and still is, the stumbling block. But even so, now there is the negotiation going on with regard to the removal of Israel's troops from Lebanon.

So, I think that some things are coming together now which, if anything, including the fact that the PLO held its meeting in Amman instead of Damascus -- I think these things are all leading toward the possibility again of getting the Arab States to agree to negotiate.

You see, they've been sitting there with the position that they refuse to recognize Israel's right to exist as a nation. Well, you can't negotiate with someone until that's removed. Well, Egypt did it.

And now I think the attitude of Hussein shows that -- Jordan can't be alone in doing that, but I think that what they're saying is that if the others can come together on this and enter into negotiations -- the PLO; we now see them taking on the radical faction in their own midst that was pro-Syrian.

In the history of this Nation, there has been a small number of men and women whose contributions to its traditions of freedom, justice, and individual rights have accorded them a special place of honor in our hearts and minds, and to whom all Americans owe a lasting debt.

William Penn, as a British citizen, founded the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania in order to carry out an experiment based upon representative government; public education without regard to race, creed, sex, or ability to pay; and the substitution of workhouses for prisons. He had a Quaker's deep faith in divine guidance, and as the leader of the new colony, he worked to protect rights of personal conscience and freedom of religion. The principles of religious freedom he espoused helped to lay the groundwork for the First Amendment of our Constitution.

As a man of peace, William Penn was conscientiously opposed to war as a means of settling international disputes and worked toward its elimination by proposing the establishment of a Parliament of Nations, not unlike the present-day United Nations.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 28th day of Nov., in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-four, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and ninth.

There are very few men or women in public life more widely respected than you. Your reputation for leadership, thoughtfulness and personal integrity is based on a record of outstanding performance in every job you have held. So it wasn't hard for me to decide last year to ask you to serve once more as Administrator of the Environmental Protection Agency. Although my decision was an easy one, I know that your decision to accept was very difficult, since it involved an extraordinary personal sacrifice in putting aside your career in the private sector and moving, with your family, across the continent from Washington State to Washington, D.C. In making your decision to accept, I know you did what you have consistently done: You looked first and foremost toward the public interest.

Since reassuming control of EPA, you have performed your duties in an exemplary manner and have justified fully the faith which I and so many Americans have in you. You have made absolutely clear our commitment to wise stewardship of the environment. In doing so, you have established the firm foundations on which your successor can continue to build -- and in which Americans can have complete confidence.

I can understand your desire to return to private life at this time, but I want to express my personal and very warm thanks -- as well as the appreciation of a grateful Nation -- for the outstanding job you have done. Nancy and I send you and Jill our very best wishes for every future success and happiness.

My sense of accomplishment derives from the current state of E.P.A. Employee morale and competence is high; first-rate Presidential appointees are in place; a management system has been installed that is functioning well; and all of the programs have generated momentum.

As a leader of the Senate, he has been endlessly patient and full of care and high purpose. He is a hero of the Republic. And I want to thank you, Howard, and let you know you're going to be greatly missed.

I want to mention also John Tower of Texas, one of the giants of the modern Senate who has done great work for his nation. So, too, with Chuck Percy and Roger Jepsen, who served our party and our country extremely well. We'll miss them.

Last week out at the ranch -- and it's not true, by the way, that we had to get people to fly over and drop more brush for me to clear -- [laughter] -- last week out at the ranch, I was digging some irrigation ditches. And it occurred to me that digging ditches was precisely the kind of hard labor that I ought to be doing to prepare for the next 4 years, because our great victory now of 1984 is over and to the victor belong the toils. [Laughter] That is the saying, isn't it?

Republican Revolution, and all of you are its leaders. I truly believe that we're now the majority party not only of the Senate but of the Nation. But if we're to keep our new status and hold it, indeed, if we're to continue to restore it -- or deserve it, I should say, we must, all of us, join together and seize the challenges that history has seen fit to hand us.

We can make it fair and clear. And we can make sure that all those who take risks will be able to enjoy the rewards that those risks entail. We have the opportunity to create a tax system that will not punish all those who could and would be the most productive members of our society, and we must.

This is, as I said, an historic opportunity, and the time to seize it is now. Some of the most productive work of your political lives will be done over the next few years. And if all of us can do what we should about taxes, then history will recall us with kindness and respect. The same holds true for our obligation to continue to cut Federal spending and get the budget monster back in its cage.

We have the continued opportunity to make it clear together in the wider theater of the world that we're absolutely committed to democracy and absolutely opposed to totalitarianism of whatever stripe. We have the responsibility to stand for freedom in a world lit by lightning, and together we must.

So many challenges before us, but together we can change the world. Here we are, all of us, together on this bright and brisk November evening. And I hope we remember this time together, remember the good feeling and the shared comitment in this room.

It's always a struggle for those of us in political life to take the long view and to brave decisions without regard to personal political cost. There are times when we fail in the struggle and times when we succeed. And I suspect the next few years will test us more than usual, but I know we're up to it. And I know that we Republicans will stick together, as united as the Union our party long ago fought to preserve. We'll have our battles ahead of us, but they're good battles, and they're worth fighting for.

I hope the loyal opposition realizes exactly how committed I am and you are to changing the status quo and improving our national life. We won't be resting on our laurels, even if we were so inclined, which we're not. History wouldn't allow it. We've been handed great opportunities and great challenges, and we intend to meet them together.

The President. Chancellor Kohl and I met today to discuss a wide range of issues. Characteristic of our relationship, our talks were friendly, useful, and productive. There's a high level of cooperation and personal rapport between us. As always, I was glad to have such thorough consultations with the Chancellor and his government.

I call your attention to the joint statement issued as a result of today's discussions. It underlines our common commitment to improving East-West relations, improving NATO's conventional defenses, and intensifying our search for arms reductions.

We place special emphasis on overcoming the barriers that divide Europe, a division keenly felt by those living in Central Europe. I was pleased to reaffirm to Chancellor Kohl today our support for his efforts to lower the barriers between the two German states.

The close relationship between the United States and the Federal Republic is enhancing the opportunity for improved East-West relations. This is demonstrated by our successful efforts to carry out the NATO dual-track decision to seek genuine arms reductions agreements and modernize our defenses.

Today Chancellor Kohl and I firmly agreed that we will continue to place a high priority on the search for a responsible means of reducing the arsenals of nuclear weapons that now threaten humankind. And we call upon all men and women of good will to join us.

The solidity of the German-American partnership remains a crucial building block in the search for world peace. The people of our two countries, blessed with liberty and abundance, have a great desire for peace. Chancellor Kohl and I share that desire, and we'll continue to work diligently to bring about a more peaceful world.

German-American contacts at all levels. Chancellor Kohl and I noted today the enthusiastic public response in our respective countries, especially among our younger citizens, to the growing exchanges between our peoples.

In sum, our talks confirmed the closeness of our views and the commitment to work together. It was a pleasure to have Chancellor Kohl, Foreign Minister Genscher, and all of his party here. I wish them a smooth journey home, and I look forward to the next time that we can get together.

The fact that a new phase can be initiated in East-West relations is due, on the one hand, to the firm and united attitude of the Western alliance and, on the other, to our joint determination to continue to seek dialog and necessary negotiations with the East.

The President and I consider it important that the Western European allies be associated with this process, thus creating the conditions for the renewed bilateral U.S.-Soviet dialog being placed on a wider foundation in the medium and long term. The close, friendly, and trusting relationship with the United States, as demonstrated in today's talks once again, is of great significance for the strengthening, cohesion, and solidarity of the alliance.

The President informed me of the American ideas for the exploratory talks to be started on 7th and 8th January 1985, between Secretary Shultz and Foreign Minister Gromyko. These talks, which are taking place on the basis of an umbrella concept developed by the United States, open up new perspectives and opportunities for arms control negotiations.

Mr. President, for very good reasons you referred in your remarks to the joint declaration which we have adopted. This declaration is intended to illustrate the link between improved East-West relations, concrete steps for arms control and disarmament, and the maintenance of our security through adequate defense.

One of the key elements of the joint declaration is the desire, particularly in view of the recent developments in East-West relations and in the field of arms control, to intensify and enhance the alliance's comprehensive, close consultations within this sphere.

Furthermore, we intend to ensure that the alliance strengthens further its conventional defense capability. To this end, we consider it necessary to coordinate the existing initiatives and proposals for better implementation of the valid NATO strategy, thus permitting the available resources to be used more effectively.

The joint declaration is of great importance in two respects. Firstly, it is being issued immediately after the overwhelming confirmation in office of the American President by the American people, and at the start of a new phase in East-West relations in which all nations, and not least the divided German nation, the two parts of Germany, place high hopes. We are thus affirming our desire to lay a new, a constructive and lasting foundation for stable East-West relations.

Secondly, ladies and gentlemen, by reflecting our full agreement on essential questions affecting our two countries, this statement constitutes a symbol and a future-oriented yardstick for close German-American cooperation. We are resolved to make our contributions towards further developing within the alliance our cooperation on this basis.

Though this was only a very brief working visit, ladies and gentlemen, I should like to express to you, Mr. President, my dear friend, our sincere thanks for the cordial hospitality extended to us and for the very friendly reception you have been giving to us.

The President of the United States and the Chancellor of the Federal Republic of Germany met today, at the President's invitation, to continue their regular exchanges on matters of common interest. Secretary Shultz, Secretary Weinberger, and Foreign Minister Genscher took part in the talks.

The President and the Chancellor stressed the extraordinary importance of establishing a more lasting basis for peace in Europe and throughout the World. Noting the role of NATO in providing peace and security for Europe and North America in the more than thirty-five years since its founding, the President and the Chancellor are reassured by the clear determination which NATO has shown to safeguard its security and assert its unity.

As democracies active in the Conference on Security and Cooperation in Europe (CSCE) process, our cooperation can be especially successful in demonstrating the human as well as political aspects of the search for peace. Committed to the Helsinki Final Act, and to the other pertinent multilateral and bilateral documents, we do not accept the division of Europe as permanent and shall work to lower the human costs of the tragic barrier which divides the continent, and in particular, the German people.

East-West relations, as set out in the Harmel Report, ensuring the maintenance of necessary military strength and transatlantic political solidarity while pursuing a productive relationship between the countries of East and West through dialogue, cooperation and negotiation.

Such dialogue must be built on the recognition of mutual, legitimate security interests and be conducted on the basis of equal rights for all parties involved. Stable relations must be characterized by the renunciation of military force levels beyond legitimate defense needs and must be founded on strict observance of the ban on the threat or use of force, as enshrined in the United Nations Charter.

Secretary at a carefully prepared meeting. The Chancellor also supports the U.S. proposal to hold regular, high-level talks and meetings which would demonstrate the will of both sides to cooperate on questions of peace, security and international stability. The President welcomes the continuing efforts of the Federal Republic of Germany to pursue dialogue and cooperation with the Soviet Union and with all the countries of Central and Eastern Europe. They urge the Soviet Union to join in a heightened effort to improve East-West relations, give fresh impetus to arms control, and fashion a constructive and stable relationship at the lowest possible level of armament.

The President and the Chancellor stressed that the Alliance's existing strategy of forward defense and flexible response has for many years played an indispensable role in preserving peace in Europe, and will continue to do so. The goal of this defensive strategy is and will remain to prevent any war. The President and the Chancellor reaffirmed the principle subscribed to by all NATO members that none of their weapons will ever be used, except in response to attack.

The United States and the Federal Republic of Germany regret that in contrast to NATO's agreed reductions, starting in 1980, of 2400 nuclear warheads, the Soviet Union has continued to build up its nuclear forces, while abandoning the bilateral Geneva arms control negotiations. The United States and the Federal Republic of Germany see it as imperative, both for eventual success in arms control negotiations and for the Alliance's security, that, in the absence of concrete results in the negotiations, NATO deployments proceed as envisaged under the 1979 decision. NATO has stated that it remains ready to halt, modify, or reverse deployments -- including the removal and dismantling of missiles already deployed in Europe -- in accordance with the terms of a balanced and verifiable agreement.

The President and the Chancellor consider it essential to redress the steadily growing conventional force imbalance favoring the Warsaw Pact. Therefore, an improved conventional defense posture would help ensure that the Alliance's capacity to act is fully preserved, that deterrence is strengthened, and that the nuclear threshold is raised. The President and the Chancellor, therefore, agreed on the need for a coherent Alliance approach to enhancing NATO's conventional capabilities, and are prepared to participate in Alliance efforts to make the necessary resources available.

The President and the Chancellor emphasized the importance of maintaining an equitable balance of effort and sacrifice among Alliance members. The Chancellor expressed his appreciation for the crucial contribution that the United States makes to Alliance security, in particular through the presence of American troops in Europe. The President expressed his appreciation for the German contribution to the common defense. In particular, he welcomed the Federal Government's recent decision toward sustaining the Bundeswehr's force structure. He also welcomed the recent initiatives of the Western European Union and the intensifying dialogue between the Independent European Program Group and their North American partners in identifying promising areas for resource cooperation. They also stressed the importance of making better use of available resources and technology through broader economic and arms cooperation among member nations.

Underscoring the basic policy of the North Atlantic Alliance, the President and the Chancellor reaffirm that deterrence and defense together with arms control and disarmament are integral parts of their security policy. They form necessary elements of a coherent strategy for securing a stable peace.

Europe and improving military stability. At the Stockholm Conference, they seek agreement on militarily significant confidence and security building measures (CSBMs) to be applied in the whole of Europe, thus allowing participants to reaffirm and make concrete the existing commitment to refrain from the threat or use of force.

The Chancellor takes special note of the President's readiness to discuss with the Soviet Union the full range of issues of concern to both sides: the reduction of intercontinental and intermediate range nuclear systems, the relationship between defensive and offensive forces, outer space arms control, improving the effectiveness of existing arms control arrangements, and agreeing to further measures to reduce the risks of conflict through accident, misunderstanding or miscalculation.

The President reiterates, and the Chancellor fully supports, the United States' continuing readiness to work with the Soviet Union in developing a conceptual framework for future negotiations leading to balanced and verifiable arms control agreements. The President and the Chancellor express their conviction that prompt and meaningful progress is possible. They stress the significance of the understanding reached between the U.S. and the Soviet Union to open a new phase of their arms control dialogue with the meeting between Secretary of State George Shultz and Foreign Minister Andrei Gromyko in Geneva.

The President and the Chancellor reaffirm the value and necessity of continued close and intensive consultations within the Alliance over the range of issues before it. In particular, the President and the Chancellor stress the importance of close consultations among the Allies on arms control matters and reiterate their resolve to continue to contribute actively to this process of consultation.

The President and the Chancellor pay tribute to the North Atlantic Alliance as the community of democratic states to which its members owe the preservation of peace and freedom. The President appreciates the vital contribution each ally makes to NATO defense and deterrence and reaffirms the United States' commitment to the common goal of maintaining peace and security in Europe.

It is my hope that when the members of the Republican National Committee meet next month, they will vote to recognize Paul Laxalt, Frank Fahrenkopf, and Betty Heitman for a job well done by keeping them in their current party leadership posts.

Although the international tribunal established to adjudicate claims of U.S. nationals against Iran and of Iranian nationals against the United States continues to function, full normalization of commercial and diplomatic relations between the United States and Iran will require more time. In these circumstances, I have determined that it is necessary to maintain in force the broad authorities that may be needed in the process of implementing the January 1981 agreements with Iran and in the eventual normalization of relations with that country.

Yesterday in Geneva American negotiators presented to their Soviet counterparts new proposals designed to achieve real reductions in the nuclear arsenals of both the United States and the Soviet Union. My instructions to our negotiators also asked that this round of the negotiations be extended into this coming week so that our team can make a full presentation of our new proposals and so that the Soviets have the opportunity to ask questions about them. I am very pleased that the Soviet Union has agreed to this extension of the talks. I know you join me in hoping that this will be a productive week in Geneva. Our new proposals address all three areas of these negotiations: strategic nuclear arms, intermediate-range nuclear forces, and defense and space systems. They build upon the concrete reduction proposals American negotiators have had on the table since early in the talks, and they take into account expressed Soviet concerns.

Our objective since the start of the administration in 1981 has been to achieve real progress in reducing not only nuclear arms but conventional forces and chemical weapons as well. We've been firm and consistent in our arms control approach. Just as important, we have placed great value on maintaining the strength and unity of our alliances and ensuring that the security interests of our allies are enhanced in these negotiations. And we've demonstrated flexibility in taking legitimate Soviet interests into account. I'm pleased to report to you that our strategy has been working. I believe we've laid the groundwork for productive negotiations in Geneva. The first sign of this was when Soviet Foreign Minister Shevardnadze presented to me at our White House meeting in September a Soviet counteroffer to our own earlier proposals. The Soviet negotiators then presented this in detail in Geneva, and our negotiators and our experts here at home have had a chance to analyze it carefully.

Based on this analysis, I decided upon the new U.S. proposals and instructed our negotiating team to present them in Geneva. Judged against our very careful criteria for reaching sound arms control agreements, we found that the Soviet counterproposal had some flaws and in some ways was onesided. But as I made clear in my speech to the United Nations, the Soviet move also had certain positive seeds which we wish to nurture. Our new proposals build upon these positive elements. One of them is the Soviet call for 50-percent reduction in certain types of nuclear arms.

At the same time, we're making it clear that we have a safer and more stable world. And if we're to have that, reductions must be applied to systems which are comparable, and especially to those which would give either side a destabilizing first-strike advantage. We not only want to bring nuclear arms way down to equal levels in a stable way, we also want to decrease our mutual reliance for security on these extremely destructive offensive arsenals. Thus, we're seeking to discuss at the same time with the Soviets in Geneva how together we can try to help make the world a safer place by relying more on defenses which threaten no one, rather than on these offensive arsenals. Each of us is pursuing research on such defenses, and we need to be talking to each other about it.

I have written to both allied leaders and Soviet General Secretary Gorbachev about our new proposals. And I have informed Mr. Gorbachev how much I am looking forward to our meeting later this month in Geneva. He and I will have a broad agenda at our meeting, one that includes human rights, regional issues, and contacts between our peoples, as well as the Geneva and other arms control negotiations. If we hope to succeed in our efforts to create a safer world and to bring about a fresh start in the U.S.-Soviet relationship, progress will be needed in all of these areas. And this can only be accomplished if the Soviet leaders share our determination. We're encouraged because after a long wait, legitimate negotiations are underway.

Now, we've had a proposal on the table in Geneva for quite a while. Now the Soviet Union has offered a counterproposal, and we, in turn, have a new proposal now reflecting some of the elements of both of the others. And this is what negotiation is all about. I can't give you any more details about our new arms control proposals because we have to let the negotiators work this out behind closed doors in Geneva. But I want to leave you with the four key objectives our American negotiators are seeking: deep cuts, no first-strike advantages, defensive research -- because defense is much safer than offense -- and no cheating.

The 1984 Protocols to the Civil Liability and Fund Conventions are intended to revise and update the international system of liability and compensation for damage caused by vessel source oil pollution. In light of worldwide experience with costly oil spills since the conventions were first negotiated, they both required substantial amendment to raise their liability and compensation limits. The maximum liability and compensation limits contained in the new Protocols are approximately four times higher than in the original conventions and are now deemed sufficient to compensate all legitimate claimants with regard to any oil spill likely to occur in waters off the coasts of the United States. These new limits would provide substantially greater levels of compensation for United States citizens who sustain oil pollution damage than is currently available under existing domestic statutes or voluntary industry mechanisms.

United States would exercise the option under the Protocols to delay the effective date of our instruments of ratification, are included in the Technical Report of the Department of State for consideration of the Senate. If approved, these declarations and understanding would be appended to the United States instruments of ratification.

Expeditious ratification of the 1984 Protocols would demonstrate not only our interest in assuring compensation for United States citizens who sustain oil pollution damage, but also our commitment to higher, uniform international standards for mitigating such damage which can be generally accepted worldwide.

Throughout America, parents, educators, law enforcement officials, and other community leaders are proving that the fight against drugs can be won. Law enforcement and international cooperation are reducing the availability and supply of illegal drugs. Research and experience have given us new insight into the causes and treatment of drug and alcohol abuse. Most important, Americans have changed their attitudes toward both drugs and drug users. Negative attitudes have been replaced with understanding, and drug abuse is seen for what it really is: destructive of life's potential and a tragic waste of health and opportunity.

Many people have contributed to this improved situation. During the past four years, all segments of American society have worked together to stop drug abuse among our young and have brought about new laws and public policies. Young people everywhere are moving away from drug-taking behavior and embracing positive goals such as excellence in education, physical fitness, and personal integrity.

Parents have banded together, and young people are receiving strong support for behavior that is anti-drug, pro-achievement, and that recognizes individual responsibility. These efforts are creating an environment that nurtures our Nation's greatest asset -- our children.

We must continue to work together to address drug and alcohol problems in our homes and families. We must carry these concerns into our schools, churches, workplaces, and community life. By heightening awareness, we can gather the moral strength to do what is right and channel it into effective measures against this menace.

Good morning, and welcome. It's a pleasure to look out on this audience and see so many old and loyal friends. I seem to recall that we shared a great moment on this date 1 year ago. And I can't think of anyone I'd rather be celebrating this anniversary with than each one of you.

While I was taking our message around the country, you were taking it to the most important level of all -- the grassroots. And that message, that historic message, went like this: Four years before, when our party had first won the White House and the Senate, we'd inherited the disastrous results of two vast and prolonged experiments.

The first experiment, a domestic endeavor, had begun during the thirties and had been renewed on a massive scale during the sixties. And based upon the premise that the answer to virtually every problem was government intervention, this experiment involved an ever-growing tax burden, an endless proliferation of government regulations, and a Federal budget that took in more and more of our gross national product. By the late seventies, the results of this domestic experiment had become clear. Inflation was spiraling up at double-digit numbers, interest rates were sky-high, and the basis for sustained growth in our economy and standard of living had been undermined.

The second experiment had involved foreign affairs. We'd allowed our military capabilities to erode. Indeed, with regard to the Navy alone, by 1980 our fleet had fallen from nearly a thousand battle-ready ships to fewer than 500. And then we had waited for the Soviets to demonstrate their good faith by doing the same. We're trusting souls. [Laughter] The Soviets, however, had embarked upon the biggest arms buildup in the history of the world. And while American liberals had treated the realm of foreign affairs like a dream world, the grim realities had been felt in places like Afghanistan and Poland.

But our administration, we told the people, had brought those experiments to an end. In foreign affairs, we'd begun the rebuilding of our military. We had boldly restated the fundamental, moral difference between democracy and communism. And in 1983 we had begun the Strategic Defense Initiative, an initiative aimed at knocking down weapons, not people. Here at home, we'd weeded out needless regulations, supported a sound monetary policy, and enacted an across-the-board cut in personal income tax rates of 25 percent. By mid-1984 our economy had been expanding for 19 months, our gross national product was soaring, productivity was up, interest rates were down, and inflation was headed toward the lowest level in over a decade.

We took this message to the people, and we asked them to make a fundamental decision: Forward or back? Our opponent, you may remember -- I said may remember -- [laughter] -- actually promised the American people that he would raise their taxes. He told the people that we wanted to reform the system to make tax rates even lower -- we told you that, not he. Well, spreading that message was exciting, but exhausting. And on this date 1 year ago, we'd given it everything we had, all of us in this room. There was nothing to do but wait. And by the wee hours of the next morning, we'd heard the final news. My friends, I'm sure you'll agree, 49 out of 50 ain't bad.

With your help, we've worked hard to put that mandate into effect in this second term. In foreign affairs, we're determined and strong. Indeed it's precisely because of our continued strength that the Soviets may well prove ready to engage in a genuine give-and-take at the upcoming meeting in Geneva. And permit me to add that -- as we made clear just last month -- the United States of America isn't about to be pushed around by the nickel-and-dime cowards who commit acts of terror.

In domestic policy, we continue to face two great challenges, two challenges on which our administration will continue to need your help. The first is deficit spending. This autumn the Congress has faced the unhappy task of raising the debt ceiling to over $2 trillion. With only a few days left before that deadline, Congress must realize that by failing to act they're entering very dangerous territory. Already they have forced us to redeem prematurely the Social Security and other trust funds in order to make payments to recipients. Never before in our history has the Federal Government failed to honor its financial obligations. To fail to do so now would be an outrage, and the Congress must understand this and bear full responsibility. And the final date is the 15th of this month.

But there's hope. By an overwhelming vote the Senate has initiated the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings amendment, a bipartisan measure that would lock the Federal Government onto a path to eliminate the budget deficit in 1990. And to protect that achievement, I will ask the Congress to enact a balanced budget amendment to the Constitution to take effect in that break-even year. The reason that I so strongly support the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings proposal is that it attacks budget deficits the right way -- not by raising taxes, but by restraining spending. It will enable us to enforce spending restraint while at the same time we honor our commitments on Social Security and defense.

Just last week the House produced a version which, unfortunately, missed the opportunity. But I believe it's essential that the House and Senate agree on a version of Gramm-Rudman-Hollings that provides for an assured path to a balanced budget without tax increases and without attacking our defenses. We agreed with the Congress in the budget resolution to the 0 - 3 - 3 arrangement on defense spending, and we expect them to live up to it; 0 - 3 - 3 means that in 1986 defense spending will be zero as to real increase over 1985. It will, however, be allowed the difference in inflation. And 3 - 3, those 2 years, there will be allowed a real increase in defense spending of 3 percent each year.

Now, this brings me to the other great challenge -- tax reform. Yes, tax reform has its ups and downs -- so do all proposals of consequence. But to paraphrase Mark Twain, reports of its death are greatly exaggerated. You see, the American people, I believe, want tax reform; many Members of the Congress want tax reform; and it so happens that this administration, over-whelmingly sent back to office 1 year ago today, wants tax reform, too. Tax reform is very much alive on the Hill, and I'm convinced we can get it and get it this year. But once again, we'll need to turn up the heat. Can I count on your help to do that? [Applause] All right. We need the kind of tax reform that we originally proposed and not with some of the waterings down that are taking place as they discuss it up there.

My friends, these are historic times for the Republican Party and the ideals that unite us. On every front, from foreign policy to education to economic growth, it is the Republican Party that is moving forward with intelligence and vigor. Our numbers are growing; indeed, for the first time in 27 years, back in my home State, as many Californians consider themselves now Republicans as consider themselves Democrats. I remember 8 years when I wished that had happened then.

Not too long ago, sitting where you're sitting were 150 officeholders, elected officials from all over the country, who had all, since their election, switched from being Democrats to being Republicans. It was quite an inspiring gathering. So it is that we stand poised to become the party of the future and party of ideas, the party of a new and durable governing coalition. All this -- all that we've accomplished, all of our noble hopes for the future -- has been built by your intelligence, dedication, and willingness to give and to work. Each of you is a participant in history, and from my heart, I thank you. I know George [Bush] has already told you how much he appreciates it. God bless you all, and now some of us are going to go back to work.

Spencer W. Kimball spent a long and full life devoted to his church and the service of his fellow man. As a young man, he combined dedication to work with an active role in charitable and community work, exemplifying the Mormon ethic of rugged free enterprise and mutual aid.

Following in the footsteps of his grandfather, a contemporary of Joseph Smith, Spencer Kimball went on to 30 years of service in his church's governing Council of Twelve Apostles, before becoming president in 1973.

Q. Secretary [of State] Shultz did give rather a bleak news conference in Moscow and seemed to have struck out, coming back empty-handed. That may or may not be true; maybe you're getting private information otherwise. But is it so, and do you think that the Soviets are being very hardline? And what are your maximum and minimum goals for this summit? What do you really think you can get out of it?

The President. Oh, Helen [Helen Thomas, United Press International], I haven't tried to pin it down to success or failure or terms of that kind. We're going there to try and basically eliminate if we can or certainly reduce the distrust between our two countries. We have to live in the world together. And it is that distrust that causes the problems and causes the situation with regard to arms negotiations. As I cited to our Russian friends when they were in here the other day that statement -- it isn't mine, I wish it were -- but a statement that I read in the press the other day that summed it up so succinctly; and that is that nations do not distrust each other because they're armed, they are armed because they distrust each other.

The President. Well, I will be presenting the same thing that I told those others. My concept of the strategic defense system has been one that, if and when we finally achieve what our goal is, that is a weapon that is effective against incoming missiles -- not a weapon, a system that's effective against incoming weapons -- missiles -- then rather than add to the distrust in the world and appear to be seeking the potential for a first strike by rushing to implement, my concept has always been that we sit down with the other nuclear powers, with our allies and our adversaries and see if we cannot use that defensive system for the elimination of nuclear weapons.

And that, certainly, I will discuss there and try to impress upon them how firmly we believe in this. I don't think the negotiation of facts and figures about which weapon and how many and numbers and so forth in weaponry should take place at the summit. I think that belongs where we have already put it and that is with the arms control negotiators that are already in Geneva. That's their kind of figuring that should go on. We shouldn't be doing that with all of the things we have to discuss at the summit meeting. At that meeting there are a number of things -- some of them I hinted at in the speech in the U.N. -- regional situation. In other words, try to, as I say, eliminate the distrust that exists between us.

Q. Mr. President, if I could pursue the SDI a little bit more. Considering what you told the Soviet journalists when they were here last week, there seems to be some discrepancy between your comments to them and your comments today about what the conditions for deployment would be.

The President. Yes, because I have already explained that to our allies at the United Nations, and this was the first misunderstanding that I have seen about it. I went through the transcript of that interview, and I mentioned it three or four times through there, in the transcript. And I think it was someone just jumped to a false conclusion when they suggested that I was giving a veto to the Soviets over this; that, in other words, if that thing that I've just described to you, that meeting, took place and we couldn't get satisfaction, that I would say, ``Well, then, we can't deploy this defensive system.'' I couldn't find any place where that was anything but an erroneous interpretation of what I'd been saying.

But even though, as I say, that would then open us up to the charge of achieving the capacity for a first strike. We don't want that. We want to eliminate things of that kind. And that's why, frankly, I think that any nation offered this under those circumstances that I've described would see the value of going forward. Remember that the Soviet Union has already stated its wish that nuclear weapons could be done away with.

Q. You say today that you would go ahead with deployment if you had the system and there weren't international agreement on mutual deployment. The other day you said that that deployment would be only on condition of what you call disarmament. This misunderstanding, it seems to me, on whoever's part has caused a lot of confusion. Does that disrupt your negotiations with Gorbachev, and what can he expect when you have said this to his journalists and now you are telling us something different?

The President. No, I'm not telling something different. I'm saying that reading that transcript of what I told to the journalists -- someone has jumped to an erroneous conclusion. I don't find anything in there -- maybe it's because I've talked about this with so many individuals, as I've said, at the U.N. and all -- that maybe having more of an understanding of it, I see it more clearly than some others might. But I have not -- and I have had others now that look at this transcript and they don't get that interpretation, that I'm giving anyone a veto over this defensive system.

Q. May I ask you, Mr. President, it seems that in the recent weeks you have been more flexible in the way you have talked about the SDI. You have not said that it could not be a bargaining chip, as you used to say it very often before. Are you more flexible? Do you want your message to be seen as more flexible? Is there room for compromise?

The President. Well, this is the point where flexibility, I think, is not involved. The demands that have been made on us already with regard to arms control are that we stop the research and any effort to create such a defensive system. And I have said that there's no way that we will give that up, that this means too much to the world and to the cause of peace if it should be possible to have an effective defensive system. In discussions here in the office, I've likened it many times to the gas mask -- 1925, when all the nations of the world after World War I and the horror of poison gas in that war. When it was over, all the nations got together in Geneva and ruled out the use of poison gas, but we all had gas masks, and no one did away with their gas masks. Well, this, in a sense, is how I see what this could be. The defense that would -- it would be so practical and sensible for any country, including the Soviet Union, to say, why go on building and maintaining and modernizing these horrible weapons of destruction if there is something that can be implemented that makes them useless?

Q. Mr. President, Secretary [of State] Shultz held a press conference in Iceland today on his way back to report to you and with him was a senior official -- not identified, but we can guess who it is -- who held a background briefing for reporters. And he said that the impression that the American delegation got during this weekend's talks in Moscow was that Mr. Gorbachev was concerned that U.S. policy was influenced by a small circle of anti-Soviet extremists. Now, if Mr.

The President. I would respond with the truth as clearly as I could enunciate it. This is one of the things that I feel with regard to the distrust, that the Soviet Union tends to be distrustful and suspicious that things that are presented to them are perhaps concealing some ulterior motive.

United States was guided by some desire to one day assault the Soviet Union, why didn't we do it when we were the most powerful military nation on Earth right after World War II. Our military was at its height. We had not had the great losses in the millions that the other nations had had that had been there longer. Our industry was intact. We hadn't been bombed to rubble as all the rest had, and we were the only ones with the ultimate weapon, the nuclear weapon. We could have dictated to the whole world, and we didn't. We set out to help the whole world.

And the proof of it is, today, that our erstwhile enemies -- and there could never have been more hatred in the world than there was between the enemies of World War II and ourselves -- they are today our staunchest allies. And yet here is a former ally -- there are Americans buried in the soil of the Soviet Union that fought side by side against the same enemies. And so, I think we can prove by the record that any fairminded person would have to see that we did not have expansionism in mind. We never took an inch of territory as a result of the victory of World War II or of World War I, for that matter. And on the other hand, to point out to him why we are concerned about them -- that their expansionist policy is very evident. The gunfire hasn't stopped for a moment in Afghanistan. We could name all the other spots where they or their surrogate troops are in there. So, this is my hope, that I can convince him, if he's a reasonable man -- and there's every indication that he is -- would see that if we both want peace, there'll be peace.

Q. Mr. President, your remark that you think Mr. Gorbachev is a reasonable man brings me to another question. I assume that you have been doing a lot of reading about Mr. Gorbachev, the man, and Gorbachev, the leader of the Soviet Union, and that perhaps you've even seen some videotapes of him in action. What sort of an opponent do you expect to face across the table at Geneva?

The President. Ralph [Ralph Harris, Reutters], I would think that any Soviet leader who reaches the office that he holds would be a formidable opponent. If he does not subscribe to the party philosophy, he wouldn't be in that position.

The President. Well, Helen, as I say, there's no way that you can prove that that isn't so. On the other hand, there's no way you can prove that it is. So, you just have to accept that we did our best in view of their expressed desires, and then they did what other defectors before them have not done, and they -- oh, I think here and there, there's been one or two that went back. So, you can't rule out personal desire, homesickness, whatever it might be. I'm sure that, as has been suggested by someone discussing this, that people who go through that must be under quite some strain, and it must be a traumatic experience to step forth from the land of your birth and denounce it and say you want to live someplace else, in another country. But there's no way to establish this. Either they honestly did feel they wanted to defect and then changed their minds, or the possibility is there that this could have been a deliberate ploy.

The President. I don't know, but I welcome it. It's long overdue, and we're pleased to see it happen. But let me point out also this does not mean that human rights will not be a subject for discussion. They will be very much so. They're very important to the people of our country and, in their view, of a relationship with the Soviet Union. But I don't think that it is profitable to put things of this kind out in public where any change in policy would be viewed as a succumbing to another power.

Q. Mr. President, talking of spies, some months ago -- I forget the date -- in one of your Saturday radio speeches, you said there were too many Soviet and East European diplomats in this country and too many spies among them.

The President. Well, we're having discussions about that and reducing numbers. We recognize that when we do anything of this kind there's going to be retaliation, but what we're trying to do is to simply arrive at agreements that will be mutual and with regard to reductions of staff and numbers in each other's countries.

The President. Let me simply say no. Secretary Weinberger isn't trying to sabotage anything of the kind. He's been most helpful in all of the meetings that we have had on this. And all of the talk that we unhappily read about feuds and so forth; again, this is a distortion or misinterpretation of my desire for what I've always called Cabinet-type government, where I want all views to be frankly expressed, because I can then make the decision better if I have all those viewpoints. And the fact that we have debate and discussion in that regard, in that way, should not be construed as feuds and battles and so forth. I want all sides.

The President. Well, but it'd been portrayed not in the spirit in which I just spoke of it. It's been portrayed as animus and anger and so forth, and it isn't that kind. It's the devil-advocate type of thing where I hear all sides.

Q. Mr. President, your health is vital to the long-range success of any progress that you make at the summit. Why won't you permit the release of the test results from your periodic examinations to reassure the public that there is no recurrence of the cancer?

The President. Well, for heaven's sakes. First of all, that term ``the recurrence of cancer'' -- you've given me an opportunity to give an answer I've wanted to give for some time. I'm deeply appreciative of the concern of people and all the letters of condolence and good wishes and so forth that I've received. But I feel the people have been doing this under a little misapprehension.

The whole thing has been portrayed as that I was a sufferer of cancer, I had cancer. And then an operation took place, and now I have had a good recovery. No, the truth of the matter was, I had a polyp. There are two kinds of polyps in the intestines, and one kind, if allowed to go on, eventually becomes cancerous and then would spread. I had a polyp removed. It is true that it, within itself, had begun to develop a few cancer cells, but it was still a self-contained polyp. The only way that type of polyp can be removed is by major surgery. So, in reality, the only real illness that I suffered in any way and at any time was the incision. And my healing was not a healing of cancer; mine was a healing of a 10- or 12-inch incision. So, I'm delighted to get this out and on the table before you.

Yes, they gave me a complete schedule, and they said we will want to do this down the line periodically, and then, it gets farther and farther apart as time goes on. It would mainly be an examination, periodically, to see if any further polyps of that kind -- if one could start, then, I suppose another could start. And then, if so, you'd want to get rid of them. The examinations that I have had are also spaced out, like this last time, are part of the kind of annual physical that I've had for many years and long before I came here. Where, once I used to go into the hospital for a few days and have all the whole physical done, well, now we do it in bits and parts. So, this last one, mainly I went in and they simply examined the incision -- wanted to see how the healing was coming -- and then I had some x-rays of the lungs, which had nothing to do with the operation, but that are a normal part of the general physical that I have. Now, there will be another trip there coming up in the near future and that will be the first trip for a look at the intestines for the possibility of polyps.

And so, when the doctors come out and when the doctors -- they say the same thing to me that has been said to you -- maybe I'll have them say it to you instead of me repeating it -- when they stand there in front of me and say, ``You've had 100-percent recovery. Everything is just fine.

For example, if they do the examination to see -- to check if there's another polyp -- well, the only test is they say to you -- [laughter] -- there wasn't one or there is one; whichever way it comes out. So, it's a case of verbalizing. There isn't any report to be given you that -- oh, incidentally, I also had the blood check taken this time also with the x-rays. But that was done here a few days before, not at Bethesda. They take a little blood, see what it is. And that would be done, this would have been done, now, even without any physical examination. They always do this prior to a trip abroad, make sure that they know what's there, and in the event of an accident or anything, they know what could be needed.

The President. We were embarked on a plan of trying to negotiate the Cubans out of Angola and the independence of Namibia, and this also involved that in that there would be a reconciliation between UNITA, the Savimbi forces and the present government, which, more or less, was installed by the presence of the Cuban troops. Now, with the elimination of the Clark amendment, we are still most supportive of that, that we believe a settlement in Angola should involve UNITA, and the people of that country have a choice in making a decision as to the government they wanted to have. And so, all of this is going forward.

The President. Oh, yes, and you know most of them: tax reform, a program that will set us, even longer than 3 years, on a course for the elimination of the deficit; then, the achievement of a balanced budget amendment, so that once and for all we'll be free of this. And I've had one tucked away in the back of my mind for a long time, that once we can do that, then, I would like to see us start on the reduction of the national debt.

The President. Welcome. The Medal of Freedom is our nation's highest honor for those outside the Armed Forces who've rendered outstanding service to their country. It acknowledges discipline, courage, high standards, and moral character. The three Americans we honor today have contributed among them more than a century of public service. They have been personally involved in answering the great questions of their day, questions of war or peace in a nuclear age.

Paul Nitze brought unmatched experience and expertise to his current responsibilities. He has served so long and so faithfully in the highest councils of state that his presence has been almost taken for granted. Today we acknowledge for all the world that Paul is indeed an exceptional individual, a great man and a great public servant. And Paul Nitze played a key role in the design and implementation of the Marshall plan. He was a principal architect of our security strategy after World War II, helping us understand what it would take in resources and commitment to meet the new challenges emerging in the postwar world. Paul, we may need to call on you to give our current foreign assistance program the same boost that you gave to Harry Truman's.

Secretary of Defense, and Deputy Secretary of Defense. For the past 15 years he's played a special role in the Nation's search for ground arms policy. He worked in government to ensure our approach was right. When he saw things headed in the wrong direction, he worked outside the Government to alert his fellow citizens. Paul is now playing an indispensable role in our efforts to forge a bold and creative arms control policy. Peace and equilibrium are terms we associate with international affairs, and yet they also describe Paul Nitze, the man who seeks them. He is consistently shrewd, but never cynical; impressively erudite, yet never pedantic; immensely dignified, yet never stuffy; always hopeful, and yet ever realistic. We're happy, then, to honor him for what he has done and, even more, for what he is.

Now, we also honor Roberta and Albert Wohlstetter, two of the finest strategic analysts and security specialists our country has known. In saying this, however, we only begin to describe their work in helping citizens and statesmen to understand fundamental relationships in this nuclear age between technology, politics, history, and psychology. It's been the good fortune of our country to have these two brilliant people help us make sense of the unprecedented security problems we've faced in our modern age.

Roberta Wohlstetter, a generation ahead of her time, asserted her influence in areas dominated by and, in some cases, reserved for men. She rose above all obstacles and has had a profound influence. Her inquiries went to the heart of the system of our society, focusing on essential questions. Her analysis of the problems of terrorism, intelligence, and warning and, with Albert, the problem of nuclear deterrence broke new ground and opened new alternatives for policymakers. I daresay that she has blankly enjoyed posing the same penetrating questions to her husband that she has to the intellectual and political leaders of the country. And that is certainly one explanation for the clarity and persuasiveness of his own voluminous words on strategy, politics, and world affairs.

Albert Wohlstetter is a brilliant man with enormous strength of character. His intellectual integrity is renowned, and his analytical standards have been increasingly and unceasingly rigorous. He's been a steady hand in an uncertain time. His understanding on many levels has been indispensable to the well-being of the free world. In these last 30 years, Albert has been influential in helping to design and deploy our strategic forces -- an awesome task. He's sought ways to make our forces safer from attack, less destructive, and thereby less dangerous to us all. Many of the basic concepts and requirements for deterrence in the nuclear age -- analysis on which we've operated -- can be traced to this outstanding individual. And his work on the problem of nuclear proliferation gave us the insight we needed to better curb the irresponsible flow of sensitive material and technology.

Albert has always argued that in the nuclear age technological advances can, if properly understood and applied, make things better; but his point, and Roberta's, has been a deeper one than that. He has shown us that we have to create choices and, then, exercise them. The Wohlstetters have created choices for our society where others saw none. They've taught us that there is an escape from fatalism.

Those we honor today continue to make contributions. Their genius has made it possible for us to start on a new path which can free mankind of the fear of nuclear holocaust. These three people began their work in far different times, four decades ago when our national success was far from certain. Who would have foreseen the extraordinary achievements of the past generation, not the least of these a general peace, which has remained intact for 40 years. We praise these three extraordinary individuals who played a significant role in the most successful of all peace movements. They gave us strength through clarity; security through preparedness; and progress through intellect. They were the engineers and architects of a system that works and has served mankind well. They are the innovators who are leading mankind to the next step forward: Peace, based on protection, rather than retaliation.

In a career spanning nine Presidencies, Paul Nitze has made enormous contributions to the freedom and security of his country. Paul Nitze exemplifies the powers of mind, commitment, and character needed to fulfill America's world responsibilities. He was present at the creation of the strategy that has kept us at peace for 40 years. His deep understanding of the issues of war and peace, his discharge of high public assignments, and his advice to those in authority have been invaluable to our national well-being. He remains the most rigorous, demanding, and independent of analysts and the wisest of counselors.

Ambassador Nitze. Thank you, Mr. President. Mr. President, I'm deeply honored at having received and you having awarded me the Medal for Freedom. There is, I think, the task that gives the greatest opportunity for development and for doing things is service in this government. You, today, have really a marvelous team helping you on foreign policy and national security, led by Secretary [of State] Shultz and Bud McFarlane, but they're also supported by an able team of negotiators, a most able team of negotiators, in Geneva. And we all thank you for your leadership.

Participants in the nuclear era's most momentous events, Roberta and Albert Wohlstetter have shaped the ideas and deeds of statesmen, and have helped create a safer world. Over four decades, they have marshaled logic, science, and history and enlarged our democracy's capacity to learn and to act. Through their work, we have seen that mankind's safety need not rest on threats to the innocent, and that nuclear weapons need not spread inexorably. Their powers of thought and exposition are, in themselves, among the Free World's best defenses.

Mr. Wohlstetter. Mr. President, I receive this great honor not only for myself but for the brilliant and devoted research men and students with whom I've been lucky enough to work for nearly 35 years. I take particular pride in being given this Medal of Freedom from a President who's stressed that it's freedom that we're defending, that we have to defend it without bringing on a holocaust that would end both free and unfree societies. I'm most grateful and honored, Mr. President.

We hoped that by this time these principles would have been enacted by the various States that have unitary taxation. Since States have not universally accepted these principles, I am instructing the Secretary of the Treasury to initiate the process of crafting Federal legislation to incorporate these principles into law and to work with the Congress for passage and also, where appropriate, to enter into negotiations to amend double taxation agreements. I am also instructing the Secretary of the Treasury to pursue enactment of the domestic ``spreadsheet'' legislation, which has been previously proposed and which is designed to assist nonunitary States with tax enforcement respecting multinational corporations in order to promote full taxpayer disclosure and accountability. Further, I am instructing the Attorney General to ensure that the United States interests are represented in appropriate controversies and cases consistent with this approach.

My action on this bill should in no way be interpreted as a lessening of this Administration's strong commitment to the biomedical research endeavors of NIH. In fact, I want to underscore my personal support and the support of my Administration for biomedical research and for the NIH.

For over 40 years, the NIH has enjoyed unparalleled success. Enormous progress in research and the improved health of the American people attest to that success. An appropriations bill or a continuing resolution will provide uninterrupted funding for NIH activities in fiscal year 1986.

Although H.R. 2409 is overloaded with objectionable provisions that seriously undermine and threaten the ability of NIH to manage itself and is therefore unacceptable, I recognize there are areas in which the Administration can step forward to strengthen specific research efforts.

In recognition of the plight of the millions of arthritis victims and society's costs, I have directed the Secretary of Health and Human Services to establish administratively a separate National Institute of Arthritis and Musculoskeletal and Skin Diseases that will meet the continuing need for coordinated research in this important area. This directive is consistent with the Department's recommendation to me that this Institute be established.

At the same time, I do not believe that the establishment of a nursing research center at NIH is appropriate, for a very basic reason -- there is a lack of compatibility between the mission of such a center and the mission of NIH. The biomedical research activities of NIH are concerned with discovering the etiology of and treatment for diseases. In contrast, nursing research uses substantive scientific information and methodology and focuses on their relevance to nursing practice and administration. This research is important, but neither it nor disease-oriented research are served by the provisions of the bill.

H.R. 2409 manifests an effort to exert undue political control over decisions regarding scientific research, thus limiting the ability of the NIH to set this Nation's biomedical research agenda. I do not believe that it is either necessary or wise to restrict the flexibility under which the NIH has operated so successfully. In 1984, I rejected a very similar bill, and once again I find no reasonable justification for the extensive changes to the NIH mandated by H.R. 2409. In order to allow NIH to continue to provide excellence in biomedical research and in its management, I am disapproving this bill.

For more than two million Americans with Alzheimer's disease, each day is fraught with fear and frustration. Fear of getting lost in one's own neighborhood; of not recognizing members of one's immediate family; of not being able to perform simple, familiar chores. For the victims of this disease, tying shoes or setting a table can be overwhelming tasks. As our elderly population grows, more and more people will be affected by this malady.

Alzheimer's disease is the major cause of the confusion, erratic behavior, and forgetfulness once believed to be a ``normal'' part of old age. This ``senility'' is actually the result of the destruction of certain brain cells.

As the afflicted person loses the ability to function intellectually, the family faces growing emotional, physical, and financial burdens. Eventually, many victims require specialized professional care. Fifty percent of all nursing home residents in America suffer from Alzheimer's disease or other serious, irreversible forms of dementia.

The medical research community is focusing special attention on Alzheimer's disease in an effort to discover its causes and develop effective treatments. Recently, a Department of Health and Human Services task force defined the current state of medical knowledge of Alzheimer's disease and recommended future research directions. Organizations leading this research include the National Institute of Neurological and Communicative Disorders and Stroke; the National Institute on Aging; the National Institute of Mental Health; and the National Institute of Allergy and Infectious Diseases. For Alzheimer's patients and their families, this intensive research is the greatest source of hope.

But until a way to prevent Alzheimer's disease is found, these families need our support and understanding. I commend the superb services provided by voluntary health organizations, notably the Alzheimer's Disease and Related Disorders Association.

We're expanding the format of our radio broadcast today. During the next 10 minutes, I'll be speaking to the citizens of the Soviet Union over the Voice of America about the upcoming Geneva summit. My words will be directed to them, but I want you to hear what I say. My speech is also being broadcast to over 50 nations by the Worldnet Television Network.

Washington about my upcoming meeting with General Secretary Gorbachev in Geneva and my hopes for a better relationship between our two governments. Your leaders can freely appear on American radio and television and be interviewed by our magazines and newspapers. So, I was grateful for my recent and rare opportunity to speak with representatives of the Soviet press.

While I appreciate that, only parts of the interview were published in Izvestia, and much of what was left out I think is important. So, I wish to speak to you personally as a husband, father, and grandfather who shares your deepest hopes -- that all of our children can live and prosper in a world of peace.

I grew up in a small town in America's heartland where values of faith in God, freedom, family, friends, and concern for one's neighbors were shared by all -- values you also share. During my school years I worked during vacations, for a time on construction and then for several summers as a lifeguard at a river beach. After finishing my education I became a radio sports announcer, which led to acting in Hollywood where I was elected head of our actor's guild. I'm the only American President who was also president of a labor union. Back then I had no intention of engaging in national politics, but America's a great country filled with opportunities. In the years that followed, including my years as Governor of California and as President, I have not forgotten the values I learned as a boy nor have my fellow Americans.

Now, I know that much has been written in your press about America's hostile intentions toward you. Well, I reject these distortions. Americans are a peace-loving people; we do not threaten your nation and never will. The American people are tolerant, slow to anger, but staunch in defense of their liberties and, like you, their country. More than once, our two countries have joined to oppose a common enemy. During our War of Independence, Russia provided assistance to the distant American colonists. A century and a half later, we joined together to defeat the common enemy of fascism; before that, we were allies in World War I.

Yet after that victory, Americans gave generously to help rebuild war-torn countries, even to former enemies, because we had made war on a vicious ideology, not on a people. And we demonstrated our desire for peace by rapidly demobilizing. At the end of 1945, we had an armed force of almost 12 million men; by 1948 we had reduced that number to less than 1\1/2\ million.

We were the only country with nuclear weapons. We proposed giving those weapons up altogether to an international authority so that no country would have such destructive power at its disposal. What a pity this idea was not accepted.

Today we must both face the challenge of eliminating nuclear weapons. I have said many times and will say again to you: A nuclear war cannot be won and must never be fought. I pray God that we can rid the world of these dangerous weapons, in part by finding a reliable defense against them. Our negotiators in Geneva are working hard to reach a breakthrough. I am pleased that the Soviet Union finally responded to our original proposals. We studied the response carefully and replied quickly. These are complicated negotiations and satisfactory results will take long, hard work.

Let me be clear about our research and testing program on strategic defense technologies. Our goal is to make the world safer through development of nonnuclear security shields that would protect people by preventing weapons from reaching their targets and, hopefully, render ballistic missiles obsolete. Your own government has been conducting longstanding and extensive programs on its own defensive systems, including advanced research. The United States is just beginning a long process of investigating defenses. If and when our research proves that a defensive shield against nuclear missiles is practical, I believe our two nations, and those others that have nuclear weapons, should come together and agree on how, gradually, to eliminate offensive nuclear weapons, as we make our defensive system available to all. We ought to start talking about this process at the Geneva arms talks.

We must live together in peace. America's whole history has been a search for peace and opportunity by pioneers seeking freedom, many from the old European order. We're proud of the Russians, the Ukrainians, the Jews, the Armenians, and many others who sailed by our Statue of Liberty and reached our shores. Diversity is one of our great strengths. This is partly why we're confusing to outsiders. Our government is elected by the people; it is not above the people or above the law. We believe the truth is found through debate and discussion. Truth does not burn in the fire or drown in the water. Our system is often uncomfortable for elected officials, because one of our proudest institutions is a free press. The press criticizes me, and sometimes it hurts, but that is their role -- to raise difficult questions and keep officials accountable to the people. But no one should mistake our freedoms for weakness. We favor free and open dialog not just for Americans, but for all peoples. We believe in freedom of the individual. Freedom of worship, freedom of speech, freedom of the press are, as our Declaration of Independence says, unalienable rights of all men.

Helsinki accords. We all pledged to respect human rights, permit our citizens freedom of speech and travel, and improve communication among the peoples of the signatory nations. America asks the world's leaders to abide by what they have committed themselves to do. As the world's two strongest nations, we owe it to the rest of humanity not only to keep our word but to help find peaceful settlements to local and regional conflicts in Afghanistan, Africa, Latin America, and elsewhere.

We must also join forces against terrorism. There is no place in a civilized world for assassinations, terrorist bombings, and other mindless violence. I strongly urge you and your government to join us in combating terrorism and ensuring that no country will offer succor or comfort to terrorists.

We have much to learn from each other. Americans have long been enriched by your cultural giants. The works of Tolstoy, Dostoyevsky, Turgenev, Chekov, and Pasternak are taught in many American universities; just as American authors from James Fenimore Cooper, Mark Twain, and Jack London to Ernest Hemingway and William Faulkner are popular in your country. I want expanded contacts between our two great societies, wherever there is mutual interest. I am particularly interested in increasing exchanges among our young people, for they are our future.

We should open a dialog between our nations, so leaders of each country would have the same chance to communicate to the people of the other on television. If more of your citizens visited us, you would understand that our people want peace as fervently as you do.

I hope my discussions with Mr. Gorbachev in Geneva will be fruitful and will lead to future meetings. We seek peace not only for ourselves but for all those who inhabit this small planet. We share borders with three countries -- Mexico, Canada, and the Soviet Union. We pride ourselves on our friendly relations and open borders with our two North American neighbors. And I hope the day will come when that narrow chain of islands stretching from Alaska to the eastern shore of Siberia will symbolize the ties between our two great peoples, not the distance between us.

Russian language-qualified officers of the American Embassy in Moscow and the American consulate in Leningrad. They report that in Moscow, two and possibly three frequencies were clearly audible and probably not jammed; the signal on one of them was as clear as a local station, according to the Embassy monitoring report. On another 15 frequencies, there were varying degrees of jamming. In Leningrad, one Russian-language frequency was received loud and clear.

Atmospheric conditions on November 9 were conducive to good reception of shortwave signals in the Soviet Union. English-language broadcasts, which are not normally jammed, were well received. We are pleased and hope that this development will set a precedent which will allow the Soviets to put a permanent end to jamming on all frequencies. A free flow of information would be a very positive development in people-to-people communications between the two nations.

Price, ladies and gentlemen, Nancy and I are deeply honored to welcome the Prince and Princess of Wales to the White House. Permit me to add our congratulations to Prince Charles on his birthday, just 5 days away, and express also our great happiness that we have been able to have this affair with Princess Diana, here on her first trip to the United States -- that we should be able to share in that first trip.

Our two countries are bound together by innumerable ties of ancient history and present friendship. Our language, our law, our democratic system of government, our fierce belief in the God-given right of men to be free -- all of these we owe to you. We've stood together through two great world conflicts. Today we go on, shoulder to shoulder, in an alliance to protect freedom and democracy.

Your Royal Highnesses, in the eyes of my countrymen, you and your family hold a place of high honor; your devotion to duty commands our esteem. Americans join our British cousins in looking upon you with affection and respect. And in that same 1941 address, Winston Churchill said: ``It is not given to us to peer into the future. Still I avow my hope and faith, sure and inviolate, that in the days to come, the British and American people will, for their own safety and for the good of all, walk together in majesty, in justice, and in peace.'' And today that noble hope is a glorious reality.

Prince Charles. Mr. President, Mrs. Reagan, ladies and gentlemen, if I may say so, Mr. President, you really have touched both my wife and myself most deeply this evening by your extremely kind words. And we can't possibly, both of us, thank you enough for your immense hospitality and your great kindness in having us here this evening and in making us feel so unbelievably welcome.

I would think one of the most marvelous things about coming to the United States is that you have this extraordinary gift for making people feel welcome. And apart from the friendliness with which you greet everybody, it really does warm the heart to come here and be made to feel welcome. I can't tell you what it means to us both. It really does. As you know, we've flown in hesitant stages from Australia and tried to stop on the way in order to regain our strength. And all that's happened is we're suffering terribly from jet lag. [Laughter] And I've yet to discover a foolproof method for actually getting one over the problems of this particular affliction.

I would also just like to say that coming, as we have, down from Australia, it is one of the more interesting aspects, I think, of the pioneering spirit of the English-speaking peoples. That here were two great continents -- Australia and the United States of America, the former having developed about 150 years later than this great country -- and in many ways there are similarities between the two. And I think that one of the things that becomes most obvious about Australia and America is that personal independence becomes a very dominant feature, particularly, I think, in American life. And one Englishman observed in 1796 that Americans tend to pass their lives without any regard to the smiles or frowns of men in power. However, in your case, Mr.

So, if I may, finally, again say what an enormous pleasure it gives both of us to be here and how proud we are to be able to represent Britain here in America. As you say, it does, I think, emphasize the very strong links that do exist between our two countries -- always have done, and I'm sure always will. And in the end, that bond between our two peoples is one of the most important and enduring features of this Earth.

Secretary Weinberger, Harry Walters, Robert Medairos, reverend clergy, ladies and gentlemen, a few moments ago I placed a wreath at the Tomb of the Unknown Soldier, and as I stepped back and stood during the moment of silence that followed, I said a small prayer. And it occurred to me that each of my predecessors has had a similar moment, and I wondered if our prayers weren't very much the same, if not identical.

We celebrate Veterans Day on the anniversary of the armistice that ended World War I, the armistice that began on the 11th hour of the 11th day of the 11th month. And I wonder, in fact, if all Americans' prayers aren't the same as those I mentioned a moment ago. The timing of this holiday is quite deliberate in terms of historical fact but somehow it always seems quite fitting to me that this day comes deep in autumn when the colors are muted and the days seem to invite contemplation.

We are gathered at the National Cemetery, which provides a final resting place for the heroes who have defended our country since the Civil War. This amphitheater, this place for speeches, is more central to this cemetery than it first might seem apparent, for all we can ever do for our heroes is remember them and remember what they did -- and memories are transmitted through words.

Sometime back I received in the name of our country the bodies of four marines who had died while on active duty. I said then that there is a special sadness that accompanies the death of a serviceman, for we're never quite good enough to them -- not really; we can't be, because what they gave us is beyond our powers to repay. And so, when a serviceman dies, it's a tear in the fabric, a break in the whole, and all we can do is remember.

We see them as something like the Founding Fathers, grave and gray haired. But most of them were boys when they died, and they gave up two lives -- the one they were living and the one they would have lived. When they died, they gave up their chance to be husbands and fathers and grandfathers. They gave up their chance to be revered old men. They gave up everything for our country, for us. And all we can do is remember.

There's always someone who is remembering for us. No matter what time of year it is or what time of day, there are always people who come to this cemetery, leave a flag or a flower or a little rock on a headstone. And they stop and bow their heads and communicate what they wished to communicate. They say, ``Hello, Johnny,'' or ``Hello, Bob. We still think of you. You're still with us. We never got over you, and we pray for you still, and we'll see you again. We'll all meet again.'' In a way, they represent us, these relatives and friends, and they speak for us as they walk among the headstones and remember. It's not so hard to summon memory, but it's hard to recapture meaning.

And the living have a responsibility to remember the conditions that led to the wars in which our heroes died. Perhaps we can start by remembering this: that all of those who died for us and our country were, in one way or another, victims of a peace process that failed; victims of a decision to forget certain things; to forget, for instance, that the surest way to keep a peace going is to stay strong. Weakness, after all, is a temptation -- it tempts the pugnacious to assert themselves -- but strength is a declaration that cannot be misunderstood. Strength is a condition that declares actions have consequences. Strength is a prudent warning to the belligerent that aggression need not go unanswered.

Peace fails when we forget what we stand for. It fails when we forget that our Republic is based on firm principles, principles that have real meaning, that with them, we are the last, best hope of man on Earth; without them, we're little more than the crust of a continent. Peace also fails when we forget to bring to the bargaining table God's first intellectual gift to man: common sense.

Common sense gives us a realistic knowledge of human beings and how they think, how they live in the world, what motivates them. Common sense tells us that man has magic in him, but also clay. Common sense can tell the difference between right and wrong. Common sense forgives error, but it always recognizes it to be error first.

We endanger the peace and confuse all issues when we obscure the truth; when we refuse to name an act for what it is; when we refuse to see the obvious and seek safety in Almighty. Peace is only maintained and won by those who have clear eyes and brave minds. Peace is imperiled when we forget to try for agreements and settlements and treaties; when we forget to hold out our hands and strive; when we forget that God gave us talents to use in securing the ends He desires. Peace fails when we forget that agreements, once made, cannot be broken without a price.

In memory of those who gave the last full measure of devotion, may our efforts to achieve lasting peace gain strength. And through whatever coincidence or accident of timing, I tell you that a week from now when I am some thousands of miles away, believe me, the memory and the importance of this day will be in the forefront of my mind and in my heart.

There is a potentially deadly disorder that affects our children called Reye's Syndrome. It is one of the top ten killers among all diseases affecting young people aged one to ten. Each year in the United States, a number of healthy children under age nineteen are afflicted with Reye's Syndrome, and many victims die or become crippled within several days.

We did not recognize Reye's Syndrome as a specific illness until 1963, and we still do not know what causes it or how to prevent it. Diligent research has identified its symptoms: severe vomiting, delirium, lethargy, unusual drowsiness, and belligerence. During last winter's flu season, only 171 cases of Reye's Syndrome were reported in the United States, down from the 422 cases reported as recently as 1980. A variety of factors have contributed to this sharp decline, which is an encouraging chapter in the annals of American medicine. Experience has taught us that quick medical intervention usually can avert death or disability.

Neurological and Communicative Disorders and Stroke and other units of the National Institutes of Health such as the National Institute of Allergy and Infectious Diseases, the National Institute of Child Health and Human Development, and the National Institute of Arthritis, Diabetes, and Digestive and Kidney Diseases, are untiring in their efforts to understand this lethal disorder. They are assisted in this endeavor by their Federal colleagues at the Food and Drug Administration and Centers for Disease Control, who monitor the occurrence of Reye's Syndrome throughout the country.

Association and the National Reye's Syndrome Foundation have launched effective public education campaigns. We must build upon these efforts to acquaint all parents and medical professionals with the dangers of this illness. We must stimulate further scientific investigation of the origin of this enigmatic killer in the biomedical research arena, where our greatest hope of conquering this disease lies.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Lois Burke Shepard to be Director of the Institute of Museum Services, National Foundation on the Arts and the Humanities. She would succeed Susan E. Phillips.

The President. Well, I'm not as pessimistic as that. I understand, of course, that it's not going to be easy. There's a long history of meetings between our two countries and, many times, without much result. But I'm going to make every effort to try and reduce the mistrust and suspicion that seems to exist between our -- well, not only our two nations but sort of the East and the West.

And I believe there are possibilities. We're going to try to deal in some four areas -- arms control, of course, is one; the regional disputes that are going on in the world and where the major powers are involved. Bilateral issues, a number of kind, that are between us probably would be the easiest thing that we'll face in those meetings. And we'll just carry on, see what we can do.

Q. Mr. President, I wonder, on arms control, are you going with a set negotiating position -- some counterproposals to Mr. Gorbachev's proposals -- and is your team of advisers finally united behind you?

The President. Yes, we are united, and I think that there's been some distortion as to whether we weren't. In our government here, I solicit and encourage varying opinions and ideas. I think it helps to make a decision when I hear all viewpoints. But I don't envision this meeting as being one where we will get down to specific numbers and so forth. We have a team of negotiators, each side, in Geneva that have been negotiating on the possibility of nuclear arms reductions for some time.

And so, the proposal that we've made in response is one that kind of compromises between our original proposal and theirs, accepting some of their figures -- in fact, some of the main figures on basic numbers and so forth -- and then, our view on some of the complex issues about the mix of weapons and so forth. And to me, this is legitimate negotiations.

But I would think what we should be dealing with at the summit is, as I said earlier, the elimination of suspicion and mistrust to the point that we could turn the specific numbers over to those other negotiators, but that they could have a signal from both sides, from their government and ours from us, have a knowledge that we want them to continue and to arrive at an agreement.

Q. Mr. President, over the last few days and even now here, you continue to sound optimistic about the summit in Geneva, though we know now there will be no substantial agreement, there will be no arms agenda, and even, probably, there would be no joint communique. Now, what would it be -- just a get-acquaintance meeting? And in this case, even the atmosphere, I think it's a bit strange, considering the last occurrences. So, what's the reason of your optimism?

The President. Oh, no, I don't think this is just a get-acquainted meeting, important though that may be. But I think there are many areas for agreement here. And as I say, I'm not pessimistic about them. Look at the one situation that has both of us continuing to build these arsenals of weapons. The Soviet Union claims that they fear that we mean harm to them, that somehow we're nursing a plan of invading them or attempting to change their system. On the other hand, we believe, and I think with some evidence, that their policy has been expansionist; that's evidenced by Afghanistan, Ethiopia, South Yemen, Angola.

And I think that if we sit and face each other and lay our cards on the table as to the fact that they don't like us or our system and we don't like theirs. But we're not going to try to change theirs, and they better not try to change ours. But we have to live in the world together. And we're the only two countries that probably could start world war III. We're also the two countries that could prevent world war III from happening. And I think that a little common sense should make us find out that we can continue to be competitive in the world, but in a peaceful way and without the threat of annihilation hanging over the world as it does now.

Q. Mr. President, scientific results show up to now that your space defense shield is not as impenetrable as originally thought. Does this make SDI more of a bargaining chip? Could you compromise on this system?

The President. Not compromise in the sense of giving up on the research. Now, the truth of the matter is there've been some breakthroughs that have a number of scientists quite optimistic about this research, and since this research is all going on within the bounds of the ABM treaty, we're going to continue, because I think it would be the greatest thing in this century if we could come up with the idea that, at last, there is a defensive measure, a system against nuclear missiles.

Then, as I've said many times, I think if the research, and when the research, would show that such a weapon is practical, then, before deployment, I think we sit down together and decide how we use this to bring about the elimination of nuclear weapons, offensive weapons, and to make the world safer.

Q. Mr. President, you have described Mr. Gorbachev as a formidable opponent. Did his Paris meeting with the French President give you a new light on the Soviet leader's personality and did that change your approach of the summit in any way?

Unfortunately, President Mitterrand couldn't be at the U.N. meeting, where I managed to meet with the heads of state of our other economic summit allies. And so, I heard secondhand, however, from some of them who had had an opportunity and then from Margaret Thatcher and then, as I say, with our own people who've met with him. I recognize all they say. On the other hand, I just told our people this morning that there will be another first in these meetings. It'll be the first time we've ever had someone on our side of the table who's older than the fellow on the other side of the table. So, maybe I can help this young man with some fatherly advice.

The President. Well, I believe if we're going to eliminate or reduce the tensions or the mistrust between us, it's going to have to be by deeds rather than words. And I enunciated what I believe about the regional things in my speech to the United Nations, that here are these conflicts, people are being killed, such as is going on in Afghanistan. And it is true that there is a government in Afghanistan that is on the side of the Soviet Union. It also is true that the Soviet Union installed that government there; it was not chosen by the people of Afghanistan. Now, my thought is that if we can take these up as examples of the expansionism that I mentioned and see if we together, these two great powers together, cannot withdraw foreign forces and then help and perhaps get international custodial forces while they settle peacefully the dispute within each one of these regions.

This is what we've been trying to do in Nicaragua, where, again, the Soviet Union is -- no question -- they're involved with advisers, trainers, and great amounts of weaponry, more than any Central American country needs for its own defense. So, you have to believe that they, too, are looking toward spreading beyond their borders this totalitarianism. But we have urged the contras and the Sandinista government of Nicaragua to come together, lay down their weapons, declare a truce and come together, and then, we suggested there the church overall supervise or mediate while they seek to settle their differences without further bloodshed. So far the contras have agreed. The Sandinista government is the -- and so has the church -- the Sandinista government has said no.

But this is the type of thing that we think should be the answer to these regional problems, not only out of humanitarianism and a desire to see people be able to live peacefully in their countries but because those regional conflicts run the risk of spreading and leading to confrontation between major powers.

The President. Well, I think the world is pretty much divided right now, certainly Europe and our own hemisphere here between East and West and the NATO alliance -- that NATO line does seem to be a dividing line between that and the Warsaw Pact, and there's no way that I could go there and deal with the subjects before us without having in mind the best interests of our allies also, because in the event of catastrophe they are there on the front line, they would be the first to feel that. So, yes, I expect to have their interests very much in mind.

Q. Sir, this is in a way a followup on Martin Bell's question. I should say that the Europeans have a great nostalgia of detente, and what's your message to them at the eve of Geneva, and what's your vision of a new detente? Limits also?

The President. If it is a real detente, if it is based on the elimination or reduction of the suspicions that now exist -- but in the past, under the guise of detente, we saw the Soviet Union engage in the greatest military buildup in world history and at the same time that we were supposed to be talking as if we had friendly relations and had achieved some kind of a detente. And what was really, finally, going on was an arms race, because when they achieved an imbalance so great that we felt our own security was threatened, we had to get into the arms race. I've often told of a cartoon that appeared in one of our papers when we started our refurbishing of our military power. And it was a cartoon of two Soviet generals, and one was saying to the other, ``I liked the arms race better when we were the only ones in it.'' And I know that Mr. Brezhnev at one point, to his own people, publicly made the statement that through detente they had gained enough that they would soon, shortly, be able to have their way and work their will throughout the world.

Q. Mr. President, if SDI is not negotiable at the moment, so there might be no compromise also on ballistic missiles, could you envision an understanding with Mr. Gorbachev in the area of theater nuclear weapons already in Geneva?

The President. Well, yes, as you say, this is already in Geneva. And this is definitely one of the topics we will take up there at the summit. As you know, our original proposal was -- we were willing to cancel all of them. The Soviets were sitting with SS - 20's in great numbers, multiple-warhead missiles targeted on Europe. And Europe had asked us -- before my arrival here -- had asked my predecessor for weapons to counter those. And the agreement was made that we would. And I inherited the job when I got in here of providing those weapons. They had not yet been delivered. We at no time ever were delivering an equal number of what the Soviets had, but we did propose zero-zero. And on that case, the Soviets met us halfway -- zero for us and they'd continue to have their SS - 20's. But, yes, we would like to see that, as we're negotiating in Geneva, as treated separately from the intercontinental ballistic missiles, the strategic weapons, to see if we could not eliminate those medium-range weapons that could target each other in a matter of just a few minutes.

The President. Well, it is a totalitarian regime. They don't see freedom for their people as the democracies do. But as I've said before, we're not trying to change their system internally. What I think it's necessary to do is to let them know that the democratic world is not going to hold still for their expansionism into other parts of the world and to our own countries. Yes, I used the term the ``evil empire.'' There've been some things that have gone on that -- and yet I have a few quotes of my own that they have said; one in which they even called us ``cannibals.'' So, I think both of us have stopped that language, thinking that we'll get farther at the meetings if we come together to try and eliminate the need for such talk.

Q. Mr. President, the summit of Geneva will be the first in 6 years, and you will have about 8 hours of discussion with Mr. Gorbachev, which is not so much. So, what kind of approach will you try on him? Will you try a kind of man-to-man approach to try to convince, to get your point?

The President. Yes. As a matter of fact, there are some meetings scheduled where it will just be one on one, the two of us. And I will do my utmost, with the evidence at hand, to prove to them that if he does nurse any suspicion that we mean him harm -- I think the presentation of some facts such as at the end of World War II, when we were the only nation whose industry and capacity had not been bombed to rubble, when we were the only ones with the nuclear weapon, we could have been pretty dictatorial, ourselves, in the world. But we weren't; we didn't do that -- and then point out to him how we see their expansionist policies and so forth and see if we can't come together and recognize that this -- when I said deeds, this is how we can eliminate the suspicion. I think the theme that I will take was cited by someone -- the line is not original with me -- who said that nations do not distrust each other because they are armed, they're armed because they distrust each other. So, we'll see if we can't work on that last half.

The President. Not really, no. Maybe I'm relying on past experience. Long before I ever thought I would be in public life in this way -- for about 20 years, I did the negotiating for the union of which I was president for 6 of those 20 years, our contract negotiations, repeatedly, with management. I'm the first President of the United States who was ever president of a labor union.

The President. Well, an overall agreement that we do understand the positions that we're in as the two so-called superpowers and that we have a great responsibility to maintain peace in the world and that it doesn't mean that we interfere with each other's internal policies at all, but that we agree to exist in the world and compete peacefully. And that's the overall tone I think that should come out of the summit. But as I say, it can't just be based on each of us making a promise and saying we feel that way. There have to be some things done, some deeds that really prove that we mean our words.

The President. I think whether it's on an annual basis or back and forth and so forth, I think those are things to be settled at this summit. But I definitely think that a great measure of success would be if we came away from this meeting with a decision that we were going to continue meeting and discussing the problems between us.

The President. Yes, I'm not a great fan of communiques, the sort of settling on a statement in advance. And I know we discussed this with them. I think that it'd make far more sense if each one of us came forth and gave our own view of the meetings and what had been achieved, told frankly what had been accomplished and what hadn't. I have agreed with the heads of state of our NATO allies that on the day that we leave Geneva to come home, I'm going by way of Brussels, and if they will be there, I'm going to give a briefing right then. And then, when I arrive here that night, I am going to go directly from the plane to the Congress and before a Joint Session of our Congress and on television to the people of the United States, report on the meetings. And I think that's a better thing to do. If there are things that we haven't been able to agree on, let's be willing to say it, but say we'll keep on trying -- but not have a communique which all too often seems to want to gloss over the things that weren't accomplished.

The President. Well, I think it'll be on the basis of when I report, judgment of the outcome of the things that I will specify that were done or the things that were left undone or the things, then, that we've agreed to go on talking about.

The President. No, no, as a matter of fact, he told me that they kind of went at it and that he was argumentative and interrupted at times. But then he said he, [Secretary of State] George Shultz, interrupted also and found out that it wasn't resented, that it was that kind of a free-for-all discussion. And he said that he was very set in his ways -- or I mean, about his views on the aims of his country and so forth. And, well, we're very set on ours.

Q. Mr. President, in the second debate with the then-candidate of the Democrats, Mr. Mondale, you said that, even possibly, you would share the results of the scientific research on SDI with the Russians in order to make the world safer. Do you still consider in doing that, finally?

The President. Maybe I didn't make it clear. That's what I meant in my earlier answer -- not just share the scientific research with them. Let me give you my dream of what would happen. We have the weapon. We don't start deploying it. We get everybody together, and we say, ``Here, here it is. And here's how it works and what it'll do to incoming missiles.'' Now, we think that all of us who have nuclear weapons should agree that we're going to eliminate the nuclear weapons.

But we will make available to everyone this weapon. I don't mean we'll give it to them. They're going to have to pay for it -- [laughter] -- but at cost. But we would make this defensive weapon available.

The President. Well, I think there was some misunderstanding about it and where we were going with it. And I know in the meetings up at New York, at the U.N. opening this time, there was a great change on the part of a number of them when I explained what our view of this was. And so I think that there is not that great opposition to it. And a number of the countries where they, as governments, did not want to become involved, for whatever reasons they had, but would not object to their own scientists, their own private business firms and so forth, or industries getting involved and joining in with us in this research and development.

Q. Mr. President, on behalf of my colleagues here, I would like to thank you very much for granting us this interview and sharing your views just a week before your summit meeting in Geneva with the Soviet leader. Thank you very much, Mr. President.

There are many encouraging signs that we are making progress in bringing this disease under control. The death rates from heart attacks and stroke have been declining dramatically over the past decade and more. From 1972 to 1984, for example, the death rate for heart attack dropped by 33 percent, and for stroke by 48 percent.

At least one of the factors responsible for this decline is an enhanced awareness among the medical profession and the public of the dangers of high blood pressure and the steps that must be taken to control it. This growing awareness has been brought about with the assistance of the National High Blood Pressure Education Program, a coordinated effort involving the Federal government; community volunteer organizations; medical associations; industry and labor; State and local public health agencies, and many other groups. Since the program began in 1972, public understanding of high blood pressure, the number of people being treated, and the number of those effectively controlling their high blood pressure has increased considerably.

Often called the ``silent killer'' because it usually has no easily detectable symptoms, high blood pressure is an insidious condition that may lead to heart attack, stroke, or kidney damage. It is one of three major risk factors, along with cigarette smoking and elevated blood cholesterol, for cardiovascular diseases. All of these factors can be controlled or eliminated.

High blood pressure can be detected using the familiar inflatable arm cuff and stethoscope. The test takes only a few moments and is painless. Once detected, high blood pressure can be very effectively controlled. Sometimes this can be accomplished by such measures as weight loss, salt restriction, and exercise. When these do not work, the physician can select an appropriate treatment program from a wide range of drug therapies.

I urge all Americans to take advantage of the high blood pressure screening activities in their communities, their work places, and their public health facilities. They should ask their physicians how often they should have a blood pressure check. All Americans should be aware of the dangers of this very widespread condition and they should also know that these dangers can be eliminated by proven methods.

Because of failure by Congress to act on appropriations bills and on legislation to raise the ceiling on the national debt, our country faces an unprecedented crisis in our history. It is an unnecessary crisis, and it can be avoided. But the President cannot stand by and wait for the worst to happen, including dishonoring the Government's checks.

We cannot avoid some serious damage. However, to mitigate the problem, the President has authorized the Director of the Office of Management and Budget, Jim Miller, to instruct the Federal agencies, starting Friday, to stop issuing any new checks if the debt ceiling is not raised by then. The Government would continue to function, but it would temporarily stop paying its bills -- to vendors, to its own employees, to individuals receiving government benefits, to State and local governments -- until this crisis is resolved. We are not going to issue checks that will bounce.

The President today announced the appointment of Kathleen Osborne to be Special Assistant to the President. Ms. Osborne will remain in the personal office of the President, where she has served as his personal secretary for 4 years, and will continue carrying out her duties in that capacity.

President for Public Liaison. Mr. Kojelis will head the division of foreign policy and defense issues in the Office of Public Liaison. He has served 2\1/2\ years as Associate Director in the same office.

Ms. Risque has been with the Reagan administration since January 1981. Previously, she was a government affairs representative for private industry; a Ford administration appointee at the Commerce Department; and a publicist. She also worked in program and campaign development for the Republican Party. She has a bachelor of arts degree from Radford College and currently resides in Virginia.

Without this legislation, the cost of services that State and local governments provide -- police, firefighters, and other services necessary to the success of any community -- would have increased by as much as $3 billion per year. The new law provides important relief to State and local governments, their employees, and all American taxpayers. The law contains an effective date of April 15, 1986, eliminating the unexpected back pay liability for overtime pay dating from the court's decision. It enables all State and local governments to accept offers of voluntary service from civic-minded citizens, and it allows the continuation of a longstanding practice by legitimizing the use of compensatory time as a substitute for cash in paying overtime hours.

Although real improvement has been brought about by this legislation, I believe the constitutional principles of federalism must be recognized so that limits are placed on Federal regulation of State and local governments in a manner consistent with their special status in our system of government. In this and in other regards, federalism will remain a major priority of my administration.

Each year, an estimated 500,000 more Americans are told by their physicians that they have diabetes. This chronic disease interferes with the body's ability to derive energy from glucose, a type of sugar and an important product of digested food. When diabetes strikes children, it is in a form that can soon be fatal without daily injections of the life-saving hormone insulin. Most people with diabetes have another form of the disease that begins in adulthood and that, over the years, can insidiously and progressively damage the heart, eyes, kidneys, and nervous system.

The acute illness and long-term complications of diabetes cost the country an estimated $14 billion each year in medical outlays, disability payments, and loss of income. Individuals and families suffer an inestimable drain on their emotional and economic resources in coping with this disease.

Hope for the future lies in research. In recent years, scientists have laid the groundwork for an eventual cure for diabetes. Basic research has provided the tools with which scientists are describing the genetic, immunologic and biochemical mechanisms that underlie diabetes. Through research, we now know that diabetes has multiple causes, and scientists are developing the means to understand and correct these defects in ways specific to each cause. Research is also clarifying how best to treat diabetes. This research, along with efforts to transmit the most up-to-the-minute knowledge to health practitioners and to individuals who might be affected by diabetes, is helping to preserve the health of its potential victims.

Only through the continued commitment and cooperation of the Federal government, the scientific community, and the private agencies and citizens dedicated to the fight against diabetes can progress continue.

We Americans are justly indebted to all who have served in uniform in the cause of our national defense. It is an honor for me to invite special attention to the unique contributions made to that cause by women veterans.

Throughout our Nation's history, American women have answered duty's call, even when that call exacted a great price. Many women have become casualties in their country's service, and countless more have suffered family disruptions and dislocations caused by commitments to the armed services.

The nearly 1.2 million women veterans living in the United States today have contributed immeasurably to restoring and maintaining the peace. Their performance in a wide range of demanding specialties in all branches of service has been in the proudest traditions of our Armed Forces, and it is altogether fitting that we as a Nation pause to express our appreciation.

Settlement Agreement of January 19, 1981 (the ``Algiers Accords''), continues to make progress in arbitrating the claims before it. Since my last report, the Tribunal has rendered 25 more decisions, for a total of 194 final decisions. Of these, 146 have been awards in favor of American claimants; 101 were awards on agreed terms, authorizing and approving payment of settlements negotiated by the parties; and 45 were adjudicated decisions. As of October 15, 1985, total payments to successful American claimants from the Security Account stood at approximately $368 million. In cases between the governments, the Tribunal has issued two decisions in favor of each government, dismissed one claim that had been filed by the United States, and dismissed four claims that had been filed by Iran. In addition, Iran has withdrawn fifteen of its government-to-government claims, while the United States has withdrawn only three.

Shortly before Messrs. Briner and Virally assumed their new positions, Tribunal proceedings had been briefly disrupted because of travel difficulties allegedly encountered by Iranian respondents in connection with the Iran-Iraq war. With these alleged difficulties having abated, and the two new arbitrators having assumed their roles as Chairmen, the Tribunal has resumed normal operations.

Since my last report, Iran has initiated two new interpretive disputes. The first concerns the purported obligation of the U.S. Government to satisfy Tribunal awards issued in favor of Iran against private U.S. claimants. The second concerns the Tribunal's jurisdiction over indirect claims for losses incurred by corporations (and similar entities) that lack U.S. nationality, but which are controlled by U.S. nationals. The Department of State is now preparing responsive pleadings in both these proceedings.

Markazi Iran concerning the payment from Dollar Account No. 2 (the interest-bearing escrow account established at the Bank of England in January 1981 with the deposit of $1.418 billion of previously blocked Iranian funds) of nonsyndicated debt claims of U.S. banks against Iran. Since my last report, Continental Illinois National Bank and Trust Company of Chicago reached a settlement with Iran, bringing to 30 the total number of bank settlements involving payments from Dollar Account No. 2. About 16 banks have yet to settle their claims. In addition, a number of those banks that have already reached settlements with Iran have reserved claims against Dollar Account No. 2.

Iran's syndicated debt. Agreement on the text of this ``Agreed Clarification'' was reached in June, and Treasury instructed the Federal Reserve Bank of New York, as fiscal agent of the United States, to sign the document; however, the Bank Markazi representatives were not prepared to sign. They claimed the delay was due to the need to obtain additional formal clearances in Tehran and that there was no substantive problem with the agreement. The Department of the Treasury is hopeful that the necessary approval in Tehran will be forthcoming.

The purpose of the deduction was to reimburse the U.S. Government for a portion of the expenses incurred in connection with the arbitration of claims of U.S. persons against Iran before the Tribunal and the maintenance of the Security Account from which such claims are paid. In ordering the deduction of this user fee, Treasury relied solely on the authority of the Independent Offices Appropriation Act (the ``IOAA''). The amounts deducted, which as of August 16, 1985, totaled $7.3 million, had been paid into the Treasury as miscellaneous receipts. Last May, in a case brought by Sperry Corporation, the U.S. Claims Court issued a bench ruling holding that the two percent fee did not comply with the requirements of the IOAA and hence was invalid. No judgment has yet been issued, and, in light of the new legislation described below, it is unlikely that one will be issued.

Section 502 of this legislation directs the Federal Reserve Bank of New York to deduct one and one-half percent from the first $5 million awarded on each claim paid from the Security Account, and one percent from any amount over $5 million, and to deposit the amounts deducted into the Treasury to the credit of miscellaneous receipts. The constitutionality of this legislation has been challenged, however, in a continuation of the litigation by Sperry. By its terms, Section 502 is effective as of June 7, 1982. Consequently, the Department of the Treasury is in the process of refunding to those claimants that have received awards paid from the Security Account the difference between the two percent fee already deducted and the one and one-half/one percent fee authorized by Section 502 of Public Law 99 - 93. These refunds will total approximately $2.6 million.

Commission to determine the validity and amounts of any claims against Iran that are settled en bloc by the United States and Iran, and provides certain limited exceptions to the disclosure provisions of the Freedom of Information Act for Tribunal-related documents within the possession of the U.S. Government.

Ambassadors Max Kampelman, John Tower, and Maynard Glitman. The meeting provided an opportunity for our chief negotiators to brief me on the just concluded round of negotiations in Geneva and on their perspectives for future developments in the talks.

This past round in Geneva, the third in the negotiations which began this past March, has been useful. It was marked by the Soviet presentation, in late September, of a counterproposal to the concrete reductions offers which the U.S. had put forward at the outset of the talks. Drawing on the counsel of our negotiating team and of our experts in Washington, we analyzed this Soviet counteroffer very carefully, making clear both its positive elements and the areas in which it fell seriously short of the criteria which we have established for an effective and equitable arms reduction agreement. As I have emphasized before, these necessary criteria are deep cuts; no first-strike advantages; research on defense, because defense is much safer than offense; and no cheating -- that is to say, full compliance.

Building upon these criteria, as well as the positive seeds in the Soviet counterproposal, I instructed, on November 1, our negotiators to table a new set of proposals in Geneva. These new U.S. proposals cover all three areas of the negotiations: strategic nuclear arms, intermediate nuclear forces, and defense and space arms. These new developments in the Geneva negotiations demonstrate that a serious give-and-take process can now take place. We welcome this, and we are determined to do our part to bring about the real nuclear reductions that the world desires and deserves. If there is equal determination and flexibility on the Soviet part, this can be done. I therefore hope that my coming meeting with General Secretary Gorbachev will give further momentum to this process.

Glitman for their highly professional and very patient negotiating efforts in Geneva, and my own appreciation for the wise counsel they have provided to me. Their continued efforts and advice will be vital in the days and months ahead, as we strive for radical, equitable, and verifiable cuts in nuclear arms.

Officers Association of the United States and serves on the national executive committee and the building committee. He is former chairman of the Central Texas Salvation Army Advisory Committee and former member of the board of directors of the Dallas County Mental Health Association.

During the period covered by the report, the Sandinistas have continued their refusal to engage in dialogue with the democratic opposition and have adopted an intransigent position in Contadora negotiations. The October 15 suspension of civil liberties dramatically reflected the Sandinistas' continued repression of human rights and their desire to silence their opponents rather than pursue internal reconciliation.

The events of the ninety days covered by the attached report clearly show the need for continued support for the Nicaraguan democratic resistance. Only it can provide the sharp pressure needed to move the Sandinistas toward serious negotiations and prevent the consolidation of a totalitarian state allied with Cuba and the Soviet bloc in Central America.

The loss of life and the destruction have caused sorrow to us all. Our prayers are with you and all those who are working to rescue those who have been affected. Colombia is a great friend and ally of the United States. I want you to know in this hour of need, that we want to work with your government and be of help.

Q. Your first meeting with the Soviet party secretary in Geneva has focused worldwide attention upon the subject of U.S.-Soviet relations, greatly raising the expectations of many for possible improvements in this relationship. What do you yourself think that the outcome of the summit meeting will be?

The President. I am optimistic that my meeting with General Secretary Gorbachev can be an important step on the path to a safer, more stable, and more productive East-West relationship -- if the Soviets come to Geneva with the same goal in mind. Such an outcome would be an investment in the future, in a safer and better world for ourselves and our children. I think it's clear that the Soviets see things much differently than do we of the democratic world and that those differences will ensure continued competition for years to come. Yet this competition can and must be peaceful.

Secretary Gorbachev shares my determination to go to Geneva with the idea of moving forward the arms control process as well as other areas of our relationship. To establish a more constructive relationship, discussion of arms reductions must be accompanied by a frank discussion of areas of tension and the causes of those tensions which have led the U.S. and our allies, including the Japanese, to build up our defensive capabilities. Someone once said, ``Nations do not distrust each other because they are armed; they are armed because they distrust each other.'' That's why it's especially important to make progress in all areas, even as we seek to cut our nuclear arsenals.

On October 24 at the United Nations, I proposed a comprehensive approach to dealing with five long-running conflicts -- in Afghanistan, Cambodia, Ethiopia, Angola, and Nicaragua. We are also seeking ways to increase contact and communication between the Soviet and American peoples, and we hope the Soviet Union will take practical steps to meet Western concerns on human rights and humanitarian questions. I cannot predict breakthroughs in any of these areas. But I think the meeting will be an important step towards real progress down the road.

Q. Could you discuss the possibility that an even broader, more encompassing framework for arms control negotiations might come about as a result of your meeting with the Soviet leader in Geneva next month? In your view, are there any substantive issues not now included in the arms control talks that should be?

Geneva nuclear and space forum provides a good framework for us to address the most pressing problems we face: first, to bring about the radical reduction of offensive nuclear weapons to equal levels under verifiable agreements; and second, to discuss with the Soviets the possibilities for moving toward a more stable and secure world in which defenses play an increasingly prominent role, if the technological research being done by the United States and the Soviet Union shows this is feasible.

There are other arms control fora where the United States and our NATO allies are pursuing a broad arms control agenda, for example, the MBFR talks on troop levels in central Europe; the Stockholm CDE Conference; and the Conference on Disarmament, where we have proposed a comprehensive global ban on chemical weapons. On nuclear testing, we think the first step is to improve the verification of compliance with the thresholds set down in the Threshold Test Ban Treaty. I've unconditionally invited Soviet experts to observe one of our nuclear tests, a practical step toward verification of effective limits on underground nuclear testing.

To reach effective arms control agreements requires genuine give-and-take on both sides. For too long the Soviet Union has not been willing to engage in serious negotiations or to make reasonable proposals. And they coupled their massive military buildup with an attempt to win in the streets and parliaments of the democratic world concessions that they couldn't win at the bargaining table. Fortunately, Western governments and public opinion remained steadfast in their insistence that arms control agreements improve stability rather than give unilateral Soviet advantage and that they meet other criteria of a successful agreement, such as significant reductions in nuclear warheads and the most destabilizing missile systems, equitable limits and constraints on other systems, and verifiability.

This steadfastness brought the Soviets back to the negotiating table after their walkout and, more recently, convinced them to table an arms control counterproposal that accepts the principle of deep reductions. Although the Soviet counterproposal is unacceptable to us as is, it includes positive elements. It is for this reason that I instructed American negotiators at Geneva to put forward a new U.S. proposal designed to advance the prospects for achieving real reductions in nuclear arms, enhancing stability and addressing the legitimate concerns of the United States and our allies, as well as the Soviet Union.

Q. Although we can assume that this upcoming summit meeting between the two superpowers might contain a sort of give-and-take process, it seems to us that you have struck a hard or rather nonnegotiable position on behalf of the Strategic Defense Initiative (SDI), to which the Soviet leader is deadly opposed. Are you confident in persuading Mr. Gorbachev to accept this SDI concept, or are you going to take a little bit more flexible stance on this issue?

The President. My vision of the future is of a more stable and secure world in which strategic defenses play a dominant role, one which would neutralize the menace of ballistic missiles and, ultimately, allow us to eliminate nuclear weapons altogether. And since a transition from reliance on offensive to defensive weapons will be neither simple nor quick, it is in everyone's interest to explore now the possibilities for doing so. That's why we have raised with the Soviets the vital relationship between offensive and defensive systems and sought to discuss ways for jointly managing a stable transition to a peace based on defense systems which threaten no one, rather than the threat of nuclear retaliation.

Now, let me speak more specifically about SDI. It is a research program to ascertain the feasibility of defenses against ballistic missiles. SDI research has been and will continue to be conducted within the bounds of the ABM treaty. Incidentally, the Soviets have conducted strategic defense programs since the 1960's. Their research and development program far exceeds ours in this area.

When our research is completed, and if strategic defenses prove feasible, we will consult with our allies before deciding whether to develop and deploy strategic defenses. We will discuss and, as appropriate, negotiate with the Soviets prior to deployment, in accordance with the ABM treaty.

The President. These missiles are included in the Geneva talks. The Soviet SS - 20 is more accurate than earlier Soviet intermediate-range forces. It is mobile and thus easily redeployed. It also carries three independently targetable warheads, as opposed to the single warhead of the earlier generation of Soviet intermediate-range missiles; thus, the SS - 20 greatly increases the threat to Asia as well as to Europe. In 1981 we advocated that a total elimination of U.S. and Soviet missiles in this category is the best solution, and we have made this proposal to the Soviets in the Geneva arms control talks. As an interim measure, we have proposed reductions to the lowest possible equal number of these U.S. and Soviet missile warheads on a global basis. We have made this position clear in the Geneva talks.

Nuclear weapons that threaten our allies and friends anywhere in the world are, of course, of deep concern to us. We could not, therefore, accept any Soviet proposal in Geneva which would endeavor to address European security by increasing the threat to our friends and allies in Asia.

Soviet counterparts. In my speech to the United Nations on October 24, I proposed that we and the Soviets make a special effort to contribute to the resolution of crises in Afghanistan, Cambodia, Ethiopia, Angola, and Nicaragua. Our starting point would be a process of negotiation among the warring parties in troubled countries. In the case of Afghanistan, this would include the Soviet Union; in Cambodia, the Vietnamese. On a second level, once negotiations take hold and the parties involved are making progress, representatives of the United States and the Soviet Union should sit down together and ask how we can best support the ongoing talks among warring parties. Finally, if the first two steps are successful, we would welcome each country back into the world economy, so that its citizens can share in the dynamic growth that other developing countries enjoy.

Actions by the Soviet Union in Asia, Africa, and the Western Hemisphere have been a major cause of tension in our relations over the last decade. Moreover, they could lead to situations that could be hard for either side to control. I hope we will make substantial progress in resolving our differences over our approaches to regional problems. General Secretary Gorbachev can contribute to this progress by bringing a positive response to my U.N. initiative. Afghanistan would be a good place to start. The Soviets say that they agree with us that only a political solution can end Afghanistan's war. If so, they should begin by addressing the critical question: that of the more than 100,000 Soviet troops waging war against the Afghan people. As for the Middle East, the way to peace is through direct negotiations with the parties involved.

The President. The meeting with Mr. Gorbachev is an important part of a process we have long pursued -- putting East-West relations on a safer and more productive course. I have no illusions about the difficulties involved. But General Secretary Gorbachev and I have an obligation to try and narrow some of the profound differences between us. If we make progress toward that goal, all of the world will benefit. To establish the foundation for a more constructive relationship, I want to discuss not just arms control but regional tensions, our bilateral relationship, and our mutual obligation to respect human rights. All of these issues are important to us. Even before the meeting, we want to make as much progress as possible in all aspects of our relationship. We are ready to do this and hope the Soviet Union will cooperate.

Obviously, we're not going to solve every difference in the next few weeks. I hope, however, that the meetings will give momentum to a genuine process of problem-solving and that we can agree on a bilateral agenda that will bring dividends in the future. A dedicated approach to a safe future would be the most important thing I can bring home from Geneva.

The President. You have already made a considerable contribution to peace and East-West stability through your steadfast support of a policy which brought the Soviets back to the bargaining table and convinced them to respond to our arms control proposals with a serious counterproposal of their own. The free world has contributed by maintaining its strength, unity, and sense of purpose. The revival of democratic beliefs in all corners of the world and the expanding global prosperity within the free world has to have made a deep impression in the Soviet leadership. Nowhere is this more apparent than in east Asia, where countries such as Japan, which are dedicated to individual freedom and initiative, have set new standards for social and economic development.

U.S.-Japanese relationship during the past 40 years, for example, is evidence of the foresight of two generations of American and Japanese statesmen. The support of nations such as Japan, which share our democratic values, has played a crucial role in strengthening our hand as we look to our meeting in Geneva. I have consulted frequently with Prime Minister Nakasone in the months leading up to the meeting and I will continue to do so as our discussions with the Soviets develop.

I am delighted to join with Speaker O'Neill in welcoming the important Anglo-Irish accord announced today by Mrs. Thatcher and Dr. FitzGerald. We applaud its promise of peace and a new dawn for the troubled communities of Northern Ireland. I wish to congratulate my two good friends -- and outstanding Prime Ministers -- who have demonstrated such statesmanship, vision, and courage.

The peoples of the United Kingdom and of Ireland have made a great contribution to the political and intellectual heritage of the United States and to our economic and social development. We are particularly pleased that these two neighbors, faithful friends of America, so close to the United States in their ties of history, kinship, and commitment to democratic values have joined on a common causeway toward hope and harmony in Northern Ireland. All Americans -- and above all those of Irish descent who have prayed for an end to violence in the land of their ancestry -- can take pride in this important step forward.

We view this agreement as a clear demonstration of British and Irish determination to make progress concerning Northern Ireland and in their bilateral relations. Given the complex situation in Northern Ireland, all may not applaud this agreement. But let me state that the United States strongly supports this initiative, which pledges to both communities in Northern Ireland respect for their rights and traditions within a society free from violence and intimidation. On a number of occasions, we have joined the Irish and British Governments in condemning violence and discord in Northern Ireland and calling on all Americans not to assist, either with money or moral support, those misguided efforts that prolong the nightmare of terrorism and hatred. Our call is even more compelling now that a framework for peace has been agreed upon. I wish to reconfirm and reinforce our condemnation of terrorism wherever it may take place.

Now that a framework has been established, the work of constructing a durable peace must proceed. This will involve rebuilding what has been destroyed by hatred and violence and giving hope to those who have been tempted by despair. We have often encouraged Americans to let their foreign investments and vacation dollars, and the employment opportunities that accompany such spending, find their way to the Emerald Isle. I am proud that Northern Ireland enterprises in which American money is involved are among the most progressive in promoting equal opportunity for all.

Northern Ireland. And I will be working closely with the Congress, in a bipartisan effort, to find tangible ways for the United States to lend practical support to this important agreement. The Speaker, who has kindly joined me at the White House today, and I have already discussed how the United States could assist in promoting peace, friendship, and harmony between the two great Irish traditions.

The President. The Speaker and I are very pleased this morning to be able to tell you that we have each issued a statement about what has taken place today between the Taoiseach of Ireland and the Prime Minister of England in regard to Northern Ireland in trying to finally settle the tragic internecine warfare going on there. We're delighted that this has come about, and we hope that, in a bipartisan way, that we can go forward with anything we can do to help -- and they have agreed to -- the two governments, other two governments -- to help in restoring sound economics there -- and anything we can do to encourage private investment that will provide prosperity and employment for their people. But it has been, we think, a great breakthrough which shows great promise. Now, Tip.

Speaker O'Neill. Well, thank you, Mr. President. I think it was very courageous on the part of the leaders of the English Government and the Government of Ireland to get together to try to work out and solve the problems of Northern Ireland. There, in the land of cultures, yet 90 miles from the European Continent, there have been hundreds of killings and thousands of woundings, and it has showed through the years that bullets and bombs are not the answer -- the answer is talking the question over. And I'm glad that both of these countries appreciate the severity of the questions. America has flourished because of diversity, and there's no reason that Northern Ireland can't be the same way. And so, I stand here beside the President of the United States, part of the fact that we both support the leaders of those two great nations -- the Taoiseach and the Prime Minister.

Presidents have said, that if we could bring this to an end, we would do everything that we humanly could. And I speak for the House, Mr. President -- any means that we can use in the Congress of the United States to help bring peace in Northern Ireland, I assure you that we'll have the full cooperation of the Congress; there's no question in my mind.

The President. I'm -- this is almost -- this was that knuckleball I was talking about yesterday, to throw something -- I was prepared not to take any questions. We're not going to take questions here at this particular occasion; statements have been issued. But when you ask one like that with the Speaker standing here, yes, I am very pleased and delighted with what he had to say.

Speaker O'Neill. I want you to know that we wish you all the success and happiness and best wishes, and you come home with the greatest results -- everyone in America. You're our leader, and we know that you're going to have results.

Mr. Madsen is president of Bonneville International Corp., an independent broadcast organization wholly owned by the Mormon Church, in Salt Lake City, UT. He has served as chairman of the international committee, National Association of Broadcasters, and is a member of the Broadcasters Foundation. In 1981 he was recognized by the National Association of Broadcasters for his achievements in broadcasting.

The PFIAB is a permanent, nonpartisan body of distinguished Americans who perform a continuing and objective review of the performance of the intelligence community. The Board reports directly to the President and has full access to all information necessary to advise the President on the conduct, management, and coordination of the various agencies of the intelligence community.

United States Postal Service, and certain Independent Agencies for the fiscal year 1986. Last night, under emergency conditions, I signed two pieces of temporary legislation to prevent the Federal Government from shutting down and having its checks dishonored.

This is an unacceptable situation in two respects. First, the temporary bills on appropriations and the debt ceiling again illustrate the failure of the budget process. I have received only 4 of the required 13 appropriations bills, though all were supposed to be passed by September 30th. We have known for months that the debt limit would have to be increased, yet legislative inaction forced us to accelerate the redemption of securities in the Social Security and other trust funds and waste millions of taxpayer dollars.

Second, this episode is just the latest example of an ingrained incapacity to tackle the large budget deficit. Although a budget resolution was finally produced 2\1/2\ months behind schedule, its presumed savings have not been achieved. The old propensity to spend and spend and to capitulate to one interest group after another continues unabated. The solution to solving the deficit problem is not to be found in spending more money. The need to veto this unacceptable measure is proof positive of the need to sign acceptable legislation to improve the budget process, such as the amendment proposed by Senators Gramm, Rudman, and Hollings.

Many Members of Congress share my frustration. That is why the Senate passed in early October the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings legislation to force hard decisions and set us on a course toward a balanced budget. We need this legislation urgently, just as we need the line-item veto. There is still ample time to enact both before this session of Congress ends. This chronic budgetary crisis, and the inexcusable waste of taxpayer dollars that it entails, highlights once again the pressing need for basic reform of the congressional budget process. But there can be no gain for our prosperity or our security if Congress approves the version of Gramm-Rudman-Hollings passed by the House -- a distorted version that takes unacceptable risks with our national security.

In my budget last February I proposed a commonsense path toward lower deficits by reforming, reducing, or eliminating about 50 domestic spending programs. The Congress has accepted very few of these proposals, and every nondefense appropriations bill will far exceed my budget. The bill I am vetoing today is a case in point. For discretionary programs the bill is more than $900 million above my budget and $180 million for budget authority and other discretionary resources above the level for this bill implied in the budget resolution. Its language contains provisions that are purely and simply bad policy, and one section of the bill raises serious constitutional concerns with respect to Presidential appointments.

In my budget last February I proposed reforms, reductions, and terminations in some 50 domestic programs to start us on a sensible path to lower budget deficits. Because Congress has accepted very few of these proposals, it is now clear that all of the non-defense appropriations bills will be far above my budget.

For discretionary programs the bill provides $900 million more than my budget and is $180 million above the level for budget authority and other discretionary resources implied in the budget resolution. For example, my budget proposed a major paring of the remaining postal subsidies, and the Congressional budget resolution envisaged a lesser saving. This bill provides $820 million for these subsidies, which represents little saving from current levels and is $72 million above the budget resolution level.

Apart from its spending levels, this bill contains a number of language provisions that are highly objectionable. Among them are provisions blocking performance-based regulations for civil servants issued by the Office of Personnel Management, curbing the authority of the General Services Administration to contract out certain services to the private sector, forbidding review by the Office of Management and Budget of marketing orders for agricultural products, and one section of the bill raises serious constitutional concerns with respect to presidential appointments.

The presidential veto is an instrument to be used with care. But until the Congress comes to grips with the problem of the large budget deficit, it is an instrument that I shall not hesitate to employ.

They are the primary civilizing agent, preparing the young for good citizenship. It is, therefore, fitting that we give special recognition to those generous families that encourage and take part in adoption.

Children who live in a permanent home with caring adoptive parents are far less likely to develop emotional and psychological problems. We must encourage the effort to promote the adoption of all children without families -- with particular emphasis on those who are older, handicapped, or members of minority groups. Whenever possible, the adoption process should work to keep siblings together as they are placed in new families.

Through promotional efforts in the workplace and through inclusion of adoption benefits in employee benefit plans, the American corporate sector has been supporting the adoption of children with special needs. Furthermore, through the Adoption Assistance and Child Welfare Act, many children with special needs have been adopted who otherwise might not have been.

National Adoption Week should remind us that no woman need fear that the child she carries is unwanted. It is a sad paradox that while thousands of American couples desperately desire to adopt a baby, many women who undergo abortions every year in the United States are unaware of all the couples eager to share their home with a newborn and to give that child all the love and care they would give if they had been its natural parents. Adoption is an alternative that provides family life for children who cannot live with their biological parents, and it is especially fitting that at Thanksgiving time we emphasize the importance of family life through the observance of National Adoption Week.

This week provides an opportunity to reaffirm our commitment to give every child waiting to be adopted the chance to become part of a family. During this holiday season, let us work to encourage community acceptance and support for adoption, and take time to recognize the efforts of adoptive parent groups, companies, organizations, and agencies that assure adoptive placements for waiting children. We also pay tribute to those magnanimous people who have opened their homes and hearts to children, forming the bonds of love that we call the family.

Although the time and date of the first American thanksgiving observance may be uncertain, there is no question but that this treasured custom derives from our Judeo-Christian heritage. ``Unto Thee, O God, do we give thanks,'' the Psalmist sang, praising God not only for the ``wondrous works'' of His creation, but for loving guidance and deliverance from dangers.

Governor William Bradford created the most famous of all such observances at Plymouth Colony when a bounteous harvest prompted him to proclaim a special day ``to render thanksgiving to the Almighty God for all His blessings.'' The Spaniards in California and the Dutch in New Amsterdam also held services to give public thanks to God.

In 1777, during our War of Independence, the Continental Congress set aside a day for thanksgiving and praise for our victory at the battle of Saratoga. It was the first time all the colonies took part in such an event on the same day. The following year, upon news that France was coming to our aid, George Washington at Valley Forge prescribed a special day of thanksgiving. Later, as our first President, he responded to a Congressional petition by declaring Thursday, November 26, 1789, the first Thanksgiving Day of the United States of America.

It is in that spirit that I now invite all Americans to take part again in this beautiful tradition with its roots deep in our history and deeper still in our hearts. We manifest our gratitude to God for the many blessings he has showered upon our land and upon its people.

In this season of Thanksgiving we are grateful for our abundant harvests and the productivity of our industries; for the discoveries of our laboratories; for the researches of our scientists and scholars; for the achievements of our artists, musicians, writers, clergy, teachers, physicians, businessmen, engineers, public servants, farmers, mechanics, artisans, and workers of every sort whose honest toil of mind and body in a free land rewards them and their families and enriches our entire Nation.

Let us thank God for our families, friends, and neighbors, and for the joy of this very festival we celebrate in His name. Let every house of worship in the land and every home and every heart be filled with the spirit of gratitude and praise and love on this Thanksgiving Day.

It was an accurate description and a supreme tribute from a child prodigy whose musicial genius first found expression on the violin -- at the age of three! Born in Budapest on November 18, 1899, Eugene Ormandy came to the United States in 1921. His first job was as a violinist with the orchestra of the Capitol motion picture theater in New York City. Soon he became its conductor.

Leopold Stokowski as director of the Philadelphia Orchestra. It would be his true home for the rest of his life. Under the magic of his baton, conductor and orchestra entered the musical pantheon of the United States and of the world.

Eugene Ormandy brought widespread acclaim to his adopted nation, which he loved with the passion of a patriot. He served as an ambassador of goodwill through the Philadelphia Orchestra's tours of China, the Soviet Union, South America, Europe, and Japan.

To commemorate these magnificent and enduring contributions of Eugene Ormandy to the rich cultural traditions of the United States, the Congress, by Senate Joint Resolution 174, has authorized and requested the President to declare the anniversary of the birth of Eugene Ormandy as ``Eugene Ormandy Appreciation Day'' and called upon the American people to observe the day with appropriate ceremonies.

Section 1. (a) No petroleum product refined in Libya (except petroleum product loaded aboard maritime vessels at any time prior to two days after the effective date of this Executive Order) may be imported into the United States, its territories or possessions.

Sec. 2. The Secretary of the Treasury may issue such rulings and instructions, or, following consultation with the Secretaries of State and Energy, such regulations as he deems necessary to implement this Order.

Actually, the Red Cross was founded in Geneva over a hundred years ago to care for the victims of war. Then Clara Barton, who became known as the ``Angel of the Battlefield'' during our Civil War, brought the idea to the United States and expanded it to include disaster relief during peacetime. One way or another the Red Cross has touched most of our lives. Last year close to 1\1/2\ million volunteers worked for the Red Cross, with many millions more giving blood and participating in their programs for young people. It was with the Red Cross, in fact, that I received training for one of my first jobs -- as a lifeguard. And today I'm proud to serve as this noble organization's honorary chairman.

This year has been unprecedented in the history of Red Cross disaster relief efforts, and their resources have been stretched to the limit. In addition to helping our neighbors around the world -- in famine-stricken Africa, after the devastating earthquake in Mexico City, and most recently with the eruption of a volcano in Colombia -- well, Red Cross has had its work cut out for it here at home, too. A series of natural disasters has struck the United States since last July 1st. Several of them you probably know by name: Bob, Danny, Elena, Gloria, and Juan. But in addition to these hurricanes, there have been other disasters: fires, evacuations, the Puerto Rican mudslides, and the floods in Virginia, West Virginia, Maryland, and Pennsylvania, which were extremely destructive and have added enormously to the burden of Red Cross relief efforts.

Still, each time disaster struck, the Red Cross volunteers were there. I'm sure that for those people whom the storms made homeless a hot meal, a Red Cross blanket, a soft bed, and a warm smile helped get them through the nightmare and take that first step on the difficult road to rebuilding their lives. I guess the only good thing to come out of natural disasters like these are the stories of self-sacrifice and downright heroism, and so often those heroes turn out to be Red Cross volunteers.

That was the case recently in West Virginia when some volunteers heard a dog barking inside a flooded house. By the time they got there, the water was already rising past the windows. Inside, a man was struggling to save his furniture from the water and had no idea the peril he was in. He was blind and may not have been evacuated if the Red Cross hadn't come to save both him and his dog. Then there was a family in West Virginia marooned in their home; the only way food and supplies could reach them was by a Red Cross boat. And there were the volunteers who dove into a rushing torrent to save a mother and her children just before they got swept away by the current.

The Red Cross is always there for us; now we need to be there for them. You may be surprised to know that, as big as it is, the Red Cross receives no government funding; it is entirely dependent on private contributions for support. Just since the beginning of July, the Red Cross has spent a record $48 million responding to emergencies, and they are quite simply running out of funds. So, they are launching an emergency disaster relief campaign, and they've set a fundraising goal of $20 million. It's now time for all of us to volunteer for the volunteers, to give to those who've given so much of themselves. In recent years we've witnessed a resurgence in the great American spirit of neighbor helping neighbor. Now more of you are volunteering your time and contributing money to charity than any time in our nation's past. We've seen Americans unite to help feed the hungry around the world, provide emergency assistance to disaster victims in foreign lands, and we've seen one of the largest private sector initiatives in history raise funds to restore our great Statue of Liberty. Well, today I ask your help so that others may be helped. Please contact the Red Cross chapter nearest you and ask what you can do to give them a hand.

President Furgler, I would like to extend to you and to the Swiss people my appreciation for helping to make possible the coming meetings between representatives of the United States and the Soviet Union. Nancy and I are delighted to be in this magnificent city on the shores of Lake Geneva. On behalf of the American people, thank you for your warm and friendly welcome.

Again and again, you've provided your territory for international meetings and your good offices in the mediation of disputes. It was the Swiss who founded one of the great humanitarian organizations of our time, the International Red Cross. And it is Switzerland that often represents the diplomatic interests of other nations, including the United States, in lands where these nations have no formal diplomatic relations of their own. Indeed, in your unshakable commitment to independence, democratic government, and human rights, the Swiss Confederation in itself serves as an example to all the world.

The motto on the Great Seal of the United States, Mr. President, is ``E Pluribus Unum'' -- Out of many, one. Well, here in Switzerland, a country of rich religious, cultural, and linguistic variety, you practice just such unity in diversity. Permit me to add that our two countries are bound together by family ties. As early as 1562 a Swiss citizen appeared in Florida, and in 1670 a Swiss settlement was established near Charleston, South Carolina. Ever since, Americans of Swiss descent have pioneered and led the development of our nation. Today Swiss Americans number in the hundreds of thousands, and I would be remiss if I failed to express their affection for you, their Swiss cousins. Indeed, just last month the good will of the American people toward the Swiss was formally expressed in a joint resolution of the Congress of the United States.

And recently, Mr. President, Boston University awarded you an honorary doctorate of laws. In your acceptance address, you stressed the obligations incumbent upon the West to defend its values and its way of life. ``It is,'' you said, ``part of the definition and vocation of the human being to be free.'' Well, Mr. President, each in its own way, our two nations stand at the forefront of this struggle for liberty; each stands determined to defend the freedoms of its own people and to advance the cause of freedom throughout the world; and each rests confident in the knowledge that freedom will endure and prevail.

American-Soviet relations need a fresh start -- a genuine give-and-take on regional conflicts, on human rights, and on the reduction of arms. American and Soviet differences on these matters run deep. Mr. Gorbachev and I cannot surmount them in only 2 days, but I'm here in the fervent hope that on behalf of all the people of the world, we can at least make a start.

These comprehensive discussions covered the basic questions of U.S.-Soviet relations and the current international situation. The meetings were frank and useful. Serious differences remain on a number of critical issues.

While acknowledging the differences in their systems and approaches to international issues, some greater understanding of each side's view was achieved by the two leaders. They agreed about the need to improve U.S.-Soviet relations and the international situation as a whole.

They agreed to meet again in the nearest future. The General Secretary accepted an invitation by the President of the United States to visit the United States of America and the President of the United States accepted an invitation by the General Secretary of the Central Committee of the CPSU to visit the Soviet Union. Arrangements for and timing of the visits will be agreed upon through diplomatic channels.

USSR and the U.S. for maintaining peace, have agreed that a nuclear war cannot be won and must never be fought. Recognizing that any conflict between the USSR and the U.S. could have catastrophic consequences, they emphasized the importance of preventing any war between them, whether nuclear or conventional. They will not seek to achieve military superiority.

They agreed to accelerate the work at these negotiations, with a view to accomplishing the tasks set down in the Joint U.S.-Soviet Agreement of January 8, 1985, namely to prevent an arms race in space and to terminate it on earth, to limit and reduce nuclear arms and enhance strategic stability.

Noting the proposals recently tabled by the U.S. and the Soviet Union, they called for early progress, in particular in areas where there is common ground, including the principle of 50% reductions in the nuclear arms of the U.S. and the USSR appropriately applied, as well as the idea of an interim INF agreement.

The sides agreed to study the question at the expert level of centers to reduce nuclear risk taking into account the issues and developments in the Geneva negotiations. They took satisfaction in such recent steps in this direction as the modernization of the Soviet-U.S. hotline.

General Secretary Gorbachev and President Reagan reaffirmed the commitment of the USSR and the U.S. to the Treaty on the Non-Proliferation of Nuclear Weapons and their interest in strengthening together with other countries the non-proliferation regime, and in further enhancing the effectiveness of the Treaty, inter alia by enlarging its membership.

They view positively the practice of regular Soviet-U.S. consultations on non-proliferation of nuclear weapons which have been businesslike and constructive and express their intent to continue this practice in the future.

In the context of discussing security problems, the two sides reaffirmed that they are in favor of a general and complete prohibition of chemical weapons and the destruction of existing stockpiles of such weapons. They agreed to accelerate efforts to conclude an effective and verifiable international convention on this matter.

The two sides agreed to intensify bilateral discussions on the level of experts on all aspects of such a chemical weapons ban, including the question of verification. They agreed to initiate a dialogue on preventing the proliferation of chemical weapons.

Measures and Disarmament in Europe and noting the progress made there, the two sides stated their intention to facilitate, together with the other participating states, an early and successful completion of the work of the conference. To this end, they reaffirmed the need for a document which would include mutually acceptable confidence and security building measures and give concrete expression and effect to the principle of non-use of force.

President Reagan and General Secretary Gorbachev agreed on the need to place on a regular basis and intensify dialogue at various levels. Along with meetings between the leaders of the two countries, this envisages regular meetings between the USSR Minister of Foreign Affairs and the U.S. Secretary of State, as well as between the heads of other Ministries and Agencies. They agree that the recent visits of the heads of Ministries and Departments in such fields as agriculture, housing and protection of the environment have been useful.

The sides intend to expand the programs of bilateral cultural, educational and scientific-technical exchanges, and also to develop trade and economic ties. The President of the United States and the General Secretary of the Central Committee of the CPSU attended the signing of the Agreement on Contacts and Exchanges in Scientific, Educational and Cultural Fields.

The two leaders also noted with satisfaction that, in cooperation with the Government of Japan, the United States and the Soviet Union have agreed to a set of measures to promote safety on air routes in the North Pacific and have worked out steps to implement them.

They acknowledged that delegations from the United States and the Soviet Union have begun negotiations aimed at resumption of air services. The two leaders expressed their desire to reach a mutually beneficial agreement at an early date. In this regard, an agreement was reached on the simultaneous opening of Consulates General in New York and Kiev.

Both sides agreed to contribute to the preservation of the environment -- a global task -- through joint research and practical measures. In accordance with the existing U.S.-Soviet agreement in this area, consultations will be held next year in Moscow and Washington on specific programs of cooperation.

The two leaders agreed on the utility of broadening exchanges and contacts including some of their new forms in a number of scientific, educational, medical and sports fields (inter alia, cooperation in the development of educational exchanges and software for elementary and secondary school instruction; measures to promote Russian language studies in the United States and English language studies in the USSR; the annual exchange of professors to conduct special courses in history, culture and economics at the relevant departments of Soviet and American institutions of higher education; mutual allocation of scholarships for the best students in the natural sciences, technology, social sciences and humanities for the period of an academic year; holding regular meets in various sports and increased television coverage of sports events). The two sides agreed to resume cooperation in combatting cancer diseases.

The two leaders emphasized the potential importance of the work aimed at utilizing controlled thermonuclear fusion for peaceful purposes and, in this connection, advocated the widest practicable development of international cooperation in obtaining this source of energy, which is essentially inexhaustible, for the benefit for all mankind.

And we've done it totally openly and frankly. We've discussed several most important issues. The relations between our two countries and the situation in the world in general today -- these are issues and problems the solving of which in the most concrete way is of concern both to our countries and to the peoples of other countries in the world. We discussed these issues basing our discussions on both sides' determination to improve relations between the Soviet Union and the United States of America. We decided that we must help to decrease the threat of nuclear war.

It goes without saying that discussions of these sort we consider to be very useful, and in its results you find a clear reflection of what the two sides have agreed together. We have to be realistic and straightforward and, therefore, the solving of the most important problems concerning the arms race and increasing hopes of peace, we didn't succeed in reaching at this meeting. So, of course there are important disagreements on matters of principle that remain between us; however, the President and I have agreed that this work of seeking mutually acceptable decisions for these questions will be continued here in Geneva by our representatives.

We've also going to seek new kinds of developing bilateral Soviet-American relations. And also we're going to have further consultations on several important questions where, for the most part, our positions, again, are completely different. All this, we consider these forthcoming talks to be very, very useful.

But the significance of everything which we have agreed with the President can only, of course, be reflected if we carry it on into concrete measures. If we really want to succeed in something, then both sides are going to have to do an awful lot of work in the spirit of the joint statement which we have put out. And in this connection, I would like to announce that the Soviet Union, for its part, will do all it can in this cooperation with the United States of America in order to achieve practical results to cut down the arms race, to cut down the arsenals which we've piled up, and produce the conditions which will be necessary for peace on Earth and in space.

We make this announcement perfectly aware of our responsibility both to our own people and to the other peoples of the Earth. And we would very much hope that we can have the same approach from the administration of the United States of America. If that can be so, then the work that has been done in these days in Geneva will not have been done in vain.

The President. President Furgler, General Secretary Gorbachev, may I express Nancy's and my deep personal appreciation and that of all Americans to the people of Switzerland for welcoming us so warmly and preparing the foundations for productive discussions. Yours is a long and honorable tradition of promoting international peace and understanding. You should take pride in being the capital for international discussions. So, again, to the Government of Switzerland and to the citizens of Geneva, many, many thanks.

We've packed a lot into the last 2 days. I came to Geneva to seek a fresh start in relations between the United States and the Soviet Union, and we have done this. General Secretary Gorbachev and I have held comprehensive discussions covering all elements of our relationship. I'm convinced that we are heading in the right direction. We've reached some useful interim results which are described in the joint statement that is being issued this morning. In agreeing to accelerate the work of our nuclear arms negotiators, Mr. Gorbachev and I have addressed our common responsibility to strengthen peace. I believe that we have established a process for more intensive contacts between the United States and the Soviet Union. These 2 days of talks should inject a certain momentum into our work on the issues between us, a momentum we can continue at the meeting that we have agreed on for next year.

Before coming to Geneva, I spoke often of the need to build confidence in our dealings with each other. Frank and forthright conversation at the summit are part of this process, but I'm certain General Secretary Gorbachev would agree that real confidence in each other must be built on deeds, not simply words. This is the thought that ties together all the proposals that the United States has put on the table in the past, and this is the criteria by which our meetings will be judged in the future.

The real report card on Geneva will not come in for months or even years, but we know the questions that must be answered. Will we join together in sharply reducing offensive nuclear arms and moving to nonnuclear defensive strengths for systems to make this a safer world? Will we join together to help bring about a peaceful resolution of conflicts in Asia, Africa, and Central America so that the peoples there can freely determine their own destiny without outside interference? Will the cause of lib- erty be advanced, and will the treaties and agreements signed -- past and future -- be fulfilled? The people of America, the Soviet Union, and throughout the world are ready to answer yes.

I leave Geneva today and our fireside summit determined to pursue every opportunity to build a safer world of peace and freedom. There's hard work ahead, but we're ready for it. General Secretary Gorbachev, we ask you to join us in getting the job done, as I'm sure you will.

Mr. Sollars is chairman of the board of Sollars Brothers Corp., manufacturers of farm equipment, in Washington Court House, OH. He is also on the board of directors of the Nationwide Insurance Co. and chairman of the board of the Nationwide Mutual Insurance Co. He is a past president of the Ohio Farm Bureau Federation and a past president of the Ohio Federation of Soil and Water Conservation Districts.

This has been a busy and eventful week for Nancy and me. Now that the summit in Geneva is behind us, we need to look ahead and ask: Where do we go from here? As I told Congress, we've made a fresh start in U.S.-Soviet relations. Every issue was on the table, and our 15 hours of discussions were tough and lively throughout. I got a better perspective from listening to General Secretary Gorbachev, and I think he went home with a lot to think about, too. I plan to meet Mr.

Opportunities to address important problems of Soviet-American relations should not be squandered. We must always be realistic about our deep and abiding differences, but we should be working for progress wherever possible.

On arms control, the Soviets, after several years of resisting talks, have now agreed that each side should cut nuclear arms by 50 percent in appropriate categories. And in our joint statement, we called for early progress on this, directing the emphasis of the talks toward what has been the chief U.S. goal all along: deep, equitable, fully verifiable reductions in offensive weapons. If there's a real interest on the Soviet side, there's a chance the talks can begin to make headway.

Mr. Gorbachev and I discussed our work on SDI, America's Strategic Defense Initiative. I told him that we're investigating nonnuclear defensive systems designed to destroy offensive missiles and protect people. Although reluctant to acknowledge it, the Soviets have been carrying forward a research program, far more extensive than ours, on their own version of SDI. I think it's fair to point out that the Soviets main aim at Geneva was to force us to drop SDI. I think I can also say that after Geneva Mr. Gorbachev understands we have no intention of doing so -- far from it. We want to make strategic defense a strong protector of the peace. A research and testing program that may one day provide a peace shield to protect against nuclear attack is a deeply hopeful vision, and we should all be cooperating to bring that vision of peace alive for the entire world.

Regional conflicts were prominent in our discussions, and we'll be watching very closely for any change in Soviet activities in the Third World. Another resounding vote of the U.N. General Assembly has just called for Soviet withdrawal from Afghanistan. Next month a new round of talks on this question takes place, also under United Nation auspices. If these talks are to succeed, the Soviets must provide a timetable for getting out and recognize that the freedom fighters will not be conquered.

On bilateral and human rights questions, there were some small, encouraging steps before the summit, and in the agreements we reached there, to promote people-to-people contacts. In both areas, we're hoping greater steps will follow. As I also told the Congress, human rights is a true peace issue.

If there is one conclusion to draw from our fireside summit, it's that American policies are working. In a real sense, preparations for the summit started 5 years ago when, with the help of Congress, we began strengthening our economy, restoring our national will, and rebuilding our defenses and alliances. America is strong again, and American strength has caught the Soviets attention. They recognize that the United States is no longer just reacting to world events; we are in the forefront of a powerful, historic tide for freedom and opportunity, for progress and peace.

There's never been a greater need for courage and steadiness than now. Our strategic modernization program is an incentive for the Soviets to negotiate in earnest. But if Congress fails to support the vital defense efforts needed, then the Soviets will conclude that America's patience and will are paper thin, and the world will become more dangerous again. Courage and steadiness are all important for freedom fighters, too. I made it clear in Geneva that America embraces all those who resist tyranny and struggle for freedom. Breaking faith with freedom fighters would signal that aggression carries no risk, and this we will not allow. My fellow Americans, we are entering a season of hope. If we remain resolute for freedom and peace, if we keep faith with God, then our American family, 238 million strong, will be even more thankful for next year.

At this time of national Thanksgiving, when we thank God for our many blessings, we are especially mindful of those in distress. And we thank God for inviting us to respond with open hearts to the cry of the afflicted and the needy. For in being generous to others we become more like Him Who has been so generous to us. Most recently, we heard the cry for help that came from the rubble of Mexico City and from the people of Colombia whose villages were engulfed by mud slides. We heard and we responded.

Similarly, we hear and we continue to respond to the cry that comes to our ears from the famine-stricken regions of Africa. That famine has already caused the death of hundreds of thousands of people and endangers the lives of millions. The solution to such famine involves not only rushing emergency food and medical supplies to the areas stricken, but also improving agricultural policies and enlisting greater cooperation by certain governments with international relief agencies.

Americans from all walks of life and every part of our country have responded quickly and generously to every famine that has occurred since World War II. And we have already raised more than $120 million for emergency relief for victims of the current famine in Africa. The generosity and compassion of our people deserve to be recognized and commended.

Various private organizations are organizing a day of fasting as a means by which Americans can show their concern, express solidarity with the plight of fellow human beings suffering from hunger, and draw attention to efforts to raise funds to help the victims of famine.

On October 21 I submitted to the Congress a formal notification of the proposed sale of fighter aircraft, air defense missiles, armored vehicles, and other equipment to the Hashemite Kingdom of Jordan. The number and type of arms included in our proposal were selected only after careful study of Jordan's legitimate defensive needs.

I have today signed into law Senate Joint Resolution 228, which provides that no letter of offer for any of the advanced weapons systems, including advanced aircraft and advanced air defense systems, included in our proposed sale to Jordan will be valid before March 1, 1986, unless Jordan enters direct negotiations with Israel before that date. This legislation expresses Congress' belief that the peace process should be our primary concern. Peace remains my main concern, as it is that of King Hussein, Prime Minister Peres [of Israel], and other responsible leaders throughout the Middle East. King Hussein has taken dramatic steps towards peace, steps which have exposed him and the people of Jordan to strong pressure and bloody violence from those adamantly opposed to any peaceful settlement. Our arms proposals are designed to strengthen Jordan's ability to pursue its demonstrated commitment to peace.

In the months between now and March 1, we will continue to work towards achieving the goal we all share, the goal King Hussein outlined in his recent speech to the United Nations General Assembly: prompt, direct negotiations between Jordan and Israel. I remain equally committed to providing Jordan the defensive arms it requires. These weapons are neither a reward nor penalty for Jordan's actions, but tangible proof that we remain committed to providing a good friend of many years with the tools needed to protect itself during the search for peace in a troubled region.

This bill would also authorize FEMA, through a new ``national board,'' to oversee an emergency food and shelter program. I am deeply concerned about the membership of the Board. Under this bill the Board is to be composed of seven members who would be officers of the executive branch because the Board will perform executive functions. If read literally, the bill would permit six private organizations to appoint members of the Board, in violation of the appointments clause of the Constitution (Article II, section 2, clause 2). In order to avoid this constitutional infirmity, I direct the Director of FEMA to construe this provision as granting him complete discretionary authority to determine who should be appointed to the national board. The organizations mentioned in the bill may make recommendations, but only the Director, as the ``head of a department,'' id., is authorized to appoint members to the Board.

The bill also provides, in section 413, that ``[n]o part of any appropriation contained in this Act shall be available to implement, administer, or enforce any regulation which has been disapproved pursuant to a resolution of disapproval duly adopted in accordance with the applicable law of the United States.'' The ``applicable law of the United States'' includes, of course, the Constitution and the decision of the Supreme Court in INS v. Chadha. Under the Constitution and that decision, the ``resolution of disapproval'' referred to in section 413 must be a joint resolution presented to the President for approval or disapproval.

The U.S.-Sweden agreement is similar in objective to the social security agreements already in force with Italy, the Federal Republic of Germany, Switzerland, Canada, Belgium, Norway, and the United Kingdom. Such bilateral agreements, which are generally known as totalization agreements, provide for limited coordination between the United States and foreign social security systems to overcome the problems of gaps in protection and of dual coverage and taxation for workers who move from one country to the other.

Since my previous report, the United Nations Secretary General has continued to work with the two Cypriot communities to achieve a framework agreement for a comprehensive Cyprus settlement. As I reported to you earlier, the Secretary General announced in June that the Greek Cypriot side had accepted revised documentation incorporating such an agreement. On August 8 the Turkish Cypriot leader, Mr. Denktash, sent the Secretary General a letter with detailed comments on the Secretary General's documentation and expressed willingness to meet with him for further discussion.

The Security Council heard an oral report from the Secretary General on September 20. He told the Council that his efforts had brought the positions of the two sides closer than ever before; and he expressed his conviction that what had been achieved so far should lead to an early agreement on a framework for a just and lasting settlement of the Cyprus question. The United Kingdom Permanent Representative to the Security Council, speaking as President of the Council, expressed strong support on behalf of its members for the mandate of the Secretary General and called upon all parties to make a special effort in cooperation with the Secretary General to reach an early agreement.

Like the comet that startled the night sky at his birth and returned as a bright chariot to ``carry him home'' 75 years later, the literary achievements of Mark Twain can truly be called an ``astronomical'' phenomenon.

Annealed through time and art, those recollections would be transformed by his genius into immortal characters in masterworks that not only won great popularity in his day but have also stood the test of time.

Today, as we commemorate the 150th anniversary of Mark Twain's birth -- and as Halley's Comet again brightens the skies of our planet -- the wit, the wisdom, and the inimitable style of Mark Twain continue to delight and instruct young and old -- in more than 50 languages.

It is a measure of the richness of Twain's genius and the complexity of his character that debates still go on as to whether he was primarily a humorist, a novelist, a charming spinner of provincial yarns, a cynic, or a sentimentalist. The truth is he was all of these -- and more.

Twain also knew the shattering humiliation of betrayal and bankruptcy. He endured the soul-searing desolation of bereavement, and in the depths of his grief he could sometimes rail like the proverbial village atheist. But he could also write of the saintly Joan of Arc with the awe and ardor of a hagiographer. In many ways Twain remains a riddle. He still awaits a definitive biography. He would probably have been amused at all the fuss that has been made over him and chuckle at some of the theories the critics have spun about him and his works. Self-deprecation was the hallmark of his humor; he loved to puncture pomposity -- even his own.

New York, Connecticut, California, and Hawaii are only some of the States that can claim to have shaped his life, but Hannibal, Missouri, where he grew up, will always have a prior claim. And so it is especially fitting that while all Americans celebrate this anniversary, Hannibal -- which maintains his boyhood home as a museum -- has been the scene of special events starting in May and culminating on November 30, the 150th anniversary of his birth.

You've heard me say that nuclear war cannot be won and must never be fought. Well, today I wish to speak to you about a struggle which we do wage every day, a struggle we must win if we're to protect our freedom and our way of life. At stake are government secrets essential to our national security. Protecting these secrets against espionage and any hostile intelligence threat to the United States is a heavy responsibility.

Operations to protect America's secrets are usually done quietly with little publicity. Well, lately they've been making big news. Some of you may be wondering if the large number of spy arrests in recent weeks means that we're looking harder or whether there are more spies to find. Well, I think the answer to both questions is yes. The threat is certainly increasing. The number of hostile intelligence officers in the United States and working against us around the world has grown sharply in recent years. Espionage, spying, is not a game. It costs our country secrets and millions of dollars in stolen technology. It can also cost lives and threaten our national survival.

This administration had given high priority to improving our ability to detect and counter any hostile intelligence threat. We've added resources, people, and top-level attention to this task. We will not hesitate to root out and prosecute the spies of any nation. We'll let the chips fall where they may. And we've had impressive results. From 1975 to 1980, the United States apprehended a total of 13 spies. From 1981 through this year, we've apprehended 34. Here, let me add a word of appreciation in particular to the men and women of the FBI who have been working so diligently on this vital and sometimes thankless task.

In the past, we've had some difficulty in readily admitting the intensity of this threat. Today, however, we approach the intelligence threat with a new degree of realism. We recognize that the KGB and others seeking to exploit the openness of our society are not 10 feet tall; neither, however, are they midgets. We're up against aggressive people who take their job seriously.

There's no reason to sugar-coat reality. The free world is today confronted with some of the most sophisticated, best orchestrated efforts of theft and espionage in modern history. Today the Soviet intelligence services and secret police, the KGB and the GRU, and their surrogate services among the Soviet-bloc countries -- Czechoslovakia, Poland, East Germany, Bulgaria, Cuba, and others -- are hard at work. Their activities include classical espionage and what they call active measures.

As events of recent days have made clear, many nations spy on the United States. The totality of this threat underscores just how important it is that we protect ourselves. What better time than this Thanksgiving weekend to remember and give thanks that we live in the freest land God has placed on this Earth. Yet even with our freedom, we must have the ability to protect certain vital secrets. So much depends on this: our diplomatic efforts to advance liberty and preserve peace, our own ability to see and hear what is going on in the world, and the readiness of our military forces and their effectiveness in carrying out their mission anywhere in the world.

While our security is tied to protecting certain secrets, there is no need to fight repression by becoming repressive ourselves. Understanding the problem is the first step. The arrests we are seeing now should alert us to the danger we face. Even skeptics should recognize how necessary it is to maintain our top-quality counterintelligence efforts. At the same time, we can learn through each espionage case how to prevent these spies and turncoats from hurting us. In 1981 we began a comprehensive review of counterintelligence, security, and countermeasures. While much has been done, culminating in additional arrests, there is more we can and must do.

We are currently seeking a broad range of reforms and improvements, including reducing the size of the hostile intelligence threat within our borders, better monitoring of exchange programs, improving government communications and personnel procedures, better analysis, expanding counterintelligence capabilities abroad, and ensuring the security of U.S. Embassies and bases throughout the world. We are working closely with the Congress in addressing many of these needs. I am asking for your understanding and support as we move ahead together to win this struggle and keep America free, secure, and at peace.

I'd like to talk with you for a few minutes about a cause that I know is as dear to you as it is to me -- the cause of peace. America's at peace today, and for any President that's cause for real satisfaction. Still, a President's job is more than that -- it's to make the peace we enjoy today even more secure.

Since my meeting just 3 weeks ago with General Secretary Gorbachev in Reykjavik, Iceland, the capital city of that island nation in the North Atlantic, I believe that prospects for strengthening peace between our country and the Soviet Union have become better than at any time in the last 40 years. Today I want to tell you how we're building on what we accomplished there and what it will take to make the most of the opportunities that opened up in these discussions. We're pursuing agreements on some of the most vital issues of our time, but success will depend -- as it should -- on your support and on that of the Congress.

For the first time, we came close to an historic agreement on dramatic reductions in strategic nuclear weapons. For the first time, the Soviets talked seriously about removing all intermediate-range missiles from Europe and doing it in a way that would not threaten our Asian allies. And they accepted the principle that human rights issues must be a permanent part of our dialog. It's no wonder that some have said that we made more progress in those 2 days than negotiators for our countries have made in the past 2 years toward true arms reductions. It's no longer a matter of if we reach agreement; it's now a matter of when.

One of the keys to our success in Iceland was our Strategic Defense Initiative, SDI -- our program to find a way to defend against ballistic missiles. SDI helped to bring the Soviets to the bargaining table, and it will keep them there. SDI will help assure compliance and implementation with eventual agreements, and it will provide a vital insurance policy for peace in a world without ballistic missiles. As I've said many times in the past week, no responsible President should rely solely on a piece of paper for our country's safety. We know the record on Soviet treaty violations. We can either have American technology as insurance for keeping us safe, or we can rely on Soviet promises alone. Our technology and their promises each have their own track record. And I'll take our technology any day.

We're ready to move forward, for example, on achieving a 50-percent reduction of both U.S. and Soviet strategic forces in the next 5 years, on eliminating intermediate-range missiles in Europe, and on scrapping all ballistic missiles on both sides in the next decade. To continue our dialog at the highest level, I've asked Secretary of State Shultz to meet next week in Vienna, on November 5th and 6th, with Soviet Foreign Minister Shevardnadze to discuss these and other issues on our agenda. A spokesman for the Soviet Government said last week that the meeting between Secretary Shultz and Mr.

But as we build on Iceland -- whether in Vienna or Geneva or Washington, where our two countries held talks on civil space cooperation this week -- let's not forget why relations with the Soviets have come so far, so fast. A great deal of the credit for this progress belongs to you, the American people. You've supported our program to build America's strength. Today our men and women in uniform have the best equipment and training available. And I might add that our men and women in uniform are the best available, too. And I know you join in my pride in them. America also firmly supports the forces of freedom around the world, and we go to every negotiating table in a position of strength. You know, as I look back on the last few weeks of remarkable progress, I can't help remembering something Winston Churchill once said. ``There is nothing,'' he said, ``for which the Soviets have less respect than weakness, particularly military weakness, and nothing they admire so much as strength.'' Churchill's wisdom points to a simple truth: that peace is strong today because America is strong.

In the last few months, some in Congress tried to ignore that truth. They tried to cut vital defense programs, including SDI, even as I was preparing to go to Iceland. I hope you'll let your elected representatives know that that's not what you want, that you want to continue to build a strong America so that, together, we can continue to build a more peaceful, stable world.

Thank you, Ed, and a special thanks to the Cal State-Long Beach Marching Band. You know, these last few days -- campaigning across our country -- have been a thrill. There's a rising tide of enthusiasm in this land, a groundswell of support for the ideals that we hold dear and the vision we have for America. And among no group is our support stronger or more enthusiastic than among our young people. They know that fulfilling their hopes and aspirations depends on a strong, growing, and opportunity-filled society.

Here in California, we're lucky to have a standard-bearer who personifies enterprise and creativity, a candidate who young people can identify with and who can lead this party and our country into the 21st century. You've guessed already I'm talking about Ed Zschau, and I hope you will do everything you can to make him California's next United States Senator. I remember coming to Anaheim 20 years ago in my first campaign for Governor. Orange County was essential to success. And everything we've accomplished since then in Sacramento and, yes, in Washington began with that margin of victory provided here in Orange County. I delight in telling some people, who don't understand, outside of the State of California, that Orange County is where the good Republicans go before they die. [Laughter] Today you are no less vital to securing the gains that we've made and keeping our country moving forward. Your support is indispensable again, so let me ask you this one last time. Come election day, let's get out the vote and see to it that our team wins the day.

What we've got in California's Senate race is a face-off between an unrepentant advocate of the failed policies of the past versus a champion of the opportunity society of the future. Ed's opponent [Alan Cranston] was not just a member, he was a leader of the tax-and-tax and spend-and-spend crowd that nearly wrecked our economy during the last decade.

His policies gave us double-digit inflation, 21-percent interest rates, economic stagnation, ever-increasing taxes, and unprecedented pessimism. Of course, he painted a different picture when he would come home.

This is about a young fellow that liked animals, and he wanted a job at the zoo. So he went and applied, and they accepted him. But they said there's one thing first before you actually get into your job. Our gorilla died, and we want you to put on the gorilla suit that we have and be in the cage and entertain the children, do tricks and things for them. And he was a little upset, but they said, no, no, when that's over, you've got the regular job taking care of the animals. So, into the cage he went in the gorilla suit, and he was doing all sorts of things and got to be a little carried away with what he was doing and the delight that he was giving, particularly to the children.

I think it's time that somebody got fired, and I think our country has had enough of what Ed's liberal opponent thinks is best for America. In these last few years, we've reignited our citizens' faith in themselves and their country and put our economy back on track. Inflation has been cut to 1.8 percent. The interest rates have been cut by nearly two-thirds. We've enjoyed almost 4 years of economic growth during which time over 11\1/2\ million new jobs have been created. And that's more than those that were created in Japan and all of Europe combined in a 10-year period. Now, this is what I call a Republican jobs program. The gains we've made did not happen by accident, and they should not be taken for granted. If the other party regains control of the Senate, they could well drag us right back onto the same pit we left behind. We could not have done any of the things that we've accomplished if we had not had that one House of the Legislature.

You can bet that, given the chance, Ed's opponent will undermine the spirit of the historic tax reform legislation just signed into law and risk throwing our country back into recession by increasing your taxes. He looks at your take-home pay as his personal treasury. [Laughter] And it's about time that we replace that fellow with someone more concerned about protecting the family budget than fattening the Federal budget. Ed and I know, and I think you agree, we don't have a deficit because you aren't taxed enough. We have a deficit because government spends too much. I know that Ed is committed to a vibrant, expanding economy, low taxes, and high growth. He puts his faith in enterprise, technology, and hard work. His opponent puts his faith in regulation, controls, and the Federal bureaucracy. It's about time we put an individual in this Senate seat who reflects the spirit of California, instead of the dying vestiges of collectivism. That's exactly what the voters of this great State will be doing on Tuesday when we elect Ed Zschau to the United States Senate.

The contrast in the economic philosophies of the two candidates is no less stark than the difference in their approaches to the safety of our people and the security of our country. Ed believes in tough law enforcement and, when appropriate, yes, the death penalty. Ed's opponent, on the other hand, voted against using the death penalty on terrorists who bomb buildings or hijackers who murder their victims. And he voted against using the death penalty for drug-related murders. In fact, he has voted against the death penalty, or missed the vote, every time it's come up. The American people rely on those in government to protect them and see to the security of the Nation.

Ed's opponent has done neither. Ed's opponent was an architect of America's military decline during the last decade and has fought us every step of the way in our efforts to rebuild our defenses. I can't think of a single member of the Senate who has a record as antimilitary, antipreparedness, antisecurity as Ed's opponent. He would leave the frontiers of freedom unguarded and shortchange our military personnel, forcing them to rely on outdated weapons and bargain basement equipment. Well, as President, I have to tell you, there's nothing that has given me so much pride as those 2 million young men and women who are in the uniform of our military today. Now, God forbid, they will ever have to put their lives on the line, but if they do, they deserve the best weapons and equipment that money can buy. And together, we're going to see that they get them.

Incidentally, I see all the talk about whether we're wasting our money in the military, and they use it as an excuse on the other side of the aisle to keep cutting back on our defense budget. I think it's kind of interesting that just the other day our 15th carrier, the Teddy Roosevelt -- and the largest and the best -- was commissioned and put into service 16 months and $80 million ahead of schedule and under budget. So, I don't think they're really throwing things away. But we must always be ready to negotiate, and let's make certain we do it, that we negotiate from a position of strength. Rebuilding our strategic muscle, for example, is what now enables us to negotiate with the Soviet Union. When we came into office in 1981, on any given day, 50 percent of our military aircraft couldn't take off for lack of spare parts. Fifty percent of our naval vessels couldn't leave port for lack of spare parts or lack of crew. Well, now things are a little different.

Iceland, serious discussions at the highest level were taking place about a dramatic reduction of nuclear missiles. Now, that's progress in anybody's book. Arms talks will continue, but I promise we will not bargain away our insurance policy of a safer tomorrow, our research into a strategic defense against ballistic missiles. Now, such a defensive shield, in the end, will make a ballistic missile reduction more likely, because it will make those deadly weapons less effective. It will also protect against cheating. And when it comes to a choice between trusting the Soviets and technology, I'll put my money on American technology any time.

We've come a long way from the days of weakness, vacillation, and timidity. The Western alliance is strong and confident. The tide of history is now floating on the side of the free. One thing I'm especially proud of: During these last 6 years, not 1 square inch of territory in the world has been lost to the Communists, and one small country, Grenada, has been restored to the family of free nations. Ed's opponent is a longtime leader in the Blame America First crowd. He didn't support the rescue of our students or the liberation of Grenada. He always seems to be skeptical, if not outright opposed, nearly every time strong action is required to ensure our national security. And worse, he plays fast and loose with the lives of those who protect us. For example, when it was proposed in Congress to make it a felony to disclose the identities of American undercover intelligence operatives in foreign countries, Ed's opponent opposed that -- just as he opposed vital weapons systems and the modernization of our military forces.

Now that you know where I stand, Ed Zschau stands, George Deukmejian stands on the judges, isn't it about time Ed's opponent had to take a stand? As we approach Tuesday's election, I hope you'll spread the word that this contest in California is pivotal. Today the Republican Party stands united and ready for action. Reflecting that unity, I notice we've got stalwarts here today representing the width and the breadth of our party who actively support Ed.

We're all here today for Ed, and his election is critical, but we also need to ensure that George Deukmejian is reelected Governor. His record is outstanding, and his leadership for California is respected across the country. And Duke will be even more effective if we give him a Republican majority in the State legislature. I never had that but 1 year out of the 8.

Senate, we also need to elect Bob Henley and Elton Gallegly to join Bob Dornan and the rest of our tremendous California Republican delegation in Congress. Some of those Congressmen are here on this dais.

And we are all here because we understand how important this race is. We're all here because of that. And on Tuesday, Californians will determine not only who will represent them in the Senate but which party controls the Senate.

Senate. And the choice is moving forward, building on what we've accomplished, versus 2 years of stalemate. I can just tell you, I didn't run for President to be a 6-year President. We've got a great candidate in Ed Zschau.

You know, for the young people who may be here in the office -- audience, not office. You can see how long I've been in the Oval Office. [Laughter] They don't let me out enough. But for the young people here, you might be interested to know that the age group of 18 to 24 has the highest percentage of people supporting our policies. But there is one problem that I have to mention. That particular age segment also has the lowest percentage turning out to vote. So, all of the young people here in the room, you heed our request that you vote, but, also, buttonhole your companions in your age group out there and tell them to get to the polls, too. And one day we'll turn over to you a country that's as free and offers as much opportunity as our parents and grandparents turned over to us. That's our goal.

This legislation would have established specific, minimum energy efficiency standards for home appliances without regard to technological feasibility or the need for economic justification. The bill intrudes unduly on the free market, limits the freedom of choice available to consumers who would be denied the opportunity to purchase lower-cost appliances, and constitutes a substantial intrusion into traditional State responsibilities and prerogatives.

It also mandates a complicated series of 19 rule-makings over the next 20 years for 52 subcategories of appliances, virtually assuring extensive litigation, increasing Federal regulation many years into the future.

Moreover, although I share the interest in the need for conserving energy resources that led the Congress to pass this bill, H.R. 5465 fails to advance this goal in a manner that takes account of the tremendous cost to consumers, who would have to spend an estimated extra $1.4 billion per year on appliance purchases.

Higher prices would force many to buy more expensive appliances than they would prefer, and make some delay or forgo some appliance purchases altogether. By eliminating the lower-priced models, the bill would hit low-income consumers particularly hard. It could also discourage and slow the introduction of useful product innovations.

Disapproval of this bill does not mean, however, that the energy efficiency of appliances will be wholly without Federal regulation. Under current law, the Department of Energy is required to conduct a rule-making which may lead to the imposition of Federal standards, and any such standards would preempt existing State law.

Thus, the choice is between Federal regulation of appliance standards under this bill and regulation under current law, which requires the Department of Energy to take account of technological feasibility and economic factors. Under these circumstances, I think current law is preferable.

In addition, I note that the Congress included in H.R. 5465 amendments requiring the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission to issue a declaratory order in a pending proceeding and setting a deadline for the Commission to resolve a pending rate case. I am in agreement with what the Congress sought to achieve in requiring the Commission to issue a declaratory order and am asking the Secretary of Energy to take appropriate action before the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission so that this matter will be promptly and favorably resolved. I also agree with the Congress that the rate case matter should be resolved swiftly and urge the Commission to exert its best efforts to meet the deadline the Congress has sought to impose.

Discrimination against older workers is a matter of great concern to this nation because of the need to sustain and enhance our productive capacity and attain the goal of fairness in employment opportunity for all American workers. In enacting the Age Discrimination in Employment Act in 1967, the Congress took the first giant step toward achieving this goal. With the signing of this legislation, we take another important step by ensuring that the many individuals 70 years of age and older, who have valuable contributions to make, will now have the opportunity to do so.

I am pleased to announce that one of the Americans held hostage in Beirut has been released. David Jacobsen was released early this morning by his captors in Beirut. His family has been notified and will be joining him soon. I do want to express my personal appreciation to the various parties and intermediaries who have been helpful in arranging this release. We have been working through a number of sensitive channels for a long time. Unfortunately, we cannot divulge any of the details of the release, because the lives of other Americans and other Western hostages are still at risk.

I call on the captors of all hostages in Lebanon to release their innocent victims. No political goals are or will be achieved by resorting to extortion and terrorism. We hold the captors of the remaining American hostages in Lebanon responsible for the safety of those Americans. My thoughts and prayers go out to the families of those American hostages as we continue to work for their safe return.

I have been President, I have spoken with you often from this office -- on economic recovery, freedom, world peace, and many other subjects. Tonight I want to talk about one of the most important decisions you will ever make about your future and America's future. Tuesday you will exercise the greatest privilege you have as an American: your right to vote. I would like to take a few quiet moments to try to put it all in perspective, to reflect on what is at stake.

All of this happened because you refused to give up your dreams. In 1980 you voted for a new team of Republican leaders who shared your vision of a brighter future. And now we need your help again, because there is a challenge to all we have done and all we hope to do. The changes of the past 6 years were not an accident; we are bringing America back.

We can protect the peace and reduce nuclear weapons if we stop those who would gut our defense and scrap our program of strategic defense that brought Mr. Gorbachev to the negotiating table. We must not be content to live in a world where our safety depends solely on the power to annihilate mankind.

We can complete the economic recovery if we prevent the Democrats from raising your taxes and from rekindling inflation. That's the choice you will make on Tuesday. Will you choose to expand our economic recovery or to return to the stagnation of the seventies? Will you choose Republican leaders who protect the family budget or Democratic leaders who fatten the Federal budget? Will you choose to escape the prison of nuclear terror or to remain in a world where the only way to keep the peace is more and more nuclear weapons? And finally, will you choose Republican candidates who will build on all we have done or Democratic candidates who would return us to the failed policies of the past?

Let's not go back. Our choice must be to keep our nation strong, free, and full of hope. America is a great and generous nation. We are the beacon of liberty and freedom to all the world. Together you and I, with the help of the Republican team, can finish the job. We can realize the dreams our critics said were not possible. We proved them wrong in 1980, and I believe we can do so again. But I need your help.

The President. Thank all of you. And I thank Jim Santini for that most gracious and heartwarming introduction. Senators Laxalt, Hecht, Hatch, Lieutenant Governor Bob Cashell, our GOP chairman, and Congresswoman Vucanovich -- I want you to know that the fellow you see standing before you considers himself one lucky man. It's not everyone who can come to Nevada twice in one week.

And since I used to be a drum major myself in the Dixon, Illinois, YMCA Band, I'd like to thank some of the people who've been making beautiful music: the Love All People singing group and the Chapperal High School Band. I can't help but see the young people here in the audience, as I did in Reno on Thursday. I have a special message to all of you from my roommate. [Laughter] She says when it comes to drugs, please -- for yourselves, for your families, for your future and your country -- just say no. I've even seen I've got some fraternity brothers in the crowd.

I've come here on this day before election day to talk with the people of Nevada about the importance of the vote that you'll be casting. You know, back when I was working in the State capital across the line there, I got to know your then-Governor very well. You know his name -- Paul Laxalt. He introduced me to the Nevada character: rugged, hard-working, patriotic -- a lot less interested in being told what to do by big government than in having the freedom to show what you can do on your own.

For 12 years now, Paul Laxalt has been true to the character of you the people of Nevada in the United States Senate. And now Paul and I are convinced that the man to continue that conservative, patriotic tradition in the United States Senate, the man who, like you and Paul and me, so deeply believes in low taxes, limited government, and peace through strength -- that man is Jim Santini.

But, ladies and gentlemen, now we've come to an issue that transcends in importance even all the other crucial matters that I've mentioned: My most solemn duty as President is the safety of the American people and the security of these United States. Here, too, because of the support of men like Jim Santini, we have been able to restore America's strength. There's nothing I am prouder of than the 2 million young men and women who make up the Armed Forces of the United States. And when some of those people loudly are proclaiming that we must eliminate the spending for defense, well, let me tell you: If we must ever ask those young people to put their lives on the line for the United States of America, then they deserve to have the finest weapons and equipment that we can produce. And with Jim's help, we're going to do just that. You know, because of our young men and women in uniform, things have kind of changed around the world. You know, America used to wear a ``Kick Me'' sign around its neck. We threw that sign away. Now it reads, ``Don't Tread on Me.'' Today every nickel-and-dime dictator around the world knows that if he tangles with the United States of America, he'll have to pay a price. And one other thing I am especially proud of: After 6 years of this administration, not 1 square inch of territory in the world has been lost to communism, and one small country, Grenada, has been set free.

And there's another special issue. We remain committed to our decision to move ahead with our Strategic Defense Initiative against ballistic missiles, the SDI. Today we are dealing with the Soviet Union from a position of strength, and it was SDI that brought the Soviet Union to the bargaining table. And let me pledge to you: Our goal is to keep America strong, to save the world from mutual nuclear terror, to make ballistic missiles obsolete and, ultimately, to eliminate them from the face of the Earth.

But let me tell you: We never could have come this far without the support of people like Jim Santini. I remember back in 1981 when we needed all the help we could get to cut your taxes and get this economic expansion rolling. Jim was a Democrat back then, but despite threats from the liberal Democratic Party leadership, Jim Santini -- then a Democratic Congressman -- promised me his support. And Jim is as good as his word. He came through with the votes, just as over and over again he has come through for the great State of Nevada.

Now it's time we got the facts out about Jim's opponent [Harry Reid]. And in all this talk about negative positions in a campaign, there is a difference when you bring to the fore the record of the two and what philosophy guides the two rival candidates. And that is not negative because that's upon what you have to base your decision. And I think it is time that we got out the facts about his opponent. I don't think the fiercely independent people of Nevada want as their Senator a tax-and-spend liberal, who is against a balanced budget amendment. And I don't want anyone to think I'm taking this personally, but to sum up: I think the difference between the two men -- Jim's opponent voted against me and the things that I was proposing more often than Teddy Kennedy, and that's saying something.

Party, which has taken them down a course that leads to disaster. Now, as you were told, I used to be a Democrat myself, and I must tell you from my heart that Jim Santini represents your views far better than liberals who run the Democratic Party in Washington -- and, yes, right here in Nevada. So, I ask all Nevada Democrats whether -- just maybe -- they ought to join the Republican Party as Jim and I did. We know that it isn't easy to do. But as Winston Churchill said, as a Member of the British Parliament, when he changed parties and was criticized harshly for doing so -- and he simply said, ``Some men change principle for party, and others change party for principle.'' Even if some of you who are Democrats here and who can't quite bring yourself to changing parties -- it took a while for both of us to do that -- you still can make the difference by voting for Jim Santini.

So, just to be sure where you stand, I thought I'd conduct an informal poll. Now, speak up loudly so everyone can hear. Do you want to go back to the days of big spending, high taxes, and runaway inflation?

Constitution says no. Of course, if you're saying I can live 4 more years, that's all right. [Laughter] But since the Constitution intervenes, I'll tell you what I will settle for: 2 more years of a Republican Senate. Important as this election will be to me, it'll be even more important to you, especially to you young people, for it'll shape our nation's future. Every poll shows that the age group 18 to 24 has the highest percentage who are supportive of the things that we're trying to do in Washington. But every poll also shows just as clearly that in this same age group, 18 to 24, you have the lowest voter turnout. So, to you young people: Exercise your sacred right as an American. Participate in shaping history itself by going to the polls and casting your vote. And when you leave here, buttonhole your companions in your same age group and tell them to get to the polls tomorrow and vote.

Marshall, who was the Chief of Staff of the United States Army, whether we had a secret weapon as we went into that war and, if so, what was the weapon? And General Marshall said, ``Yes, we have a secret weapon. It's just the best blankety-blank kids in the world.'' I've seen your generation across this country in meetings like this, on campuses, in high schools, those young people in the military. And if George Marshall were here today, he'd say you are the best blankety-blank kids in the world. Now, he didn't use the word blankety-blank. I did, because Presidents aren't allowed to talk like generals talk. [Laughter] But before leaving, I'd just like to say that people my age deeply believe that it's our duty to turn over to you young Americans the same freedom and opportunity that our parents and grandparents handed on to us. And generations here between mine and yours -- and there are some -- all of us have that same goal. What frightens us is that we look back and see that over the years -- and, yes, just a few years ago -- we've gone through phases in which we have let the greatness of this nation slip. And we have all renewed our pledge that, yes, we're going to turn over to you, when it is your turn to take this country and run it, that same great nation of opportunity and freedom that we were handed when we were young.

Government of the United States had satisfactorily discharged its obligations as the Administering Authority under the terms of the Trusteeship Agreement and that the people of the Northern Mariana Islands, the Federated States of Micronesia, and the Republic of the Marshall Islands had freely exercised their right to self-determination, and considered that it was appropriate for that Agreement to be terminated. The Council asked the United States to consult with the governments concerned to agree on a date for entry into force of their respective new status agreements.

General of the United Nations that, as a consequence of consultations held between the United States Government and the Government of the Marshall Islands, agreement had been reached that the Compact of Free Association with the Marshall Islands entered fully into force on October 21, 1986. The United States further advised the Secretary General that, as a result of consultations with their governments, agreement had been reached that the Compact of Free Association with the Federated States of Micronesia and the Covenant with the Commonwealth of the Northern Mariana Islands would enter into force on November 3, 1986.

As of this day, November 3, 1986, the United States has fulfilled its obligations under the Trusteeship Agreement with respect to the Commonwealth of the Northern Mariana Islands, the Republic of the Marshall Islands, and the Federated States of Micronesia, and they are self-governing and no longer subject to the Trusteeship. In taking these actions, the United States is implementing the freely expressed wishes of the peoples of the Northern Mariana Islands, the Federated States of Micronesia, and the Marshall Islands.

The Commonwealth of the Northern Mariana Islands in political union with and under the sovereignty of the United States of America is fully established on the date and at the time specified in Section 2(a) of this Proclamation.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this third day of November, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

I am pleased to announce the beginning of new relationships between the United States and the island groups that have emerged from the Pacific Islands Trust Territory. One of these, the Northern Mariana Islands, is now a United States Commonwealth, and its people are now United States citizens. The other two, the Republic of the Marshall Islands and the Federated States of Micronesia, are sovereign, self-governing nations in free association with the United States. The fourth and remaining island group, Palau, has not yet finally approved its compact of free association. Until Palau's future political status is resolved, the United States will continue to discharge its responsibilities there as administering authority under the trusteeship agreement.

United States liberated these islands during our westward drive across the Pacific toward the end of World War II and has administered them as a United Nations strategic trusteeship since 1947. In these last four decades, we have worked with the islanders to improve health, education, and social service facilities throughout the more than two thousand islands comprising the trust territory. Our most valuable contribution to the islands, a legacy in which we can take pride, are the democratic, representative governments created and now enjoyed by the peoples of the trust territory.

Northern Mariana Islands, the Marshall Islands, and the Federated States of Micronesia. We deeply appreciate those who have worked so long and hard, in the negotiations and in the Congress, to fashion and enact the commonwealth covenant and the compacts of free association. We especially want to welcome the people of the Northern Mariana Islands into the American family as fellow citizens. We are honored by the choices of the peoples and leaders of the two new freely associated States to associate with us in close and long-lasting relationships, which reflect the good will and affection between our peoples. For these peoples, the long years of trusteeship are over and the dignity and opportunity for self-government are here. We in the United States pledge our friendship and support as the Northern Mariana Islands, the Marshall Islands, and the Federated States of Micronesia now walk the paths they themselves have chosen.

The President. You know, as I often say when we're taking off in Air Force One, it's great to get out of Washington and back to where the real people are. And the message I've been taking to the American people everywhere is plain and simple. I've reminded them that we turned the economy around: Inflation is down, interest rates are down, jobs and growth are up. And today we're enjoying one of the longest economic expansions in our history.

Now, I have pledged that we will not be satisfied until this expansion reaches every sector of our economy and every home in America and until every American who wants a job has a job. But on this campaign trip I have also alerted the American people that there is a threat to all we've accomplished. A threat that comes from the Democratic leadership in Congress that would rather fatten the Federal budget than protect the family budget.

Those folks never met a tax they didn't like. And when it comes to spending your hard-earned money, they act like they have your credit card in their pocket. And believe me, they never leave home without it. You know, in illustrating the differences between the approach of the Democratic leadership and our approach, I've been fond of telling a little story almost everywhere we've gone. So, today I have a special message from my friends in the press who've traveled with us in the past few days and weeks.

You know, in illustrating the differences between the approach of the Democratic leadership and our approach -- well, that, I figure, fits. Now, everywhere I've gone I've also spoken of my most solemn duty as President: the safety of the American people and the security of these United States. And I've also talked about how proud I am of the 2 million young men and women who are in the uniforms of the United States military today. Thanks to them every nickel-and-dime dictator around the world knows that if he tangles with the United States of America, he will have to pay a price.

SDI, and our goal to keep America strong, to save the world from mutual nuclear terror, and to eliminate nuclear ballistic missiles from the face of the Earth and ultimately all nuclear weapons, of every kind.

Now, everywhere I've gone I've tried to have a special word for Democrats and Independents. I wanted them to know that during these past 6 years as President, I've relied again and again upon their support and told them I'm grateful. With their huge majority in the House of Representatives, had there not been many of them willing to cross over and support us, we couldn't have done any of the things that we've done. You know, I used to be a Democrat myself.

So, ladies and gentlemen, this, then, has been our message: a strong economy, lower taxes, a strong America. But I hope you will forgive me if, toward the end of a long campaign, I take some quiet moments now to add some final thoughts about the meaning of what we saw and did. Of course, I welcomed the chance to talk about the issues, but I think you can see I've always thought there was only one real issue in this campaign: the future. That future that all of us want: a future of prosperity, of freedom for the individual, and above all, a future where America is safe and secure and advancing the cause of world freedom while helping humanity escape from the prison of nuclear terror.

I`ve seen that future during this campaign. I've seen it in those faces and faces along the highway our motorcade traveled from the airports. So many Americans interrupt their day to walk out and wave a hello. Children waving flags in front of their schools, office workers standing outside in their shirt sleeves, and laborers and mechanics in their work clothes as we pass their garages and warehouses.

And that's why, wherever we've gone -- as we flew away from Washington over the towns and neighborhoods and the baseball diamonds and football fields, shopping centers and school yards -- I always told my countrymen how grateful I was for the gift of the real America, the gift of coming home again. And now that I'm back here in California, where my career in public office started, I want to say thanks to all of you, too, for that gift of coming home. Flying back from Iceland recently, I think you can imagine how grateful I was for that gift, the gift of returning to a land like this. But I must tell you I also thought about other faces I've seen, the faces of the people of Iceland and so many other nations -- faces filled with hope, hope that the leaders of the world might someday work together and bring to every people and every land the blessings of peace and freedom.

I just think it's our job as Americans to work for that. You know, the other night on Air Force One we were flying from one stop to another after a long day, and I went back where a lot of our people and the staff were in the plane, and they got to reminiscing and telling stories. They know my weakness. You get along toward this time in life and you do have a lot of stories you delight in telling if there's half a chance. But there was one out of all of this that I'd like to share with you, and it isn't a joke.

Vietnamese prison camp, he stepped off that homebound plane and all of us were watching on television wondering what we were going to see of these men who had endured so many years of torture and imprisonment. And there he stood. He saluted the flag, and then he just said it all: ``God bless America.'' We made it to Oklahoma, Wisconsin, Missouri, too. I got hugged there by a bear with a big tummy. The Secret Service wasn't even a little bit nervous. He was the school mascot for the Southwest Missouri State University.

Now, most recently, I've been in the Black Hills of South Dakota. Air Force One took a few passes by Mount Rushmore, and we did the same thing in Colorado over the Air Force Academy. And we could see the cadet corps down below, they had all come out to salute us as we went over. We went to Indiana, Spokane, Washington, then a big western welcome in Idaho, and on to Nevada. I was just there this morning. And now, at last, home to California.

You know, maybe I could finish this campaign today by telling you something about the Iceland summit that wasn't too widely known. Mr. Gorbachev told me that when I talk about how we Americans look forward to a day when all the world would know the blessings of liberty, he said the Soviet Union takes this as a kind of threat. And, of course, there's really only one answer to that: It's no threat, Mr. Gorbachev, it's just a dream; we call it the American dream. But the truth is it's the oldest dream of humanity: the dream of peace and freedom, a dream that someday must belong to every man, woman, and child on Earth. And we find it is terrifying to the head of state of the Soviet Union, that picture of freedom for all people.

I welcome the opportunity to sign H.R. 2484, providing amendments to the Quiet Title Act. The product of long negotiation and of compromise, the bill removes impediments to the rights of States to sue the Federal Government in disputes over ownership of public lands. This measure represents a significant victory for principles of federalism. With the provisions of these amendments in place, we all can enjoy more certainty and repose with regard to Federal and State land claims.

Furthermore, over the last five years, my Administration has increased funding for the Federal Aviation Administration by 50 percent. Our multi-billion dollar safety modernization program for the Nation's air traffic system -- already the safest in the world -- has contributed to a decline in the accident rate by over 50 percent during the last decade. We have been equally dedicated to improving highway safety. In the past decade, the highway fatality rate has declined by about 25 percent. Still, my 1987 budget request for motor carrier safety exceeded 1982 funding five-fold.

H.R. 4961 directs the Administrator of the Federal Aviation Administration to establish an airport liability insurance clearinghouse and, with the Secretary of Transportation, to prepare reports on the increasing costs of general liability insurance coverage for airports and the implications of those increasing costs for airports. A final report would include recommendations for actions that the Federal government might undertake to assist in ameliorating the liability insurance difficulties of airports used by the public.

Americans are caught by the spiraling costs of liability insurance. While I am not unsympathetic to those who are bearing the cost of rising insurance premiums, I believe it would be inequitable and unwise for the Federal government to address this issue on an industry-by-industry basis.

For these reasons, I am compelled to withhold my approval from the bill. In so doing, I reemphasize that the disapproval will not disrupt the NTSB's activities in 1987 and that my Administration remains firmly committed to ensuring safe transportation.

Well, thank you all very much. Based on my previous experience, I ought to quit right now. [Laughter] And I thank you, George and Don and Mitch and Haley. With the Mets coming in next week to the White House, I sort of thought it'd be a good idea if we got our own championship team together. And as I look out upon all of you, I sort of thought it'd be a good idea -- not only that, but you've served such long hours and with such unstinting devotion. You who have, through your own dedication and sacrifice, made it possible for us to change our nation's history. I can't help but thinking, they're amazing. And you are amazing. So, the first order of business for me is to simply -- my friends -- and we've been through enough together for a real sense of friendship to develop, haven't we? My friends, I thank you.

Now, before turning to the works of the next 2 years, a word about the results of yesterday's election. First, my congratulations to all those who won -- Governors, Senators, and Representatives, Republicans and Democrats -- and my condolences to those who lost. Overall, yesterday's election brought fairly good news, though we lost the Senate. We realized many gains in other areas. We won unprecedented victories in governorships, gaining eight -- resulted in Republican Governors serving more than half the population for the United States. And additionally, against overwhelming historical odds, we kept our base in the House of Representatives virtually intact. The rest of the story is we came up short on keeping our Republican majority in the Senate. We did so because we lost six cliffhangers in which our candidates each received 49 percent or more of the vote. Now, this is not the outcome we sought. But our agenda remains unchanged, and I look forward to its attainment.

We traveled 25,000 miles. We worked with candidates, took our message to the people, and demonstrated our commitment to the major issues. I think it's worth noting that, even in this hotly contested race, we enjoyed widespread support on the issues that we campaigned on: our economic policies of low taxes and spending, judicial nominees who are firm with criminal wrongdoers, and a strong defense, especially SDI. So, in a sense, our message -- that same message of limited government and a firm foreign policy that we enunciated from our first day of office -- did get across and continues to get across.

So, I want to take a moment to personally thank the many, many people who made this effort possible. In addition to all those in this room who have done so much, I want to extend to all the candidates, to all the volunteers and staffs of the party and candidates, my heartfelt thanks. As I say, the political spectrum continues to move in our way. All our candidates, their staffs, and volunteers can feel heartened by this.

To all those on Capitol Hill, I look forward to Congress' return. By then, the election will be behind us, and hard work and bipartisan cooperation will be ahead. You have my pledge to seek solutions where problems exist and progress where barriers may arise. In a word, the challenge now before us is simply this: to complete the revolution that we have so well begun. Three aims must be met: We must make America more prosperous, more productive, and the world more peaceful.

My first aim, a more prosperous America, involves a redoubling of our efforts to get big government off the backs and out of the pockets of the people themselves. The spending restraint that we've pushed for so unceasingly ever since 1980 must finally be achieved. And that means permanent structural reform of the entire budget process. This town was kind of shaken up to discover that we were serious about the line-item veto and the balanced budget amendment during our first 6 years. Well, we've seen to it that the line-item veto and the balanced budget amendment have received serious consideration in the Congress. And serious opinion has already begun to shift in favor of both these reforms. Even so, you can take it from me: Washington ain't seen nothin' yet. We can achieve these two reforms. So, let's go after them.

As budget reform enables government to become more productive, we'll need to foster still greater productivity in the private sector if America is to go on competing in the global marketplace. We'll do all we can to keep regulation down and capital formation up, so that high technology can flourish and make American agriculture and traditionally -- or traditional industry more innovative and competitive. And now we have our new corporate and individual tax rates. No less a figure than Prime Minister Thatcher of the United Kingdom has commented that, at 28 percent, the top American individual tax rate will be lower than the lowest British individual rate. We intend to protect those low rates, to recognize them for what they are: the greatest spur possible to entrepreneurial growth. At the same time, we'll keep in mind that 50 percent of our gross national product is accounted for by services. So, we'll be looking at ways to achieve greater productivity in services of all kinds, from financial services to transportation to government to health care. And if I could interject something here: With inflation under control, I just have to believe -- and I'm sure you agree -- that the time has come to get the cost of health care under control.

And something else: Nothing represents a heavier drag on our productivity than drugs and crime. Drug abuse destroys families. It keeps young people from getting the education they need and means that tens of thousands of adults are often absent from the workplace, are demoralized and sick at heart. The loss to the economy can be measured in the billions of dollars, but there's no way to measure the loss to the country of all those ruined lives. Crime likewise exacts a toll from us, a toll of lost and destroyed property, high insurance rates, and mounting burdens on police and other law enforcement officials. But perhaps the heaviest toll is the toll of violence, personal injury, and fear.

So let's carry out our pledge to the people. Let's win our crusades against drugs and crime, because a productive America is an America that's kicked the habit and put criminals behind bars where they belong.

Well, our third aim is as straightforward as a phrase I used again and again during the campaign: peace through strength. And you know, after using these words before audiences across the country, I just can't help thinking that for this administration peace through strength is more than a policy; it's a promise, a promise we've made to the people and a promise we intend to keep. Hope alone can never lead to agreement with the Soviets. We must maintain our military preparedness and push forward with new technologies -- and, yes, that means SDI. So, the bridge to real arms reduction and a just peace rests on two girders: military preparedness and the pursuit of advanced technologies like SDI.

Well, in brief, then, this is our agenda. Now, of course, there are those who say it cannot be done. You'll remember they first said that back at the beginning of the second term. And that was before we'd enacted all aid for the freedom fighters in Nicaragua, achieved progress toward genuine arms reductions at Reykjavik, and passed the most sweeping, far-reaching reform of the tax code in history. There's one nice thing about it, you know, when you haven't been around the town too much and then you come here. You discover that some of the things you can't do can be done.

Well, the truth is the voters reelected us in 1984 to keep the revolution alive -- not just for 2 years, but for 4. And believe me, if you'd been out on the campaign trail with me hearing all those chants of ``4 more years!'' you'd know just how much the country is with us. I told them that I assumed that they were suggesting I live 4 more years and I was in favor of that. [Laughter] There's much more work to be done: State of the Union, budget preparation, and arms negotiations. There are those who will continue to harp upon the obstacles, who dwell upon what they consider the certainty of failure. The only real certainty is that if we do nothing, nothing will be achieved. To those who say it cannot be done, I'll only say this in reply: The only thing that cannot be done is to allow the stirring challenges that face us to go unanswered. For 2 years more, my friends, let us make history together.

Alzheimer's disease afflicts more than 2.5 million Americans. It destroys specific cells of the brain, impairing memory and judgment and producing confused thought and irritability. Families and friends, no less than the patient, are caught up in a daily battle to cope emotionally, physically, and financially with the patient's loss of intellectual functioning. We owe these patients and their families our understanding and our support.

No cure or treatments yet exist for Alzheimer's disease, but scientific research gives us hope. In medical institutions and laboratories across our country, scientists, supported by the Federal government's National Institute of Neurological and Communicative Disorders and Stroke and by voluntary organizations such as the Alzheimer's Disease and Related Disorders Association, are carrying out a wide range of studies on Alzheimer's disease and similar forms of dementia.

Each day, these efforts yield new knowledge about the functions of the brain and its disorders. New imaging techniques have disclosed that Alzheimer's disease does not affect the entire brain, as previously thought, but instead destroys specific areas. Scientists can now target future research more precisely on these areas and on certain brain chemicals that appear to play a role in the disease. Much about Alzheimer's disease remains to be learned, but through research we hope to find a way to overcome what we now know is a disease and not ``senility'' or a normal consequence of aging.

America, do hereby proclaim the month of November 1986 as National Alzheimer's Disease Month, and I call upon the people of the United States to observe this month with appropriate ceremonies and activities.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this fifth day of November, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

Department of Health and Human Services, which has set an ambitious agenda of health promotion and disease prevention goals to be achieved by 1990. I am encouraged by the progress that is being made toward those objectives and the plans which lie ahead. These plans include a national conference in late 1989 or early 1990, and many individual programs such as the Low Birth Weight Prevention Initiative, the National High Blood Pressure Education Program, and the Healthy Older People Public Education Program. Because our Federal commitment to such activities must, and will, continue, a President's Council on Health Promotion and Disease Prevention is not necessary at this time.

The President. I'm very pleased that you could all be here today. I know how busy you've been with events leading up to Tuesday's election, and I want to congratulate all of you in the House of Representatives who've just been reelected.

It's the product of one of the longest and most difficult legislative undertakings in the last three Congresses. Further, it's an excellent example of a truly successful bipartisan effort. The administration and the allies of immigration reform on both sides of the Capitol and both sides of the aisle worked together to accomplish these critically important reforms to control illegal immigration.

I would like to recognize a few of the public servants whose unflagging efforts have made this legislation a reality. Senator Alan Simpson, Congressman Dan Lungren, Chairman Peter Rodino, and Congressman Rom Mazzoli have long pursued and now have attained this landmark legislation. Important roles were played by Senator Strom Thurmond, Senator Paul Simon, and Congressmen Ham Fish, Bill McCollum, Chuck Schumer, and many others in both Houses of the Congress and in both parties. Additionally, I would like to note the excellent efforts of members of my administration who have worked so hard over the last 6 years to make this bill signing possible today. The long list of those in the executive branch is headed by Attorneys General Edwin Meese and William French Smith, who with Immigration Commissioner Alan C. Nelson have contributed greatly to our efforts to pass meaningful immigration reform.

The President. No comment. But could I suggest an appeal to all of you with regard to this: that the speculation, the commenting and all, on a story that came out of the Middle East, and that to us has no foundation -- that all of that is making it more difficult for us in our effort to get the other hostages free.

Immigration Reform and Control Act of 1986 is the most comprehensive reform of our immigration laws since 1952. In the past 35 years our nation has been increasingly affected by illegal immigration. This legislation takes a major step toward meeting this challenge to our sovereignty. At the same time, it preserves and enhances the Nation's heritage of legal immigration. I am pleased to sign the bill into law.

The major purpose of section 274B is to reduce the possibility that employer sanctions will result in increased national origin and alienage discrimination and to provide a remedy if employer sanctions enforcement does have this result. Accordingly, subsection (k) provides that the section will not apply to any discrimination that takes place after a repeal of employer sanctions if this should occur. In the light of this major purpose, the Special Counsel should exercise the discretion provided under subsection (d)(1) so as to limit the investigations conducted on his own initiative to cases involving discrimination apparently caused by an employer's fear of liability under the employer sanctions program.

I understand section 274B to require a ``discriminatory intent'' standard of proof: The party bringing the action must show that in the decisionmaking process the defendant's action was motivated by one of the prohibited criteria.

Moreover, paragraph (d)(2) refers to ``knowing an intentional discrimination'' and ``a pattern or practice of discriminatory activity.'' The meaning of the former phrase is self-evident, while the latter is taken from the Supreme Court's disparate treatment jurisprudence and thus includes the requirement of a discriminatory intent.

For example, the section does not preclude a requirement of English language skill or a minimum score on an aptitude test even if the employer cannot show a ``manifest relationship'' to the job in question or that the requirement is a ``bona fide occupational qualification reasonably necessary to the normal operation of that particular business or enterprise,'' so long as the practice is not a guise used to discriminate on account of national origin or citizenship status. Indeed, unless the plaintiff presents evidence that the employer has intentionally discriminated on proscribed grounds, the employer need not offer any explanation for his employee selection procedures.

In accordance with the provisions of section 274B(h) and (j)(4), a requirement to pay attorneys' fees may be imposed against nonprevailing parties -- including alleged victims or persons who file on their behalf as well as employers -- if claims or defenses are made that do not have a reasonable foundation in both law and fact. The same standard for the imposing of attorneys' fees applies to all nonprevailing parties. It is therefore expected that prevailing defendants would recover attorneys' fees in all cases for which this standard is satisfied, not merely in cases where the claim of the victim or person filing on their behalf is found to be vexatious or frivolous.

INA section 245A(d)(2) states that no alien would qualify for the lawful temporary or permanent residence status provided in that section if ``likely to become [a] public charge [ ].'' This disqualification could be waived by the Attorney General under certain circumstances. A likelihood that an applicant would become a public charge would exist, for example, if the applicant had failed to demonstrate either a history of employment in the United States of a kind that would provide sufficient means without public cash assistance for the support of the alien and his likely dependents who are not United States citizens or the possession of independent means sufficient by itself for such support for an indefinite period.

INA section 210(d), added by section 302(a) of the bill, provides that an alien who is ``apprehended'' before or during the application period for adjustment of status for certain ``special agricultural workers,'' may not under certain circumstances related to the establishment of a nonfrivolous case of eligibility for such adjustment of status be excluded or deported. I understand this subsection not to authorize any alien to apply for admission to or to be admitted to the United States in order to apply for adjustment of status under this section. Aliens outside the United States may apply for adjustment of status under this section at an appropriate consular office outside the United States pursuant to the procedures established by the Attorney General, in cooperation with the Secretary of State, as provided in section 210(b)(1)(B).

Cooperative Economic Development, all of whose members are appointed by the legislative branch. Section 601(d)(1) states that the access to executive branch information required under section 304(g) must be provided to this Commission also. Accordingly, the comments of the preceding paragraph are appropriate here as well.

INA section 274A(a)(5) provides that a person or entity shall be deemed in compliance with the employment verification system in the case of an individual who is referred for employment by a State employment agency if that person or entity retains documentation of such referral certifying that the agency complied with the verification system with respect to the individual referred. I understand this provision not to mandate State employment agencies to issue referral documents certifying compliance with the verification system or to impose any additional affirmative duty or obligation on the offices or personnel of such agencies.

Distance has not discouraged illegal immigration to the United States from all around the globe. The problem of illegal immigration should not, therefore, be seen as a problem between the United States and its neighbors. Our objective is only to establish a reasonable, fair, orderly, and secure system of immigration into this country and not to discriminate in any way against particular nations or people.

The act I am signing today is the product of one of the longest and most difficult legislative undertakings of recent memory. It has truly been a bipartisan effort, with this administration and the allies of immigration reform in the Congress, of both parties, working together to accomplish these critically important reforms. Future generations of Americans will be thankful for our efforts to humanely regain control of our borders and thereby preserve the value of one of the most sacred possessions of our people: American citizenship.

Thank you, Eddie, for that kind introduction. And I want to thank you, too, John Phelan, and my Board of Advisors for hosting this conference, and to welcome all the delegates here and to extend a warm welcome to all the distinguished ambassadors present and to Minister Francois Leotard.

I am pleased to be here to help inaugurate a new era for private sector initiatives. The Conference that you'll be attending involves the cooperation of seven governments, especially that of Prime Minister Chirac and his cabinet.

And it's a fine example of a public-private partnership in action. Funding for this Conference has come entirely from the private sector through such donations as those made by American Express and the New York Stock Exchange.

The Conference plans have involved countless volunteer man-hours on the part of those who are dedicated to promoting international voluntarism, like Jim Robinson, Paul Sheeline, and Bill Walsh. Bill even loaned his son, John, to the effort. And a number of organizations and corporations have provided support, such as the United Way, the National Association of Broadcasters, and International [Intercontinental] Hotels. It marks the first time that cooperation between the public and private sector will be the subject of a high-level international conference.

This international conference is very important to me because it's a major development in a program that has been close to my heart. You've often heard me talk about growing up in a small midwestern town where neighbor helped neighbor. From the barn raisings to the volunteer fire department, I was able to witness the great strength of private sector activity. When I became Governor of California, I sought to use the power of my office to promote this philosophy throughout that great State. As a matter of fact, I called on the private sector to come in and help me do some reorganizing in government. And 250 of the top leaders in the State of California gave several months of their time -- full-time -- to going into 64 agencies and departments of government to come back with some 1,400 recommendations as to how government could be made more efficient and more economical. And we implemented almost all of those recommendations.

Then in 1981, when I became President, I decided that promoting private sector initiatives across this country would be a top priority of our administration here at the national level. And just look at the success we've witnessed. Over the past 5 years, charitable giving has increased 80 percent to last year's record high of nearly $80 billion privately given to good causes. In the area of voluntarism, more people are donating their time than ever before, and a recent survey estimated the annual value of the services these people have rendered is over a hundred billion dollars. In the area of public-private partnerships, we've seen thousands of new programs across the country committed to meeting human needs in health, education, nutrition, child care, and many other fields. And we've seen many American corporations take active roles in communities across the country in a new concept known as corporate social responsibility. As a matter of fact, right here in our own community -- and it's going on across the country -- many of them made themselves partners of local schools. And they chained us into it.

Well, now, I'm very pleased that the private sector initiatives program has spread internationally. The good-hearted actions of individuals, of you and me, promote the public good, the welfare of the Nation as a whole, in ways that government never could. They ensure that the public-spiritedness of our people is harnessed to its full extent. If we let government take its place entirely, we would surely be wasting our most potent resource. Alexis de Tocqueville's description is as true of America today as it was when he wrote it. He came here to find out the secret of our seemingly miraculous progress as a brand new pioneer country. And then he went back and wrote the story of what he had seen. He said, ``In a local community in their country'' -- our country here -- ``a citizen may conceive of some need which is not being met. What does he do? He goes across the street, discusses it with his neighbor. And then what happens? A committee comes into existence, and the committee begins functioning in behalf of the need.'' And he topped off his description by saying -- and whether you believe this or not -- ``No bureaucrats ever got involved.'' [Laughter] Public-spiritedness has built America, and you'll be its ambassadors at the Paris Conference later this month.

I know you've been briefed at length about the Conference, and you've heard the excitement expressed by the ambassadors of the other participating nations. I'm sure that your discussions with your foreign counterparts about how the programs work here in America will give them a true understanding of our private sector initiatives. I know you'll take time, as well, to understand what they are doing in their countries, so that our own wisdom will be enriched, as it has been countless times in the past by the experience of others. Americans live by the age-old truth that with personal charity there are two winners: the person who gives as well as the person who receives. And very often, it's the giver who receives the most precious gift.

Personal, private charity humanizes a society. It makes us more aware of each other, of our hopes and needs, and of our sorrows and our joys; and it makes us all more compassionate. This is our message as a nation to the Conference that you're about to attend.

June I'll be in Venice, meeting at the economic summit with the heads of many of the countries involved in your Conference. I hope that we'll be able to look back at the Paris Conference as the start of an unprecedented international epoch in the history of private sector initiatives, and I'm sure that you'll all make America proud.

I remember one story that was told back when Americans first came to the point that they could begin to think about visiting their fatherlands and motherlands, the other countries, the heritage of their parents and grandparents. And we didn't exactly turn up as tourists over there -- as the most desirable kind. We were pretty brash. I remember the story of an elderly farm couple that had finally taken this tour, and a guide was explaining to them the great power of Vesuvius and the heat and everything that was involved.

I have approved H.R. 2434, an act that authorizes appropriations for the Patent and Trademark Office through fiscal years 1987 and 1988. I have done so despite certain concerns. Our ability to compete in world markets has come to depend more and more on the creative talents of our citizens and the extent to which we and our trading partners respect and protect intellectual property. A nation's respect for such property is measured in large part by its willingness to devote the necessary resources to the administration of its patent and trademark systems.

Recognizing this, my administration, with the Congress' support and cooperation, has developed a comprehensive plan for improving the patent and trademark examination processes, reducing the pendency periods for both patent and trademark applications, and increasing the likelihood that issued patents and registered trademarks will withstand challenges. Complete automation of the Office's operations by the mid - 1990's and increased reliance on user fees are essential ingredients of this ambitious undertaking.

Unfortunately, the act contains some troublesome features. My approval of this bill does not signify that I would necessarily sign a similar bill for any fiscal year beyond 1988. I am particularly disturbed by a provision that prohibits the use of fee revenue to defray more than 30 percent of the automation costs in each of fiscal years 1987 and 1988. The effect of the provision will be to make the automation initiative more dependent on scarce general revenues supplied by the public at large and less dependent on funds supplied by those who use and benefit from the automated systems. Should this be repeated, the future of the automation project will be jeopardized. The continuing need for fiscal restraint will permit no other result. Fortunately, we have been assured by Members of both Houses that the act is intended to establish no precedent for future years in this regard.

In addition, I am concerned about provisions that subject key management decisions on the deployment of the automation system to an intrusive degree of congressional supervision. These 90-day report-and-wait provisions come unduly close to crossing that fine line between legitimate oversight and interference in the management prerogatives of the executive branch.

However, under the particular circumstances of this bill, I view the report-and-wait provision less as a challenge than as a genuine desire to understand more about the automation project and to participate with the executive branch in helping the Patent and Trademark Office prepare itself for the challenges of the next century.

Despite these reservations, the act clearly has many desirable features. It makes the current policy of reducing fees for small businesses, independent inventors, and nonprofit organizations a permanent feature of the patent law. It makes it clear that the Patent and Trademark Office may, except for the limitation previously noted, use fees to support any of its programs. In sum, the act provides the needed support to continue implementing the automation master plan.

Administrator of the Environmental Protection Agency, sent to the Congress a proposal to amend and reauthorize appropriations under the Clean Water Act. As that proposal demonstrated, this administration remains committed to the act's objectives, and I am proud that we can report remarkable progress in this massive national cleanup effort.

Unfortunately, this bill so far exceeds acceptable levels of intended budgetary commitments that I must withhold my approval. Central to my proposal of last year was the phasing out over a period of 4 years and the termination by 1990 of the huge sewage treatment grant program. With the backlog of needed treatment plants financed in major part by the Federal Government since 1972, it is now necessary for the Federal Government to reduce its expenditures and complete the transition from Federal to State and local responsibility. The Environmental Protection Agency has already spent $44 billion to assist municipalities in meeting a need that was estimated to be $18 billion when the program was established in 1972. My proposal would have extended another $6 billion to finish the projects that had been started with Federal funds.

Notwithstanding my recommendations, S. 1128 would authorize $18 billion, or triple the amount I requested for that grant program, expand the allowable uses of Federal funds, and continue Federal grants for another 9 years. By 1993, S. 1128 would increase outlays by as much as $10 billion over the projections in my 1987 budget and would reverse important reforms enacted in 1981 that targeted funds to the completion of construction of sewage treatment plants -- the program's original and principal remaining purpose.

Water Act, including expanded Federal enforcement authorities and an easing of the regulatory and financial burden on cities in dealing with stormwater discharges. We will work diligently with the 100th Congress to address these concerns. S. 1128 also would authorize some new programs -- at a 5-year total of $500 million -- that my administration has strongly opposed. Principal among them is the reinstatement of a Federal financial assistance program to pay for local plans to control diffuse sources of pollution. Over $500 million was spent on a similar program between 1973 and 1981, with little or no positive result. Restarting expensive planning grant programs that have failed in the past is not justifiable.

For these reasons, I cannot approve S. 1128. I must emphasize, however, that my action will have no impact on the current conduct of water pollution control programs under the Clean Water Act. All regulatory, enforcement, and permit issuance activities will continue under permanent law. Although authorization to appropriate for the sewage treatment grant program and other grant and research programs expired between 1983 and 1985, funds have been appropriated for them annually, and they are funded in the continuing resolution for 1987.

My administration will work closely with the next Congress to pass acceptable legislation. We will continue our commitment to improve and protect our nation's water quality by working with the Congress to modify current law to help cities handle stormwater discharge permits.

We welcome the willingness of these Americans to serve on the U.S. delegation. Their presence will help demonstrate the desire shared by all Americans for improved Soviet and East European adherence to the human rights and other commitments of the Helsinki Final Act. The public members will be an invaluable source of expertise and a means of staying in close touch with interested groups at home as the conference progresses. In addition to calling on the talents of this outstanding group, Ambassador Zimmermann will work closely with the many private individuals and nongovernmental organizations from the United States who are interested in CSCE and who plan activities and visits in connection with the Vienna meeting.

From his boyhood, an independent Israel was his dream. He never wavered in pursuit of that dream; he worked all his life long to establish the State of Israel and to build and strengthen it. He succeeded.

Every quality we associate with statesmanship was David Ben-Gurion's -- wisdom, tremendous ability, great resourcefulness -- but none more so than the vision and the determination that propelled him decade after decade. Israel's existence is a true testament to the spirit and the deeds of David Ben-Gurion. He would have wanted no other legacy.

Among the many links between the United States and Israel are principles that were dear to David Ben-Gurion. The Declaration of Independence of the State of Israel, a milestone in the life of Ben-Gurion, echoes the American Declaration of Independence in its recognition of the equality of every human being.

In order to honor the celebration of the centennial of the birth of David Ben-Gurion and the values of freedom and democracy we share with Israel, the Congress, by Senate Joint Resolution 422, has authorized and requested the President to issue a proclamation designating 1986 as the centennial of the birth of David Ben-Gurion.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this seventh day of November, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

Hospice care is a humanitarian way for terminally ill people to approach the end of their lives in comfort with appropriate, competent, and compassionate care in an environment of personal individuality and dignity.

In a hospice, care is provided by an interdisciplinary team of physicians, nurses, social workers, pharmacists, psychological and spiritual counselors, and other community volunteers trained in the hospice concept of care. Physical, emotional, and spiritual needs of patient and family are treated, with special attention to their pain and grief.

Hospices are rapidly becoming full partners in the Nation's health care system. Medicare provides a hospice benefit, as do many private insurance carriers. But there remains a great need to increase public awareness about the benefits of hospice care.

America, do hereby proclaim the month of November 1986 as National Hospice Month. I urge all government agencies, the health care community, private organizations, and the people of the United States to observe that month with appropriate forums, programs, and activities designed to encourage national recognition of hospice care.

We also generously support the arts and desire to make them as widely available as possible. A typically American consortium -- informal and effective -- of individuals, corporations, foundations, and taxpayers provides financial support to artists to augment revenues raised directly from patrons.

It is most fitting that we take time to celebrate the arts of our Nation, to honor our artists, and to express our appreciation to everyone who patronizes the arts. And as we celebrate the arts, we celebrate and give thanks for our freedom, the only atmosphere in which artists can truly create and in which art is truly the expression of the soul.

Let us join together during National Arts Week to celebrate the arts of our Nation and in pledging to continue this magnificent partnership of artist and patron so as to enrich the soul and the heart of our people forever.

I am writing to inform you of my intent to add the Republic of the Marshall Islands and the Federated States of Micronesia to the list of beneficiary developing countries under the Generalized System of Preferences (GSP) Program, effective October 21 for the Republic of the Marshall Islands and November 3 for the Federated States of Micronesia.

Jacobsen. I certainly have some words, and I would like to read them. I usually like to speak extemporaneously. But we have our people being held prisoners, and I'd like to just preface my remarks by one simple statement. And what I say today, what you report, what you speculate upon is heard throughout the entire world within 24 hours. A simple speculation on your part could cause the death of my dear friend Tom Sutherland or Terry Anderson or Joe Cicippio or any other of the other hostages. And I would ask that you would be responsible and please do not engage in unreasonable and unrealistic speculations. Be intellectually honest. I ask of you, I plead for you: I am worried about what you might say, or someone else, might result in a death of somebody that I love. I don't want that on my conscience, and I don't think you want it on yours. So I have a brief statement that I've written, and I'm happy to read it. And it's a thrill to be here.

President, you can't really imagine -- and Mrs. President -- can't imagine my joy of being here with you on this very special day. For 17 long months, I never lost hope of being a free man again. I prayed long and hard. And my dear family -- my six wonderful children are here, are with me here today -- and my friends -- they kept the faith, and they never lost hope despite many, many frustrations. And that knowledge kept me going.

And freedom is a very precious gift, and I really learned it in a very personal manner. Freedom is a very precious gift, and one that we Americans sometimes take for granted. When freedom is taken away, the loss is immense. But that same hope and that faith and that optimism that sustained the founders of our country, of this great land, during the periods of our adversity as a nation also kept my spirits high during my long captivity. And, Mr. President, I know that you and many others in and out of the administration of this government have worked long and hard on my behalf and on the behalf of the other captives and you continue to do so for the others that are still being held hostage. And in particular, there are a number of independent people, religious leaders and others, that deserve special praise for their independent efforts.

Waite, who is one of those great humanitarians, who has given so much of himself so that I may be free -- Terry Waite did it as a free man, free of all governments and any type of deals. Terry did it as a humanitarian. The families of Terry Anderson, Tom Sutherland, Joe Cicippio, and the other innocent people still being held hostage, should not give up hope.

Contact by you, Mr. President, and others in the administration and especially those very special people in the State Department, who have maintained frequent contact with our families, help our dear ones sustain their hope. And I know, Mr. President, that you have sought our freedom from the day that the first American was taken hostage, and I know that you have not rested, nor will you rest, until every American is home free.

The President. Bill [Bill Plante, CBS News], I think in view of this statement, this is just exactly what I tried to say last night. There's no way that we can answer questions having anything to do with this without endangering the people we're trying to rescue.

The President. Because it has to happen again and again and again until we have them all back. And anything that we tell about all the things that have been going on in trying to effect his rescue endangers the possibility of further rescue.

Jacobsen. Please, you didn't hear what I said at the beginning. Unreasonable speculation on your part can endanger their lives. I would like to take some time now and talk. But this is a day of joy for me. I have my children inside.

The President spoke at 1:38 p.m. in the Rose Garden at the White House. Following the remarks and the exchange with reporters, the President met privately with Mr. Jacobsen and his family in the Oval Office.

The campaign season is behind us, and it's now time to get down to business here in Washington. As we wrapped up the last session of Congress, one bit of unfinished business was crying out to be completed. I'm talking about the congressional budget process. I believe, and many believe with me, that the way the budgets are put together is a disgrace, simply unworthy of the Legislature of the greatest democracy in the world. This is not a criticism of Congress. In fact, many Members of Congress from both sides of the aisle agree.

Let's look for a moment at what happened this year. For more than 8 months the process dragged on, with Congress failing to send to me any of the appropriations bills I needed to keep the Government running. It came down to the deadline, the day the Federal Government would simply run out of money, and there was still no budget. Instead, as has happened so many years in the past, we got what is called a continuing resolution, a grab bag full of special-interest projects that never would have made it into a real budget.

This was the first time in history, however, that every single appropriations bill for the whole United States Government was dumped in one wagon. I was given a half-trillion-dollar spending bill on a take-it-or-leave-it basis.

Well, we insisted that some of the most flagrant abuses of the budget process be taken out, such as language that would have undercut our position at the arms reduction talks in Geneva, language that would have very likely have made our progress in Iceland all but impossible. Other provisions that would have hurt vital defense needs were also eliminated. Even so, you can bet that tucked away in that half-trillion-dollar bill was enough waste to run several small countries for many years.

There are many in the Congress who are unhappy with the way the budget process works. In the crisis atmosphere surrounding these continuing resolutions, all sorts of wasteful spending programs and other measures that never could have survived a thorough and thoughtful debate can sneak through.

America to conduct its fiscal affairs. No private company would be permitted to behave this way. No State legislature in our Union is allowed to conduct its affairs this irresponsibly. And most important, no family can be so negligent in running its finances. Why can't we expect the United States Congress to do what millions of American families do every month: set a budget, stick to it, and balance their checkbooks?

You know, our Founding Fathers considered the power of the purse the most important responsibility of the legislative branch. If that power is abused, it can have very serious consequences for our nation, not only threatening our prosperity with huge budget deficits but, ultimately, undermining the economic foundations of our safety and national security. And that's why we must start now, while the memory of this year's budget fiasco is still fresh in our minds, to reform the budget process. We must redouble our efforts, on both sides of the aisle, in a spirit of cooperation to improve the budget process. There are a number of solutions to this problem, and I will outline other recommendations at a later date. The balanced budget amendment and the line-item veto are a good place to begin. The American people overwhelmingly support a balanced budget. And the balanced budget amendment lost in the Senate early this year by only one vote.

When Congress reconvenes next year, that amendment should be foremost on their agenda. The line-item veto can also be within reach of next year's Congress. No other single piece of legislation would so quickly and effectively put order back into our budget process. All it would mean is that the President could selectively sign or veto individual spending items, that he wouldn't have to take the fat along with the meat. Forty-three Governors have the line-item veto. I had it when I was Governor of California.

You know, when we first started talking about tax reform, a chorus of naysayers arose telling us it couldn't be done. But we stuck to our guns, and with your support and a bipartisan coalition in Congress, we did it all right: The most profound, progrowth tax reform this nation has ever seen is now the law of the land. Well, the same can be true with budget reform. There are always people in this town telling you why something can't be done. But I've got one good reason why budget reform can be done, and that reason is you, the American people. And that's why I believe Washington ain't seen nothin' yet. Budget reform is an idea whose time has come.

Commandant and Mrs. Kelley, ladies and gentlemen of the Marine Corps, I'm honored to join you for this traditional ceremony commemorating the founding of the Marine Corps 211 years ago. Now, if I was talking about my own birthday, I would be using a different term here and referring to this as the 172d anniversary of your 39th birthday. [Laughter] But I wish I could be with every marine today to say how grateful America is for all that the Marines have given over the years and give today in the defense of freedom.

Yes, in these 211 years, whenever America has called, the Few and the Proud have been there, in places like names with Belleau Wood and the Argonne Forest, Guadalcanal, Saipan, Okinawa, the Chosin Reservoir, Khe Sanh, and Grenada. From the halls of Montezuma to the shores of Tripoli the men of the United States Marine Corps have fought with a consistency of courage and skill unparalleled in the history of man. Everywhere they've landed, those of the Eagle, the Globe, and the Anchor have taken with them a spirit that all the world knows today and respects. As Ernie Pyle, the legendary World War II war correspondent wrote: ``The source of that spirit is that a Marine just plain considers himself a better soldier than anybody else.'' And he might have added the Marines have never given anyone any reason to think differently. The Marines have always hit the beaches hard. They never leave their men on the battlefield. And let me just say that's not only a Marine tradition. In Southeast Asia, we will write no final chapters, we will close no books, until we have a return of all who may be alive, a fullest accounting of all those missing in action, and repatriation of the remains of those who died serving our nation. Like the Marines, America will not leave its men on the battlefield.

So, yes, whether raising the flag over Iwo Jima or in the daily duty of guarding our Embassies around the world, the Marine Corps spirit has been an inspiration to generations of Americans. And the Marine Corps strength has been among our surest guarantees of America's security around the world. The corps today is almost 200,000 strong -- a far cry from that band that the corps' first commandant, Captain Samuel Nichols, first recruited at Tun Tavern in Philadelphia in the winter of 1775.

June, and the commander told me that today's young recruits are the best he's ever seen. To me, that's saying a lot, because I know a few past recruits. I could come pretty close to mustering a platoon of them just by calling a Cabinet meeting.

In accordance with the provisions of the International Emergency Economic Powers Act, I am transmitting a report on the status of the Nicaraguan emergency and any actions or developments that have occurred during the last six months. This report also summarizes the expenses to the government attributable to the emergency.

I have determined that the policies of the Sandinista government continue to pose a threat to the national security of the United States, and therefore I shall continue to use the powers at my disposal to apply economic sanctions against Nicaragua.

Since my report of May 23, 1986, fewer than 35 applications for licenses have been received with respect to Nicaragua, and the majority of these applications have been granted. Of the licenses issued in this period, most either authorized exports for humanitarian purposes, covering medical supplies, food, and animal vaccines, or extended authorizations previously given to acquire intellectual property protection under Nicaraguan law. A few additional licenses authorized exports to international organizations in Nicaragua, as well as imports of unaccompanied baggage by U.S. citizens formerly residing in Nicaragua who have returned to the United States.

The policies and actions of the Sandinista government continue to pose an unusual and extraordinary threat to the national security and foreign policy of the United States. During the period covered by this report the Sandinistas continued to support guerrilla groups in neighboring Central American countries and to expand their already huge arsenal of Soviet weaponry. Soviet arms deliveries in 1986 have already exceeded those of any previous year and continue to arrive. The Sandinistas also continued their policy of internal repression, leading to large outflows of refugees, thousands of whom have sought shelter in the United States. I shall continue to exercise the powers at my disposal to apply economic sanctions against Nicaragua as long as these measures are appropriate, and will continue to report periodically to the Congress on expenses and significant developments, pursuant to 50 U.S.C. 1641(c) and 1703(c).

President today met with his senior national security advisers regarding the status of the American hostages in Lebanon. The meeting was prompted by the President's concern for the safety of the remaining hostages and his fear that the spate of speculative stories which have arisen since the release of David Jacobsen may put them and others at risk.

During the meeting, the President reviewed ongoing efforts to achieve the release of all the hostages, as well as our other broad policy concerns in the Middle East and Persian Gulf. As has been the case in similar meetings with the President and his senior advisers on this matter, there was unanimous support for the President. While specific decisions discussed at the meeting cannot be divulged, the President did ask that it be reemphasized that no U.S. laws have been or will be violated and that our policy of not making concessions to terrorists remains intact.

At the conclusion of the meeting, the President made it clear to all that he appreciated their support and efforts to gain the safe release of all the hostages. Stressing the fact that hostage lives are at stake, the President asked his advisers to ensure that their departments refrain from making comments or speculating about these matters.

Veterans Day, we take respite from the ordinary business of daily life to pay honor to those who have served in the Armed Forces throughout our nation's history. It is right that we should meditate upon the principles for which so many Americans have fought -- peace, freedom, the sacred and inviolable dignity of all men -- principles that still give hope to the Nation. But let us above all consider the veterans themselves, the millions of men and women who have given of themselves, even of their lives. Our veterans have come from the grassy plains of Iowa and the streets of Brooklyn. They have spoken with the twang of New England and the drawl of the South, and, often, with the accents of the foreign lands of their birth. And from the time of the Revolution, when black soldiers fought for the American cause, they have represented our country's diverse ethnic heritage. And they have prevailed, prevailed so that today the United States of America is the greatest Nation on Earth.

We also pledge again what we have pledged before: We will write no final chapters, we will close no books, until we have a return of all who may be alive in Southeast Asia, a fullest possible accounting of all those missing in action, and repatriation of the remains of those who died serving our nation. In our hearts, we will hold these men -- husbands, fathers, sons, brothers, and sweethearts -- and we will never forget. America will not leave its men on the battlefield. Our veterans, then, are the heroes among us. On this Veterans Day, let us pay them tribute. And let us resolve to live up to their example.

Less than a year ago, I signed Public Law 99 - 258, which extended the same statute of limitations as the act that I sign today extends an additional 2 years. I reluctantly sign S. 485, and I do not intend to sign another extension. This extension of the statute of limitations will maintain the status quo while the Congress completes development of a sound legislative solution to the complex and unique land management problems concerning submerged lands in Alaska. I strongly urge the 100th Congress to resolve these problems as soon as possible.

In signing this legislation, I note that section 3, providing for the manner of appointment of members of the Blackstone River Valley National Heritage Corridor Commission, could be interpreted to raise constitutional concerns. The Secretary of the Interior is authorized to appoint each of the Commission's 19 members, but in the case of 6 of the members he is apparently required to appoint certain specified State officials designated in the statute. To the extent that such persons could be deemed empowered by reason of their appointment to exercise significant governmental authority, this method of appointment would contravene the appointments clause of the Cons|itution, article II, section 2, clause 2. I am signing this bill with the understanding that these 6 members of the Commission, who comprise a minority of its membership and who cannot constitute a quorum, are empowered to act only in an advisory capacity. In this manner, the legislation may be interpreted consistently with the requirements of the Constitution.

Well, all my life I've believed that if you truly have faith, your dream will come true. And your dream began in spring training and culminated by bringing the championship to the Big Apple. It took you through 108 regular-season wins and hard-fought victories in the playoffs. And even after being down to your last strike three times in game six, you came back to epitomize what that other bard of baseball Yogi Berra once said, ``The game isn't over till it's over.'' So, believe me, even this lifelong Cubs fan has to dish out the praise: You have certainly done yourselves, the city of New York, and all America proud. And I'm sure you wouldn't have hurt Casey's feelings a bit, either.

Since today marks the close of round six of the nuclear and space talks (NST) between the United States and the Soviet Union, I want to take this occasion to reaffirm our commitment to achieving deep, equitable, and verifiable reductions in the U.S. and Soviet nuclear arsenals. Such reductions would reduce the risk of nuclear war and create a far safer world.

United States proposed that neither the U.S. nor U.S.S.R. deploy advanced strategic defenses for 10 years, while conducting research, development, and testing, which are permitted by the ABM treaty. This would be coupled with agreement that during the first 5 years of this period, strategic offensive arms would be reduced by 50 percent, and that during the second 5 years all remaining U.S. and Soviet offensive ballistic missiles would be totally eliminated. We made clear that at the end of the 10-year period, either side could deploy defenses if it so chose, unless the parties agreed otherwise. Mr. Gorbachev did not accept this proposal and instead insisted on making the ABM treaty more restrictive by limiting our research exclusively to the laboratory and, in effect, killing the United States Strategic Defense Initiative.

During this round, our negotiators in Geneva formally tabled new U.S. proposals reflecting the areas of agreement I reached with Mr. Gorbachev in Reykjavik, as well as our other proposals. On November 7, the Soviet Union took some new steps as well, by tabling proposals that partially reflect the headway made at Reykjavik. These areas of agreement can serve as the starting point from which United States and Soviet negotiators could hammer out significant arms reduction treaties. But this has not yet been the case. While this may have been the most productive round to date, the Soviet negotiations have still not followed up adequately to build on the progress made at Reykjavik. Instead, at times the Soviets have seemed more interested in conducting a public relations campaign than in pursuing the serious give-and-take of the bargaining table.

This is particularly true in the case of reductions in intermediate-range nuclear forces. One year ago, at our summit meeting in Geneva, Mr. Gorbachev and I agreed to build upon areas of common ground, including an interim agreement in INF. The Soviets reiterated this position in proposals they made earlier this year. And they reaffirmed the goal of a separate INF agreement only days before our meeting in Iceland. Now, however, the Soviets have taken a major step backwards by insisting that progress in every area of nuclear arms control must be linked together in a single package. This attempt to hold progress in other areas of arms control hostage to acceptance of the Soviet effort to kill our SDI program is patently unacceptable.

In light of the continuing Soviet offensive buildup, the longstanding and extensive Soviet programs in strategic defense, and continued Soviet noncompliance with existing arms control agreements, SDI is crucial to the future security of the United States and our allies.

Americans recognize that SDI was essential in getting the Soviets to return to the negotiating table, and that it is essential as well to our prospects for concluding an agreement with the Soviets to reduce nuclear arms. Effective strategic defenses would be insurance against Soviet cheating or abrogation of such an agreement. In addition, they would provide a continuing incentive to the Soviets to pursue further reductions in offensive weapons. SDI is, therefore, a vital insurance policy that we cannot and will not bargain away. That is a commitment which I have made to the American people, and I stand by it.

United States negotiators have worked hard in translating the progress made at Reykjavik into concrete new arms reduction proposals. These new American proposals, along with some new Soviet proposals, are now on the table in Geneva. Let us hope that when the talks resume on January 15, as we have already agreed, the Soviets will move with us to bring about, for the first time in history, significant reductions in nuclear weapons. Such reductions are now within our grasp if the Soviet Union will join us in serious pursuit of agreements which are equitable and stabilizing for both sides and in the interest of the entire world. We are ready for this. We await Soviet readiness to move forward.

Americans have always relied on education to enrich our lives and to keep our Nation free and strong. We have relied as well on our spirit of voluntarism to improve our communities and to help our neighbors. These two traditions are among our Nation's greatest strengths, and we can all take a great deal of pride in our millions of school volunteers who exemplify both of them.

These volunteers generously contribute their time, talent, and resources to help professional educators enhance classroom instruction. In addition, citizens form business and education partnerships and adopt-a-school initiatives to develop a broader range of educational opportunities for students. All of this support from the community encourages school staffs and furthers the education of our children. The magnitude, quality, and selflessness of these efforts deserve the gratitude of every American who cares about our children and the future of our Nation.

November 12, 1986, as Salute to School Volunteers Day. I invite government officials, educators, parents, students, and all Americans to observe this day and participate in activities to recognize and show appreciation for school volunteers' contributions to education.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twelfth day of November, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

The family is the most important unit in society, because belonging to a family is so important to the individual. We all need the love and the nurture of a family. Children belong in a family, where they can be cared for and taught the moral values and traditions that give order and stability to our lives and to society as a whole. Many adults, who cannot have children or who have room in their hearts for more of them, desire the special joy of sharing their homes with children who would otherwise have none. For these families, adoption represents a happy marriage of personal needs that serves society's larger interests as well.

Despite the many parents who want and wait for children and the perfect gift of life adoption can represent, it has tended to become the forgotten option in America. Many Americans, however, are taking courageous steps to reverse this trend and to promote public awareness of the positive advantages of adoption. For instance, they are making us aware that today in America approximately 36,000 children are legally eligible and waiting for adoption. These children have special needs that loving and generous people can meet. Some of these children are physically, mentally, or emotionally handicapped, while some are older, or belong to minority groups, or have brothers and sisters and need to be adopted together. Through the combined efforts of public and private child welfare agencies, church and civic groups, adoptive parent and advocacy groups, businesses, and the communications media, loving families are being found for these wonderful children.

More and more Americans are also encouraging adoption as the best solution for single women facing crisis pregnancies. Thousands upon thousands of Americans long for children even as more than 4,000 unborn babies perish in our country each day by abortion. As a people we must do more to give all the support we can, during and after pregnancy, to the courageous and compassionate mothers who choose adoption as a means of giving their little ones a lifetime of love with a permanent family.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this thirteenth day of November, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

I know you've traveled far, but I believe that our meeting will bring us closer to overcoming one of the most serious challenges our country faces. And as you know by now, because I know you've been hearing from others, we're waging a battle against an enemy as insidious as any in our history. Illegal drugs have infiltrated our schools, invaded our factories, are terrorizing our citizens, and undercutting our institutions.

I'm encouraged by the progress that we've made since we began 5 years ago, but there's still a lot to do. Yesterday I know Don Regan [Assistant to the President and Chief of Staff] described to you the six goals of our national crusade to lead us toward a drug-free America. I've called for a sustained, relentless effort by every segment of society. We mean to free the user from drugs and to prevent others from becoming users. I believe the American people are willing to make it clear that illegal drug use will no longer be tolerated and are ready to support our fight to rid America of this deeply disruptive and corrosive evil. If this battle is to be won, and it must be, each and every one of us has to make a stand and get involved. Leadership and commitment must be evident, not only in the White House and statehouses but also in Congress, in the pulpit, in the union hall, in our schools, in the media, and, yes, by you, our Ambassadors who represent us around the world. You know all too well that drug abuse is not just an American problem, it's a critical worldwide problem.

Internationally, the narco traffickers endanger our national security by weakening the authority of friendly governments and spewing a trail of terrorism, violence, and corruption. We've seen tragic evidence of that here in the Western Hemisphere in recent times. We're starting to make some encouraging progress. The nations of the world are becoming aware of the danger to their own societies, and many of them are now taking strong action against the drug trafficker -- overcoming what, for many years, was said to be insurmountable cultural, political, and logistical obstacles. There's increased cooperation between nations and a greater sense of urgency by the international community.

Many of you've been at the forefront of this change, and I recognize the dangers you face and am proud of the work that you've done. We have to build on that progress. And we must convey to the rest of the world a sense of our own commitment to win this battle against drugs. So, I'm asking you to take our message back with you. To the leaders of the various nations I'm sending a personal message through with you. We will not tolerate the use or the supply of illegal drugs anyplace, anytime. We mean to have a drug-free country, and we mean business. And I ask each of you to ensure that the fight against illegal drugs is a priority of your mission. Let there be no doubt that the priority is real. We'll be doing our part here at home, and I hope that you'll seek every opportunity to give visibility to U.S. antidrug efforts. I know that as other countries realize the extent of our activities, they'll also find it easier to take the right steps to fight drugs.

And finally, we must offer a helping hand. Although each country has the responsibility, both to its own people and as international citizens to eradicate this evil within its own boundaries, no one country can win this battle alone.

We want all nations to join with us in this and make it a global crusade. And when we stand together united and committed to this cause, I think we represent a powerful force for humanity. And when that happens, there'll be no sanctuary on Earth for those who were pilfering human dignity and pandering despair. So, I'm counting on all of you, and I'm looking forward to hearing your views now.

Thank you very much. I have just read a clipping this morning from the United Press that shows how the private sector is spreading and things of this kind in philanthropy; that the First Lady of the Soviet Union has been named to the board of directors of a private, and privately financed, group in the Soviet Union. But I appreciate this opportunity to be with you today in recognition of one of America's greatest national treasures: the spirit of philanthropy that is so evident among our people.

Just like every other kid in our town, I was a beneficiary of this spirit of community. I did a lot of talking about this out on the campaign. Part of it for me meant being a member of the YMCA Boys Band; I was the drum major. And during the recent election there'd be some high school bands at the political rallies, and I would tell some of these young people the story about what happened to me in that band. We were invited to go to a smaller town nearby on Memorial Day and to march in the parade. And we found out that we were at the head of the parade. The only thing in front of us was the parade marshal on a big white horse. And we started off down the street; and I'm with that baton, which was bigger than I was. And suddenly, he rode back down the parade line to make sure that everything was coming along all right. And I'm going down the street, leading the band and the music began to sound a little faint. [Laughter] And I sneaked a glance back. He had caught up with the front of the parade just in time to turn the band down an intersection, and I was walking up the street all by myself. [Laughter] I cut across backyards and so forth and scrambled to get in front of the band about another block away.

Well, over the last decade, I think the American people didn't like where they were being led. Philanthropy and personal involvement were giving way to Federal programs and bureaucratic solutions. I remember as a Governor, one of the nearby States had a most successful -- in its leading city -- program for preventing dropouts in high school. And then the Government came along with a program, and its first task was it just simply did away with that very successful private program in that nearby city.

Right from the start, I think one of the major goals of our administration has been to reinvigorate the American spirit of neighbor helping neighbor. We made encouraging private sector initiatives part of our agenda at the White House.

And wherever I speak, I try to bolster local campaigns and give a well-earned pat on the back to some great Americans. And of the accomplishments of this administration, one of which I am most proud is the success that we've had in this area. Over these last 6 years we've witnessed an outpouring of charitable giving, voluntarism, and community spirit that was beyond our wildest expectations.

The figures are in for the period from 1980 through 1985. Total charitable giving in that period increased by 82 percent. The figures for last year, 1985, which are the latest statistics, show giving was at an all-time high, almost $80 billion, exceeding the 1984 record high by almost $6 billion. And during a time of low inflation, these are figures that indicate tangible change for the better going on in our society. Furthermore, people are donating their time.

I'm very pleased that 10 days from now this subject will be discussed at an international conference in Paris, France, which my Board of Advisors on Private Sector Initiatives is hosting. They, from abroad, brought it up. They want to find out what it is and how we do it. Paris is a fitting place for the meeting because it was a young Frenchman named Alexis de Tocqueville who first noted this laudable part of the American character when he toured our country back in the 1830's. And now, I know what some of you are thinking. I didn't point this out to de Tocqueville. [Laughter] He recorded this all on his own. [Laughter] But clearly, it's something that Americans have always been proud about, and this conference will give us a chance to share our experience with the rest of the world.

Tomorrow marks National Philanthropy Day. For the first time in our nation's history, a day has been specifically designated to pay tribute to this fine American tradition. Philanthropy, as you know, is defined as an affection for mankind. Well, I think this benevolence flows from human freedom. It's when people are helping one another, not because they're taxed or coerced into it, but because they want to, that concern for one's fellow man becomes part of a nation's soul. And, also, from freedom flows a desire for peace.

I was trying to capture that last night when I addressed the Nation about some of the issues surrounding our dealings with the Government of Iran. Our relations with the Islamic Republic of Iran have been almost nonexistent for these last 7 years. And during this time there's been turmoil in the Middle East and an incredibly destructive war between Iran and Iraq, a tragedy of monumental proportions. All the speculation in the media notwithstanding, our dealings with Iranian officials have been aimed at bridging the rivers of animosity and hostility that separate our countries and at using our influence to bring a just peace to the region. That the Iranians have used their influence to help free American hostages in Lebanon has been a bonus that has come with the opening of these channels of communication, an encouraging first step and a show of good faith on the part of the Iranian officials. Now that the veil of secrecy has been lifted, the unfounded rumors laid to rest, I think most Americans will approve of our efforts to better relations between our countries and rejoice that it has resulted in the freeing of some of our fellow citizens who had been hostages.

All that has been accomplished can be laid to courageous diplomacy. We have, and will continue, to pursue every possible option to remove the causes of terrorism. In short, we will talk when talking is productive, and we'll be firm when firmness is required. But when terrorism does occur, we will act decisively against those who are responsible. There has not been, and will not be, any ransom for hostages. Let there be no doubt the United States does not pay tribute to terrorists. So, with that point made, I want to thank all of you for being here today and for all that you've done to make this a better country and a better world. I know that Ann Ascher of my Private Sector Initiatives Board of Advisors is ready to carry on this discussion, so I'll do what the little girl in her letter to me said after she told me all the things I should do after I was elected President, and then added a P.S. and says: Now, get over to the Oval Office and go to work.

The literal meaning of ``philanthropy'' is ``affection for mankind.'' Throughout our history, we Americans have displayed this trait through our generous charitable giving and our spirit of neighbor helping neighbor. We help each other, and we reach out to help people all over the world. Our tradition of voluntarism embodies a great deal of caring, initiative, and ingenuity in solving problems and improving our communities. It is one of our greatest strengths as a people.

The record of our private sector giving is clear. Our country has more than 800,000 nonprofit philanthropic organizations. They employ more than 10 million people, of whom 4.5 million are volunteers. In 1985 alone, individual Americans, corporations, and foundations contributed almost $80 billion for the charitable work of these organizations, an increase of nearly 9 percent over the previous year's generous total. These efforts are augmented by the volunteer work of nearly half of all teenage and adult Americans; in 1985, 89 million of us each volunteered an average of 3.5 hours every week to help worthy causes.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this fourteenth day of November, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

In addition to these actions, we have informed U.S. oil companies that we consider their continued involvement in Syrian oil operations inappropriate under these circumstances. More vigorous procedures will be applied to Syrian visa applications. We also have revised an advisory statement on American travel in Syria to alert citizens to the potential for terrorist activity originating there. Finally, we are reducing the staff of our Embassy in Damascus and no high-level visits between the U.S. and Syria will take place.

These measures are intended to convince the Syrian Government that state support of terrorism will not be tolerated by the civilized world. We will continue to closely monitor the stituation and take additional steps as necessary. As long as Syria does not stop terrorism launched from its own territory, or areas of Lebanon under its effective control, the security of all states in the region is jeopardized.

Syrian-supported terrorism has introduced an unpredictable element of instability in the region and risks the danger of open violence there. Syria can play an important role in a key region of the world, but it cannot expect to be accepted as a responsible power or treated as one as long as it continues to use terrorism as an instrument of its foreign policy.

My approval today of S. 991 is not to be construed as my acquiescence in section 405(b) of the bill, which purports to terminate the terms of office of United States Commissioners on the Great Lakes Fishery Commission, as of the date of enactment of the bill, permitting them to serve for a period not in excess of 60 days, pending new appointments made under the provisions of the bill.

I am today signing S. 1744, an omnibus health measure, with mixed feelings. On the one hand, I warmly endorse provisions of this legislation permitting the export of unapproved drugs and biologicals under certain conditions and repealing the Federal health planning authorities. These are changes in the law my administration has long sought. On the other hand, I have serious reservations about the portion of the bill that would establish a Federal vaccine injury compensation program. The administration has also objected to other portions that create a new program of State mental health planning grants and enact superfluous new authorities such as that for Alzheimer's disease research, education, and information dissemination activities.

The centerpiece of S. 1744 is title I, which allows the export of drugs and biologicals awaiting approval in the United States to foreign nations in which their use is allowed. I cannot emphasize too strongly the positive effects of this provision. It will increase the competitiveness of the American pharmaceutical industry abroad, create jobs, foster biotechnology, and aid other nations. I commend the Congress for its fine work in developing and passing this measure. The provisions of this well-crafted legislation strike an appropriate balance between permitting drug exports to countries that have adequate processes for making their own approval decisions, while at the same time reserving to the Secretary of Health and Human Services sufficient authority to protect the public health in the United States.

It is also with great pleasure that I can finally lay to rest the Federal health planning authorities. I have sought their repeal since I assumed office. These authorities, while perhaps well intentioned when they were enacted in the 1970's, have only served to insert the Federal Government into a process that is best reserved to the marketplace. Health planning has proved to be a process that was costly to the Federal Government, in the last analysis without benefit, and even detrimental to the rational allocation of economic resources for health care.

As noted, however, I do have serious reservations about title III of S. 1744, which creates the framework for a vaccine injury compensation program and a national vaccine program. Title III would establish a court-administered program to compensate persons who suffer an injury as a result of receiving a childhood vaccination. Although the goal of compensating those persons is a worthy one, the program that would be established by title III has serious deficiencies.

The administration has been greatly concerned for some time that unpredictable tort liability has caused many vaccine manufacturers to abandon production of childhood vaccines. Last year we proposed legislation to address the liability concerns underlying this serious problem so that vaccine manufacturers can produce these vital vaccines without jeopardizing the viability of their companies. Title III addresses only the worthy purpose of compensating persons who may have been injured by a childhood vaccination. Even in this regard, however, it suffers from substantial deficiencies. For example, under this title there continues to be the opportunity for very substantial and inequitable differences in liability judgments awarded similarly situated plaintiffs. Another serious deficiency of title III is that it would create a program administered not by the executive branch, but by the Federal judiciary.

A major factor in my decision to approve S. 1744 despite the serious deficiencies in title III is that the bill provides that the vaccine compensation program established in that title will not be effective until a separate measure funding the program is enacted. This provision offers the opportunity to ensure that any funding measure enacted by the next Congress to implement the compensation feature of title III will not call for any part of the cost to be borne by the Federal taxpayer, and will also include certain key corrective program changes addressing the problems I have noted. In this regard, title III should be modified to ensure that childhood vaccines will be available to all American children. Second, there should be an acceptable resolution to the separation of powers concerns raised by the bill, resulting in a structure compatible with the inherent responsibilities of the executive and the judiciary in the administration of entitlement programs. Third, any acceptable measure to implement a vaccine compensation program should structure the program so that no funding will be provided from the Treasury of the United States.

In addition to my concerns regarding title III, I also have reservations about titles IV and V of S. 1744. Title IV, which is concerned with certain aspects of medical malpractice, has been modified and improved substantially from earlier versions. Nevertheless, I am concerned that the provisions of this title may increase anticompetitive behavior among physicians, raise the cost of health care, and reduce its quality. At my request, Secretary of Health and Human Services Bowen has established a task force that is examining the whole range of issues related to medical malpractice, and I look forward to his additional recommendations early next year.

V requires States to develop and implement comprehensive mental health services plans. States that do not submit such plans or fail to implement such plans would not be eligible to receive funding under the Alcohol, Drug Abuse, and Mental Health Services Block Grant. These provisions not only intrude into traditional State responsibilities and prerogatives concerning health care regulation but also undermine States' flexibility regarding the provision of specified health care services. The provisions are also unnecessary since the Public Health Service Act already permits States to use block grant funds to prepare comprehensive mental health services plans.

I am signing today H.R. 5363, a bill to amend the interest provisions of the Declaration of Taking Act. This legislation amends the interest provisions of the Declaration of Taking Act by substituting for the 6 percent per annum simple interest provided therein, a rate of interest based on the yield rates of 1-year Treasury bills, compounded annually. The bill, which authorizes Federal acquisition of real property for public use, provides for payment of interest by the United States when there has been a delay between acquisition and payment of just compensation.

This administration proposed this amendment to remedy a number of problems flowing from the courts' perception in recent years that the 6-percent simple interest rate was not a fair and appropriate rate. The courts have come to interpret the 6-percent rate as a floor, but there has not been agreement as to what is an appropriate interest rate or what securities should be examined to determine the interest rate. Consequently, these issues are being litigated on a case-by-case, court-by-court, basis -- with considerable disparity in result. The interest rate established by this amendment is a fair and reasonable one. Unlike the 6-percent rate, which remained fixed, notwithstanding fluctuations in market interest rates, the rate established by the amendment is a fluctuating rate reflecting the upward and downward movement of interest rates generally. And the interest is compounded annually. In addition, establishment of this uniform rate applicable in all courts in all cases covered by the bill will avoid discrimination among property owners and will benefit the parties and the courts by eliminating the need to litigate in order to secure a fair and appropriate rate of interest.

In signing this legislation, I wish to express the following views concerning its interpretation. Although I am signing this bill, I am very troubled by the inclusion of an unrelated, last-minute amendment to the Bankruptcy Code. The Congress' decision to link such provisions to otherwise desirable and useful legislation is but one example of the highly objectionable practice of combining unrelated legislation in a single bill. This practice, at a minimum, violates the spirit of the Constitution by restricting the President's veto power. Under the Constitution, the Congress is authorized to establish ``uniform Laws on the subject of Bankruptcies throughout the United States'' (U.S.C. Const. art. I, sec. 8, cl. 4). Section 2 of the bill requires that bankruptcy trustees in specified cases continue to pay certain benefits to retired former employees, and subsection (b)(3) identifies such a case by reference to the circumstances of its bankruptcy proceedings. This amounts to a private bankruptcy law, which is beyond the Congress' constitutional authority to enact, and the provision is accordingly without force or effect. I am advised by the Attorney General that, because of the unconstitutional nature of this provision, it should not be defended.

This legislation would authorize appropriations for 1987 for the National Aeronautics and Space Administration (NASA); authorize appropriations for the Office of Commercial Space Transportation in the Department of Transportation; establish a National Space Council in the Executive Office of the President to advise me on space-related matters; make numerous other amendments involving the Space Shuttle; amend the Land Remote-Sensing Commercialization Act in various respects; and authorize appropriations for a variety of programs of the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration in the Department of Commerce.

The establishment of a National Space Council in the Executive Office of the President would constitute unacceptable interference with my discretion and flexibility in organizing and managing the Executive Office as I consider appropriate. Besides creating additional and unnecessary bureaucracy, the National Space Council would duplicate the functions of the interagency bodies -- the Senior Interagency Group (Space), the Interagency Group (Space), and the Economic Policy Council -- that already coordinate the development and implementation of space policy. Because the proposed National Space Council would unnecessarily limit my authority to organize and manage the Executive Office while offering nothing by way of improvement in space policymaking, I am compelled to reject it.

I find two other provisions of H.R. 5495 troublesome. First, by mandating certain space shuttle launch priorities, the bill does not adequately recognize the importance the Administration places on the development of a commercial space launch industry or my specific decision to allow NASA to launch certain foreign payloads. Second, section 111 of H.R. 5495 would impose a ``buy America'' restriction on certain NASA procurement activities, in violation of the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade Agreement on Government Procurement. Enactment of this proposal could subject the United States to significant retaliation by other countries.

Shultz met with President Kyprianou on September 23 in New York. State Department officials met with Mr. Denktash during his September visit to the United States. In those meetings, American officials reiterated support for the Secretary General's good offices mission and urged the Cypriot leaders to cooperate with his continuing efforts.

I have signed into law S. 2638, the National Defense Authorization Act for Fiscal Year 1987. I am both pleased and disappointed with this act. I am pleased that it supports a defense program that is consistent with the dollar level provided in the congressional budget resolution for fiscal year 1987. I am disappointed, however, that the funding levels proposed in the congressional budget resolutions for the past 3 years have decreased continually and that even those lower levels have not been fully appropriated.

As a result, some of our significant accomplishments over the past few years in rebuilding America's military strength may have been put in jeopardy. Two consecutive years of real decline in defense budgets will widen the gap between our military capabilities and our national security requirements. The past erratic patterns of funding for our national defense that we have sought to avoid are again a reality, resulting in program stretchouts, increased acquisition costs, and instability in defense planning. I intend to work closely with the new Congress to enact a 2-year defense program for fiscal years 1988 and 1989, as required by current law. I believe that this 2-year budgeting initiative will lead to the stability so necessary to proper management of our defense requirements.

I am also extremely disappointed that the Congress saw the need to legislate the reorganization of the Special Operations Forces, particularly in mandating the creation of a unified command, which has heretofore been the exclusive prerogative of the President as Commander in Chief.

With regard to arms control, this act includes a nonbinding sense of the Congress provision concerning continued United States compliance with certain provisions of SALT II. In addition, it includes a sense of the Congress statement that it is not in the national interest of the United States to continue compliance with an agreement the Soviet Union has clearly violated.

In accordance with international law, and specifically with regard to SALT II, the United States cannot accept the principle that the Soviet Union is free to select which provisions of an agreement it will adhere to and which ones it will violate. I wish to reaffirm that, as the United States concentrates on achieving dramatic reductions in United States and Soviet nuclear arsenals at Geneva, we will continue to exercise utmost restraint even as we undertake the appropriate, proportionate responses required by Soviet actions.

In addition, there are other features of the act that trouble me. Sections 921(d) and 1207 of the act require the Department of Defense to make efforts to expand participation in the procurement process by small business concerns owned and controlled by socially and economically disadvantaged individuals and to establish a contracting goal for such concerns and for historically black colleges and universities and certain minority institutions. I have signed this act on the understanding that those objectives will be pursued in a race-neutral manner, consistent with constitutional standards. These standards require that any implementation of these provisions be premised on findings of actual discrimination in the granting of defense contracts and be narrowly tailored to remedy such discrimination. Thus, the Secretary's authority under the act must be read with constitutional requirements in mind.

State or the Secretary of Energy has or is entitled to have, with the exception of certain intradepartmental communications. I must consider this section to be advisory, since if it were construed otherwise, it would intrude on my constitutional responsibilities to direct and supervise officers of the executive branch and to control the dissemination of sensitive national security information. The Secretary of Defense has certain statutory responsibilities with respect to nuclear proliferation that would be served by his receipt of appropriate nonproliferation information. The sharing of appropriate information on nuclear nonproliferation will be resolved through the normal interagency process in the executive branch.

Education Foundation to award scholarships and fellowships to eligible persons for study in the fields of science and mathematics. I welcome the participation of Members of the House and Senate, who will constitute 4 of the 13 members of the Board of Trustees of the Foundation. However, the doctrine of separation of powers necessarily restricts their participation on the Board to ceremonial or advisory functions, rather than matters involving administration, which may only be performed by executive officers. Moreover, under the Incompatibility Clause of the Constitution, any Member of Congress appointed to serve on the Board of Trustees may serve only in a ceremonial or advisory capacity.

Saturday I spoke to you about the congressional budget process, how it had completely broken down and was in urgent need of reform. As I said then, there are many in Congress, on both sides of the aisle, who agree that something must be done, and done now, to prevent this out-of-control budget process from further threatening the economic well-being of our nation. Well, this week I want to talk about how a similar bipartisan consensus is forming in Congress around many other issues -- both domestic and international -- holding out the hope of significant progress in the months ahead. So, let's take a moment to look at our broader agenda and see just where we stand.

One of the most troubling issues facing our country is drugs. But it's a problem that, working together, I know we can lick. I must say, I couldn't have been more heartened than during this fall's campaign. Wherever I went, the rallies were thronged with young people. So, before I got into the substance of my speech, I'd usually start off with a message to them from Nancy. I would say, ``When it comes to drugs, please -- for yourselves, for your families, for your future, and for your country -- just say no.'' And it was a marvelous thing. Almost all the time, by the time I got to the end, those hundreds of young people were on their feet calling out loudly along with me, ``Just say no!'' America is united today as never before in its recognition that illegal drugs are evil -- pure and simple -- a threat to our children and our nation that simply cannot be tolerated.

I'm glad to say that both parties in Congress were able to cooperate and act quickly in confronting this problem. While we'd hoped that the final drug bill would include stiffer penalties -- including the death penalty -- for the pushers who prey upon our nation's youth, this bill still represents a major step forward, including stiffer law enforcement and improved efforts at antidrug education and treatment.

Last month I signed a bill that will give us the most modern tax code and the lowest marginal individual tax rates of any major industrialized country. It will make America more productive, more competitive abroad, and more prosperous at home.

Eighty percent of the American people will pay a top Federal income tax rate of only 15 percent or less. Families will get a long overdue tax break, and millions of poor will be dropped from the tax rolls altogether. It's no exaggeration when I call tax reform simultaneously the best jobs creation bill, the best antipoverty legislation, and the best profamily legislation the U.S. Congress has ever produced. Having come so far, we cannot let ourselves slide back into the past. We must strengthen the consensus that tax hikes on the American people are simply out of the question. It is Congress's responsibility to cut the Federal budget and leave the family budget alone.

A third area of cooperation -- in many ways the most important -- has been on the grave threat of Communist subversion in our hemisphere. This year many Senators and Congressmen on both sides of the aisle joined us in supporting military assistance to the brave freedom fighters in Nicaragua. I believe we're beginning to see the recreation of the fundamental bipartisan consensus on national security issues that guided this nation through much of the postwar era. Nothing could be more important than this: When it comes to America's national security, politics must stop at the water's edge. America must remain united in spirit and strong in purpose. We must resist together the threat to our security and freedom posed by an aggressive, Soviet-sponsored regime on the American mainland.

I'm looking forward to working with the 100th Congress. Together, there is much we can accomplish. At the same time, let me make it clear that America cannot retreat from its basic commitments, and where I see backsliding, I will not hesitate to use my constitutional veto power to keep America strong and secure and moving forward. My hope is that in the 100th Congress we will strengthen the consensus we have achieved on these issues of progrowth tax cuts, spending reductions, and protecting our national security in Central America. And I hope we can make up for lost time in other areas, especially the urgent task of budget reform, so we can keep America moving forward on the track of peace, progress, and prosperity.

In signing this bill, I have grave doubts as to the constitutionality of the provision in section 10 which would authorize the Governors of Washington and Oregon and the State-appointed Columbia River Gorge Commission to disapprove Federal condemnation actions. The Federal Government may not constitutionally be bound by such State action taken pursuant to Federal law. To avoid this unconstitutional interpretation, I am signing this bill with the understanding that State disapproval of a Federal condemnation action under this legislation will not operate as a veto, but will be merely advisory. Upon receipt of a State notice of disapproval, the Federal Government will decide whether to proceed with its condemnation action. If it is not possible to construe the State disapproval authority in section 10 of the bill as advisory, the severability clause in section 18 of the bill nevertheless enables me to approve the legislation. The severability clause states that the invalidation of one portion of the bill will not affect the validity of the remainder of the bill. Thus if it is not possible to interpret section 10 in a constitutionally acceptable fashion, the severability clause will operate to keep the remainder of the legislation in force despite invalidation of the unconstitutional provision.

In addition, I am concerned that H.R. 5705 could lead to undue Federal intervention in local land use decisions. I believe that the regulation of private land use is generally not a responsibility of the Federal Government.

I am signing this bill because of the far-reaching support in both States for a solution to the longstanding problems related to management of the Columbia River Gorge. Because of that strong support, I urge the States to establish the Commission at the earliest possible date so that the Commission can make the land use decisions that are properly the function of State and local governments. In that spirit, I am also directing the Secretary of Agriculture to implement this legislation in a manner that will minimize, to the extent permitted by law, Federal intervention in such decisions.

I have approved H.R. 5730, the Haida Land Exchange Act of 1986, which will authorize a land purchase and transfer agreement between the United States and the Haida Village Native Corporation in Alaska. The Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act (ANCSA) was intended to provide full and final compensation to Alaska natives for the extinguishment of their land claims. It authorized the conveyance of 44 million acres of public land and the payment of almost $1 billion to regional and village native corporations in which all natives received shares. The corporate mechanism was chosen as a means of preventing the kind of Federal interference in Alaska native affairs that has often been blamed for impeding economic development and self-determination on Indian reservations in the lower 48 States. The establishment of a Federal fiduciary responsibility for assets conveyed to Alaska native corporations was rejected with the intent of permitting Alaska natives to control their own destiny. In my view, this policy choice, made after extensive study and careful deliberation by the Congress, was a wise one. I continue to support this general approach.

The Haida corporation is the only native corporation established under ANCSA that, because of the unusual circumstances of geography, was unable to select lands to satisfy its entitlement under ANCSA from outside its core townships. This unique situation contributed to the corporation's difficulties and cannot be viewed as a precedent for any native corporation that may seek special Federal relief in the future. For these reasons, I have approved this act. Finally, I will oppose any future efforts to provide additional compensation to Alaska natives for the extinguishment of their land claims.

Diabetes afflicts perhaps one in twenty Americans and is one of the leading causes of death in our Nation. Every year, diabetes takes more than 35,000 lives and contributes to the loss of another 95,000. Diabetes can cause complications such as blindness, heart or kidney disease, strokes, birth defects, and lower life expectancy. This disease also imposes a personal burden on those affected with it and on their families. Day-to-day treatment is a lifelong responsibility for those who have diabetes.

Despite diabetes' serious consequences, almost half of those with the disease are not aware they have it. Through greater public awareness of the frequency and the dangers of diabetes, we may reduce the incidence of complications from it -- and even prevent most cases of noninsulin-dependent diabetes.

Thanks to advances in research in recent years, we understand more than ever before about diabetes and its mechanisms. This knowledge is providing the basis for trials of new diagnostic techniques and new treatments.

Through the shared dedication of the Federal government and of private organizations and individuals, we can continue to make progress in research and education efforts aimed at controlling and one day curing this disease. The goal of eliminating diabetes as a public health threat is an essential task and a realizable one.

To increase public awareness about the dangers of diabetes and the need for continued research and education efforts, the Congress, by Public Law 99 - 460, has designated the month of November 1986 as ``National Diabetes Month'' and authorized and requested the President to issue a proclamation in observance of this month.

America, do hereby proclaim the month of November 1986 as National Diabetes Month. I call upon all government agencies and the people of the United States to observe this month with appropriate programs and activities.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this seventeenth day of November, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

Education is a lifelong process. Local support for education helps to promote programs for learners of all ages, backgrounds, and needs and encourages full use of school facilities. As each community draws upon its own resources, new opportunities are created, helping many individuals achieve their goals and aspirations. These are the opportunities that have always sustained the freedoms and responsibilities so important to all Americans.

Public education is a community enterprise, and everyone in the community has a stake in the education of adults as well as children. Local citizen involvement is critical in deciding how the financial and educational resources of the community should be used. Many communities are making valuable efforts to promote the use of community resources in schools and colleges, citizen involvement in educational decision-making, the use of community resources to provide educational opportunities for learners of all ages and educational backgrounds, and interagency cooperation to assure effective use of limited resources.

November 18, 1986, as National Community Education Day. I invite State and local officials, educators, parents, students, and all Americans to participate in activities that recognize and show appreciation for what community resources are doing for education.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this eighteenth day of November, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

And with those enthusiasms, Bill has made life for all of us a lot more fun. And he's done something else: He's changed the course of history. Beginning at a time when it was out of fashion to do so, he reaffirmed the enduring values of our civilization. I can't think of anyone whose life stands as a better example of what the Ethics and Public Policy Center itself stands for or who is a more fitting recipient of this year's Shelby Cullom Davis Award. Now, Bill, this is the moment I'm supposed to say congratulations. But I think on behalf of all those who love freedom, I'd rather just say thanks.

Tonight we're honoring both Bill and the 10th anniversary of the Ethics and Public Policy Center. It seems hard to believe that it's been only 10 years since Ernest Lefever sent out his prospectus for the center, a center that was to focus on the political and international issues of our time in what should have been an ordinary, but was in fact a revolutionary, way. Yes, this wasn't to be just another clever think tank, looking at -- to use a term that's received too much currency in this age -- value-neutral strategies. No, it was to examine the issues of today in light of timeless moral principles, principles rooted in the Judeo-Christian ethic.

Weaver once reminded us that ideas have consequences. In his prospectus, Ernie Lefever said he would establish an institution for reminding us that values have consequences. No wonder that Bill Buckley took a few moments on a January day one decade ago to write Ernie and tell him that his proposal, as Bill said, ``cheers me as much as any document that I have seen in months and months.'' And no wonder that so many champions of freedom like Shelby Cullom Davis have come to support the center since. Ernie, as you know, I've been doing a little campaigning lately.

Today, not just America but the world needs the center and its message that the central issue of our times, the question on which the future not just of our blessed nation but of all mankind turns, yes, the issue of ethics in public policy and, yes, the issue of our vision of man and the moral order, yes, the issue of values. Here in the United States a few years back, it seemed that too many had lost all sight of that enduring truth. And with no values to defend, they spoke as if nothing in this great nation were worth defending. Jeane Kirkpatrick called them the Blame America First crowd, and they had their day. But, ladies and gentlemen, I'm happy to report to you tonight that that day has passed. In the last 2 years, Congress -- including the Democratically controlled House of Representatives -- has enacted aid to freedom fighters on three continents. It has supported -- and the Nation has rallied around -- striking hard in retaliation against terrorism by Qadhafi's Libya, just as both rallied behind our mission in Grenada. And in just the last few months, support for our dream of a strategic defense against nuclear missiles has grown to embrace almost the entire Nation.

And in the campaign we've just finished, hardly a candidate in the other party dared to raise the Blame America First flag again. They'd all started to speak the way only we used to. And, no, that's not a criticism; I'm all for it. I hope it'll someday be said that one of the enduring legacies of our administration was that in these years America at last put in the past the divisions of more than a decade ago and united in a new bipartisan consensus on foreign policy. If there's one thing all Americans can agree on, it's that politics should stop at the water's edge. Like the old consensus, this new one is not based on political strategy or special interest, but on the common values that we all share as Americans and that all free people share. We rediscovered those values in these last few years, and now all the democratic world is rediscovering them as well.

We're here tonight to discuss the future of that democratic world, of the West and the Western alliance. And let me begin by repeating something I said 4 years ago in London when I told the British Parliament that ``the ultimate determinant in the struggle that is now going on in this world will not be bombs and rockets, but a test of wills and ideas, a trial of spiritual resolve, the values we hold, the beliefs we cherish, the ideals to which we are dedicated.'' Yes, the alliance and the conflict between it and the Soviet Union can have no meaning, no justification, no reason at all, if we forget that what we are in is fundamentally a moral and ethical conflict. America and the other democracies did not seek this conflict. We're a peaceful people, and so are our allies. We wish no nation or people anything but the best. But we face today, as we have for 40 years, a challenge that we cannot turn away from, a challenge to our Judeo-Christian ethic, to our belief that man is a creature of God and so precious in himself.

We must never let it be forgotten that what we're fighting for, on our side, is not territory or privilege, but, in Churchill's words, ``the safety and welfare, the freedom and progress, of all the homes and families of all the men and women in all the lands.'' Well, let's not forget that, either: not some lands, not just our lands -- all lands. We have no choice about the nature of the conflict, only about whether or not we recognize its nature. Thirty years ago this month Soviet troops swept into Budapest to snuff out the light of freedom in Hungary. With some of the most advanced tanks, troops, and guns in the world, they crushed an uprising of ordinary people, killing or wounding more than 30,000 of the brave as they did.

Well, some said at the time that there would be no next victims if we did not interfere. They said that it was not in our interest to hear this cry from out of the totalitarian night. But as we look back now over three decades of Soviet adventurism around the world, can anyone truly say it was in fact in our interest to stand by, hands folded, at the dying of the light in Hungary? And would it be today in our interest to stand by and watch the dying of the light in Afghanistan, the dying of the light in Angola, the dying of the light in Nicaragua? I say no. Not then. Not now. Not ever. Yes, it is in our interest to stand with those who would take arms against the sea of darkness. It is in our interest to stand with those who would light even a candle in the night of oppression. It is in our interest not simply because of what the Soviets are, but because of what we, the free peoples of the world, are.

World War II. There had been many speakers and entertainers, and many of them declared that we would win the war because God was on our side. And then a young man of few words but much wisdom was introduced. Madison Square Garden was well known to him.

Private Joe Louis, United States Army. He stepped up to the microphone, spoke one simple line, and brought the crowd roaring to its feet. He said, ``We will win, because we're on God's side.'' Well, like that crowd so long ago, we Americans today are most united and most determined when we're standing for the values of freedom and dignity not simply for ourselves, but for all who yearn to have them, when we're reaffirming those values that gave birth to our nation and to all democracies, when we're partners in extending the reach of freedom.

In these last 6 years, from El Salvador to the Philippines to Grenada, we have once again become true to our heritage of helping to hold out freedom's hand. And in our talks with the Soviet Union, we have put aside the old, worn doctrine that relations between our countries have nothing to do with Soviet behavior throughout the world or with the Soviet treatment of its own peoples at home.

We have said that greater respect for human rights in the Soviet Union is a fundamental condition of true peace between us, and that arms negotiations that reduce our arsenals but do nothing about the reasons they were built in the first place have little chance for lasting success. We have reaffirmed a rule as timeless as common sense: Nations do not have disagreements because they're armed; they are armed because they have disagreements.

This reclaiming of old values is why America is more united today than in two decades. It is why we're seeing once again a bipartisan consensus emerge on foreign policy. It's why our alliance is stronger today than it's been in many years. And it's why you might notice that, every now and then, Soviet leaders look nervously over their shoulders. You may remember that I had a little chat with Mr. Gorbachev a few weeks back. During it he told me that when I talk about how we Americans look forward to the day when the world knows the blessings of liberty -- he told me the Soviets take this as a kind of threat. And, of course, there's really only one answer to that: It's no threat.

We call it the American dream. And, yes, we do think it's important. And, yes, we do believe that someday it will belong to every man, woman, and child on Earth. And let me say to you tonight: We must never let the need to talk with the Soviets lead us to forget that dream or our duty to it. And we must never forget, either, that this very dream, our Judeo-Christian ethic and all it means, is not only our reason for meeting the Soviet challenge but also our great advantage.

In getting ready for my meetings with Mr. Gorbachev, I asked many experts what role Communist ideology plays in the Soviet Union today. Some told me it's irrelevant because nobody believes it anymore. After all, it failed to produce not only freedom but also food. Others told me that though no one believes it, everyone accepts it, because now, after almost 70 years, no one knows any better or has a choice, and everyone knows who has the guns. And still others said that, whatever people think of it, it's put the Soviets in an ideological bind that will thwart their participation in the technological revolution that -- with America in the lead -- is now sweeping the world.

Well, that revolution is really a revolution of hope that will launch the West into a new age of productivity, prosperity, and growth; an age as far advanced over our own as the Industrial Age was over the preindustrial, an age in which statism and totalitarianism are left forever behind. And that's why it's so important for all of us here tonight to remember that this revolution of hope, this new position of strength for the West, is the backdrop for the talks we've been having with the Soviets. And that's why we believe that we made more progress in our meeting in Iceland in 2 days than our negotiators in Geneva made in the last 2 years. Well, all of our proposals are still on the table, and we see no reason that our negotiating teams shouldn't pick up where we left off. The Soviets have sent signals that they maybe believe this, too.

Well, this past weekend, as you know, I met with Prime Minister Thatcher. We agreed on priorities for arms reduction talks: 50-percent reductions in strategic offensive weapons, sweeping reductions in intermediate-range missiles, a ban on chemical weapons, addressing conventional force imbalances. America will go into those talks with the support of our allies and, I hope, the support of Congress as well. This should be a pillar of our new bipartisan consensus: We will not give away in Washington what we're negotiating over in Geneva. The hopes of too many ride with us to do that.

My friends, it's written that three things abide: faith, hope, and love. Faith, hope, and love are lamps that illuminate our civilization. And may I say that I believe that their light, particularly the light of hope, is the greatest gift we can offer to those who live in the darkness of oppression. When we give aid to freedom fighters around the world, we give hope to the oppressed, and we say that people, not iron laws, shape history. When we say that arms reduction and human rights must be talked about together, we give hope to the oppressed that freedom is still a living dream. And, yes, when we keep our pledge to go forward with research on our strategic defense against nuclear missiles, we give hope to all the world that even the night of nuclear terror may some day pass from this Earth. But most of all, when we proclaim our faith in God and the dignity of man, our love of freedom, and our fidelity to our Judeo-Christian values, when we do all this, we give hope to every freedom-loving soul that truth is strong and that the hollow shell of totalitarianism may one day crack and let its people go.

I keep something around me, something at my desk, that reminds me of how much millions depend on the hope we give. It is a letter, a full handwritten letter, and I treasure it very much. It's written on a slip of paper only 4 inches long and \5/8\ -- or 4 inches wide, I should say, and \5/8\ of an inch in height. But on that is penned a message which could only be read or written under a strong magnifying glass. It has 47 words plus the salutation, addressed to me. And in my case, it had to be translated, because it was written in Russian. That tiny letter then has 10 names affixed in that little \5/8\-inch strip. It was smuggled out of a labor camp in the Soviet Union. It was signed by 10 women who have gone through hunger strikes in their desire for freedom. It was accompanied by a 4-inch square paper chart -- the same fine small writing -- the chart of the hunger strikes of the 10 women who from August 1983 through 1984 endured those hunger strikes. The reason they wrote me and got it smuggled out was to tell me that we in the United States represented to them the hope that one day there would be freedom throughout the world. I'm going to keep that letter as long as I live. I can never mention aloud -- the situation still is -- the names of those 10 brave women -- because most of them are still in that prison camp, and we know what would happen to them.

But, my friends, that letter may have been addressed to me, but it wasn't written to me alone. It was written also to each of you, to all Americans, and to our allies as well. It was written in thanks to all those who've joined in our bipartisan crusade to make America stronger. And it was written in thanks to all of those who have returned us to our values and reminded us of what they mean in this world. At the National Review dinner last December, I closed my remarks by saying thanks to Bill Buckley for ``setting loose so much good in the world.'' But tonight, Bill, Ernie, Paul, Don, Jeane, and everyone, others far away, thank you, too. Thank you, God bless you all.

The President. Good evening. I have a few words here before I take your questions, some brief remarks. Eighteen months ago, as I said last Thursday, this administration began a secret initiative to the Islamic Republic of Iran. Our purposes were fourfold: to replace a relationship of total hostility with something better, to bring a negotiated end to the Iran-Iraq war, and to bring an end to terrorism and to effect the release of our hostages.

We knew this undertaking involved great risks, especially for our people and for the Iranian officials with whom we dealt. That's why the information was restricted to appropriate Cabinet officers and those officials with an absolute need to know. This undertaking was a matter of considerable debate within administration circles. Our policy objectives were never in dispute. There were differences on how best to proceed. The principal issue in contention was whether we should make isolated and limited exceptions to our arms embargo as a signal of our serious intent. Several top advisers opposed the sale of even a modest shipment of defensive weapons and spare parts to Iran. Others felt no progress could be made without this sale. I weighed their views. I considered the risks of failure and the rewards of success, and I decided to proceed. And the responsibility for the decision and the operation is mine and mine alone.

I understand this decision is deeply controversial and that some profoundly disagree with what was done. Even some who support our secret initiative believe it was a mistake to send any weapons to Iran. I understand and I respect those views, but I deeply believe in the correctness of my decision. I was convinced then and I am convinced now that while the risks were great, so, too, was the potential reward. Bringing Iran back into the community of responsible nations, ending its participation in political terror, bringing an end to that terrible war, and bringing our hostages home -- these are the causes that justify taking risks.

There were risks when we liberated Grenada, when we went into Lebanon, when we aided the Philippines, and when we acted against Libya. So, we'll continue our efforts. However, to eliminate the widespread but mistaken perception that we have been exchanging arms for hostages, I have directed that no further sales of arms of any kind be sent to Iran. I have further directed that all information relating to our initiative be provided to the appropriate Members of Congress. There may be some questions which for reasons of national security or to protect the safety of the hostages I will be unable to answer publicly. But again, all information will be provided to the appropriate Members of Congress.

The President. Well, Helen, let me take the last one first. I know some persist in saying that we traded Zakharov for Daniloff. We did not. We said that we would have no dealings with the Soviet Union, even on going to Iceland, until Daniloff was in our hands. But to bring it up to date on this, there was no deception intended by us. There was the knowledge that we were embarking on something that could be of great risk to the people we were talking to, great risk to our hostages. And, therefore, we had to have it limited to only the barest number of people that had to know. I was not breaking any law in doing that. It is provided for me to do that. At the same time, I have the right under the law to defer reporting to Congress, to the proper congressional committees, on an action, and defer it until such time as I believe it can safely be done with no risk to others.

And that's why I have ordered in this coming week the proper committees will be briefed on this. And there are still some parts of this that we cannot go public with, because it will bring to risk and danger people that are held and people that we have been negotiating with. We were not negotiating government to government. We were negotiating with certain individuals within that country.

The President. No, as I say, we are going to observe that embargo. And it's part of the same reason that, as I've said, we were doing this in the first place: And that is to see, among the other issues involved, if we can help bring about peace between those two countries, a peace without victory to either one or defeat and that will recognize the territorial integrity of both. And this is something that all of our allies are seeking also. But I think the people understand that sometimes you have to keep a secret in order to save human lives and to succeed in the mission, just as we went into Grenada without prior notice, because then we would have put to risk all of those men who were going to hit the beach.

The President. Mike, he has never suggested to me in our meetings that resignation. And in fact, he has made it plain that he will stay as long as I want him, and I want him. So, there's never been any discussion there. He knows that I want him to stay, and he has, in advance, said that he wants to. There's been no talk of resignation.

The President. No, there have been no conditions. As I say, we didn't discuss that. And as I've said now, there is no need to go further with this. The mission was served that made us waive temporarily that for that really minuscule amount of spare parts and defensive weapons.

Mr. President, you have stated flatly, and you stated flatly again tonight, that you did not trade weapons for hostages. And yet the record shows that every time an American hostage was released -- last September, this July, and again just this very month -- there had been a major shipment of arms just before that. Are we all to believe that was just a coincidence?

The President. Chris, the only thing I know about major shipments of arms -- as I've said, everything that we sold them could be put in one cargo plane, and there would be plenty of room left over. Now, if there were major shipments -- and we know this has been going on -- there have been other countries that have been dealing in arms with Iran. There have been also private merchants of such things that have been doing the same thing. Now, I've seen the stories about a Danish tramp steamer and Danish sailors union officials talking about their ships taking various supplies to Iran. I didn't know anything about that until I saw the press on it, because we certainly never had any contact with anything of the kind. And so, it's just that we did something for a particular mission. There was a risk entailed. And Iran held no hostages. Iran did not kidnap anyone, to our knowledge. And the fact that part of the operation was that we knew, however, that the kidnapers of our hostages did have some kind of relationship in which Iran could at times influence them -- not always -- but could influence them. And so three of our hostages came home.

The President. No, because I don't see where the kidnapers or the hostage-holders gained anything. They didn't get anything. They let the hostages go. Now, whatever is the pressure that brought that about, I'm just grateful to it for the fact that we got them.

Mr. President, when you had the arms embargo on, you were asking other nations, our allies particularly, to observe it -- publicly. But at the same time, privately, you concede you were authorizing a breaking of that embargo by the United States. How can you justify this duplicity?

The President. I don't think it was duplicity. And as I say, the so-called violation did not in any way alter the military balance between the two countries. But what we were aiming for, I think, made it worthwhile. And this was a waiver of our own embargo; the embargo still stays now and for the future. But the causes that I outlined here in my opening statement -- first of all, to try and establish a relationship with a country that is of great strategic importance to peace and everything else in the Middle East, at the same time, also, to strike a blow against terrorism, and to get our hostages back, as we did. And this particular thing was, we felt, necessary in order to make the contacts that we made and that could lead to better relations with us. And there was a fourth item, also, as I pointed out.

Sir, if I may, the polls show that a lot of American people just simply don't believe you. But the one thing that you've had going for you, more than anything else in your Presidency, your credibility, has been severely damaged.

Mr. President, you say that the equipment which was shipped didn't alter the military balance. Yet several things: We understand that there were 1,000 TOW antitank missiles shipped by the U.S. The U.S. apparently condoned shipments by Israel and other nations of other quantities of arms as an ancillary part of this deal -- not directly connected, but had to condone it, or the shipments could not have gone forward, sir. So, how can you say that it cannot alter the military balance? And how can you say, sir, that it didn't break the law, when the National Security Act of 1977 plainly talks about timely notification of Congress and also, sir, stipulates that if the national security required secrecy the President is still required to advise the leadership and the chairmen of the intelligence committees?

The President. Oh no, about the -- that it didn't -- no, that it didn't violate the -- or that did violate the law. No, as I've said, the President, believe it or not, does have the power if, in his belief, national security can be served to waive the provisions of that law as well as to defer the notification of the Congress on this.

The President. This is a purely defensive weapon. It is a shoulder-carried weapon. And we don't think that in this defensive thing -- we didn't add to any offensive power on the part of Iran. We know that Iraq has already announced that they would be willing to settle the conflict, as we've said, with no winners or losers. And the other parts happened to be spare parts for an antiaircraft Hawk battery. And, as I say, all of those weapons could be very easily carried in one mission.

We do understand that the Israelis sent a shipment in 1985, and there were also reports that it was the Israelis that contacted your administration and suggested that you make contact with Iran. Could you explain what the Israeli role was here?

The President. No, because we, as I say, have had nothing to do with other countries or their shipment of arms or doing what they're doing. And, no, as a matter of fact, the first ideas about the need to restore relations between Iran and the United States, or the Western World for that matter, actually began before our administration was here. But from the very first, if you look down the road at what could happen and perhaps a change of government there, that it was absolutely vital for the Western World and to the hopes for peace in the Middle East and all for us to be trying to establish this relationship. And we worked -- oh, it started about 18 months ago, really, as we began to find out some individuals that it might be possible for us to deal with and who also were looking at the probability of a further accident.

Can I follow up please, if I may, on that? The contacts that you're suggesting are with moderates in the Iranian Government and in the Iranian system. Barry Goldwater tonight said in his judgment there are no moderates in Iran. I don't mean to suggest that there may not be, but how did you know that you were reaching the moderates? And how do you define a moderate in that kind of a government?

The President. Well, again, you're asking questions that I cannot get into with regard to the answers. But believe me, we had information that led us to believe that there are factions within Iran, and many of them with an eye toward the fact that they think sooner rather than later there is going to be a change in the government there. And there is great dissatisfaction among the people in Iran.

Your chief arms negotiator, Max Kampelman, said that as a result of your meeting with Mr. Gorbachev in Iceland that there indeed were substantial results and agreements. But the leadership of the Soviet Union say that there were no results, nothing positive, and the area is widely scattered still. How do you propose, in the remainder of your term, to close the gap for an agreement?

The President. Well, Trudie, the thing is, about that situation, they are not widely scattered. All the agreements, or the apparent places where we agreed at Reykjavik, are on the table now with our arms negotiators in Geneva. And for the first time there was an agreement reached on the desirability of eliminating all strategic nuclear missiles in a 5-year period and then dealing with the intermediate-range missiles in Germany. And just before the meeting broke up was the first time that -- it had always been our purpose, and it was our purpose when we went there, to see if this -- these are the destabilizing weapons, these are the weapons that people in their mind can picture someone pushes a button and lot of places blow up. And we always thought that if we could make a start on those, the destabilizing missiles, and then we could work on to the other nuclear weapons -- bombs carried by airplanes and so forth. And we had gone there with the express purpose of seeing if we could arrive at some kind of a settlement on one or the other of these other two missile types. And it was just before the meeting broke up that for the first time they suggested that they were talking about all nuclear weapons, not just the others. Well, there was no time for us to discuss them -- this new force that was in there.

I think Mr. Kampelman was saying right -- that I just call to your attention that never in the history of the Soviet Union has a Soviet leader ever publicly proposed eliminating weapons they already have. And this Soviet leader has. He has talked actually of totally eliminating them. And so the only thing I can say to this is -- I know they are difficult to deal with -- but all I can say is they're still at the table in Geneva, and the proposals are still there. So, I continue to be optimistic.

I just want to follow up. Do you think you're going to see Mr. Gorbachev again during your term, or do you think he is thinking that he'll wait for the next President to negotiate an arms control agreement?

The President. Well, I have to believe there is reason for optimism, because he himself suggested the Iceland meeting as a forerunner to the summit that was supposed to take place in the United States. And all I can do is recall that when the Soviets, sometime ago, got up and walked out of the Geneva arms meetings, because we were installing medium-range -- the Pershings and the cruise missiles in Europe. And they walked out and said, ``That does it.'' Well, they came back.

Mr. President, going back over your answers tonight about the arms shipments and the numbers of them, are you telling us tonight that the only shipments with which we were involved were the one or two that followed your January 17th finding and that, whatever your aides have said on background or on the record, there were no other shipments with which the U.S. condoned?

Can I just follow up on that for a second, sir, because what is unclear to, I think, many people in the American public is why -- if you are saying tonight that there will be no further arms shipments to Iran -- why you won't cancel the January 17th intelligence finding so that you can put to rest any suggestion that you might again, without notification and in complete secrecy and perhaps with the objection of some of your Cabinet members, continue to ship weapons if you think that it is necessary?

The President. We weren't giving them to the Ayatollah Khomeini. It's a strange situation. As I say, we were dealing with individuals, and we believe that those -- and some of those individuals are in government, in positions in government. But it was not a meeting officially of the United States head of state and the Iranian head of state. But these people, we believed, and their closeness to the Iran military was such that this was necessary to let them know, number one, that we were serious and sincere in our effort about good relations and also that they were dealing with the head of government over here, that this wasn't something coming out of some agency or bureau, that I was behind it.

The President. No, I said that -- at the time -- I said to them that there was something they could do to show their sincerity. And if they really meant it that they were not in favor of backing terrorists, they could begin by releasing our hostages. And as a matter of fact, I believe and have reason to believe that we would have had all five of them by this last weekend, had it not been for the attendant confusion that arose here in the reporting room.

The President. To our best information, the leak came from a person in government in Iran and not one of the people that we were dealing with, someone that would be more hostile to us. And that individual gave the story to the magazine, and the magazine then printed the story there in Beirut.

Mr. President, there has been an obvious change in policy towards Iran: from refusing to deal with a terrorist state to even sending weapons as a gesture of good will. Would you consider, in the name of the same geopolitical interest that you invoked with Iran, changing your policy towards Nicaragua?

I've answered that question, I think, more than once here -- that no, we still hold to our position, and Iran officially is still on our list of nations that have been supporting terrorism. But I'm talking about the people that we were doing business with, and they gave us indication and evidence that that policy was changing. And so, as I said, to give them more prestige and muscle there where they were, we made this sale.

The President. No, we have not thought of that, and we still believe very much in supporting the contras, because we believe in the contras' cause. The contras have made it plain that all they seek is to be able to put enough pressure on the Sandinista government for that government to negotiate with them and the people of Nicaragua for the kind of government that they altogether had promised when they were fighting the revolution against the Somoza dictatorship. And it was the Sandinistas who, as Communist groups usually do, simply, when the revolution was over, they did everything they could to get rid of their fellow revolutionaries, and they seized power and created a totalitarian Communist state.

Now, the Sandinista -- or the contras have never proposed overthrowing the government. They have repeatedly offered and said: ``We simply want to be able to negotiate and have a chance to have the government installed that we'd promised the Organization of American States we were fighting for.'' So, I think we continue to help them, but we believe that there is a value in maintaining relations. It gives us a listening post in Nicaragua.

Mr. President, there is a mood in Washington tonight of a President who is very much beleaguered, very much on the defensive. Why don't you seize the offensive by giving your Secretary of State a vote of confidence declaring that all future covert activities will have his support and by shaking up the National Security Council in such a way as to satisfy the concerns in Congress that it has been running a paramilitary operation out of the basement of the White House in defiance of the State Department and the Congress?

The President. The State Department -- or the Secretary of State was involved, the Director of the CIA was involved, in what we were doing and, as I said before, there are certain laws in which, for certain actions, I would not have been able to keep them a secret as they were. But these people you've mentioned have been involved -- do know what was going on. And I don't see that the action that you've suggested has called for it. But what you've disappointed me the most in is suggesting that I sound defensive up here. I've just been trying to answer all your questions as well as I can. And I don't feel that I have anything to defend about at all. With the circumstances the way they were, the decision I made I still believe was the correct decision, and I believe that we achieved some portion of our goals.

The President. No, and I don't see in any way how that could be, with the particular things that we were using. I don't see where the Ayatollah could be a logical target for an antiaircraft missile or even for a TOW missile for that matter.

Mr. President, you made an exception for the arms embargo when you thought it was in the U.S. interest to do so. Why shouldn't other nations ship weapons to Iran when they think it's in their interests?

The President. Well, I would like to see the indication as to how it could be in their interest. I know that there are other nations that feel as we do that the Western World should be trying to find an avenue to get Iran back where it once was -- and that is in the family of democratic nations and the family of nations that want peace in the Middle East and so forth.

How, Mr. President -- if I may follow up -- how does shipping weapons to Iran help bring them back into the community of nations? You've acknowledged that you were dealing with only a small portion of the Government?

No, sir, I thought I knew what a TOW was. I just wanted to ask you what would be wrong at this stage of the game, since everything seems to have gone wrong that could possibly go wrong, like the Murphy Law, the Reagan Law, the O'Leary Law, this week -- what would be wrong in saying that a mistake was made on a very high-risk gamble so that you can get on with the next 2 years?

The President. Because I don't think a mistake was made. It was a high-risk gamble, and it was a gamble that, as I've said, I believe the circumstances warranted. And I don't see that it has been a fiasco or a great failure of any kind. We still have those contacts. We still have made some ground. We got our hostages back -- three of them. And so, I think that what we did was right, and we're going to continue on this path.

This is a question that will not wait. It's cold weather out there, and the growing number of hungry and cold people who are homeless in all of our cities -- and these volunteers that you urge to take part in this and try to help have now made their surveys across the Nation.

They've come back and said we can't feed the hungry and take care of the homeless by ourselves. We've got to have Federal help. You have no policy in the White House, I believe, to do this, and you're now just leaving this to local government and local groups. They can't take care of it. Won't you please give us a federally coordinated program with long-time planning?

The President. I think that in things of that kind we are still spending more than has ever been spent before trying to help the needy. I will be very pleased to look into that particular facet and see if there is some snafu there, but I don't think so. But I do think that many of these programs are being undertaken at a State and at a local level and with the aid of Federal financing. But I'll look into it.

There was a third country involved in our secret project with Iran. But taking this into account, all of the shipments of the token amounts of defensive arms and parts that I have authorized or condoned taken in total could be placed aboard a single cargo aircraft. This includes all shipments by the United States or any third country.

Americans have always loved the flowers with which God decorates our land. More often than any other flower, we hold the rose dear as the symbol of life and love and devotion, of beauty and eternity. For the love of man and woman, for the love of mankind and God, for the love of country, Americans who would speak the language of the heart do so with a rose.

We see proofs of this everywhere. The study of fossils reveals that the rose has existed in America for age upon age. We have always cultivated roses in our gardens. Our first President, George Washington, bred roses, and a variety he named after his mother is still grown today. The White House itself boasts a beautiful Rose Garden. We grow roses in all our fifty States. We find roses throughout our art, music, and literature.

We decorate our celebrations and parades with roses. Most of all, we present roses to those we love, and we lavish them on our altars, our civil shrines, and the final resting places of our honored dead.

American people have long held a special place in their hearts for roses. Let us continue to cherish them, to honor the love and devotion they represent, and to bestow them on all we we love just as God has bestowed them on us.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twentieth day of November, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

Sec. 2. Program Limits. The experimental program shall be conducted during the fiscal years 1987 through 1989, and not more than ten individuals may commence participation in the program during any fiscal year. Acceptance of voluntary services from such individuals may not result in the displacement of any employee of the government.

Restrictions. An individual participating in the experimental program shall be considered an employee of the agency to which assigned for purposes of any laws, rules, and regulations of the United States, except that such individual shall not be covered by chapters 51, 53, 63, 83, 87, or 89 of title 5, United States Code, or any comparable provisions relating to classification, pay, leave, retirement, life insurance, or health benefits for employees of the government.

This care is supplemented by the many members of our system of home health care providers who give special assistance to families and can make the difference in preventing, postponing, or limiting institutional care.

Our home health care system includes untold numbers of churches, volunteer groups, private agencies, and families, as well as government programs. All Americans can be proud of this effort for those in need, and of this national commitment to our American values of strong family life and neighbor helping neighbor.

Let us continue to emphasize the benefits of home health care. Let us also give much-deserved thanks and recognition to the dedicated men and women of our home health care system who help us care for our loved ones, preserve their independence, and keep our families intact.

America, do hereby proclaim the week of November 30 through December 6, 1986, as National Home Care Week, and I call upon the appropriate government officials, interested organizations and associations, and all Americans to observe this week with appropriate activities.

Family life and the life of freedom are interdependent. In the arena of the family, children learn the most important lessons they will ever receive about their inherent dignity as individuals. They learn as well about the social and religious traditions that unite generation to generation, and they begin to acquire the values for which their ancestors sacrificed so much for freedom.

The centrality of the family is acknowledged even by those forces that would weaken or destroy it. Totalitarian societies see in the family a natural enemy, a bulwark of basic loyalties and inherited ideals that places allegiance in relationships that precede the claims of the state. Corrosive influences such as illegal drugs and pornography seek to substitute for the permanent bonds of family life a transient and ultimately false sense of happiness and fulfillment. Against these forces the family can often seem helpless and ineffective, but experience shows that it is in being tested that the strength of the family finally reveals itself. After all, the family has been with us from the dawn of human history, and there is no reason to believe that it will not endure.

Family Week affords all Americans the opportunity to frankly face and assess the quality of family life in our Nation and to reflect on what each of us can do as a father, daughter, mother, son, or grandparent -- as a member of a family -- to strengthen this divine institution. Better yet, let us undertake this reflection as families and as a family of free people. As Chesterton said, ``The family is the test of freedom.'' Let us make this another test America refuses to fail.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-first day of November, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

January 1986, the payment of awards in favor of U.S. nationals caused the balance of the Security Account to fall for the first time below $500 million, thus triggering Iran's obligation to replenish. Iran acted quickly in instructing replenishment from interest earned on the Security Account, which is also held by the NV Settlement Bank. Although technical difficulties involving the concerned central banks delayed actual replenishment for several months, a procedure has now been established that should make future transfers administratively simple. On October 10, 1986, replenishment was again triggered, and the second replenishment occurred on October 27, 1986.

In cases between the two governments, the Tribunal to date has issued three decisions in favor of each government, dismissed one claim that had been filed by the United States, and dismissed four claims that had been filed by Iran. In addition, Iran has withdrawn 15 of its government-to-government claims, while the United States has withdrawn three.

The Tribunal continues to make progress in the arbitration of claims of U.S. nationals for $250,000 or more. More than 50 percent of the claims have now been disposed of through adjudication, settlement, or voluntary withdrawal, leaving 251 such claims on the docket. Among recent cases, two U.S. claimant companies received large awards totalling approximately $91 million. Other decisions were notable for the legal precedents set by the Tribunal: In one case, the Tribunal valued an expropriated service company at its going concern value, taking into account the negative impacts of the Iranian revolution on its business, rather than using the net book value of the business as advocated by Iran. In a second legally significant decision, the Tribunal held that an order by a local Iranian court prohibiting an Iranian company from making lease payments or returning equipment to the U.S. claimant constituted a taking by the Government of Iran requiring compensation under international law. Both these decisions should prove helpful to other U.S. claimants before the Tribunal.

Since my last report, the Tribunal has held seven hearings on claims under $250,000, and issued awards in three contested claims, raising the total number of such decisions to five, of which four favored the American claimant. These decisions will help in establishing guidelines for the adjudication or settlement of similar small claims. To date, American claimants have also received 15 awards on agreed terms reflecting settlements.

The Department of State continues to coordinate the efforts of concerned governmental agencies in presenting U.S. claims against Iran as well as responses by the U.S. Government to claims brought against it by Iran. Since my last report, the Department has filed pleadings in nine government-to-government claims based on contracts for the provision of goods and services. The Tribunal issued a decision holding the U.S. Atomic Energy Commission liable for simple interest at the rate of 10 percent per annum on a previously issued principal award of approximately $8 million in favor of the Atomic Energy Organization of Iran.

Government based on the alleged breach of contract by a U.S. defense contractor, finding that the U.S. Government was not a proper respondent. Forty-two government-to-government claims remain pending.

York, as fiscal agent for the United States, for the payment of Iran's syndicated indebtedness. The Tribunal determined that Iran is entitled to so much of the remaining balance as is not needed to satisfy outstanding claims against the fund, as soon as the two governments reach agreement on three points: 1) the amount of claims remaining against the fund; 2) the amount not needed for any such claims and thus available for transfer to Iran; and 3) the terms of a release of all claims by Iran against the United States for administration of the fund. If the two governments are not able to reach such agreement within four months from the date of the order, either government may apply to the Tribunal for further action.

Regulations. In response to the Tribunal's decision on Iran's claim to any excess monies held by the Federal Reserve Bank of New York over those required to pay Iran's syndicated indebtedness, a new regulation has been issued, requiring registration of all claims against the fund, all claims against Dollar Account No. 2, and all claims for January Interest (which, as my previous reports have indicated, are arguably payable out of either fund). 51 Fed. Reg. 37568 (Oct.

The ongoing claims settlement process created by the Algiers Accords continues to implicate important diplomatic, financial, and legal interests of the United States and its nationals and presents an unusual challenge to the national security and foreign policy of the United States. In particular, the Iranian Assets Control Regulations issued pursuant to Executive Order No. 12170 continue to play an important role in structuring our relationship with Iran and in enabling the United States properly to implement the Algiers Accords. I shall continue to exercise the powers at my disposal to deal with these problems and will continue to report periodically to the Congress on significant developments.

President today met with Henri Namphy, President of the National Council of the Government of Haiti, in the Oval Office. President Namphy later met with Vice President Bush. The President discussed the political and economic situation in Haiti with General Namphy, devoting particular attention to the increased U.S. assistance program, the need to develop the Haitian private sector through foreign investment, the protection of individual rights and freedoms, and the long-term development needs of Haiti in the areas of education and literacy, health, agriculture, and environment.

Reagan expressed his firm support for General Namphy's efforts to build democratic institutions and achieve the goal of a working democracy over the next 15 months. In connection with General Namphy's visit, the U.S. and Haitian Governments have agreed to launch a major training initiative for Haiti. The Training for Development Project will make available $10 million over the next 5 years for training educational institutions of over a hundred Haitian technicians, administrators, medical personnel, and business professionals in America.

The total U.S. aid package was also discussed by the two leaders. Haiti is one of the very few countries where, despite an overall reduction in U.S. assistance levels this year, U.S. aid will increase -- an increase of 25 percent to just over $100 million. The U.S. Government is also working with other international donors and with the private sector to assure adequate, overall external support for Haiti's democratization process. During his visit to Washington (November 20 - 22) General Namphy also had meetings with Secretary of State George Shultz and AID Administrator Peter McPherson.

Namphy described the progress achieved so far in implementing the 2-year political calendar that calls for a referendum on a new constitution in February 1987; local, legislative, and Presidential elections during 1987; and the inauguration of a duly elected President in February 1988.

Thank you very much. [Applause] You don't know how heartwarming that is to just come back from Iran and be greeted like that. [Laughter] Bob and Elizabeth Dole, Mr. Vice President, members of the Cabinet, and honored guests and my dear friends: First, I'd like to congratulate the new Republican leaders who will be on the point for the GOP in the upcoming 100th Congress. Republican Leader Dole will again have a solid team to back him up: Alan Simpson, John Chafee, Bill Armstrong, Thad Cochran, Rudy Boschwitz, and of course, our honorary President pro tem Strom Thurmond, who will keep an eye on all of you. We salute all of you and are proud of the qualities of leadership that you bring to the Senate. And also a heartfelt welcome to Senators-elect Bond and McCain, new Members of the Senate, but both battle-hardened political veterans. Kit and John, we're happy to have you aboard.

And it was so good to have with us tonight Howard and Joy Baker [Former Senate majority leader and Mrs. Baker]. I think they had to depart early to catch either a train or a plane; I didn't quite get which one it was going to be. But this is one of those occasions when it is easy, as Bob hinted, to get a little misty. We've been a team -- men and women who've shared a vision and who've developed bonds of friendship while working to turn our goals for America into reality.

Tonight we honor, in particular, Senators Laxalt, Goldwater, and Mathias and all those who will not be returning for the battles in the years ahead. Paul Laxalt, as is no secret, has been close to me these last 6 years and long before that. I've managed to stay his friend even if it meant having to eat those special dishes at his Basque barbecues -- [laughter] -- some of you'll have to explain to others. Paul, Nancy and I are grateful for all you've meant to us, and we'll miss you and Carol.

Goldwater, who is not able to be with us this evening, has been our inspiration, indeed, the conscience of Conservatives. And 6 years ago at this very dinner, I saluted Barry, saying then what remains true today: His principal stand in 1964, the ideals he expressed, the courage he displayed, captured our imaginations. He was a pathfinder, a point man, and in these last 6 years his guidance and grit and wisdom has strengthened our resolve and kept us going.

And then, there's Senator Mathias, who also couldn't be with us this evening. Mac is the kind of individual who's made Washington a fun place to work. We worked together when he was the chairman of my second inaugural committee. And whatever the issue of the day, no matter how hotly contested, he was always a gentleman. His good will, thoughtfulness, and sense of humor have been appreciated.

To those of you who will leave the Senate next year, we can be proud of what we've accomplished, individually and collectively. Mark Andrews has stood by and fought for the farmer through difficult times. And thanks to the efforts of Jim Abdnor, this week I was able to sign a landmark water resources bill into law which will benefit Americans of present and future generations. Jim Broyhill has had a long and dedicated career in Congress. A keen parliamentarian -- he brought the leadership in the area of energy and commerce. Jerry Denton, an American hero, is a hero still. In the Senate he fought against terrorism and held up traditional family values. Slade Gorton played a key role as a member of the Budget Committee and helped to give us a stronger America. Paula Hawkins mobilized our country against drugs and child abuse. Mack Mattingly championed the line-item veto and was indispensable this year to our success in aiding the freedom fighters in Nicaragua. Each of you has my thanks, and I know that of your colleagues. But more important, you have the gratitude of the Nation.

Yes, the election results in the Senate may make our task more difficult. Many of you'll be playing new roles in the struggle to direct the course of our country's future. But let us not forget -- I'm going to change that around. I was raised in an era in which -- the first major employer I had said you should never use a negative. Let's say, let us remember that the underlying long-term message of the election was positive. Governorships were won that will redirect State government and grassroots politics throughout our country.

Senate vote itself, contrary to what our opponents have been saying, reflected a continued evolution in our direction. With a change of 29,000 votes, control of the Senate would still be in our hands, and this in the face of historical trends that work against the party in power. There's ample reason for optimism. At every rally across our country young people in great numbers could be seen and heard. Their youthful idealism, their energy, their zest for life made those rallies joyous occasions, especially for someone who used to cause a hostile riot just by showing up on a campus -- a certain Governor I remember.

I remember back in the days when, well, when I'd first become a Republican, because I was in the other party. Then, as the Bible says, I put aside childish things. [Laughter] When I was new as a Republican and I would go and appear at a fundraiser or something for the party and I would come home to Nancy and I would say that the only young people there looked like they couldn't be invited anywhere else.

That's all changed now. They've responded to our message of opportunity, as I say, growth, and strength. And they don't want to be told to lower their expectations. They don't want to give their lives over to central planners in Washington. They want the same kind of freedom that we had and the same challenge to go as far and as high as their hard work and talents will carry them. And as long as we keep faith with them, this generation of Americans will keep faith with us. What we've been doing these last 6 years, of course, has been for them. And when today's young people have grown a bit older, when we see them with families and children of their own, living in their own homes with productive jobs, we can all feel pride in the job that we've done in these last 6 years. Our young people have been spared the ravages of war and have enjoyed the same sweet liberty we possessed as young adults in the United States. Our reward is knowing that we did our best for them, for our country, and for the cause of human freedom.

In a word, the challenge now before us is simply this: to complete the revolution that we have so well begun. Of course, I'll be talking about this in detail in the days to come. But you know of our commitments to the American people on the balanced budget amendment and the line-item veto. You know the importance of keeping tax rates low and spending under control and of appointing Federal judges who will interpret law, not make it. And, yes, you know of the freedom fighters around the world who need our help and with whom we're determined to stand. In these last 6 years we have left the days of retreat and apology behind. We've again made America the engine of enterprise, the bastion of freedom, the hope for a beleaguered mankind that God intended her to be.

In tackling our agenda, I want to assure you of one important thing: Now, more than ever, we'll need to depend on one another to achieve our goals for this country. No, I've never served on a legislature before, that's true, but after 6 years down the avenue here, I think I understand your problems pretty well.

And I know that your problems are my problems, too. We're one team. We've got to stick together, even more effectively in the Congress to come. So, in the years ahead, no matter where we are, we can be proud that we were members of the class of 1980 and that, together, we changed history.

This coming Thursday we'll celebrate a holiday that belongs uniquely to our nation -- Thanksgiving Day. Millions of us will travel from all parts of the country to gather in family homes, observing the holiday according to longstanding tradition: turkey with all the fixings, pumpkin pie, laughter, the warmth of family, love, and, yes, a moment of prayer to give thanks. Yet, at the same time, many among us will be less fortunate. And just as Thanksgiving Day has always been an occasion for counting our blessings, so, too, it's always been a time for making life better among our fellow Americans. In churches and synagogues across the country, for example, food will be collected in the next few days for distribution to the needy, or on Thanksgiving Day itself. And with this spirit of Thanksgiving in mind, I thought I'd speak with you for a moment this afternoon about the goodness of the American people and our willingness to give each other a helping hand.

The spirit of voluntarism is deeply ingrained in us as a nation. Maybe it has something to do with our history as a frontier land. Those early Americans who gave us Thanksgiving Day itself had to help each other in order to survive -- joining together to plant crops, build houses, and raise barns. And perhaps they discovered that in helping others their own lives were enriched. In our own day, a poll showed most Americans believe that no matter how big government gets and no matter how many services it provides, it can never take the place of volunteers. In other words, we Americans understand that there are no substitutes for gifts of service given from the heart.

In our recent history, there was a time not long ago when this spirit seemed endangered, when philanthropy and personal involvement were giving way to bureaucratic plans and Federal programs. So, when our administration took office, we made it one of our main aims to encourage private sector initiatives, to reinvigorate the American tradition of voluntarism. And I have to admit, our success in this area is one of the accomplishments of which I'm most proud. For in the past few years, we've witnessed an unprecedented outpouring of the volunteer spirit, a tremendous reassertion of good will and neighborliness. Last year alone, individuals, corporations, bequests, and foundations gave nearly $80 billion to good causes -- a record high. You can see these volunteer efforts all around. Consider the United Way, founded a century ago next year. Today there are more than 2,200 local United Ways in communities throughout the country. Just last year the United Way raised more than $2.3 billion, supported more than 3,700 health and human care agencies and programs, and served millions of families.

Then there's Just Say No, a largely volunteer organization that's teaching children around the world to say no to drugs. This organization got started when Nancy was visiting an elementary school in California. A little girl asked what to do if someone offered her drugs, and Nancy's answer was simple: ``Just say no.'' Well, not long ago, Nancy hosted a Just Say No rally here at the White House. More than 2,300 children attended. Although Just Say No requires school officials, teachers, and especially parents to devote to it a great deal of time, Nancy told me that everyone she spoke to at the rally was convinced that it's not only worth it but of vital importance for the future.

Local efforts may be less well known than major undertakings like Just Say No and Project HOPE, but to the very heart and soul of the American volunteer spirit, many of you'll be able to think of good works being performed in your own communities. I think of a house for the homeless here in Washington founded by a young priest, Father Jack Pfannenstiel, and sustained by his own hard work and that of volunteers. McKenna House offers shelter, food, and human concern for the homeless men right here in our Nation's Capital. Of course, we must do more, striving always to give of ourselves to those less fortunate. But it's good to reflect that here in America, perhaps more than in any other nation on Earth, we have a tradition of giving -- of neighbor helping neighbor -- that makes life better for tens of thousands every day. And for this, too, on Thanksgiving Day, let us give thanks.

Americans we know as American Indians and Native Americans were the first explorers and settlers of the areas that now make up the United States. Mountain and river, lake and valley, State and county, trail and town across the land bear Indian names; they are lasting reminders of the presence and the significance of American Indians not just in our geography but throughout the whole of American history.

Many of the foods we eat and the medicines and remedies we use were introduced by Indians, and more than one highway follows an Indian trail. Indians make contributions in every area of endeavor and American life, and our literature and all our arts draw upon Indian themes and wisdom. Countless American Indians have served in our Armed Forces and have fought valiantly for our country. All Americans are grateful for these lasting contributions.

We look to the future with the expectation of even stronger tribal governments and lessened Federal control over tribal government affairs. We look to a future of development of economic independence and self-sufficiency, and an enhanced government-to-government relationship that will allow greater Indian control of Indian resources.

During the Thanksgiving season, generations of Americans have been reminded of the early friendship of the Pilgrims and American Indians. We give thanks to God for the friendship, cooperation, and brotherhood between American Indians and other Americans, as we thank Him for all the many blessings He bestows on us.

Americans are living longer, and their lives are more productive than ever before. The number of people 65 years old or older continues to grow rapidly, and there has been an unprecedented increase in persons 85 or older. With this blessing comes the reality that advancing age can bring increased frailty and disability. Some 5.2 million people have disabilities that leave them in need of help with such daily tasks as dressing, bathing, and food preparation.

The prime source of such care for these people is their families. These loving family caregivers provide 80 to 90 percent of the medical care, household maintenance, transportation, and shopping needs of older persons. Too little recognition is given in our society to those who perform such a labor of familial love. Anyone who has personally cared for a loved one or who has witnessed such care knows that, however gratefully received, the effort is often physically and emotionally challenging.

For these reasons, it is important that all Americans have a greater awareness of and support for the vital role of family caregivers. I also ask individual Americans to think about the older people in their neighborhoods, to lend a hand when the opportunity presents itself, and to offer a friendly smile of greeting to older people. This is a wonderful way to repay the lifetime of care, kindness, and assistance that older people have already given others. It is also a fine way to discover afresh that older Americans, despite the disabilities they might have, can give everyone a great deal of love, wisdom, and friendship in return.

The President. Last Friday, after becoming concerned whether my national security apparatus had provided me with a security -- or a complete factual record with respect to the implementation of my policy toward Iran, I directed the Attorney General [Edwin Meese III] to undertake a review of this matter over the weekend and report to me on Monday. And yesterday Secretary Meese provided me and the White House Chief of Staff [Donald T. Regan] with a report on his preliminary findings. And this report led me to conclude that I was not fully informed on the nature of one of the activities undertaken in connection with this initiative. This action raises serious questions of propriety.

I've just met with my national security advisers and congressional leaders to inform them of the actions that I'm taking today. Determination of the full details of this action will require further review and investigation by the Department of Justice. Looking to the future, I will appoint a Special Review Board to conduct a comprehensive review of the role and procedures of the National Security Council staff in the conduct of foreign and national security policy.

Although not directly involved, Vice Admiral John Poindexter has asked to be relieved of his assignment as Assistant to the President for National Security Affairs and to return to another assignment in the Navy. Lieutenant Colonel Oliver North [Deputy Director for Political-Military Affairs] has been relieved of his duties on the National Security Council staff.

I am deeply troubled that the implementation of a policy aimed at resolving a truly tragic situation in the Middle East has resulted in such controversy. As I've stated previously, I believe our policy goals toward Iran were well founded.

However, the information brought to my attention yesterday convinced me that in one aspect implementation of that policy was seriously flawed. While I cannot reverse what has happened, I'm initiating steps, including those I've announced today, to assure that the implementation of all future foreign and national security policy initiatives will proceed only in accordance with my authorization. Over the past 6 years we've realized many foreign policy goals. I believe we can yet achieve -- and I intend to pursue -- the objectives on which we all agree: a safer, more secure, and stable world.

I am pleased to announce the appointment of former Senator John Tower, former Secretary of State Edmund Muskie, and former National Security Adviser Brent Scowcroft -- three distinguished experts in foreign policy and national security affairs -- to serve as the members of the Special Review Board I announced yesterday. Former Senator Tower has agreed to serve as the Board's Chairman. As I indicated, the Special Review Board will conduct a comprehensive study of the future role and procedures of the National Security Council staff in the development, coordination, oversight, and conduct of foreign and national security policy.

In particular I have asked the Board to review the NSC staff's proper role in operational activities, especially extremely sensitive diplomatic, military, and intelligence missions. Specifically, they should look at the manner in which foreign and national security policies I established have been implemented by the NSC staff. In conducting their review, the Board will have full and complete access to the NSC staff and its resources as well as the cooperation of the other Departments and Agencies in the executive branch.

American agriculture is the most productive in the world. Our Nation's consumers have the broadest selection of nutritious and healthful food in the world, and we purchase our food for only around 15 percent of after-tax income. Because we are most grateful for this abundance and we share it gladly with other lands, we lead in providing food aid programs around the world. In addition, we are a huge commercial exporter and dependable supplier of food and fiber.

Nation and the world owe many thanks for this bounty to American farmers, whose dedication, enterprise, hard work, and good management are models of modern productivity. One American farm worker supplies food and fiber for 75 people, 60 here in the United States and 15 overseas.

We also owe thanks to our farmers' partners in our agricultural system -- the rural townspeople and the city workers who maintain a pipeline of production supplies to farms. We are grateful as well to the truckers, shippers, processors, warehousers, retailers, and others in our chain of marketing distributors.

Each year at Thanksgiving time, our Nation pauses for Farm-City Week activities to recognize the enterprise that makes this bountiful agricultural harvest possible through the blessings of our Creator.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-sixth day of November, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

Nancy and I celebrate Thanksgiving weekend each year in California's Santa Ynez Mountains, we find it a wonderful opportunity to be together with family and friends and, like so many Americans, a chance to reflect on all the Lord's blessings to our country.

We've been particularly conscious this year of one blessing that has made this holiday season a happy one for countless more Americans, Americans who in years past were trapped in want and poverty. Only 4 years ago, as our economic policies were just taking effect, we began what became the second-longest peacetime expansion since World War II. This year the stock market has hit all-time highs, while inflation continues near all-time lows. Only this week new figures show inflation running at less than 1 percent in 1986, the trade deficit continues its substantial decline, and, above all, today more Americans are working than ever before. So, contrary to those many predictions over the last 4 years -- some of them still being heard as late as last August -- there is no recession. Our expansion is not only with us but continues gaining momentum, and, of course, that means more jobs for more Americans. It's this last development we should be especially grateful for. In the past 4 years we've created more than 12 million payroll jobs, and that means 2.2 million people have lifted themselves out of poverty since 1983.

As perhaps you know, it's budget preparation time in Washington. And recently, in reviewing these statistics, I reflected back on some of the solutions suggested a few years ago to our economic problems -- they have been the worst since the Great Depression. I can especially remember one make-work jobs program that Congress came up with, a $5.4 billion extravaganza that would have helped a relatively tiny number of people. Because it was just this sort of marketplace intrusion and government boondoggle that had put our economy in trouble in the first place, I decided that, Thanksgiving or not, this was one turkey we didn't need. And to resounding criticism from Congress and the media, I put a stop to it. Well, instead, we continued with an economic policy that lowered tax rates, cut spending, and abolished unnecessary regulations -- and what a jobs program that turned out to be. We've averaged over 250,000 people finding jobs each and every month. And last month alone, close to 300,000 Americans went to work.

I think there's a lesson never to be forgotten here: It's people, not government, who create wealth, provide growth, and ensure prosperity. That may sound elementary enough, but the history or our economic difficulties, especially the terribly big deficits we run each year, stem directly from our failure to remember that government consumes wealth, it doesn't create it. You see, it's a kind of legacy from a period when I was back in college studying economics. Following the theories of a noted English economist of the period, John Maynard Keynes, economists and politicians used to say that when bad times occur the only way to restore prosperity is to spend our way out of it with massive new government programs paid for by borrowing.

Since our first day in office, we've been going after this structural deficit by, first, asking for major spending cuts and, second, asking for reforms like the line-item veto and balanced budget amendment that would, well, unstructure the structured deficit. So, while we've been occupied with the Iranian issue over the past 2 weeks, let's not forget that there are many other issues that concern us. And this deficit problem remains a major priority. In order to pursue this issue and all the others like it on our domestic and foreign agenda, we must be certain to maintain peace in the world and keep our defenses strong while, of course, sparking our domestic economy to even greater growth. As Jefferson once said, his one fear about our Constitution was that it permitted government to borrow. Well, government has borrowed too much and spent too much. So, believe me, I'll be back in Washington next week, determined to work with the Congress to get deficit spending under control and keep America growing with record numbers of jobs for American people.

Born in Arkansas, William Sessions grew up in Kansas City and served 5 years in the Air Force before he and his wife, Alice, settled in Texas. After receiving his law degree from Baylor University in 1958, he began a legal career of immense distinction: successful private practice in Texas; service in the Criminal Division of the Justice Department here in Washington; appointment by President Nixon as United States attorney for the Western District of Texas; and then appointment, just 3 years later, by President Ford as a Federal judge.

I could interject something else, I can't help thinking of another superb judge whose nomination is soon to go before the Senate -- Judge Douglas Ginsburg. As you know, Judge Sessions, we've been toughening the Federal laws against crime, and judges have been returning to a more faithful interpretation of the Constitution regarding criminal law. The constitutional rights of the accused must be protected, but so must the rights of law-abiding citizens. Hardened criminals simply must not be allowed to prey upon the innocent.

On the Supreme Court, Judge Ginsburg would continue the trend toward a recognition that victims have rights, too. And, so, his Senate confirmation is vitally important to the fight against crime. Let's commit ourselves today to providing for future generations an America that cares about victims' rights, not just criminal rights. The next Justice on the Supreme Court better be ready to deal with that challenge. And Doug Ginsburg is ready.

Now this fine judge has taken the oath of office as our nation's fourth Director of the Federal Bureau of Investigation. You will lead a Bureau that has sharpened its investigative focus to ensure that our country's law enforcement expertise and resources are directed against the crimes of the highest national priority.

Foreign intelligence activities and terrorism threaten the security of our nation and the lives of all Americans. In the past 3 years, the FBI's counterintelligence efforts have achieved unprecedented success against those who threaten our nation's security. By targeting these criminal activities and other priority matters such as organized crime, white collar crime and drugs, and pursuing investigations of quality rather than mere quantity, the FBI is confronting the challenge of enforcing our laws and protecting our citizens. I am confident that, under the leadership of Judge Sessions, the men and women of the FBI will carry on the fight against crime with ever greater thoroughness and skill.

Sessions, I can think of no one better qualified to live up to and enlarge on the FBI tradition of fighting crime fiercely, but always according to the due process of law. No one can better embody the FBI belief that the enforcement of our laws must be very tough, but very fair. On behalf of all Americans and, if I may, especially on behalf of the men and women of the FBI gathered here today: Judge Sessions, congratulations. Thank you, and God bless you.

Congressmen, distinguished guests, and my former friends of the Federal judiciary, Mr. Otto -- I think I said that poorly, they are always my friends, and I'm the former judge, but you know what I mean -- Alice, dear friends, and family: Before I can look to the future, I am compelled to recall the past and to acknowledge the contribution of Judge Webster to the tradition of this amazing institution.

To you, Mr. President, I can now publicly express my gratitude for being afforded the opportunity to lead the men and women of the world's finest and most extraordinary law enforcement agency. I would be remiss if I did not express my thanks to the Acting Director, John Otto, for the illustrious service he has performed during the months of waiting, and also for waiting so patiently for the passing of the torch of leadership.

My pledge today is truly unchanged, though it is now supported by my publicly expressed oath, that is, to lead in a fashion that unerringly and faithfully supports and defends the constitutions and the laws of this great land.

My hope is that I can so faithfully uphold the standards of the Federal Bureau of Investigation that when my term is completed my associates here at the Bureau will regret my departure and my country will have been strengthened and enriched by my service. My commitment to the Bureau is to give, as courageously as I can and with all the integrity that I can muster, whatever is required to fulfill the obligation of my oath and my pledge. And I do truly thank you.

Greetings. I'm speaking with you from here in Washington via the satellite channels of WORLDNET and Voice of America. This is but another demonstration of the dramatic effect technology is having on our lives. Science is shrinking distances, overcoming obstacles, and opening borders. Today individuals in distant lands are working, trading, and even playing together on a global scale. We are, as would never have been thought possible a century ago, truly becoming a community -- perhaps even a family -- of free people, united by humane values and democratic ideals, and sharing in a prosperity that is closely linked to the trade and commerce between us.

Earlier in this century, during a time when fascism and communism were on the rise, there were those who believed that the light of democracy might well be extinguished. It was feared that the era of representative government, of political and economic freedom, would prove to be a short interlude of history and would disappear just as the democracy of Greece and the Roman republic had vanished.

Well, our cause may have seemed precariously perched, fragile, and without the power projected by strutting troops and mass political spectacles; but it should be clear now that the courage and resilience of free people are too easily underestimated, as is our resolve to cooperate, to see a common purpose, and to act together in our own defense.

Hugo once wrote: ``People do not lack strength; they lack will.'' Well, in my life, I have time and again seen evidence that gives me great confidence that those who live in freedom do indeed have the will to remain free, even under enormous pressure, even against great odds. Those of us who lived through the Second World War saw that in the British people, whose indomitable spirit never broke under heavy bombardment. We saw it in the French troops and resistance fighters, who battled to free their homeland; in Polish Home Army soldiers, who rose in Warsaw; in the moral heroes throughout the continent, including within Germany itself, who resisted nazism often at the cost of their own lives; and others who risked all to save Jews, sometimes perfect strangers, from the death camps. We saw it in Normandy, where Americans joined with people from all over Europe to breach the Atlantic Wall and head inland, joined together in one mighty crusade to rid the continent of Hitler's National Socialism and all the horrors that went with it.

Yes, and in the four decades since the end of the Second World War, the free peoples of the world have continued to prove their courage and, just as important, as never before to demonstrate their solidarity with one another. The North Atlantic alliance, a lasting triumph of unity and cooperation among free peoples, has maintained peace on the European continent for four decades. It has been the shield of democracy and the greatest deterrent to war in history.

It has not been easy, yet we've done what was necessary to keep our countries free and to preserve the peace. That certainly was true of the alliance's response to the vast expansion of Soviet military power in the late 1970's, especially their introduction of the new SS - 20 intermediate-range missiles.

What we were witnessing was an attempt to tip the military balance of power in Europe and erode the security bond between Europe and the United States. It tested our cohesion and could well have had serious, even catastrophic, long-term consequences had the alliance not acted with resolve. But we did act.

December of 1979 Western leaders made the decision to move forward on a two-track approach. First, the United States would negotiate with the Soviets in an attempt to convince them to withdraw their new missiles.

Second, as long as the Soviets continued on their course and kept their missiles in place, NATO would deploy in Europe a limited number of Pershing II and ground-launched cruise missiles. What the alliance sought, however, were fewer missiles, not more.

Our plan depended upon unflagging solidarity and steadfastness of purpose, even under immense pressure. And the pressure was put on. Had the nuclear freeze and unilateral disarmament protesters won, Europe would now be condemned to live under the shadow of Soviet nuclear-armed INF missiles. To democracy's credit, the political courage of farsighted European leaders carried the day.

The agreement we are now hearing is based upon the proposal that the United States, in full consultation with allied leaders, put forward in 1981: the zero option. The plan will require the Soviets to remove four times as many nuclear warheads as the United States. Not only will the entire Soviet force of SS - 20's and SS - 4's be destroyed but also the shorter range SS - 12's and SS - 23's. It'll be the first mutual reduction of the world's nuclear arsenals in history. And more than that, the shorter range Soviet missiles that will be eliminated are capable of carrying not just nuclear but also chemical and conventional warheads. Thus, we will be making a promising start in cutting back these threats to Europe as well.

Achievements like this are not the result of wishful thinking, nor are they made more likely by loud proclamations of a desire for peace. Lasting progress derives from hardnosed realism, strenuous effort, and firmness of principle. I can assure you that any treaty I sign will be realistic and in the long-term interest of all the members of the alliance, or no agreement will be signed.

So, any new treaty will contain ironclad provisions for effective verification, including on-site inspection of facilities before and during reductions and short-notice inspections afterward. The verification regime we've put forward is the most stringent in the history of arms control negotiations. None of us in the alliance can settle for anything less.

Arms reduction -- if done with care to ensure the continuing credibility of our deterrent, both nuclear and conventional -- is in the interest of all Western countries. And any INF agreement should be viewed not as the end of the process but the beginning, a first big step. We and the Soviets have also been negotiating possible reductions in our strategic arsenals, which for us is a high priority. Again, it's an American proposal that is the centerpiece of the negotiation -- a dramatic proposition to cut our strategic arsenals in half.

What is totally unacceptable, however, is the Soviet tactic of holding these offensive reductions hostage to measures that would cripple our Strategic Defense Initiative. We won't bargain away SDI, which offers the promise of a safer world in which both sides would rely more on defenses, which threaten no one, than on offensive forces. It shouldn't escape our attention that the Soviets themselves have been spending billions on a strategic defense program of their own.

Much has been heard as of late about reforms being instituted within the Soviet Union. Glasnost, we are told, is ushering in a new era. Well, who cannot but hope these reports are true, that the optimism is justified? Good sense, however, dictates that we look for tangible changes in behavior -- for action, not words -- in deciding what is real or illusionary. We will, for example, closely watch the condition of human rights within the Soviet Union. It is difficult to imagine that a government that continues to repress freedom in its own country, breaking faith with its own people, can be trusted to keep agreements with others.

Yes, this year some people, including a few very prominent individuals, were permitted to leave the Soviet Union. It's better than the record of recent years, yet many more emigration and divided-family cases remain. And let us remember: Denial of the right to emigrate is only a small part of the problem of the repressive Soviet system. A recognition of freedom of speech, religion, and press; a release of all prisoners of conscience; an ending of the practice of sending perfectly sane political dissidents to psychiatric hospitals; tolerance of real opposition; and freedom of political choice -- these things, which we all take for granted, would signal that a true turning point has been reached and would offer hope of positive changes in the international arena, as well.

If there's one observation that rings true in today's changing world, it is that freedom and peace go hand in hand. The further the Soviet leadership opens their system and frees their people, the more likely it will be that the tensions between East and West will lessen. Reflecting this, we also hope to see changes in Soviet foreign policy. The Soviet occupation of Afghanistan is most certainly a dreadful quagmire. The Afghan people have proven themselves the bravest of the brave. They will continue to have the sympathy and support of free nations in their struggle for independence. Soviet leaders can win accolades from people of good will everywhere and free their country from a no-win situation by grounding their helicopter gunships, promptly withdrawing their troops, and permitting the Afghan people to choose their own destiny. Such actions would be viewed not as a retreat but as a courageous and positive step.

Another sign to look for -- this one closer to home for you on your side of the Atlantic -- would be a loosening of the Soviet hold over Eastern Europe. Why should the peoples of Europe remain divided as they are with barbed wire, watch towers, and machineguns? Why shouldn't all Europeans be free to travel, to visit one another, or to conduct business with each other? Shouldn't the Brezhnev doctrine finally be renounced? Four decades after the war, why should 17 million Germans be treated like prisoners in their own land? A true opening-up and recognition of their sovereign independence would be welcomed by all the peoples of Eastern and central Europe, and it would not threaten the security of the Soviet Union or anyone else.

A few months ago, I visited Berlin. I stood there alongside the cruel wall that symbolizes so powerfully the scar that divides the European continent. It's time for that wound to heal and that scar to disappear. Wouldn't it be a wonderful sight for the world to see, if someday General Secretary Gorbachev and I could meet in Berlin and together take down the first bricks of that wall -- and we could continue taking down walls until the distrust between our peoples and the scars of the past are forgotten.

A few moments ago, I recalled the valiant fight 40 years ago to liberate the European continent. Who cannot help but appreciate that, in that epic struggle, the peoples of the Soviet Union fought bravely and sacrificed so immensely to defeat the common enemy. After the war, we became adversaries, at times bitter adversaries. Yet this need not have happened and need not continue. Any philosophy or leader suggesting that there is a predetermined course of history and that conflict between our peoples and systems is inevitable is wrong. We are not condemned by forces beyond our control. We, all peoples in every land, can shape the world in which we live and determine the future. We in the Western democracies have been doing just that. Together we've built a freer and more prosperous way of life, a community of free people. I'm certain you agree with me that the door is open to all who would join with us.

German literary figure Heinrich Heine has written: ``Do not mock our dreamers. Their words become the seeds of freedom.'' Well, today our vision, not only of a more peaceful world but of a world of freedom in which democratic rights are enjoyed in every land, seems ever more in focus, almost as if it is within reach. We will continue to watch and to be hopeful, yet we must also remain vigilant. The strength and viability of the alliance remains essential, even as an agreement between the United States and the Soviet Union opens new opportunities for peace. It is just such strength as NATO has demonstrated that is a precondition to such progress. Weakness, vulnerability, and wishful thinking can undo what has been accomplished by standing firm.

This, nevertheless, can be a time of great change. As you're likely aware, General Secretary Gorbachev has accepted my invitation to come to Washington for a summit in early December. We'll be discussing face-to-face the wide spectrum of issues I've spoken to you about today. I, in fact, expect we'll sign that agreement concerning U.S. and Soviet INF missiles during the time of our meetings.

For our part, the commitment of the United States to the alliance and to the security of Europe -- INF treaty or no INF treaty -- remains unshakable. Over 300,000 American servicemen with you on the continent and our steadfast nuclear guarantee underscore this pledge. Those who worry that we will somehow drift apart or that deterrence has been weakened are mistaken on both counts. Our ties will be strengthened, not diminished, by this success. Such an historic reduction in nuclear weapons, as now appears on the way, will be a resounding vindication of the unity, strength, and determination of the alliance.

As far as our ability to keep the peace, the NATO strategy of flexible response will continue to ensure that aggression, at any level, is blocked. A viable deterrent force of nuclear weapons of many types, including ground-based systems as well as those carried by aircraft and submarines, still protects Europe and remains in place.

The alliance has had underway for some time a program of modernizing our forces so that a credible deterrent is maintained over the long term. That is why major initiatives are moving forward to upgrade NATO's conventional strength. And after 18 years of unilaterally refraining from any production of chemical weapons, improvements are being made in our modest chemical weapon inventory.

But just as we're doing in our INF talks, we're also seeking through negotiation to correct the disparities we face in both the chemical and conventional areas. In fact, in 1984 the United States, with allied support, proposed an effective global ban on chemical weapons. As far as conventional forces, the alliance stands ready, if the East meets us halfway, to make reductions in central Europe through mutual balanced force reductions, or MBFR, as they are called. At the same time, in Vienna an agreement between East and West is being sought that would mandate new negotiations on conventional stability from the Atlantic Ocean to the Ural Mountains.

Our common security agenda, as you can see, is broad and ambitious. An INF agreement is an important first step, but only the first one toward our greater goal. And let there be no doubt, the citizens of the United States fully understand and appreciate that we are partners for peace with you, the peoples of our fellow Western democracies. That's why we applaud what we see as a new willingness, even eagerness, on the part of some of our allies to increase the level of cooperation and coordination among themselves in European defense. The growing cooperation between France and Germany is a positive sign, as is the modernization of the British and French independent nuclear deterrents, which are both vital components of the Western security system. Last week the foreign and defense ministers of the Western European union issued an impressive declaration. It reaffirmed the importance of maintaining our nuclear and conventional deterrents and affirmed a positive Western European identity in the field of defense within the framework of the Atlantic alliance. We welcome these developments.

Over these last four decades, all too often the United States has been viewed as the senior partner of the alliance. Well, today when the economic strength of Western Europe and the United States are fully comparable, the time has long since come when we will view ourselves as equal partners, and a more equal relationship should not diminish our bonds but strengthen them. It should not limit our potential but expand it.

Goethe, the soul of German literature, once wrote: ``If you would create something, you must be something.'' Well, in these last four decades the people of the United States and Europe have been a force for progress and freedom on this planet. And only a few short years from now, as mankind literally enters into a new millennium, we will have laid the foundation for a prosperous and free future. We've proven wrong -- dead wrong -- those doubters and despots who earlier in this century thought democracy was soon to be extinct. We have ensured that, in the centuries ahead, it is free people who will dominate the affairs of mankind. And let me predict that, someday, the realm of liberty and justice will encompass the planet. Freedom is not just the birthright of the few, it is the God-given right of all His children, in every country. It won't come by conquest. It will come, because freedom is right and freedom works. It will come, because cooperation and good will among free people will carry the day.

There's a story that was brought to my attention a few years ago about an elderly couple who live in the small town of Marstel on the island of Aero in Denmark -- Natalia and Nels Mortensen. For the last 40 years they have tended the grave of a young man they never met. They dig the weeds and place flowers, and always there's a small American flag. When it becomes worn, they replace it with another.

They are watching over the final resting place of U.S. Air Force Sergeant Jack Wagner, who died when his plane was shot down on June 20th, 1944, near Aero, which was then occupied territory. Jack Wagner's body washed up on shore a few days later, and the word quickly spread through the tiny community.

Jack was a 19-year-old American from Snyder County, Pennsylvania. The Danish townspeople had never met him, but they knew this young man had given his life for them. He cared enough for people he'd never met to make the supreme sacrifice for their freedom. The Mortensens never forgot this. They still care for that grave as if he was a member of their family, and in a way, he was. Just as we are all part of the family of free people.

Many young people from all of our countries have died to preserve the freedom we now enjoy. Many of our children still serve. They stand together on the ramparts of freedom. We care about each and every one of them as if he or she was our own.

In this world there are many conflicting visions of man's economic life. You know the old saying: Ask three economists a question -- you get seven different answers. But beyond the fine-tuning of experts, there's a more fundamental division of world views. One sees the resources and potential of this world as finite, and most likely insufficient for the needs of a growing humanity. It posits a world of limits and describes not only a present of insufficiency but a future of increasing scarcity, and insists on cruel but, in its view, necessary choices.

In the meantime, we don't have room for the luxuries of the past. In fact, to keep from sinking, we may have to throw them overboard. And it's our freedom that is always the first luxury to be jettisoned.

Maybe it was the object lesson of a vast and mostly unexplored continent that instilled in our souls a basic disbelief in limits and impatience with those who insist on trying to impose them -- whether it's bureaucrats telling us what we can and can't do or academics talking of limits to growth.

Well, whether we're skeptical Yankees, or recent immigrants to the Sunbelt, we know too much about America to believe in limits, to believe that the future isn't ours for the making. There's too much hope, too much possibility on this continent of ours for us to believe in the zero-sum philosophies of the Old World. Whether it's communism or socialism or what used to be called social Darwinism, we know that one person's achievement doesn't subtract from another, but adds each to the other in an expanding cycle of prosperity. Of all the zero-sum philosophies that have gripped the Old World, one of the most destructive has been mercantilism -- that's a 17th-century version of protectionism. It saw trade as a form of economic warfare -- usually bloodless, but not always -- with powerful nations preying upon the weaker, drawing off their wealth and then hoarding it within their own boundaries.

In this, the bicentennial year of our Constitution, we look back in wonder at the feat of imagination that designed our democratic institutions, so responsive and flexible, yet enduring. But perhaps as great an intellectual break with the past, as great a leap of progress, was the rejection of the mercantilist philosophies -- or hostilities, I should say -- that had been tearing our young nation apart, and the establishment of free and unfettered trade among these newly united States.

Today, we're poised to make another great leap of progress by creating free trade anew between our country and Canada. Already, our two nations generate the world's largest volume of trade. Canada is by far our largest trading partner. The United States exports more to the Province of Ontario alone than to the entire country of Japan.

We're tearing down the walls, the tariffs, that block the flow of trade and eliminating the tangle of restrictions and regulations that bind our commerce and inhibit economic cooperation. As this agreement takes effect, Americans and Canadians will conduct business, invest, and trade where they like. Two proud, independent, and sovereign nations -- Canada and the United States -- will pull together as partners toward a future of economic growth and prosperity. Rejecting beggar-thy-neighbor policies in order to build with our neighbors -- putting aside special interests in favor of the common interest, this agreement will be a win-win situation, not only for the United States and Canada but for the world.

We have broken new territory by covering areas, such as investment and services, traditionally beyond the scope of trade agreements. What better model could there be for the Uruguay Round, which is currently underway in Geneva. But success will depend in large part on people like you who are willing to operate in a truly free environment for trade and investment. And I'll be looking for your support in obtaining congressional approval for this historic, pathbreaking agreement.

Last spring, I visited Prime Minister Mulroney in Canada and was honored to speak before the Canadian Parliament. There I spoke of this visionary agreement as an example to all nations. To those still tempted by protectionism -- who would retreat into economic isolationism -- we'll show there is a better and a more expansive way. To those who think this world is a zero-sum equation, who view their neighbors with worry and distrust, we'll show the path of cooperation. And we'll show how freedom is the most valuable resource, free economies and free trade -- that the wider our embrace of freedom, the greater will be our prosperity.

You know, some time ago -- way back in those prehistoric times known as the seventies -- I called for what I named a North American accord that would embrace our whole continent -- the United States, Canada, and Mexico, as well. I said then that it's time we stopped thinking of our nearest neighbors as foreigners. Let us instead think of them as partners, independent and sovereign, but united in a common purpose. Unity, I need hardly say, does not imply homogeneity. In a true alliance of friendship, the differences -- the unique characters and national identities of our northern and southern neighbors -- would only broaden our understanding and strengthen the mandate of freedom.

Let us dare to dream, I said, of some future date, when the map of the world shows a North American Continent united in commerce and committed to freedom. I say now it is time to dream even bigger dreams -- dreams of an entire hemisphere, from the Arctic Circle to Tierra del Fuego, united by the bonds of democracy and free trade; an entire hemisphere in which all the borders become what the U.S.-Canadian border is today -- a meeting place rather than a dividing line.

When we look at the news, when we read history, it sometimes seems that wars and cataclysms dominate man's life. But, in fact, that is a misperception. It is in the peaceful, everyday business of work and trade that the real story of human progress unfolds. I am confident that when people look back on this pact it will stand out as one of the premier achievements of the 20th century, not just a free trade agreement between two nations but the catalyst of a hemispheric, perhaps world, revolution -- a peaceful revolution of expanding freedom and growing friendship between nations. That's why I pledge to you that this achievement, great as it is, will be only the beginning. We will, together with our new partner in peace and freedom, Canada, carry the banner of free trade to Mexico, to the Caribbean, and all of Latin America -- and from there on around the world.

You know, I can't help but think of a story, a few years ago, when I was connected with a place called Hollywood, and Hollywood-made motion pictures played 90 percent of the playing time of all the theaters of the world. And so, when Mr. Johnston, the head of the Motion Picture Producers Association, made one of his visits abroad, he went to Poland. And he took along a few movies, and he showed them to the Minister of Education.

Now, one of them was a movie that I escaped being in, and Dennis Morgan did the part I was going to do. [Laughter] But it was with Ann Sheridan, and they played two workers at Lockheed aircraft plant, which was only a few blocks from Warner Brothers Studio. And one of the scenes in the picture called for them to be at the lunch hour out in the parking lot, playing a scene together, talking together.

And, you know, it's just increasingly struck me that we're trying to build a world of undeveloped nations and make them believe that their only progress, economic progress, must be in exporting. Well, what would happen today if all the countries of the world could be like ours and the people who made all these wonderful products were also the customers who bought them and could afford to buy them?

There aren't too many countries where that's true. Ours is, yes, we're the biggest exporter in the world. And yet, we have a trade imbalance because we also buy more than anyone else, into the country. But again, our biggest market happens to be our own people. And when that becomes more worldwide, we're going to find that a lot of the economic problems of the world go away.

I don't know why I brought that up, except that I just came from a meeting talking about the present situation here with the deficit. [Laughter] But anyway, I just want to thank you all here, and God bless you all, and hope that we can make this particular agreement go and show the way. If 200 years ago the Constitution came into being, in large part, because the 13 Colonies that had become States of the United States still thought of each other as a foreign country and, therefore, had tariffs and all kinds of obstructions to trade across the borders, and now we've eliminated all of that with our Constitution, and here we are with 50 States trading freely with each other, why wouldn't that fit with other countries, too? Particularly here, the neighbors on our own continent -- and why wouldn't it work?

In response to improved Japanese compliance with the 1986 U.S.-Japan semiconductor agreement, I am today announcing my intention to suspend a portion of the sanctions I placed on Japanese products last April, when we determined that Japan was not fully implementing the agreement.

I also made clear, however, that we would remove the sanctions as soon as we had firm and continuing evidence that the dumping of Japanese semiconductors in third-country markets had stopped and that access to the Japanese market had improved. Japan is an important trading partner and a close ally, and we want to make every effort to resolve our differences as soon as possible.

This case serves as a reminder that the judicious and proper use of section 301 can bring results. Retaliation ought to be used only as a last resort and only when it is likely to lead to a positive result. In this case, we used the threat of retaliation to achieve a sound agreement on fair trade in semiconductors. When that agreement was not complied with, retaliation was used to bring about compliance. I hope Congress will remember that section 301 has been used effectively before making any changes in the law that would attempt to force the President to retaliate at times when it would be counterproductive.

June, when a review of the data showed that Japanese third-country dumping was declining on one semiconductor product, I ordered a proportional response and lifted sanctions on $51 million of the full $300 million in sanctions. Because the most recent review of the data shows that third-country dumping has ceased for both DRAM's and EPROM's -- the two semiconductor products covered under this portion of the agreement -- I am directing an additional suspension of sanctions amounting to $84 million. The remaining $165 million in sanctions will remain in effect because of the lack of sufficient progress to date on access to the Japanese market for foreign-based semiconductor makers.

U.S. semiconductor producers and users were closely consulted during our discussions with the Japanese Government. Based on these discussions, they recommended the action I am taking today. The Japanese Government has given me assurances that this positive pattern with respect to third-country dumping will continue.

If these assurances prove not to be the case, I will not hesitate to reimpose the partial sanctions that have been suspended. I have also been assured by the Government of Japan that no quantitative or other kinds of restrictions exist on the production, supply, or shipment of semiconductors and that it is not engaged in allocation schemes that might disadvantage foreign purchasers of semiconductors from Japanese producers. In addition, the Japanese Government has reaffirmed its commitment to monitor company-by-company costs and export prices for certain semiconductors to prevent dumping.

Director of Presidential Appointments and Scheduling. Mr. Ryan was previously an attorney with the Los Angeles law firm of Hill, Farrer and Burrill. While engaged in his practice, he published several articles on various aspects of the law.

Tic-like grimacing, shoulder-shrugging, sniffing, grunting, and coughing are common symptoms of the disorder; less frequent but perhaps more alarming symptoms include uncontrollable vocalizations, head-banging, and other involuntary self-destructive actions.

Symptoms appear in childhood, between the ages of 2 and 16 years, and wax and wane over time but do not seem to become progressively worse. Males are three times more likely to have the disorder than females.

Within the Federal government, the search for answers to why people get Tourette syndrome and what is behind its puzzling symptoms is led by the National Institute of Neurological and Communicative Disorders and Stroke (NINCDS). Research teams at NINCDS and grantee institutions, together with scientific colleagues in the private sector, are tracing and analyzing the suspected genetic basis for the syndrome. Aided by increasingly sophisticated techniques of brain imaging, they are determining the significance in Tourette patients of unusually low amounts of certain brain chemicals, called neurotransmitters, and investigating anatomical structures within the brain that may be affected. They are testing new drugs to control symptoms without causing depression and other serious side effects.

Crucial to the national research effort is the cooperation of patients with Tourette syndrome and their families, especially those allied with the Tourette Syndrome Association, Inc. This voluntary health agency provides advice and encouragement to patients coping not only with exhausting and painful physical problems, but also with the attendant damaging social and emotional problems.

Because they cannot predict or control the vocalizations or movements that periodically overtake them, people with Tourette can be easy targets of misunderstanding and rejection. The Tourette Syndrome Association plays an essential role in educating the public about the disorder and about building acceptance and respect for those who refuse to allow the disorder to diminish their lives or restrict their contributions to society.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this fourth day of November, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

Finance for the State of California. Your exceptional performance in that post as well as in subsequent positions with the Federal Government -- among them, Chairman of the Federal Trade Commission, Director of the Office of Management and Budget, and Secretary of Health, Education, and Welfare -- left me no doubt that you would make an outstanding Secretary of Defense. Not only was I correct in my judgment, but I am confident that you will be remembered as the most distinguished and effective Secretary of Defense in our Nation's history.

For the past seven years, you have worked tirelessly to help restore both America's military strength and its self-confidence. You have always recognized that the mantle of liberty carries with it responsibility and leadership. You've been indispensable in upgrading our military preparedness by promoting the B - 1 bomber, overseeing expansion of our Navy to 600 ships, and eloquently advocating the Strategic Defense Initiative -- the most important technological breakthrough in defense strategy in our lifetime. You have successfully enhanced the quality of our military personnel and improved morale, so that today the percentage of high school graduates among enlistees in our armed services is the highest in our Nation's history. You have also set an example in cracking down on waste and abuse in Pentagon spending, ensuring American taxpayers that their hard-earned monies are being properly and efficiently utilized.

I know well that you are an ardent admirer of Winston Churchill and an astute observer of history. As Secretary of Defense, you have demonstrated time and again the vision, the passion, the sound judgment, and the ability to inspire which Churchill possessed in such full measure. You recognize, as he did, that we live in a dangerous time when the survival and triumph of freedom are not self-evident. If freedom is to endure and expand, it will only be because we understand the lessons of history and the nature of the implacable enemy that confronts us globally. Having immersed yourself in these issues, you have helped this Nation apply these lessons to the many crises that we have faced together. As a result, the United States has been able to conduct itself in the 1980s in a way befitting a great Nation and the leader of the free world. Cap, you have my heartfelt gratitude for your incomparable service to our Nation. I know that as you return to the private sector, you will continue to champion the public policies that have kept our Nation strong, prosperous, and free.

With profound regret, but with unbounded admiration for all that you have accomplished for our country, I must now, because of personal family health problems with which you are familiar, ask that you relieve me of the responsibilities of this great office you entrusted to me nearly seven years ago.

It is a source of great gratification to me to reflect on how much you have changed for the better, the policies and indeed the whole agenda of the State and the Nation you have served so extraordinarily well for the nearly 20 years I have had the great privilege of working with you.

So many of the ideas and programs which, when you first presented them, were dismissed without serious consideration, are now fully accepted, and it is only the details of those new ideas and concepts that are debated.

Virtually alone, you reversed the idea that only government could solve problems, and that government could only solve problems by spending more money. You first proposed not only that taxes should be cut, but that the government's taxing power itself be limited, as a way to reduce the scope of government's power, and thus to increase the freedom of all. Also, virtually alone, you have challenged the incongruous and dangerous strategic concept that we are only safe when we are completely vulnerable to Soviet missiles. You have steadfastly kept us to the goal of deployment of your Strategic Defense Initiative, toward which we are making great progress, and you have refused all temptations, Soviet or otherwise, to be diverted from that deployment.

You never hesitated to take unpopular paths, nor to violate the conventional wisdom -- because you recognized that principle must come ahead of what is popular, and that the conventional wisdom is not always wise.

Your leadership and vision have restored America's military strength, and thus secured for us all the benefits of the freedom and the peace that can only be ours when we are strong. Our NATO Alliance and our other Allies are united and strong, and America is greatly respected again, and this too is part of the inspiration and leadership you have provided.

Most of all, it has been a continuing delight to serve with you all these years, to be buoyed by your unquenchable optimism, and to have shared in the fun of working with you as you changed the course of history.

I leave with great regret, but content in the knowledge that the nation under your leadership is far more secure, happier, and better than if you had not served us so well. I am grateful too, as I know the nation will be, that in Frank Carlucci as Secretary, and Will Taft continuing as the Deputy Secretary, you have chosen such a wise and capable Defense team, and together with Colin Powell as your Security Adviser, for whom I also have the greatest respect and admiration, you will have the benefit of one of the very best teams America can provide.

Godspeed to an old friend, the finest Secretary of Defense in the history of our nation, Cap Weinberger. And now, Cap, I'm going to take a few minutes to say exactly what I think about you. [Laughter] I know you don't go in for this sort of thing, but I'm still your Commander in Chief, so you'll just have to grin and bear it.

Courage, constancy, loyalty, together with uncommon brilliance, decisiveness, and determination -- these are the qualities that Cap Weinberger has brought not only to the Defense Department but to all the positions that he's held in service to our nation. That service didn't begin in the high halls of government here in Washington nor in the executive chambers in Sacramento. No, it began about as humbly as you can imagine: as a buck private in the Army.

When I picked Cap for the job, America's military had gone through years of indifference. And his budget was only one sign of this, and yet a true one. During a decade in which our principal adversary had built up its armed forces as never before, America had cut defense spending. The year Cap and I took office, for every dollar the Soviet Union invested in its military, the United States invested only 65 cents; by 1984 it was 92 cents. And, no, we haven't made up for the years of neglect even today, but the dollar gap is a lot smaller than it used to be, and there's no longer an indifference gap.

Some of you may have heard me tell about when I went to one of our military bases a couple of years ago and sat next to the base commander. He told me that the young men and women coming into the military were the best he'd ever seen -- the smartest, best educated, most motivated. Well, I've also been told that more reenlist than ever before in our history. We used to hear that all this was because of a weak economy, but it's kept up right through the longest and most widely shared peacetime economic expansion on record. I believe that the new enthusiasm of our soldiers, sailors, and marines has a lot to do with Cap's leadership. Once again the government treats those who defend America with respect. And, yes, once again our men and women in uniform know that America is proud of them and thankful for the work they do.

High morale won't be Cap's only legacy to our Armed Forces. When he was sworn in, not only was the government spending too little for America's defense, but too often what it did spend, it wasted. Four hundred dollar hammers, $9,000 wrenches were the kinds of longstanding abuses that Cap's tightfisted management uncovered and stopped. And I know Cap has taken heat for that very unjustly. If it hadn't been for his audits and his reviews, none of these abuses would have come to light.

Not only that, but in 1980 the annual rate of growth in the cost for major weapons systems was about 14 percent a year -- a sure sign that when it came to buying sophisticated hardware the lights may have been on at the Pentagon, but no one was home. And by 1984 that was down to less than 1 percent. And some major weapons are cheaper than ever before. Others may have forgotten -- I never did -- the guy I put in charge was also called Cap, the Knife.

The mission of those weapons makes more sense, as well. Cap has overseen a reexamination and reformulation of American strategy. And one result has been that today we're embarked on a Strategic Defense Initiative that holds the promise of shifting deterrence increasingly to defenses, which threatens no one.

It took a remarkable man to do all this. And from our first days together in California, I've always found Cap to be an outstanding thinker, leader, and adviser. Yes, I've been listening to his advice for more than two decades now. But then, I'm in good company. Cap first gave opinions as an occupation during the Second World War. After enlisting, as I said, as a private, he rose to captain and became an intelligence officer for General MacArthur. One night he was sent to wake the General -- and that's not an easy job to begin with -- and tell him that an enemy destroyer group had been spotted steaming toward an American invasion fleet. MacArthur asked the young captain for his assessment. Cap didn't hedge. He didn't play it safe. He said his judgment was that the enemy movement was a coincidence, that he didn't believe they'd detected our fleet, and that the invasion should go forward. MacArthur approved, and Cap proved right.

Well, many told him to forget it. The audience could be stacked against him, and a loss would be embarrassing. But he went ahead anyway, and he won. I've noticed that many people have rued the day they debated Cap.

Duty brought Cap to Washington. I know he didn't want to come when I called him 6\1/2\ years ago. But today American peace and freedom are stronger and safer, because, as always, he answered the call and he served. Cap, thank you. And Jane, a very, very special thanks to you.

Now, before going, let me say a word about the job still before us: to preserve and build upon all that's been accomplished here in these last 6\1/2\ years. We're about to conclude the first agreement to eliminate an entire class of nuclear missiles, because America is once again strong.

Frank, of course, served under Cap as Deputy Secretary of Defense during our first term. Before that, in over 30 years of government service, his assignments included Deputy Director of Central Intelligence, Ambassador to Portugal, as well as a number of senior domestic policy positions. This year he has served with unusual distinction as my national security adviser. And, Frank, congratulations.

And to replace Frank, I've chosen a seasoned professional and Frank's right-hand man here at the White House: Lieutenant General Colin Powell. General Powell has had a distinguished career in the field and at the highest levels of our government. Together with Frank, he helped design and direct the overhaul of the NSC staff. With him taking the helm, the NSC won't even break stride, and the team will remain intact. Colin, congratulations.

You know, this is quite a chore for me, standing up here as an ex-second lieutenant of horse cavalry. [Laughter] Before going to final goodbye, I want to extend my personal best wishes and congratulations to a great gentleman of the Senate who has played a leading role for many decades in keeping America strong and free. Today is the 40th anniversary of John Stennis' swearing-in as a Member of Congress. And as you know, Senator Stennis is retiring from the Senate. And America will miss him, but America is also grateful.

So, this is a day of mixed feelings for me. Two good men are taking new jobs, and I'm looking forward to continuing to work with them. But a great Senator will be retiring, and Cap is saddling up to head home. And, Cap, I close most of my speeches with the same words for the audience. Today, for America, I say them to you and to Jane: Thank you, and God bless you.

Weinberger. Thank you, Mr. President, Senator Stennis, and very distinguished ladies and gentlemen in the audience, and Frank and Colin, and all my friends. Normally, as you know, I think, I don't share my correspondence or recommendations to the President with anyone. But I thought I would, with your permission, sir, read a few excerpts from my letter to you today, because this is a pretty overwhelming day, and rather than making just a few short, unthought-through statements, I thought I would prefer to do this.

And so I would just say that with profound regret, but with unbounded admiration for all that you've accomplished for the country, I ask that you relieve me of the responsibilities of this great office that you entrusted to me nearly 7 years ago. And it's a source of great gratification to me to reflect on how much you have changed for the better the policies and, indeed, the whole agenda of the State and the Nation you've served so extraordinarily well for nearly 20 years.

So many of the ideas and programs that you first presented were dismissed without serious consideration, but they're now fully accepted, and it's only the details of those new ideas and those concepts that are debated. And virtually alone you reversed the idea that only government could solve problems and that you first proposed not only that taxes should be cut, but that the government's taxing power itself should be limited as a way to reduce the scope of government's power and thus increase the freedom of us all.

Also, virtually alone, you've challenged the incongruous and dangerous strategic concept that we're only safe when we're completely vulnerable to Soviet missiles. You've steadfastly kept us to the goal of deployment of your Strategic Defense Initiative, toward which we are making very great progress very rapidly. And you've refused all temptations, Soviet or otherwise, to be diverted from that deployment.

You've never hesitated to take unpopular paths nor to violate the conventional wisdom, because you recognize that principle must come ahead of what's popular and that the conventional wisdom is not always wise. Your leadership and vision have restored America's military strength and secured for all of us the benefits of freedom and the peace that could only be ours when we're strong.

NATO alliance and other allies are united and strong, and America is greatly respected again. And this, too, is part of the inspiration and the leadership you have provided. Most of all, it's been a continuing delight to serve with you all these years and to be buoyed by your unquenchable optimism and to have shared in the fun of working with you as you change the course of history.

I leave with great regret, but content in the knowledge that the Nation under your leadership is far more secure and happier and better than had you not served us. And I'm grateful, too, as I know the Nation will be, that in Frank Carlucci as Secretary and Will Taft continuing as the Deputy Secretary, you've chosen such a wise and capable defense team. And together with Colin Powell as your security advisor, for whom I have the very greatest respect and admiration, you will have the benefit of one of the very best teams America can provide.

Jane's day. And I'm just proud to be a part of it. You know, Mr. President, to you, Cap has been a loyal subordinate, a confidant, and a friend. To me, he's been an inspirational supervisor, colleague, confidant, and friend. You may lose a subordinate today, and I may lose a colleague, but we keep a confidant and a friend. I will continue to look to Cap for advice and guidance, and I want to express to Cap and Jane my heartfelt thanks for all the great support they have given me through the, I guess, 17 years that we have been associated.

And Mr. President, I'm comfortable in my relationship with you, and I know you will continue to give the Defense Department the same stalwart support you've always given it, comfortable in the relationship with your security team. And assuming I am confirmed, I know that, with many of the people assembled out here, the Defense Department will continue to provide you and America that same great service it has provided under Cap's leadership.

Let me just say a word of thanks to the NSC people here today. You've been absolutely great, and particularly to Colin Powell who has been a superb deputy. You have chosen well your national security adviser, Mr. President, and I look forward to working with him and you and all my colleagues in my new capacity.

Powell. Mr. President, Secretary Weinberger, Secretary-designate Carlucci, ladies and gentlemen -- Mr. President, I want to thank you for the confidence you have placed in me to succeed my distinguished boss and great friend Frank Carlucci, but at the same time, I share the sense of loss over the departure of Secretary Weinberger. At close hand for a number of years, I watched him use every ounce of energy everyday to push forward your defense program and the Nation's defense program. And as a field commander, I saw the results of those efforts in improved morale in soldiers and sailors and airmen and marines, who were well-trained, well-equipped, and ready for whatever they might face in the future. He will be greatly, greatly missed by those of us in uniform. But at the same time, I know that his work is being passed on to the very best hands in the land to carry on that work: Frank Carlucci.

Thank you very much. And I appreciate this opportunity to receive the report of the partnership and to thank all of you who've contributed to this study. It was 2 years ago when I first appointed 26 of you, distinguished citizens who would not take this issue lightly, to examine the status of child safety in America. This effort was launched during a time of anxiety and frustration over an escalating number of reports about the abuse, molestation, and abduction of children.

I asked for was more than just a reaffirmation that a problem exists. I'm looking forward, then, to reading your recommendations on how America should approach this issue and how all Americans can work together to prevent the victimization of children. Much care was taken to ensure that results-oriented, no-nonsense people were brought into this effort. Certainly, the last thing needed is a report predicated on the idea that government can solve this and every other problem, simply by spending more tax dollars or increasing the number of Federal bureaucrats whose official assignment is solving the problem.

Child safety is a broad and complex issue, as you have heard, and does not lend itself to easy answers and quick fixes. It's more than just abuse and neglect. It's also the exploitation of children through pornography and prostitution, the abduction of children, and the assault, robbery, and murder of children. It involves kids who run away from home or are turned out of their homes and youths who abuse drugs and alcohol.

You'll be glad to know that this month I'll be proposing legislation to Congress that will give law enforcement officials the help they need to crack down on child pornography and the exploitation of our children. The answer is not federalizing and bureaucratizing the problem. The answer is to bring into play the greatest force for good on this planet, and that is the active commitment of the American people. Your report will be another important step toward informing and mobilizing the citizenry.

It's a preeminent responsibility for the family to care for and raise its children and a preeminent responsibility of society to nurture and protect the institution of the family. We cannot make progress in this area without first admitting that many of the problems we face concerning the victimization of children stem from a breakdown of the family and the decline of certain moral values in America. These are problems that will require all of us to take a stand and to get involved.

September I issued an Executive order requiring all Federal departments and agencies to review existing and proposed legislation and regulations to make sure they don't undermine family values. From this end, you can count on me and the other leaders of our administration to consider seriously what impact the decisions we're making will have on the institution of the family, and that includes our decisions as to who will be appointed to the Supreme Court of the United States.

Jefferson once wrote: ``The fortune of our lives depends on employing well the short period of our youth.'' Well, that's what this report and the effort we're making is all about. We want all of America's children to reach their fullest potential, to reach adulthood capable of living life to its fullest and taking advantage of the tremendous freedom of our country. As I said earlier, this is not just government's job; it's up to all of us.

These are, of course, but just a few of the many wonderful examples of what Americans are voluntarily doing to better this country. Recently, it caught my attention that the Annie E. Casey Foundation will be giving $100 million to help America's children. One program being financed is specifically aimed at helping those kids at risk: teenagers who drop out of school and cannot find jobs, and pregnant young women.

Let me just note that this grant is coming from a foundation that was funded by one of America's great entrepreneurs, Jim Casey. The Foundation is named after his mother, who raised her children alone. Jim, in fact, had to quit school at the age of 11 to earn money to contribute to the family. He started delivering messages with a friend and eventually set up an office for his American Messenger Service in the basement of a saloon. With hard work and a commitment to excellence, Jim, starting from that humblest of beginnings, built one of this country's most successful business enterprises, United Parcel Service. He proved through his life that free enterprise is not only more efficient but that it fosters those human values which make this a good and a free land.

In his lifetime Jim Casey and his brothers and a sister, through the Casey family program, have helped a countless number of society's forgotten children. Jim died 5 years ago, and now a foundation that he endowed with hundreds of millions of dollars is a lasting tribute to this great American. He cared for kids he will never know. Jim is often quoted as saying, ``Determined people, working together, can do anything.'' Well, that is our challenge. So, thank you all for what you're doing to protect America's greatest national treasure, our children. And now Mario Machado will introduce the winners, and we'll present them with their awards.

Assistant to the President. Ms. Osborne will remain in the personal office of the President, where she has served as Special Assistant to the President since November 1985. Previously Ms. Osborne served for 4 years as Personal Secretary to the President. As Deputy Assistant, she will continue her duties in that capacity.

Congress sentenced to life imprisonment in 1964. The South African Government is to be congratulated for this gesture of conciliation toward the majority black population. The President hopes this action leads to a rapid process of negotiation designed to give all South Africans equal political and constitutional rights.

In welcoming Mr. Mbeki's release, the President renews our concern for the remaining political prisoners in South Africa such as Nelson Mandela, Walter Sisulu, and others who should be released so that the process of political change can be pursued with confidence and in a nonviolent manner.

The amount of such quota, if no special quota has been established under that section during the previous 12 months, is to be equal to 21 days of domestic mill consumption of upland cotton at the seasonally adjusted average rate of the most recent 3 months for which data are available and is to remain in effect for a 90-day period.

Twenty-one days of domestic mill consumption of upland cotton, which is any variety of the Gossypium hirsutum species of cotton, at the seasonally adjusted rate of the most recent 3 months for which data are available is 303,894,717 pounds.

The provisions of this Proclamation shall become effective on the day following the date of signature. The amendment made by this Proclamation to the Tariff Schedules of the United States shall expire on February 28, 1988.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 5th day of November, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

Community Education Day reminds us that schools and colleges are institutions strongly woven into the fabric of our cities and towns and that they should command the sustained interest of the citizenry. Public education is a community project, and the lifelong mission of education involves everyone in the community.

Businesses and industries become aware of what local educational institutions are offering students and consider how they can contribute their own resources and practical skills to enhance learning and provide educational opportunities for learners of all ages and educational backgrounds. Through outreach, receptiveness, and cooperation, our communities can and do become more firmly interwoven with our schools in a commitment to better education for all generations.

Members of the Task Force shall serve without any additional compensation for their work on the Task Force. However, members appointed from among private citizens of the United States may be allowed travel expenses, including per diem in lieu of subsistence, as authorized by law for persons serving intermittently in the government service, to the extent funds are available therefor.

The Task Force shall have a staff headed by an Executive Director. To the extent permitted by law and subject to the availability of funds therefor, the Executive Office of the President and the Department of the Treasury shall provide the Task Force with such administrative services, funds, facilities, staff, and other support service as may be necessary for the performance of its functions.

I'm old enough to have seen that era in which his generation and the generations earlier than that -- how it was taken and all. And how many of us would like to have everything we did when we were younger put on the book?

The President. Yes, and I'm satisfied with his statement. He was not an addict, and he was nothing of that kind, and -- few experimentations -- I'm sure there were a great many people who did that -- that particular period.

United States Supreme Court. Judge Ginsburg's qualifications were obvious: valedictorian of his class at Cornell University; a brilliant student at the University of Chicago Law School; 8 years as a professor at the Harvard Law School, where he taught and wrote about the pressing legal and policy issues of the day concerning various areas of economic regulation, such as broadcasting and banking as well as antitrust law; 3 years in high government posts, including service as Assistant Attorney General to the United States; then nomination and unanimous Senate confirmation last year to the United States Court of Appeals for the District of Columbia circuit, one of the most important and prestigious of the Federal Courts of Appeal -- and all this by the age of 40.

Obviously, remarkable credentials, but in the last day or so we've learned something else about Judge Ginsburg, something that tells us about the times we live in, about the reality of youthful error, and something that will -- according to how we react to this news -- tell us about the kind of people we are ourselves. You know, since the Republic began, the American people and those in public life have had to deal with the issue raised by this recent news.

Many of our most prominent public servants -- throughout our history and in recent times -- have had to acknowledge errors they made in their youth or even more serious errors committed when they were older. And yet if that public servant showed a sincere sense of regret and a firm purpose of amendment, the American people have always answered unhesitatingly: Continue to serve us. Well, get on with your life; we understand and forgive. And we expect great things of you. In the case of Judge Ginsburg, I think the American people will be no less compassionate and no less wise. Judge Ginsburg erred in his youth. He has acknowledged it. He has expressed his regrets. So, yes, sometimes youth can have its drawbacks, but let us remember that throughout the history of our Republic it has also shown itself to great advantage.

You know, at a Cabinet meeting earlier this week, I was remarking that Judge Ginsburg will be joining the list of remarkable Supreme Court Justices nominated at a relatively early age: Chief Justice John Marshall, nominated at the age of 45; Justice John Marshall Harlen, author of the dissent in Plessy versus Ferguson that laid the basis for the landmark decision in Brown versus the Board of Education, nominated at the age of 44; Justice William O. Douglas, a judge we conservatives often disagreed with, but whose intelligence we respected, nominated at the age of 40; and Justice Byron White, one of the finest minds on the Court today and quite a backfield man also -- [laughter] -- nominated at the age of 44. Well, as I say, I was going through this list when Education Secretary Bennett spoke up. Leave it to Bill Bennett, the former teacher. ``Mr.

I nominated Judge Ginsburg, and we're all here today not just because of his professional qualifications but, most important, there is his legal philosophy of judicial restraint. Judge Ginsburg believes -- as I do and as do you, as do all those who have a proper and balanced understanding of the American system of government -- that it is the role of the courts to interpret the law, not to make it. And this goes to the very root of what we Americans believe. For to the extent that judges make the law -- no matter how high or fine their intentions -- to that extent, we cease to be a democracy governed by the people and become governed instead by the very few. This is not what the Founders like Madison intended. To keep faith with their noble experiment in democracy, to keep faith with the generations of Americans who for two centuries have labored and sacrificed to keep this nation free, American judges must submit themselves to the Constitution and the original intent of those who founded it. Judge Ginsburg believes in keeping that faith.

Then there is a second matter. I have mentioned Judge Ginsburg's academic credentials, but there is also his dedication to the cause of justice best evidenced by his record as Assistant Attorney General. As head of the Department of Justice's Antitrust Division, Assistant Attorney General Ginsburg made criminal enforcement the Division's first priority. Under his leadership, the Antitrust Division filed criminal charges against 87 corporations and 80 individuals. And by the time I nominated Assistant Attorney General Ginsburg to the Court of Appeals, the Antitrust Division was conducting a record number of grand jury investigations of antitrust felonies.

Attorney General Ginsburg also initiated a special effort to uncover bid-rigging in connection with Federal procurement, in particular, on procurements for the Department of Defense. This effort led to more than 30 grand jury investigations into possible bid-rigging and price-fixing on contracts at military installations across the country, and in time it's certain to save the American taxpayers millions, if not billions, of dollars.

Ginsburg has thus put into actual practice his belief in the fair and firm administration of justice; in justice that respects the rights of criminals, but that respects as well the rights of victims of crime and of society itself. Dedication to the cause of justice, a brilliant mind, remarkable and extensive experience in the legal profession -- in short, Judge Ginsburg can become a great member of the Court.

I think we're fortunate to have this nominee, and I would hope that we would act expeditiously to assure that he can join his colleagues on the Circuit Court.'' And the name of the Senator who made that statement: Edward Kennedy.

That's the type of dedication we've seen in Judge Ginsburg: a complete commitment to his profession and to those judicial principles that have guided this country for over 200 years. In its place, of course, the struggle between political parties and political points of view is important, even vital, to the health of the Nation. But the Federal judiciary is not that place.

On the contrary, the Federal judiciary must remain impartial in order to command the respect of the Nation and to ensure that we remain governed by laws properly enacted, not by the views of whatever group happens to hold temporary power. Our Founders understood and intended this from the first. In the words of Alexander Hamilton: ``The complete independence of the courts of justice is essential in our Constitution.'' This places upon the Senate an obligation of the utmost importance. For in confirming a nominee to a seat on the Supreme Court, the Senate must set politics aside, apprising a nominee in an atmosphere of reason and calm.

And as I said in announcing my selection of Judge Ginsburg, the confirmation hearings should begin promptly. The integrity of the nomination process and the independence of the judiciary demand that hearings be held within the next few weeks. Moreover, it's critical that the Supreme Court, with its increasingly burdensome caseload, be put back to full strength. Justice Powell's seat has now been vacant for over 4 months -- one of the longest vacancies ever.

What it comes down to is this: It is my duty, according to my oath of office, to ensure the integrity of the nomination process and the independence of the judiciary. With Judge Ginsburg soon to be before the Senate, I am determined to use all the powers at my disposal as President to do just that. One other thing that repeatedly is being said over and over again about Judge Bork and now about this judge already: that somehow this single new Justice would just totally undo everything that has ever been done that's right and would take positions that would just turn around our country. And we've heard that same Senator that I quoted speak about all the things that would happen to the people of America.

Court who would do those things if they had a fifth vote to make them a majority. Well, I feel that we've got a Supreme Court that's been doing pretty well by us for quite some time. And I wonder if we shouldn't just start thinking about -- can one man do all those horrible things that they suggest unless he's got four more horrible men on the Court with him?

During wartime and peacetime American women in every branch of the Armed Forces have defended our country and our ideals with devotion and distinction. Such service, of course, is neither easy nor without risk. As veterans, these women continue to contribute to our Nation in civilian life. The week in which Veterans Day falls is a most appropriate time to offer women veterans our heartfelt respect and thanks for their part in preserving our freedom and security.

This week we also remember that our gratitude as a Nation must include meeting women veterans' special needs and concerns. With the help of its Advisory Committee on Women Veterans, the Veterans' Administration has sought creative, effective ways to do this. National Women Veterans Recognition Week is a fine time to both redouble our efforts and express our appreciation.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 6th day of Nov., in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

Bread, the staff of life, both gives and symbolizes sustenance. Until recent decades the American people baked their bread at home, and today many families enjoy this tradition, not simply for its wholesome nutrition but also for its rich association with the well-being and security of family life.

Baking bread at home provides a nutritious and delicious food and uses many products of American agriculture, such as wheat, rye, corn, dairy products, sugar, eggs, and other ingredients. Beside contributing to the physical needs of the family, baking bread at home can nourish its strength and unity as well, and teach and tell much about American traditions and values.

America, do hereby proclaim the month of November 1987 as National Family Bread Baking Month. I call upon the people of the United States to observe this month with appropriate ceremonies and activities.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this sixth day of November, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

Last week, news from the Philippines reminded us all of both the friendship of the Filipino people and their struggles. The gesture of friendship came when Philippine President Corazon Aquino paid a visit to Clark Air Base outside of Manila to attend a memorial service for American airmen slain by terrorists. I have told President Aquino how much all Americans appreciate her thoughtfulness. These murders bring home to all of us the troubles and threats that the new Philippine democracy faces.

Twenty months ago, we applauded as President Corazon Aquino's peaceful revolution began moving the Philippines back toward popular rule. Since then, President Aquino has been more successful than many believed was possible. Within this last year-and-a-half, she has led a successful campaign to ratify a new, more democratic constitution, and she has overseen the first free congressional elections in 15 years -- elections in which an overwhelming majority of the people participated. Now she's working with the newly elected Congress to solve that nation's serious economic problems.

Aquino believes, as I do, that free enterprise is the most powerful engine of economic progress known to humanity. She has inaugurated an ambitious reform program that has ended a sharp recession and boosted annual economic growth to 5 percent. She has begun to reform the tax system, dismantle monopolies, privatize or eliminate inefficient government-owned industries, and reduce barriers to international trade and investment.

The single most serious threat to the survival of democratic government in the Philippines remains the Communist insurgency. As a result of the restoration of democracy, that insurgency has lost political momentum; still it continues, becoming more violent as it becomes more desperate. But even as she confronts the threat of Communist guerrillas, President Aquino must also rebuild the Philippine Armed Forces. She has had to reassert the principle of civilian supremacy over the military, while at the same time resolve honest differences over how best to defeat the Communist insurgency. Not everyone in the military has been happy about the new civilian role. President Aquino has faced five attempted coups since taking office.

I've made it clear to all concerned that Filipino democracy and President Aquino have America's full support. We hope all elements in the Philippine Government, both civilian and military, will work together to find common ground. Division between government and its armed forces can only help the Communist insurgents, who are bent on destruction of freedom and democracy in the Philippines.

Few countries are as strategically important to the United States as the Philippines, and we have a moral obligation to help all democracies succeed. That's why I have recently underscored to American business leaders that the United States is committed to Philippine economic recovery. I told them that we believe there are great opportunities for American investors in the Philippines, and I reminded them that, while building the economy, our men and women of enterprise will also be helping to build a stable and democratic future for that nation.

I've also asked Congress to help. I've requested substantial economic and military assistance for the Philippines. While we'd like to do more, budgetary constraints may limit what we can do, but this is one area where we can't afford to cut corners. The people of the Philippines are counting on us. One way Congress could do a lot is to reform our sugar program, as I proposed earlier this year. We will work with President Aquino to build a safer home for democracy in the Philippines. Most of the responsibility belongs to the people of the Philippines, but we can and will lend a hand.

Now, let me turn for a moment to another area of the world where brave men and women are working for democracy. I mean Central America. This week the Guatemala peace accord went into effect. The world is waiting to see if the Sandinistas in Nicaragua keep the promises they made to the other Central American Governments when they signed that agreement.

Will they fulfill both the letter and spirit of the agreement? In particular, will they institute the steps necessary for the democratization of Nicaragua? Will they allow freedom to prosper as the agreements demand? Will they begin the process of national reconciliation? And will they take full steps, not partial steps? The United States will be watching to see if the Sandinistas were sincere when they signed the Guatemala accord or if their signature was just one more propaganda ploy.

It was with regret that I received today Judge Douglas Ginsburg's decision to withdraw his name from further consideration for the United States Supreme Court. Judge Ginsburg believes that a prolonged confirmation process will not benefit the Nation or the Court. I commended Judge Ginsburg for his record and qualifications when I announced his selection, and I commend his selflessness and clear thinking now. I will move promptly to name another nominee to fill the vacancy on the Supreme Court.

Well, as you may know, I grew up in a small town in northern Illinois, where every day you saw a neighbor helping neighbor. It was an accepted part of the running of a successful community. And, yes, from our earliest days in Hollywood to our current jobs, Nancy and I have tried to carry this spirit with us. Through our administration's private sector initiatives program, we've been able to see how -- when free of the restricting hand of government -- the private sector can respond enthusiastically to the needs of the community. Of course, I don't need to tell any of you how successful Nancy's programs with foster grandparents and Just Say No have been. And believe me, Nancy and I know that this is due in large part to your own heartfelt contributions.

One of the most rewarding things about having the job I have is that I get to see the dynamic spirit of neighbor helping neighbor at work in our country. I see hope in the faces of the Americans -- through volunteer tutors, they've learned to read. I see the eyes shining bright with expectation of those young people graduating from high school who, through the care of those like you, may have the opportunity for a better future. But most of all, I see it in the renewed spirit of those Americans who are doing the giving and helping, the ones who've chosen to get involved, to take action, to make a contribution.

For example, in the tornado-ravaged community of Saragosa, Texas, the citizens there had lost hope. Then hundreds of volunteers poured into the town to rebuild not just homes but lives. This same spirit was also obvious in the now-celebrated rescue of little Jessica McClure, whose one precious life commanded the attention of not only an entire community of volunteers but also a nation anxiously awaiting her return to safety.

Nothing makes me prouder as I travel abroad than when leaders of other nations ask me to share our formula for success in encouraging private sector initiatives. I believe that formula is summed up most adequately by the plaque hanging near the front entrance to this building. It reads: ``To increase the organized capacity of people to care for one another.'' Well, together in America we have continued to foster an economic and social environment that encourages giving. And I'm very proud to say that this includes not only individual giving but corporate giving, voluntarism, and the development of public-private partnerships.

Of course, it's a growing American economy that helps to make all this possible -- that's right, I said a growing economy. For despite the adjustments in the stock market, the economic basis in our country remains strong. Consider, for example, that during the third quarter, which ended in September, the gross national product in constant dollars rose at a 3.8 percent annual rate, spurred by business-fixed investment, which was soaring at an extraordinary 24 percent.

And just last week, we found that inflation, as measured by the GNP implicit price deflator, rose only 2.4 percent. The unemployment rate was falling to its lowest level since 1979. Manufacturing jobs had risen by over a quarter million during the past 12 months, adding to the astonishing 14.2 million jobs created during the past 59 months of economic expansion. Exports were actually up at more than a 16 percent annual rate. And the Federal budget deficit for the fiscal year 1987 had fallen by a full third from one year earlier, to its lowest levels since 1982.

This is a record to build on, because there is still much more to be done. Your spirit of cooperation is the same spirit America wants from those of us in government. Yes, the stock market has tossed and turned the past several weeks. After more than 5 years of a roaring bull market, some adjustments were to be expected. And while the financial markets have recovered somewhat. The lingering uncertainty and volatility are cause for concern. Now is not the time to reverse course; however, some adjustments can and should be made.

I have stated all my political life that deficit spending must be controlled. And that's why I have consented to negotiate with Congress to see if we can jointly produce a credible package that will further cut, and I hope eliminate our deficits. But with our administration's economic program in place -- perhaps most important of all, our tax reform and reduction in marginal rates -- America is still a very good place to do business, still a land of jobs and opportunity, making possible record levels of charitable contributions.

Way of America is demonstrating to the world how a caring nation can unite to help the less fortunate among us. Through your agencies and volunteers, you've met the challenge I set forth to you one year ago magnificently. I urge you to continue to build on this momentum. We must set our sights even higher as we look forward to the future. After all, it's our nature to set higher and higher goals; we're Americans.

It's been a privilege for me to come here today to share the encouraging news of your progress. And as we've seen today, since 1981 that overall funding for the United Way has risen -- as you've been told by Jim -- 45 percent, while certain key services have shown much greater growth. For example, funding for services to women is up 500 percent. Child welfare programs are up 198 percent. Services for the elderly up 100 percent. And funds going to substance abuse have increased 89 percent for this period.

Well, that stuck with me, and so that a little more than a year ago we had been hearing for some time from our friends and allies around the world. And then a meeting was held in Paris, France, of nations that had invited our people to come there and tell them how to institute programs such as this, programs of private giving. And now it is going on and spreading throughout the world.

I went to the economic summit in Italy last summer and did a little sideline visit at an invitation to address a group that was meeting. Yes, there were Americans present, but it was the new Italian society to now bring about private sector initiatives and do things by private giving of the people.

And you know how successful you are? There is not a government program in America to help the people in any way that has as low an overhead as you do. I was horrified once when I was Governor of California to discover that one program at least of the government spent $2 to deliver $1 to a needy person. Well, not you. Ninety percent or more of every dollar raised goes directly to help the people for which that money was raised.

Today in Geneva the United States and the Soviet Union will begin formal, stage-by-stage negotiations on nuclear testing. I have long advocated a logical approach to nuclear testing limitations which preserves our national security interests while achieving verifiable agreements with the Soviet Union. I am gratified that we have now agreed on this step-by-step approach.

As a first step, the United States and the Soviet Union will negotiate improved verification measures for two existing but unratified nuclear testing treaties, the Threshold Test Ban Treaty and the Peaceful Nuclear Explosions Treaty. Once our verification concerns have been satisfied and the treaties ratified, we will propose that the United States and the Soviet Union immediately enter into negotiations on ways to implement a step-by-step program -- in association with a program to reduce and ultimately eliminate all nuclear weapons -- of limiting and ultimately ending nuclear testing.

It is important to recall at this time that our nuclear deterrent has for over 40 years kept the peace. As successful as this policy has been, I believe we cannot be content for the indefinite future with a deterrence relationship based exclusively on the threat of offensive retaliation. We must continue our search through our Strategic Defense Initiative for a means of deterring aggression through increased reliance on defenses that threaten no one.

For as long as we must continue to rely on nuclear weapons for our security, however, we must ensure that those weapons are safe, secure, reliable, effective, and survivable -- in other words, that our nuclear deterrent remains credible. This requires nuclear testing, as permitted by existing treaties. It is only within the context of decreasing reliance on nuclear weapons that we can look forward to a time when our needs for nuclear testing would also decrease. That is my objective and one the United States is prepared to work energetically toward.

I realize that I'm holding up dessert, but I won't promise to sit down right away. On behalf of the American people, I want to welcome you all to our Nation's Capital. It's a great pleasure to have this opportunity to meet with you today.

I think it's sometimes true that we don't recognize the great historical moments until they're passed. When released from the daily struggles, we can look back and assess the full magnitude of what we have accomplished. I believe that this last decade is one such time -- a time that will be recorded in history as a great democratic awakening in the Americas, when the nations of this hemisphere advanced together toward a new era of freedom.

A new era of freedom: We see it developing in the free trade agreement between this nation and our great neighbor to the north -- an agreement, it's my fervent hope, that will not be an end in itself, but the beginning of a revolution in free trade that will embrace not just the United States and Canada but the entire hemisphere.

A new era of freedom: We see it stoutly defended by the Caribbean democracies, small in land size, perhaps, but big in heart and will, who, with courage and idealism, stood fast and stood together when one of their number, Grenada, was threatened by an alien, hostile tyranny.

A new era of freedom: We see it throughout Central and South America -- the great democratic awakening that in the last 10 years has brought 90 percent of the people of Latin America into the family of democratic nations.

Last month at the OAS, I spoke of what a great honor it was to address so many colleagues, in the democratic enterprise. That's no less true today. And one of the great privileges of my office is that I have been able, in the last several years, to meet with the leaders of practically every democratic nation in the hemisphere. When they've visited me in the White House, the talk was of the usual business transacted between heads of state. But when all that was done, there was one personal note that I had to add, something as important as anything else we discussed, something that comes directly from the heart.

The history of the hemisphere and the relations between our country and Latin America -- they've not always been easy. But the days of the Colossus of the North, I have said on those occasions: Those days are over they're gone forever. The dominance of democracy in Latin America has fundamentally altered the hemisphere. The precedent we must look to today is the one I'm reminded of by your own leaders, stories of men such as Francisco de Miranda of Venezuela, who fought in the Battle of Pensacola in our nation's war of Independence, the battle that paved the way for Cornwallis' surrender at Yorktown; or the story of General Artigas, supported by our new democracy in his independent battle against colonial Portugal. These men shared a single faith -- faith in the democratic destiny in the Americas, faith in the -- well, they knew all the American wars of independence were really one and the same -- the struggle of mankind to fulfill his destiny of freedom.

Today those independence struggles still continue. Brave men still fight to throw off an alien tyranny imposed from outside our hemisphere. As [President of El Salvador] Jose Napoleon Duarte said, there are two revolutionary processes underway in Central America. One is a democratic revolution to replace the dictatorships of the past with freedom and human rights. The other, he said, is a revolution that looks to substitute traditional dictatorships with a new dictatorship, that looks to substitute the traditional caudillos with the new caudillos of the totalitarian left.

I've spoken at length of the Sandinistas and their failure to live up to the promises of democracy and human rights they made to the OAS in 1979. There's no need to repeat that record of broken promises today. The business at hand is to determine compliance with the Guatemala accord, to examine, with clear-eyed realism, the progress of peace and democracy in Central America.

As we look at how the Guatemala accord has been implemented to date, one can't help but conclude that the differences between the democracies and the Communists in Central America have never been so apparent. Basic to the Central American peace plan is an understanding that peace will only emerge in Central America when genuine steps are taken by all sides toward reconciliation and democracy.

That's the democratic temperament, the true spirit of reconciliation. Contrast that to the partial and grudging release of prisoners in Nicaragua. Thousands of political prisoners still remain in their jails. Many of them have languished there for as long as 8 years, and the Sandinistas have said there are thousands who will never be released. Well, that's the voice of totalitarianism.

The contrast is just as stark on the question of negotiations. The Nicaraguan freedom fighters ask no more than the democratic guarantees contained in the peace plan. All they want is a chance to compete peacefully for power in Nicaragua, in a democratic way.

But the Communist guerrillas -- the FMLN in El Salvador and the URNG in Guatemala -- want no part of democracy. They were offered a chance to compete for power within the democratic process, but they refused it. They broke off negotiations, demanding power without elections. Well, I'm sorry, that's just not the democratic way.

We see the contrast between democracy and communism in another area, too. Despite the clear requirements of the Guatemala accord, the Sandinistas still refuse to lift their state of emergency. President Duarte and President Cerezo [of Guatemala], whose countries are also torn by violence, make no excuses. They have no state of emergency. Only in Nicaragua is the state of emergency still in effect.

There is, however, one hopeful sign. I welcome the designation of Cardinal Obando y Bravo as the mediator between the Sandinista regime and the Nicaraguan resistance. I have repeatedly said that the struggle in Nicaragua is fundamentally a contest among Nicaraguans over their own future, and that can only be resolved by negotiations between Nicaraguans. The indirect talks the Sandinistas have now agreed to are a way to start that process. It remains clear that the next step must be direct negotiations, of precisely the sort that President Cerezo and President Duarte have already conducted.

United States has a role to play, as a neighbor of Central America and an ally of the region's four democracies and of the Nicaraguan people. Our goals are simple to state: democracy in Nicaragua and peace in the region. And clearly, there can be no peace in the region until there is democracy in Nicaragua.

When serious negotiations between the Sandinistas and the freedom fighters, under the mediation of Cardinal Obando, are underway, Secretary [of State] Shultz will be ready to meet jointly with the foreign ministers of all five Central American nations, including the Sandinistas' representative. Before such a meeting and throughout this period, we will consult closely with the freedom fighters, for the key to democracy and peace in the region is freedom and national reconciliation in Nicaragua.

Regional negotiations including the United States can be a helpful adjunct to negotiations among the Central American nations and between the Sandinistas and the freedom fighters. They cannot be a substitute. The Central American democracies will speak for themselves about their national interests, and the Sandinistas must negotiate directly with the freedom fighters and the internal opposition to bring about true democracy and national reconciliation in Nicaragua.

Well, democracy is the key -- and one of the best indications of democratic reform is a free press. The Guatemala accord is clear on this point: It doesn't call for opening only one opposition paper. It calls for complete freedom of the press, radio, and television. The Central American democracies are in compliance with the accord -- Nicaragua is nowhere near. So far, only La Prensa is allowed to operate and even it is restricted in reporting military and economic news. Radio Catolica has been forbidden to broadcast news. There is still no independent television broadcasting in Nicaragua, and the many other news outlets remain closed.

Let me just say here: We have all been very patient in giving the peace process time to work. The Wright-Reagan plan was scheduled to take effect on September 30th. The original deadline for compliance with the Guatemala accord was this week.

President Arias was honored with the Nobel Peace Prize for his central role in putting together the Guatemala accord. And I am certain that President Arias saw this as a symbol and inspiration to all those working for peace in this hemisphere. But this noble beginning must have a noble end. In that, the OAS has a special responsibility. For, as I said when I addressed your Ambassadors last month, the OAS has already made a negotiated settlement with the Sandinistas, one that we are duty-bound to keep. In 1979, in an unprecedented action, we helped remove a sitting government and bring the Sandinistas to power.

As part of that settlement, we promised the people of Nicaragua that we would see to it that their hope of freedom would not be disappointed. We can not walk away from that promise now. As President Arias has said: We can accept no substitute for democracy in Nicaragua. Only democracy will fulfill our promises to the Nicaraguan people. Only democracy, and nothing less, will bring peace to Central America.

Now, as all of you are aware, there's a summit meeting coming up between myself and General Secretary Gorbachev. We hope at that time to sign an historic agreement that would wipe out an entire class of nuclear missiles. But as we always do in our talks with the Soviets, we will continue to insist on progress in the other three critical areas: expanded contacts between our peoples, human rights, and most importantly, a negotiated end to regional conflicts around the world.

Today, even as their economy flags at home, the Soviets spend billions to maintain or impose Communist rule abroad, projecting Soviet power by largely military means. Eastern Europe, Cuba, Vietnam, South Yemen, Angola, Ethiopia, Mozambique, Nicaragua, and Afghanistan -- the burden must be enormous. But Soviet leaders, who live vastly better than their people, are willing to make that sacrifice because it is only their military might, they know, that gives them superpower status.

Numbers vary, but one study by the Rand Corporation estimated that in 1983 between 3.56 and 4.44 percent of the Soviet gross national product went to subsidize states supporting Soviet aims. It's estimated that the Soviet war on Afghanistan costs them between $5 billion and $6 billion a year. The Soviet bloc has supplied some $2 billion in military hardware to the Sandinistas alone.

I meet with General Secretary Gorbachev, I will ask him: Isn't it time to reconsider this adventurism abroad? In the spirit of glasnost, isn't it time that the Soviet Union put an end to these destructive, wasteful conflicts around the world? Without an end to Soviet efforts to impose totalitarian regimes through force of arms, there will never be a true glasnost, true openness, between this nation and ours.

I thank you for your attention. The next few months will be among the most crucial in the history of our hemisphere. As the peace process unfolds, we must be vigilant and, at the same time, we must be honest with ourselves and with the world. We shall be holding all parties to one single and true standard, the standard of democracy. As free peoples of the Americas, we have earned the right to proclaim that standard and hold others to it. And as free people of the Americas, we can do no less.

And on my trip, I wasn't there to say that. I said I didn't have any plan; that I came down to see what ideas you might have, because my idea was that it is high time that in this -- two continents and that connecting bridge of Central America -- here, unique in all the world, we had the opportunity to literally make our borders meeting places where all of us together as allies, from the tip of Tierra del Fuego to the North Pole, we are all Americans; we occupy the American continents and Central America. And if we could come together, as we should, with our common heritage of pioneering that brought us here -- people with a dream of freedom that left their homelands all over the world to come to these continents that the Lord had left here between the oceans to be found by that kind of people -- if we could be the neighbors and the allies that we should be, we would be a force for good in the world beyond anything that had ever seen.

I was only asking for suggestions and help that maybe we could bring that about. And here I am, in the midst of the representatives of the Organization of American States. And that's why I think this one issue is so important to all of us -- because it literally can block that dream of an American alliance from pole to pole.

Because of the special conditions in Payson, I am signing this bill. I wish to make it clear that this is an exception and should not be considered a precedent for other cases. The people of this country are entitled to receive full value for the disposal of their Federal lands, and I intend to do what I can to achieve this result.

I am pleased to transmit to the Congress, pursuant to sections 123 b. and 123 d. of the Atomic Energy Act of 1954, as amended (42 U.S.C. 2153 (b), (d)), the text of a proposed Agreement for Cooperation Between the Government of the United States of America and the Government of Japan Concerning Peaceful Uses of Nuclear Energy, including an implementing agreement pursuant to Article 11 of the proposed agreement. I am also pleased to transmit my written approval, authorization and determination concerning the agreement, and the Nuclear Proliferation Assessment Statement by the Director of the United States Arms Control and Disarmament Agency concerning the agreement. The joint memorandum submitted to me by the Departments of State and Energy, which includes a summary of the provisions of the agreement, the views of the Director of the United States Arms Control and Disarmament Agency, and an analysis of the approvals and consents contained in the agreement, including the implementing agreement, and associated subsequent arrangements are also enclosed.

I also enclose for your information the texts of a proposed subsequent arrangement under the United States-Norway Revised Agreement for Cooperation Concerning Peaceful Uses of Nuclear Energy and a proposed subsequent arrangement under the United States-EURATOM Additional Agreement for Cooperation Concerning Peaceful Uses of Atomic Energy. These subsequent arrangements are designed to give effect to certain provisions of the United States-Japan implementing agreement and will enter into force only after the agreement enters into force. They are being processed by the Department of Energy in accordance with the applicable provisions of the Atomic Energy Act of 1954, as amended.

The proposed agreement with Japan, including the implementing agreement, has been negotiated in accordance with the Nuclear Non-Proliferation Act of 1978 (NNPA). In my judgment it meets all statutory requirements. It will supersede our 1968 agreement with Japan and, given the magnitude of our long-standing cooperation with Japan in the peaceful uses of nuclear energy, will represent the most significant achievement to date in our program initiated pursuant to section 404 (a) of the NNPA to update all existing agreements for peaceful nuclear cooperation to include the more stringent standards established by that Act.

I believe that the new agreement will strengthen the basis for continued close cooperation between the United States and Japan in the peaceful nuclear area and that it will further the non-proliferation and other foreign policy interests of the United States. The implementing agreement provides Japan advance, long-term consent for reprocessing, transfers, alteration, and storage of nuclear material subject to the agreement, provided that the reprocessing and subsequent use of the recovered plutonium meet and continue to meet the criteria set out in U.S. law, including criteria relating to safeguards and physical protection. These arrangements should enable Japan to plan for its long-term energy needs on a more assured, predictable basis, while at the same time embodying the most advanced concepts of physical security and safeguards of any agreement. This step forward in our cooperative relations with Japan will be consistent with the NNPA's injunction to take such actions as are required to confirm the reliability of the United States as a nuclear supplier consistent with non-proliferation goals.

Japan is not only a close ally of the United States but is also a party to the Treaty on the Non-Proliferation of Nuclear Weapons and has long been one of the strongest supporters of the international non-proliferation regime.

Moreover, the United States and Japan have a substantial identity of views and intentions with regard to preventing nuclear proliferation and are prepared to work together on measures that will contribute to the prevention of proliferation consistent with the peaceful uses of nuclear energy. An exchange of letters between the United States and Japan, the text of which is included in the agreement package, sets forth in detail our shared views on non-proliferation.

The unnamed White House and administration officials quoted in today's New York Times article on the dollar were not speaking for the administration. The United States continues to cooperate closely with its G - 7 [economic summit participants] allies to promote exchange rate stability.

Reagan. Mr. President, Mrs. Herzog, distinguished guests, shalom [hello]. I am very pleased and honored to extend a warm welcome to you, Mr. President, and to Mrs. Herzog on this historic occasion: the first state visit ever by a President of the State of Israel to the White House. Your visit is also a special event, because it takes place during the 40th anniversary year of the independence of the State of Israel. Americans are proud, indeed, that on May 15, 1948, the United States was the first country to extend diplomatic recognition to the State of Israel. Your visit emphasizes the close and special relationship between our two countries.

President, modern Israel was born in the aftermath of the tragedy of the holocaust and the calamity of the Second World War. It was created to fulfill the longstanding dream of the Jewish people to return to the home of their biblical origins. This dream came true because of the courage and determination of the Jewish people, both those already resident in Palestine and those who survived the Nazi death camps in Europe. The hopes for freedom, for independence, for an end to centuries of persecution were instilled in the State of Israel.

Today these values are reflected in the search for a just and lasting peace in the Middle East. We share the conviction that Israel can be secure and realize its full promise and genius only when security and lasting peace are achieved. The United States remains undeterred in the quest for such a peace, a negotiated settlement of the Arab-Israeli conflict that would assure the security and well-being of the people of Israel and its Arab neighbors.

We're encouraged by the progress that has been made in this noble endeavor. It was 10 years ago this month that President Sadat visited Jerusalem. Peace between Israel and Egypt created a new reality, proving that reconciliation between former enemies is possible. The past decade has shown the benefits of this peace to the peoples of Egypt and Israel. We want to work with Israel and its other neighbors to expand the horizon of peace and find a just solution for the Palestinian people. We want to see an end to the scourge of international terrorism. We want to see an end to the conflict in the Persian Gulf, and to the war between Iran and Iraq.

President, we know that the people of Israel share these desires with the people of the United States. Together we also share a commitment to create better lives for all peoples of the world. Israel has provided leadership in harnessing science and technology to human needs, as is reflected in the great strides you've made in agriculture and industry.

We're united by a common commitment to the universality of human rights. This is why America has championed the cause of Soviet Jews in their struggle for religious freedom and right, if they wish, to emigrate. We have rejoiced with you in the release of Natan Scharanskiy, Ida Nudel, Vladimir Slepak, and others. Yet we know that many others, less well-known but equally entitled to enjoy these basic liberties, remain behind, still constrained by the Soviet system. I pledge to you that we will persevere in our efforts to persuade the Soviet Union to meet its international obligations under the Helsinki accords not just to Soviet Jews but to all the citizens of the Soviet Union.

Ambassador, of course, was you, sir, and it will always be a source of pride for all Americans that on that day our own Ambassador to the United Nations stood squarely at your side. That's how it was, Mr. President, and that's how it will be. For the people of Israel and America are historic partners in the global quest for human dignity and freedom. We will always remain at each other's side.

Herzog. Mr. President, as I stand here on this momentous occasion, I can sense the movement of the wings of history. I arrive here on the occasion of the 40th anniversary year of our establishment as a free and independent state, an event which righted an historic wrong to our people over the centuries.

Mr. President, at moments such as these, words are inadequate in which to express the sense of gratitude which the citizens of Israel feel towards this great country for its ongoing support in our struggle.

Like the United States, our small country, too, acquired its independence in bloody battle and gained its strength by providing a haven for the poor, the downtrodden, and the homeless. Despite the enormous differences in size and population, we are bound together in a partnership of such profound significance, a partnership which transcends the normal friendship existing between friendly nations. For ours is an alliance born of an identity of purpose and the principles of democracy, which are the cornerstones of our two societies.

I stand here and see the work of the hand of providence. For this year, as you have mentioned, sir, marks the anniversary -- 49 years ago -- of the Nazi onslaught on the Jewish people in Germany in ``kristallnacht,'' the ``night of the crystals,'' in which synagogues throughout Germany were put to fire. The Holy Bible and the scrolls of our Holy Torah, recording the five books of Moses, bearing the message of civilization and humanity, were burned in bonfires, ignited by barbarians outside the burning synagogues. The streets of Germany were covered in a film of crystals, created by the broken glass of Jewish synagogues, schools, homes, and stores, marking the headlong rush of Europe toward the abyss which led to the darkest years of the eclipse of civilization. In those nightmare years, one third of the Jewish people were destroyed in the most terrifying holocaust ever seen in the history of mankind.

I stood moments ago and received the honors accorded me as the head of the State of Israel and thought of the day of infamy at the United Nations 12 years ago today. I had the privilege then, as you mentioned, sir, of defending my people against the scurrilous and despicable attack on Zionism, which was mounted by a contemptible coalition of totalitarian states not only against our small country but against all that the Jewish people and their traditions stand for in human dignity and experience.

As one recalls these events which occurred on this very day, on this solemn and moving occasion marking the first State visit from an Israeli head of state to the United States of America, with all that it implies, the significance of the reemergence of Israel must surely be in the forefront of our consciousness.

Mr. President, Israel has been devoted to the cause of peace since we held out our hand to our Arab neighbors in our declaration of independence, and has over the years exerted every effort to achieve it. Under your inspired leadership and with the active support of your administration, we continue these efforts to achieve the peace for which we, and I believe all the peoples in the Middle East, yearn.

Ten years ago next week, we crossed a major watershed with the historic arrival of President Sadat in Jerusalem and the enthusiastic and warm welcome accorded him by the then Government of Israel, by the Knesset, and by the people of Israel. That visit led, thanks to the active involvement in subsequent negotiations of the President and the administration of the United States, to the first peace treaty signed by Israel with an Arab State -- indeed, a leading State in the Arab world. That treaty, which concluded the first phase of the peace-making process in the Middle East, was signed here on this very site. Israel is prepared, as you are well aware, Mr. President, to move forward with your involvement to a further phase of this process.

I thank you, Mr. President, for your invitation and your welcome. I come to you representing a friend and an ally. Our two peoples are committed to the same principles and values which our Bible gave to the world. We acknowledge and appreciate the generous support of the American people extended to us in the mutual interest of our two countries to ensure the advancement of the cause of peace and stability in our area and, indeed, the peace of the world.

Your aid maintains the strength of a close ally which is committed to the defense of the cause of freedom and democracy in an area in which the longest war in this century is taking place, a brutal, bloody war fired by the fanatic extremism of religious fundamentalism which threatens the stability of so many countries in our area. A glance at the map of our area and a realization of the implications of the waves of fanaticism which are sweeping across it must surely give added emphasis to the significance of your alliance with Israel, with all that it implies.

President, on behalf of the people of Israel, I salute you, the leader of the free world, and Mrs. Reagan, and I extend to the people of the United States of America our prayers and profound wishes for the welfare of this great people and this unique country.

The President. Not that part of it, but right now I have an announcement to make: that tomorrow our nation will pause and remember those veterans who've served in the Armed Forces, both at home and abroad. And we'll remember those who gave their last measure fighting for what our country represents: freedom. There's not a better time or better way to salute those valiant men and women than to announce today my decision to support the creation of a Cabinet-level Department of Veterans Affairs.

This is a personal decision that I've thought about for some time. There are six times as many veterans alive today as there were in 1930, when the agency was first created. And veterans have always had a strong voice in our government, but it's time to give them the recognition that they so rightly deserve. So, I'm joining with those here today in support of this effort.

This harvest season, as Thanksgiving approaches, we are grateful that our country is rich in caring citizens who establish and maintain food banks to serve people in time of need. These devoted Americans daily offer their talents and material resources to help their neighbors.

Individuals, the food industry, other businesses, churches, government agencies, schools, and other groups combine to make food banks work. Social service agencies often refer clients to food banks pending the processing of the clients' benefit applications; this ensures that families' temporary needs are met while long-term assistance is being arranged. The food industry donates surplus food to regional food banks that help supply local pantries and private local food programs. Private businesses provide support services ranging from transportation and cold storage to accounting and legal help.

America, do hereby proclaim the week of November 8 through November 14, 1987, as National Food Bank Week. I call upon all Americans to observe this week with appropriate activities to learn about food banks and how they are helping or could help people in their communities.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this tenth day of November, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

A little over 3 years ago, I announced the creation of a national commission to study the scope and nature of pornography in the United States. After 14 long months of careful and objective study, including the taking of hundreds of hours of testimony from citizens on all sides of the issue, the Attorney General's Commission on Pornography released its Final Report in July 1986. In that report were numerous recommendations for changes in Federal law, many of which are reflected in the bill I am proposing today. This bill represents one point of a seven-point plan created by Attorney General Edwin Meese to crack down heavily on the producers, distributors, and retailers of obscene material.

In the last several years, distributors of obscenity and child pornography have expanded into new areas. They are employing new technologies and reaching new audiences. This is how any business grows and develops, except that this business is illegal. Neither our Constitution, our courts, our people, nor our respect for common decency and human suffering should allow the trafficking in obscene material -- which exploits women, children, and men alike -- to continue. With this bill, and the implementation of the Attorney General's seven-point plan -- in which the creation of the National Obscenity Enforcement Unit is the centerpiece -- this Administration is putting the purveyors of illegal obscenity and child pornography on notice: your industry's days are numbered.

Use of computers in child pornography. Child molesters, pedophiles, and collectors of child pornography have developed a complex, computerized, nationwide network to traffic in child pornography. This bill would clarify the existing sexual exploitation of children statutes to prohibit the use of computers for such deviant purposes.

Buying or selling of children to produce child pornography. Sadly, current Federal law does not forbid a parent or other adult with custody of a minor from selling that child for use in the production of pornography. When this bill is passed, a grievous situation will have thus been corrected.

Record-keeping requirements. Many of the individuals addicted to pornography are attracted to obscene depictions of children. To meet this demand, pornographers have often used minors to produce sexually explicit materials. This violates Federal laws that protect all persons under 18 years of age from exploitation. But because pornographers have not been required to keep appropriate records, proof of age has often been impossible. This bill will mandate the keeping of verifiable records as to the actual age and identity of each performer. If a producer fails to keep such records, or if a distributor sells the material without it containing a statement as to where such records may be found, the burden in any subsequent criminal prosecution will be on him or her to prove the performer was not a minor.

Child pornography and organized crime. There is a growing commercial market for child pornography in this country. Much of it is produced and distributed by networks of pedophiles and child molesters who are well organized. It is therefore appropriate for this bill to amend the RICO statute to include child pornography offenses. The RICO (Racketeer Influenced and Corrupt Organizations) statute, which was amended in 1985 to include obscenity, is a tool long needed by prosecutors of the highly organized, multi-billion dollar pornography industry. It provides strong criminal penalties and fines and brings forfeiture provisions into play, allowing the seizure and sale of all assets used in or obtained through organized criminal activity.

Another loophole that has long needed closing is the fact that, while it is currently illegal under Federal law to transport obscene material over State lines, it is not illegal to receive or possess that same material with intent to sell it or transfer it, or to offer to do so. This bill will close that loophole tight.

Obscenity forfeitures. Civil and criminal forfeiture provisions for Federal obscenity violations are also provided for in the bill. It has been proven time and again that the best way to dismantle any organized criminal operation is to confiscate its ill-gotten gains. Prosecution of national and international drug cartels has underscored this point on numerous occasions. Forfeiture also provides much-needed funds and equipment to the Federal efforts and, as in drug forfeiture, allows for sharing of forfeited assets with State and local law enforcement organizations involved in joint investigations.

Possession and sale of obscene material and child pornography on Federal properties. Today, there are seven States that have no obscenity laws whatsoever (Alaska, Maine, New Mexico, Oregon, South Dakota, Vermont, and Wisconsin). Of these, several contain major military bases or other large tracts of Federal land. Obscenity and child pornography are all too common on Federal lands in general. This bill will make the sale of such material on any Federal lands a felony; and the mere possession of child pornography or obscene visual depictions on these lands will itself become a misdemeanor.

Adding obscenity to the wiretap statute. When it comes to court orders for such things as wiretaps, the government can get them in cases involving drug trafficking, extortion, and many other crimes, but it cannot do so for felony obscenity offenses. This bill will rectify that needless deficiency.

Cable porn. In the interest of protecting those most vulnerable and impressionable members of our society, our children, this bill will prohibit transmission of obscenity over cable or subscription television.

Dial-a-porn. Finally, this bill will give prosecutors a powerful new weapon to attack ``Dial-A-Porn'' businesses that profit from obscenity. I have read statistics that just one company in just one city has received up to 800,000 calls per day -- 180 million calls in a single year. Moreover, law enforcement officials have estimated that a great number of these calls are made by children. A child who calls one of these numbers hears an explicit sexual message. The bill would make it a felony for these companies to transmit obscene messages.

At a dark hour in British history, Winston Churchill said, ``Give us the tools and we will finish the job.'' Federal prosecutors and law enforcement officials are saying the same thing today. The Commission has recommended it. The public is demanding it. Yet, as I have described to you, under current Federal law some very basic tools are being withheld. The legislation I propose today will give these men and women the tools they need to get the job done efficiently, fairly, and thoroughly. The producers and distributors of this material -- the heartless victimizers of women and children -- have had a huge legal advantage, and they have used it to the fullest. They have also employed the latest technologies, while Federal law has failed to keep pace. It is high time these inequities are corrected.

When the ``Child Protection and Obscenity Enforcement Act of 1987'' is passed we will all be able to go about the business of cleaning up some of the filth that floods our Nation. Right now, in the Department of Justice, this task is already well under way. The newly created National Obscenity Enforcement Unit is coordinating and spearheading nationwide prosecutions of a scope never before attempted in our Nation's history. They have my full support, but they need more. They need strong, loophole-free Federal laws, and they need the assistance of the American people. The industry they seek to shut down is very large, very powerful, and very harmful. The Federal Government alone just does not have the resources to do the whole job. We will need all the help we can get from decent-minded citizens across the country who know when it is time to stand up and be counted. And I am confident we will get that help. I look also to State and local law enforcement authorities to join with us in a total effort to rid our communities of this criminal element among us.

I look forward to you, the elected representatives of the American people, assisting me in this effort to help protect all Americans from the corruption, the disease, the violence, degradation, and victimization that flows from this despicable industry.

Child Protection and Obscenity Enforcement Act of 1987. This act is a direct outgrowth of the deep concern this administration has had with the effects of obscenity and child pornography in our nation.

With this act, and the implementation of the seven-point plan of the Attorney General's Pornography Commission -- in which the creation of the National Obscenity Enforcement Unit is the centerpiece -- this administration is putting the purveyors of illegal obscenity and child pornography on notice: Your industry's days are numbered. Just this year, there's been a dramatic increase in the Federal prosecution effort against child pornography and obscenity. This is evidenced by the recent announcements of more than 100 indictments across the Nation against child pornographers and traffickers of obscene material.

Child Protection and Obscenity Enforcement Act of 1987 proposes changes in three basic areas. First, protection of children from sexual exploitation. Our bill will amend the racketeer-influenced and corrupt organizations statute to include child pornography offenses, thereby permitting law enforcement officials to go after the child pornography industry.

The second basic area is obscenity. Organized crime controls the vast majority of the multibillion-dollar obscenity market. According to law enforcement estimates, revenues from the obscenity industry, most of which will go into the coffers of organized crime, are estimated to be between 7 and 10 billion dollars a year. A set of three ``syndicate buster'' amendments will block these illicit enterprises from taking advantage of inconsistencies in existing Federal law.

One of these amendments will prohibit the use of Federal roads, interstate railroads, motor vehicles, boats, airplanes, or other methods for obscenity trafficking across State lines. Another will inject a little common sense into the law by allowing a jury to presume, without the prosecutors having to prove it, that obscenity produced in one State and now located in another State has in fact traveled in interstate commerce. This will apply in a similar fashion to material produced in a foreign country.

Still another of these amendments will outlaw interstate or international activity or communication to further acts that are themselves illegal under obscenity and child pornography laws. This means, for example, that an interstate phone call from a retailer to a distributor regarding an interstate shipment of obscenity would itself be a criminal offense, as would be the use of the mails to pay for such a shipment.

Civil and criminal forfeiture provisions for those convicted of Federal obscenity violations are also provided for in the act. It's been proven time and again that the best way to dismantle any organized criminal operation is to confiscate its ill-gotten gains. Isn't it about time we removed the profit motive from activities that are sick and obscene? When it comes to court orders for such things as wiretaps, the Government can get them in cases involving drug trafficking, extortion, and many other crimes, but it cannot do so for felony obscenity offenses. This bill will rectify that needless deficiency.

The third major area involves child protection amendments. In the interest of protecting those most vulnerable and impressionable members of our society, our children, this act will prohibit transmission of obscenity over cable or subscription television. And it will provide prosecutors with a powerful weapon to attack the so-called dial-a-porn business that profits from obscenity. And here, I would just like to thank Congressman Tom Bliley and Senator Jesse Helms for all the work that they've been doing in leading the crusade in Congress against dial-a-porn.

I've read statistics that, in a single city, one company has received up to 800,000 calls per day -- 180 million calls in a single year -- and law enforcement officials have estimated that a great number of these calls are made by children. Every time a child calls one of these numbers, he or she hears an explicit sexual dramatization. And the time has come for this to stop.

At a dark hour in British history, Winston Churchill said, ``Give us the tools, and we will finish the job.'' Federal prosecutors and law enforcement officials are saying the same thing today. The Attorney General's Commission on Pornography has recommended it. The public is demanding it. And the legislation I am proposing today will give our prosecutors just that -- the tools they need to get the job done.

I might add that this legislation is not only a wholesome and balanced response to the Attorney General's Commission but to the grassroots movement of concerned parents and grandparents rising up in cities all across America. Cities such as Cincinnati, Oklahoma City, Kansas City, Dallas, and others, where Americans like you have stood up and said: We want laws against child pornography and hardcore, illegal obscenity, and we want them enforced.

I look to the American people to support this legislation and to the Congress to enact it with all due speed. If this nation can send men to the Moon, then we can certainly do some cleaning up here at home and give our sons and daughters the simplicity and beauty that an American childhood should entail.

The crisis between the United States and Iran that began in 1979 has not been fully resolved. Although the international tribunal established to adjudicate claims of U.S. nationals against Iran and of Iranian nationals against the United States continues to function, normalization of commercial and diplomatic relations between the United States and Iran has not been achieved.

In these circumstances, I have determined that it is necessary to maintain in force the broad authorities that may be needed in the process of implementing the January 1981 agreements with Iran and in the eventual normalization of relations with that country.

Reagan. Well, what a pleasure it is for Nancy and me and all our distinguished guests to have the President of Israel and his lovely wife with us at this festive dinner. It's a special occasion for us to have you with us, Mr.

Mr. President, your visit has special significance for yet another reason: It's a great day for the Irish! [Laughter] I can't help but note that Ireland is so successful at producing national leaders and that an Irish brogue carries as much influence in Jerusalem as it does here.

That you were born in Ireland and that my ancestors came from there may seem accidental, but it speaks to the history of both Israel and the United States. Ours are nations of immigrants and nations of opportunity. Israel was established with an open door to the Jewish people from around the globe. The epic drama of the ingathering of those who came to Israel to find freedom, escape persecution, and rebuild their lives has captured the imagination of all Americans. We, too, come from distant shores, and in different circumstances struggled for our own freedom.

Israel has never lost sight of its destiny to be a nation of free people living by the principles of democracy. Israel's vibrant democracy offers the best and strongest rejoinder to those who denigrate its achievements or who try to equate Zionism with racism, as the U.N. General Assembly did in 1975. In that connection, I welcome recent action by the Congress calling for the overturning of the U.N. General Assembly's misguided and reprehensible resolution.

Your farmers and pioneers have made the land green. Your universities and research institutes have created miracles of technology and science that have added to human welfare. And your people have set the world an example in courage and fortitude.

In these 40 years, we Americans have been proud of our friendship and partnership with Israel. Few nations enjoy richer or stronger ties. Support for Israel is not limited to one group or region; it is felt and expressed throughout the United States. It reflects genuine affection, admiration, and mutual respect.

President has cared deeply about Israel's security and its quest for peace. I carry on that tradition, and I renew tonight the pledge I've made before: The United States will always ensure Israel's security and work with her in partnership for peace.

Herzog. Mr. President, Mrs. Reagan, I rise to thank Mrs. Reagan and yourself for the kind hospitality extended by you to Aura and myself on this historic occasion, the first state visit of the President of Israel to the United States of America.

The common foundations which both our countries have based on the teachings of the Hebrew Bible have been used to build a superstructure of relationships which is really quite special. I do not know whether history has another example of a great, free democracy extending so broad a hand of friendship to a young, although also very old, state so far from its borders and so different from it in size of population and area. Indeed, our partnership led to the fact that in this building was signed the peace treaty between Israel and Egypt. It was a truly unique occasion in the history of peace. It signified the first great achievement of the peace process, which we and, I believe, the vast majority of the peoples in the adjacent Arab States pray will lead to a lasting peace to the Middle East.

America's support for Israel, a free, open, democratic society in which the dignity of man is enshrined as a supreme value, has been a pillar of American policy, a commitment of all American Presidents, a consensus uniting the American political spectrum, and a reflection of the will of the American people. You, Mr. President, have brought our relationship to unprecedented heights, to a closeness that is symbolized by this evening.

Mark Twain once said: ``Always do right. This will gratify some people, and astonish the rest.'' [Laughter] Indeed, the main thing is to continue to do what we believe to be right, as you, Mr. President, are doing with your resolve and leadership in the Middle East and in the Persian Gulf.

It is always important to remember what it is that we represent: two peoples with a rich heritage and a message that the destiny of mankind is freedom, that the greatness of a nation is determined by its commitment to freedom, and that peace and international cooperation are the only parts to a secure future.

President, on behalf of the people of Israel, I thank you for your friendship and unfailing support. Your name is inscribed indelibly in our history as a dear and close friend who appreciates the importance for the free world of a strong and stable Israel, as an outpost committed to the defense of democracy in a region swept by the winds of fanaticism and fundamentalistic bigotry.

I ask you, Mr. President, to give us, the people of Israel, the opportunity to express to yourself and to Mrs. Reagan, who has a special place in the hearts of our people, our profoundest feelings for you both by coming to Israel and meeting a grateful nation and by seeing for yourselves the realization of an ancient peoples' dream. I would ask your excellencies, ladies and gentlemen, please rise so that I may drink to the health of the President of the United States and Mrs. Reagan.

The President. It's not just in fulfillment of my constitutional duty but with great pride and respect for his many years of public service, that I am today announcing my intention to nominate United States Circuit Judge Anthony Kennedy to be an Associate Justice of the Supreme Court. Judge Kennedy represents the best tradition of America's judiciary.

His career in the law, which has now spanned the better part of three decades, began following his graduation from Stanford University and Harvard Law School when he joined a prominent San Francisco law firm. Later, after the death of his father, who was himself a well-respected attorney in Sacramento, Tony Kennedy took over his father's law practice. He devoted himself to a wide range of matters including tax law, estate planning and probate, real estate law, international law, and litigation.

President Ford appointed him to the United States Court of Appeals, where he has established himself as a fair but tough judge who respects the law. During his 12 years on the Nation's second highest court, Judge Kennedy has participated in over 1400 decisions and authored over 400 opinions. He's a hard worker and, like Justice Powell, whom he will replace, he is known as a gentleman. He's popular with colleagues of all political persuasions. And I know that he seems to be popular with many Senators of varying political persuasions as well.

I guess by now it's no secret that Judge Kennedy has been on the very shortest of my short lists for some time now. I've interviewed him personally and, at my direction, the FBI, the Department of Justice, and the Counsel to the President have concluded very extensive preliminary interviews with him. Judge Kennedy's record and qualifications have been thoroughly examined. And before I submit his formal nomination to the Senate, a full update of his FBI background investigation will have been completed.

Kennedy is what many in recent weeks have referred to as a true conservative -- one who believes that our constitutional system is one of enumerated powers -- that it is we, the people who have granted certain rights to the Government, not the other way around. And that unless the Constitution grants a power to the Federal Government, or restricts a State's exercise of that power, it remains with the States or the people.

Those three words, ``We the People,'' are an all important reminder of the only legitimate source of the Government's authority over its citizens. The preamble of the Constitution, which begins with these three powerful words, serves also as a reminder that one of the basic purposes underlying our national charter was to ensure domestic tranquility. And that's why the Constitution established a system of criminal justice that not only protects the individual defendants but that will protect all Americans from crime as well.

Kennedy has participated in hundreds of criminal law decisions during his tenure on the Ninth Circuit Court of Appeals. In that time he's earned a reputation as a courageous, tough, but fair jurist. He's known to his colleagues and to the lawyers who practiced before him as diligent, perceptive, and polite. The hallmark of Judge Kennedy's career has been devotion -- devotion to his family, devotion to his community and his civic responsibility, and devotion to the law. He's played a major role in keeping our cities and neighborhoods safe from crime. He's that special kind of American who's always been there when we needed leadership. I'm certain he will be a leader on the Supreme Court.

The experience of the last several months has made all of us a bit wiser. I believe the mood and the time is now right for all Americans in this bicentennial year of the Constitution to join together in a bipartisan effort to fulfill our constitutional obligation of restoring the United States Supreme Court to full strength. By selecting Anthony M. Kennedy, a superbly qualified judge whose fitness for the high court has been remarked upon by leaders of the Senate in both parties, I have sought to ensure the success of that effort.

I look forward, and I know Judge Kennedy is looking forward, to prompt hearings conducted in the spirit of cooperation and bipartisanship. I'll do everything in my power as President to assist in that process. And now I believe that Judge Kennedy has a few words to say.

Kennedy. Thank you, Mr. President. By announcing your intention to nominate me to the Supreme Court of the United States, you confer a singular honor, the highest honor to which any person devoted to the law might aspire. I am most grateful to you. My family, Mary and the children, also express their deep appreciation for your reposing this trust upon us.

When the Senate of the United States receives the nomination, I shall endeavor to the best of my ability to answer all of its questions and to otherwise assist it in the discharge of its constitutional obligation to determine whether to give its advice and full consent to the appointment. I share with you, Mr. President, and with each Member of the Senate an abiding respect for the Supreme Court, for the confirmation process, and for the Constitution of the United States, which we are all sworn to preserve and to protect.

Mr. President, throughout this whole process, Senator Hatch says there have been a lot of gutless wonders in the White House. Do you know who they are, who he is referring to, why he would say such a thing since he is such a devoted conservative?

The President. Helen, when these ceremonies here this morning are over, I'm going to try to find out where he gets his information because, you know something, I haven't been able to find a gutless wonder in the whole place.

Mr. President, you said that Judge Kennedy is popular with people of all political persuasions. What happened to your plan to give the Senate the nominee that they would object to just as much as Judge Bork?

Did you cave into the liberals, Mr. President? Some conservatives are saying you caved into the liberals, appointing someone who can be confirmed, but not appointing someone who is going to turn the Court around.

Associate Justice of the United States Supreme Court. The President believes that Judge Kennedy's distinguished legal career, which includes over a decade of service as a Federal appellate judge, makes him eminently qualified to sit on our nation's highest court.

Well, we've just held a very useful and, I might say, brief but also, I'll add, a very moving discussion with Chairman Yunis Khalis of the Islamic Union of Mujahidin of Afghanistan and other members of his distinguished delegation. I expressed our nation's continued strong support for the resistance and our satisfaction with the large step the Afghan resistance took toward unity in choosing a chairman for the first time. This new political milestone demonstrates that the people of Afghanistan speak with one voice in their opposition to the Soviet invasion and occupation of their homeland.

This increasing unity has already made itself felt on the battlefield. During the past 18 months, the Mujahidin fighting inside the country have improved their weapons, tactics, and coordination. The result has been a string of serious defeats for the Soviet elite units as well as many divisions from the Kabul army.

Khalis and his delegation are visiting Washington, following the November 10th U.N. General Assembly vote, which with a record vote, once again, called overwhelmingly for the withdrawal of all foreign troops from Afghanistan. This is the eighth time since the December 1979 invasion that the General Assembly has decisively called upon the Soviet Union to pull its forces out of Afghanistan. And let there be no mistake about it: The withdrawal of Soviet forces is the key to resolving the Afghan crisis. Other issues that have been raised to divert attention from this fact only extend the combat and prolong the suffering of the Afghan people.

April and September of 1987, I asked the Soviet Union to set a date this year when that withdrawal would begin. I also stated that when the Soviet Union showed convincingly that it was ready for a genuine political settlement the United States would be helpful. After all, the Soviet presence in Afghanistan is a major impediment to improved U.S.-Soviet relations, and we would like to remove it. The Soviets should want to do so, as well.

Unfortunately, the Soviet answer on a date for rapid withdrawal has been silence. Instead we've seen the Kabul regime announce a phantom cease-fire and propose a transitional government, one that would leave this discredited and doomed group in control. These gambits have been rejected by the only voice that really counts: that of the Afghan people, speaking through their resistance representatives. Any proposal unacceptable to the resistance is destined to fail.

And as the resistance continues the fight, we and other responsible governments will stand by it. The support that the United States has been providing the resistance will be strengthened, rather than diminished, so that it can continue to fight effectively for freedom. The just struggle against foreign tyranny can count upon worldwide support, both political and material.

The goal of the United States remains a genuinely independent Afghanistan, free from external interference, an Afghanistan whose people choose the type of government they wish, an Afghanistan to which the four million refugees from Soviet aggression may return in safety and, yes, in honor.

The arts lie at the heart of our Nation and of the heritage we cherish. The freedom we enjoy allows our arts to breathe the spirit of liberty and to ennoble, inspire, and nourish us. During National Arts Week, when we celebrate the arts and thank the artists, patrons, and audiences who give them life, we salute a precious dimension of America.

From our early days as a Nation, countless public-minded citizens have considered support of culture and the arts their joy and their responsibility. Their efforts have brought about an American partnership among individuals, corporations, foundations, and taxpayers that sustains the arts and makes them accessible throughout our land.

America the arts are flourishing. Everywhere, individual artists are at work, and symphony orchestras, museums, theaters, dance and opera companies, and folk arts groups are busy in cities and towns alike. As we express our gratitude to these Americans we also renew our commitment to the partnership that supports them and brings their work, and that of the rest of the world, to American audiences -- and we reaffirm our devotion to the life of the mind and the soul.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 12th day of November, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

I am today announcing my intention to raise tariffs on Brazilian exports to the United States and to prohibit imports from Brazil of certain computer products in response to the maintenance by Brazil of unfair trade practices in the area of computer products.

Brazil's national informatics policies, in place since the 1970's, severely restrict foreign participation in Brazil's computer and computer-related market. The United States has unsuccessfully raised its concerns with Brazil in bilateral and multilateral consultations since 1983. In September 1985 I initiated an investigation of these practices under section 301 of the Trade Act of 1974 and in October 1986 determined that Brazil's informatics policies were unreasonable and a burden and restriction on U.S. commerce. I suspended parts of this investigation after Brazil made commitments to implement its informatics law in a more flexible, reasonable, and just manner.

Recent developments in Brazil make it clear that these commitments are not being kept. In particular, the Brazilian Government has rejected efforts by an American software company to license its product in Brazil, asserting that a domestic company makes a product that is functionally equivalent. This decision establishes a precedent which effectively bans U.S. companies from the Brazilian software market. It is also likely to increase piracy of foreign software, since demand for the prohibited product will continue.

In response to these developments, I intend to raise tariffs to offset the lost sales opportunities for U.S. companies, estimated at $105 million, and to prohibit imports of Brazilian informatics products covered under Brazil's market reserve policy.

United States, and we support the steps it is taking to restore its democratic institutions. But Brazil is also a major beneficiary of the global trading system, the openness of which cannot be maintained if markets are deliberately closed and policies incompatible with a more free and open trading system are established.

Heroism was a thing of the past, we were told, as old and dry as a fossil in Death Valley. Fashions often run together, and this one galloped side by side with the death-of-God vogue. I seem to remember that the argument was that if God was dead nothing anyone could do was important enough to be called heroic. Well, I've never believed that either God or American heroism was dead.

This land of freedom was built, and is still being built, by men and women who, without chroniclers, without heralds, have brought a warrior's courage to the challenges of everyday life. America is a land of heroes.

Today we honor six young Americans who have shown the physical, moral, or intellectual courage, yes, the selflessness and concern for others that we call heroism. I thought I'd tell you something about each one of them.

I mentioned moral courage -- taking a stand out of the ordinary because that's what you believe is right. Linda Warsaw has that kind of courage. When Linda was 11, she began volunteering with her mother at the San Bernardino County Victim-Witness Advocacy Program. Files that passed through her hands were like a window for her into the criminal justice system. Soon she was attending trials. Much of what she saw -- child abuse cases, criminals going unpunished -- she didn't like. She conceived of an anticrime organization that would be run by and for children. Started 2 years ago when Linda was 13, Kids Against Crime now teaches hundreds of children and adults in southern California communities how to protect themselves against molesters and others who may prey on them.

Rafael Guerra-Torres has another kind of courage -- intellectual courage -- the courage to pursue a new idea, to think in new ways, not to be bound by conventional wisdom. Angel developed, as a science fair project, an experiment to demonstrate how the growth of a type of cancer cell could be inhibited by broccoli. This experiment won him first place in the medical health category of the 37th International Science and Engineering Fair. Angel's prizes include an invitation to represent Puerto Rican youth at the Nobel Prize ceremonies in Sweden.

Just over a year ago, Denise Shattuck and four friends were driving home from a field hockey game when their car hit a tree. Denise was thrown from the car and hurt her head. The car's driver was alive but trapped behind the wheel with a smashed hip, and the car was on fire. Denise ignored her own injuries, ran back to the burning car, pulled the driver out through a broken window, and dragged and carried her to safety.

March of 1986, Kimberlee Rush, then 17, was babysitting for two toddlers when a truck with a 20-ton load lost its brakes, sped downhill, and crashed into the house she was in. As the floor collapsed beneath the truck, gas lines ruptured, and a huge hole was left between the room Kimberlee had been in and the room the children were in. Kimberlee could have left the house.

Finally, on a February night 2 years ago, Mindy Clark was in bed when she heard her two-year-old brother, Justin, crying as he climbed the stairs. As Mindy got out of bed, she noticed the floor was hot. The house was on fire. Mindy gathered Justin, her other brother, and sister together. After a struggle, she opened her window and led them out onto the plastic porch roof, only to realize that Justin hadn't followed. Back into the heat and smoke of the burning house Mindy went and finally found Justin hiding in fear under her own bed. She carried him out to the roof, which was beginning to melt, and led her brothers and sister to safety.

I've heard talk from some in the press who ought to know better that this is the ``me'' age: everyone out to get his or hers. These young people and others like them are my reply to those commentators. There is a heart in America -- a good, deep, loving, and true heart. It's always been part of our land, from the time the pilgrims first bowed their heads to thank the Lord for His bounty to this day. You only need eyes to see and ears to hear, for there are signs of the love, the courage, the hope, and the generosity of the American heart at every bend in every road, and there is the music of its song in every community throughout our land. To all of you awardees here today, let me say thank you for helping us see those signs and hear that music.

More than 140,000 children are adopted each year, but thousands of childless families are still waiting for children to adopt. Unfortunately, many thousands of children with special needs, such as those with physical, mental, or legal handicaps, are not adopted. On August 24, 1987, I established the Interagency Task Force on Adoption, and the Task Force will be submitting recommendations to me that are designed to encourage and support adoption, in particular infant adoptions, as an alternative for pregnant women, and the adoption of ``special needs'' children who are waiting for a permanent, loving family.

I will be signing a proclamation soon designating November 22 through November 28, 1987, as National Adoption Week. Each department and agency head should encourage National Adoption Week activities designed to increase Federal employee awareness about the benefits of adoption.

Last year, for example, the Office of Personnel Management conducted a number of activities to promote adoption during National Adoption Week. Six children were adopted as a result of the OPM's efforts, and many OPM employees have become involved in community efforts to foster adoption.

We must expand and broaden our efforts to make sure that America's familyless children are adopted. We must do all we can to remove obstacles that prevent qualified adoptive parents from accepting these children into their homes.

At this juncture in the budget negotiations, it is encouraging to see 40 Members of the Senate willing to vote against increasing the deficit, despite pressures from special interests. Should this legislation reach the President's desk in its current form, it will be vetoed because of the impact its provisions will have on deficit spending for years to come.

This week has been a busy and important one here in Washington. And in reporting to you about it, there are three topics in particular that I'd like to discuss -- first, my announcement on Wednesday that I intend to nominate United States Circuit Court Judge Anthony Kennedy to be an Associate Justice of the Supreme Court.

Kennedy's background includes many years as a practicing lawyer, first with a major firm, then in practice on his own; more than two decades of teaching law; and service since 1975 on the United States Court of Appeals, the second highest court in the land. Judge Kennedy shares my fundamental legal philosophy of judicial restraint -- the conviction that judges should interpret the law, not make it -- that, in other words, judges should be umpires, not players.

It happens that this is not the first time I've called on Judge Kennedy for an important government job. As Governor of California back in 1973, I asked Judge Kennedy, then a lawyer in private practice, to take the lead in drafting a complex constitutional amendment and to have the work completed in less than 8 weeks. Thanks to Judge Kennedy's remarkable skill and determination, 8 weeks later, the job was done.

In choosing to nominate Judge Kennedy to the Supreme Court, I've kept in mind the fact that criminal cases make up the largest category of cases the Supreme Court must decide. These cases are especially important to the poor, inner-city residents, and minority groups, since these Americans are victimized by crime to a disproportionate extent. Judge Kennedy's record on criminal law is clear; indeed, he has participated in hundreds of criminal law decisions. He has earned a reputation as a jurist who is tough, but fair. His decisions have helped, rather than hindered, the search for truth in the courtroom. And he's been sensitive to the needs of law enforcement professionals, who each day risk their lives in the real world of street crime and violence.

Kennedy has already won bipartisan praise from the Senate, and I know you join me in looking forward to prompt Senate hearings, conducted in a spirit of cooperation. Every day that passes with the Supreme Court below full strength impairs the people's business in that crucially important body.

The second topic I want to discuss with you is Central America, for it was this week that the Guatemala accord went into effect. As I said Monday in a speech to foreign ministers from Central America, as we look at how the Guatemala accord has been implemented to date, we have to conclude that the differences between the democracies and the Communists in Central America have never been so apparent. The Communists in Nicaragua refuse to lift their state of emergency, but the democracies of El Salvador and Guatemala -- countries that are also torn by violence -- make no excuses and have no states of emergency.

Nicaragua, too, the Communists' release of political prisoners has been partial and grudging. Thousands of political prisoners remain in their jails. Yet there has been one good sign. I welcome the designation of Cardinal Obando y Bravo -- a man who himself has suffered much at the hands of the Nicaraguan Communists -- as the mediator in Nicaragua between the Communist regime and the democratic resistance, or freedom fighters. This is a Nicaraguan conflict that should be resolved between Nicaraguans. And as I said Monday: When serious negotiations between the Communists and the resistance have begun under Cardinal Obando's mediation, then Secretary Shultz will be ready to meet jointly with the foreign ministers of all five Central American nations, including the Sandinistas' representative.

Federal deficit. The negotiators are seeking to strike a bargain that would cut some $30 billion from the Federal deficit during 1988 and as much as $50 billion in 1989. As Senator Domenici put it: ``We made headway on everything; we just didn't reach closure yet.'' The bipartisan cooperation that has been evident in these negotiations is encouraging. I'm confident that this coming week the negotiators will agree to a deficit-cutting package that is fair and enforceable.

Commission. Thank you also, Carey Hanlin, and a special thank you to someone I miss seeing at the Cabinet table, a man of courage and principle, one of the best Secretaries of Health and Human Services our nation has ever had: Dick Schweiker.

I've come here today in what I'm sure we would all agree is a time of unusual worry and unusual promise. Today we Americans have it within our power to lead the entire world into a new age of prosperity and peace or to return it to the stagnation, drift, and uncertainties of the late seventies. History records few moments when an entire people arrive at a place of turning and either choose the right or the wrong path. We Americans have come to such a place, but as we've seen in the markets these last few weeks, many wonder if we'll pick the right course.

I believe we will if we recognize our opportunities. The problem of recognizing opportunities -- it reminds me of a story about Moses. He had led the children of Israel out of Egypt. He got to the Red Sea. God parted the waters.

You in the life insurance industry make a profession of keeping a cool head when others panic and of fixing your eye on the promises as well as the dangers of the future. Well, that's how you make the right decisions. In the last 7 years, I've found that's how to make the right decisions on national economic policy, too. Look at opportunities. Look at dangers, too. Look at reality. Yes, financial market gyrations are a reality, but this is reality, too: Our underlying economy is strong and getting stronger. Two weeks ago it became official: America had achieved 59 months of uninterrupted economic growth. That is the longest peacetime expansion on record in our entire history.

Yes, in the last 2 years, our manufacturing output has been rising sharply. Take just one industry, steel, which had been said to be dying. Now the talk is about its rebirth. As a recent Business Week headline said: ``Cancel the Funeral -- Steel is on the Mend.'' In our expansion, the biggest stories have been new businesses, rising family income, and jobs. They're stories that each of you knows about. After all, the life insurance industry's venture capital investments have helped finance America's entrepreneurial boom.

You've also seen your markets expand, as America created more jobs in the last 5 years than Europe and Japan combined. And as for the critics who talk about how bad are the millions of jobs America has created in service industries -- ``hamburger flipping'' is how critics characterize them -- well, those critics ought to talk to you, because many new service jobs are in life insurance.

The potential employment pool in America, as maybe some of you don't know -- I didn't know for a time -- is everyone, male and female, from age 16 up. It includes all retired people. It includes kids in school and so forth. That is the potential pool against which we match our employment record.

Well, trade is one area where we're in danger of doing the wrong thing. Forgive me for saying, but some in Congress have been playing with economic dynamite this year. More than 10 million American jobs are tied to imports, exports, or both.

From the day George Washington took office to the present, when international trade has grown, the number of jobs has grown. When trade has dwindled, so have the number of jobs. Yet a bill with some of the most protectionist provisions we've seen since Smoot-Hawley is working its way through Congress. Now, that's just what we don't need right now -- to declare a trade war, to become a casualty ourselves.

I spoke at the beginning of places of turning, and here's one: Congress can either turn towards a protectionist trade bill or it can enact responsible legislation and ratify the free trade agreement we recently concluded with Canada, and make that agreement a model for our policy toward all nations. Under this agreement, trade barriers between the world's two largest trading partners will, for the most part, vanish by the year 2000.

In the last 7 years, we have used our trade laws as never before to open world markets to American exports. For the first time, an administration has started unfair trade practice cases on its own, not waited for industry. Korea recently responded to one of these cases and agreed to end its ban against foreign firms underwriting insurance, including life insurance. This will guarantee American firms access to Korea's insurance market, and that's good for everyone, Koreans and Americans.

Not long ago, I ran across a startling example of what ending trade restrictions can mean. In January New York State put an end to a domestic trade barrier. They let in milk from New Jersey. You couldn't buy New Jersey milk in New York before that. The result: The average price of a gallon of milk on the Lower East Side of New York City dropped by 40 cents. That was just one product traded -- not between two nations but between two States. Put that on a world scale, and you see how much protectionism costs America's families. It's just this simple: America needs more trade, not less.

Last week I emphasized that it was not our policy to drive down the dollar. Exchange rates that whip around with every shift in the wind make business reluctant to sail the seas of international commerce. That hurts all trading nations. But enduring calmness on the currency markets must come from better coordination of economic policies among the major industrial countries. And that's why I was pleased by the recent action taken by Germany and other countries to lower interest rates. Coordination of policies that produce growth -- that's good for everyone and something the United States continues to support.

Here in Washington, I'm working with Congress to take another American step toward less deficit spending. But as in trade, there are right steps and wrong steps, and hiking tax rates is the wrong step. As a front page story in the New York Times 2 weeks ago warned, higher tax rates could, as the article said, ``chill the economy, reduce personal and business incomes, and thus lower tax receipts.'' Last year we cut the deficit by $73 billion -- nearly one-third of what it was in 1986. We're determined to achieve at least a $23 billion reduction this fiscal year and stay on the path to a balanced budget.

I'm confident we'll get there one way or another. But let me repeat something here I've been saying for some time now: Deficit spending is in large part an institutional problem, and a comparatively recent one to boot. In the mid-seventies, Congress, in effect, shoved the President to the side in the budget process. It legislated a major shift in the checks and balances of budgetmaking power, and the results came immediately. Before that, Federal debt with inflation taken out had been steady or falling for a quarter of a century. Since then it's been in a steep climb.

A perfect example is the housing bill being considered in the Senate. Now is not the time to add to the deficit, and this bill could add as much as $7 billion more in spending than I requested for this year. What's more, it costs at least $3 billion more than they say it costs, because they mandate things they don't pay for. That's budget gimmickry, pure and simple. Federal housing programs should be designed to help those who cannot help themselves. But under this bill, even though it's a budget-buster, aid to poor and needy Americans could actually be cut. You see, the bill diverts enormous amounts of money to subsidies for those who don't need subsidies at all. That is morally wrong. If this bill arrives at my desk, I will veto it.

What we do need right now is an extension of FHA authorities. That issue has been hanging fire for too long. I call on Congress, by the end of the month, to provide a permanent extension of those authorities, but not with so much else attached. We can't have it both ways. We can't make speeches calling for cuts in the budget deficit and then vote for bills like this that bust the budget.

The sad fact is there's only one way, once and for all, to stop them before they spend again, to free these prisoners from their dilemma. And that's to restore the role in the budget process of the only elected official who speaks not for local interests but for the interest of the entire Nation: the President. And that's why I've said over and over that it's time for the President to have what 43 Governors have, what I had as Governor of California: a line-item veto.

States have: a balanced budget amendment to the Constitution. A favorite person of mine, Prime Minister Thatcher recently said: ``Early and decisive action'' on cutting U.S. deficit spending is ``the most important single thing of all'' to restore the world financial markets. Nothing could be more decisive and convincing than these reforms.

I've spoken to you today about our economic future and the world's. But that's not the only area in which America will soon make choices for the future. Next month I will meet here in Washington with General Secretary Gorbachev of the Soviet Union. If all goes well, we'll sign an agreement that will, for the first time in history, eliminate an entire class of U.S. and Soviet nuclear missiles. It's a good bargain. For every nuclear warhead of our own that we remove, they will be giving up four. Recently, all seven living former Secretaries of Defense were asked, if they were still in office, would they recommend this agreement to the President? All seven said, yes, it's a good agreement.

Some details remain to be worked out. The most important is verification. I cherish no illusions about the Soviets. It's said: For them, past arms control treaties were like diets: The second day was always the best, because that's when they broke them. [Laughter] Any treaty I agree to must provide for effective verification, including onsite inspection of facilities before and during reductions and short-notice inspections afterward. The verification regime that we've put forward in Geneva is the most stringent in the history of arms control negotiations. I will not settle for anything less.

We're also pressing now for an agreement on reducing our two nations' strategic arsenals by one-half. Our Geneva negotiators have made progress. The Soviets must, however, stop holding strategic offensive missile reductions hostage to measures that would cripple our investigation of a strategic defense against ballistic missiles, the SDI. From the Krasnoyarsk radar facility, whose very construction violated the 1972 ABM treaty that the Soviets so vocally claim they want to preserve, to their modernized deployments around Moscow of the world's only ABM defenses, the Soviet Union's own SDI projects have become big news throughout the world in recent months. The Soviets have put billions into their program. They have more than 10,000 scientists working on military lasers alone. We know this, and they know that we know, and we know that they know we know. [Laughter] It's time for them to stop the charade and admit their own deep involvement in strategic defense work.

For us, SDI is a vital insurance policy, a necessary part of any national security strategy that includes deep reductions in strategic weapons. It will help protect our allies, too. In decades to come, it will underwrite all of us against Soviet cheating on both strategic and intermediate-range missile agreements. It goes hand in hand with arms reductions. We cannot -- we will not -- bargain it away to get strategic arms reductions.

SDI will also protect us against accidental missile launches and ballistic missile threats -- whether with nuclear, conventional, or chemical warheads -- from outlaw regimes. In the decades ahead, missile technology will proliferate, just as nuclear weapons technology already has. We can't be sure just who will get it, how competent they will be, or how rational. We must have an insurance policy against that day, as well. So, no, SDI is not a bargaining chip. It is a cornerstone of our security strategy for the 1990's and beyond. We will research it. We will develop it. And when it's ready, we'll deploy it. Remember this: If both sides have defenses, it can be a safer world. But if we leave the Soviets with a monopoly in this vital area, our security will be gravely jeopardized. We must not let that happen.

My talks with General Secretary Gorbachev will cover the full range of U.S.-Soviet relations, including human rights, exchanges between our peoples, and Soviet involvement in regional conflicts such as in Afghanistan, Angola, and Nicaragua. I believe that if America remains firm and strong, if we don't give up in squabbles among ourselves things that should be the subject of negotiations with the Soviets, we can usher in a new age of peace and freedom.

Yes, we live in a time of promise and a time of worry, of hazard. In the next few months, we can take steps that will lead America and the world toward a new age of prosperity and peace or, if we take the wrong steps, in just the opposite direction. So, I have a very simple appeal to you today. I need your help. I need your hand. Let's work together to make certain that the steps America does take are the right ones.

Speaker's involvement and discussions with Sandinista President Daniel Ortega last week. The President expressed his concern over the Speaker's role in getting involved in what should be essentially a matter between the Sandinista government and the Nicaraguan resistance with respect to negotiating a cease-fire. The President pointed out to the Speaker the confusion that arises and the misleading impressions that can be left if Members of Congress, without coordination with the executive branch, involve themselves in complex negotiations with foreign heads of government.

Cardinal Obando, and members of the Nicaraguan resistance. He asserted to the President that his efforts were an attempt to further the peace process and to offer Cardinal Obando whatever assistance might be useful in his efforts to serve as a mediator between the Sandinistas and the Nicaraguan resistance.

President strongly stressed to the Speaker the need for additional nonlethal assistance for the freedom fighters to ensure that they remain a cohesive, viable force which can continue pressuring the Sandinistas into meeting their commitments under the Central American peace plan. The President expressed the hope that Congress will work closely with the administration in the effort to secure peace in Central America and democracy in Nicaragua.

Eagle Nest, New Mexico, on a hilltop between peaks of the Sangre de Cristo Mountains and overlooking the Moreno Valley, stands a memorial to our country's Vietnam veterans. The origin of this shrine explains exactly why Americans for all the generations to come will consider it a memorial of national significance.

The monument arose from one family's grief and solemn pride in a gallant son who gave his life for his fellow Marines, for his country, and for a people oppressed. On May 22, 1968, First Lieutenant Victor David Westphall III, USMC, a rifle platoon commander, was killed in an enemy ambush in Con Thien, Republic of Vietnam. His parents, Dr. and Mrs. Victor Westphall, and his younger brother Douglas decided to erect a permanent memorial to honor his spirit and that of his 12 comrades in arms who died along with him in that battle.

Dedicating their own time and resources, the Westphalls built an inspirational monument rising nearly 50 feet in dramatic architectural lines and containing a memorial chapel where visitors could pray and reflect upon the sacrifices America's fighting forces have made to keep our country free.

Westphalls completed the memorial in 1971 and named it the Vietnam Veterans Peace and Brotherhood Chapel. In 1982, the Disabled American Veterans (DAV), a national organization of more than one million veterans disabled in military service, formed a special nonprofit corporation to assume ownership and assure perpetual maintenance of the shrine. The DAV has added a visitors' center, guest house, and access to the site for disabled persons.

Memorial Day, 1983, the memorial was rededicated and given its present name. Later that year the New Mexico Legislature declared it a State memorial. The Disabled American Veterans Vietnam Veterans National Memorial has become known to millions of Americans and has inspired the construction of other memorials to Vietnam veterans across our land. It has forever acquired a place in the history and heritage of the United States and in the hearts of all who would salute the valor, the honor, and the sacrifices of America's Vietnam veterans.

Disabled American Veterans Vietnam Veterans National Memorial as a memorial of national significance. I also salute the efforts of the individuals who have made possible the creation and continued existence of this memorial.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this sixteenth day of November, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

GIFA is one of a series negotiated in accordance with the MFCMA since 1976. The amendment and extension of the GIFA would ensure the continuation of mutually beneficial joint ventures between the U.S. and Japanese fishing industries in the U.S. exclusive economic zone. Unless the GIFA is extended, these operations will cease, causing significant financial hardship to U.S. fishermen.

The President. Admiral Crowe, thank you. This is a bittersweet moment for me and, I think, for all of us who have known and worked closely with Cap Weinberger. It's so fitting to see this fine military tribute to the one American who has probably done as much as any other in history to restore the morale and readiness of our nation's military. In the Rose Garden recently, I called you America's finest Secretary of Defense, and that was no exaggeration.

There are many qualities that made Cap's service at the Pentagon and in my Cabinet so invaluable, and I'll speak to some of those in a moment. But at the heart of the matter, well, it was really a matter of heart. Cap Weinberger started his service to this country more than 40 years ago as a buck private, and he never forgot his origins. He never forgot the men and women of America's armed services, who guard our nation's safety and protect our freedom. And if he was known up on Capitol Hill as a stalwart and determined fighter for our country's defenses -- if maybe, Cap, they even thought you a little stubborn at times -- well, that's because he was going to make sure that if our servicemen are ever asked to put their lives on the line to defend our country they have the best training, equipment, and support America has to offer.

Cap has been the point man in the effort to rebuild our nation's defenses, and he has assembled an unparalleled record of achievement. But I bet if you were to ask him what his proudest achievement was he would say restoring morale in our Armed Forces and bringing back pride in our country's uniform. And Cap can take a lot of the credit for the fact that, as one base commander said to me, the young men and women coming into our military are some of the smartest, best-educated, most highly motivated he had ever seen.

Cap's tenacity comes from another source as well: a recognition of the tragic reality of a world divided, a world torn between those who believe in freedom and cherish the value and dignity of each individual human soul and forces implacably hostile to those ideals. If one faces that reality foursquare, without illusions, it produces a certain, well, clarity of vision. And in 1980, to someone entrusted with the great responsibility of Secretary of Defense, it could only produce a profound sense of urgency.

Cap came to this job more than 6 years ago, the Navy had been permitted to dwindle from more than 1,000 ships to less than 500. There were planes that couldn't fly for lack of spare parts. And our men and women in uniform were seeing their pay in real terms shrink, while pay in the private sector rose. With Caspar Weinberger at the helm, we turned that around, and today we have a military that is once again ready, able, and willing -- a modern defense worthy of the leader of the free world. Yes, Cap, we have come a long distance from 1980. But let me also promise you this: No one here is going to be resting on their laurels after you leave. Frank [Carlucci] and I know the job is not yet complete. And to anyone who calls for even the slightest slacking off in commitment to a strong and ready national defense, I'll only have to say two words: Remember Cap.

We will remember, and we will heed the example of Cap Weinberger, just as he learned from and heeded the example of another great champion of peace through strength. I'm thinking of one particular example: One lone Member of Parliament in the 1930's who saw the promise of new, as yet unproven, technology. He was a Member of Parliament; his name was Winston Churchill, and the technology was radar. It was unworkable, unnecessary, and too expensive, said its opponents.

But with a tenacity that even Cap would envy, Churchill fought the long, hard political battle. And in a way, winning that battle was the true turning point of the Battle of Britain. In the end, Churchill's vision and foresight won the day for radar and helped save the day for Britain and freedom.

Secretary of Defense, Cap has been one of the most eloquent and forceful proponents of our Strategic Defense Initiative. In the 1970's we watched as America cut its defenses to the bone, even as the Soviets conducted a huge buildup of offensive nuclear arsenals. We know today that the Soviet Union has spent many times more on strategic defenses in the last 10 years than has the United States. Cap is determined -- I am determined -- that we will not repeat the mistakes of the last decade. We will not unilaterally disarm in this one area or any area.

SDI holds out hope of a world free from the fear of ballistic missiles. It is, as Cap likes to say, an innocent technology that threatens no one. Indeed, it's hard to see how making people's lives safer will make the world more dangerous.

After so many years, it will take time for some to adjust to a world based on defenses rather than offenses. But it's my sincere belief that SDI will not only make us safer, it will in the end relieve tensions between our country and the Soviet Union and, thus, open up new areas of cooperation and peaceful exchange.

Cap, today we say farewell. For more than two decades I have known you as a colleague, ally, and trusted adviser, but most of all, as a friend. How many times in the Oval Office or in Cabinet meetings have I waited to hear that patient voice, those clear, complex, and perfectly fashioned sentences building resolutely to a conclusion, always, it seemed, as an incontestable one? How many times, my friend, have I looked to you to find the safe harbor of principle in the stormy events of world affairs? And how many times have I found in you the stalwart commitment to freedom, that fierceness of belief in this land of ours that is the mark of a true man of peace?

In another farewell address many years ago, another great patriot, Douglas MacArthur, quoted an old West Point barracks song about old soldiers. Well, this old soldier, Cap Weinberger, isn't going to fade away.

He's leaving his official capacity as Secretary of Defense, but he can never leave his unofficial position as my trusted friend and adviser. So, Cap, if it's all right with you, I'll continue to rely on your counsel. You know that I'll never be more than a phone call away. You have served your country well.

Weinberger. Mr. President, I'm really quite overwhelmed. I really like that part about strategic defense much better. But this is an enormous honor and one that can come to very few people, and as I say, I am entirely overwhelmed by it. But, Mr. President and your excellencies and very distinguished guests, ladies and gentlemen, thank you all very much for coming.

I've always thought that service to a noble cause was actually the definition of happiness. And those of us who had the honor to serve you, Mr. President, and to serve our very great nation have reason to feel not only privileged but blessed. We have all been engaged in the task you set before us in January of 1981, which was to restore pride in the Republic, to return government to the people, and defend liberty not with words alone but with a robust military strength and with great courage.

That seems a little more than common sense, actually, but when we came to this building nearly 7 years ago, we learned that common sense had actually not been ruled. Amidst a very feverish buildup of Soviet military power, which aimed clearly at producing an arsenal of undisputed superiority, the United States had weakened our own military through deep reductions in funding in the hope, perhaps, that somehow that could soothe the Nation's nerves that had been rent so far apart after Vietnam. But sadly, nothing had changed, really, in the world to warrant this, and the threats to our security and freedom increased annually. Our responsibilities to allies and friends could not be reduced. Our obligation to help those in need remained strong.

What had changed was our resolve. Indeed, to many of us it seemed as if our very ability to act as a great power should act -- to support liberty, to deter aggression, to keep the peace -- was being challenged and denied by some.

That decade of neglect was fed, really, by a rather insidious idea that somehow American power was immoral. We began by doubting the war in Vietnam, but we ended by doubting ourselves. Such doubts, of course, led to this great thirst for contrition, which seemed to justify nearly any act of self-criticism. The more guilty we could proclaim ourselves, the better we seemed to feel. And astonishing as it may seem, I remember President Ford had to fight to get Congress even to fund our withdrawal from Vietnam.

The goal seemed to be that we should forget our Vietnam soldiers and sailors, marines, and our airmen as quickly as we could and never acknowledge their quiet heroism. And, Mr. President, I well recall the first time you came to this building as President, which was in early March of 1981, and it was to present a Congressional Medal of Honor to a remarkable soldier. And that medal had been approved sometime before, but the feeling always was that somehow we couldn't keep reminding ourselves of this war. The President saw right away that the first thing he wanted to do was to remind ourselves of the enormous courage and heroism of the people who had participated in that -- fully as great as the heroism that had accompanied all of our other wars. Well, that dark era is behind us, Mr. President, and it's behind us because of your leadership.

I leave with profound regret this very great post that you entrusted to me just about 7 years ago. But so much has been accomplished to restore our military strength and preparedness, that I also leave with a very real sense of accomplishment, with deep gratitude to you and to all with whom I've been deeply privileged to serve here.

I would like to mention particularly Will Taft, whose dedicated and enormously valuable efforts have benefited us all; our Service Secretaries, whom we've seen this morning; Jack Marsh, who has served in his post as Secretary of the Army longer than, I think, any other Secretary; and Secretary Aldridge of the Air Force, who has brought enormous skills to a number of projects, classified and otherwise, that are vital for us all; and Secretary Webb, who is away today -- ably represented by Secretary Garrett, who has presided at the great naval expansion; and their predecessor. These are all great people. And I also leave very firm and very content in the knowledge that with Frank Carlucci, who served here at the very beginning of your term, in this great building; and Colin Powell, at the White House, that we have a team that will mean that, as it should, there will not even be a ripple when the change of command passes.

Well, our recovery that we had to do, our recovery from neglect -- our recovery, really, from indifference -- had to attack many problems at once. But one problem stood out as the most acute. One problem above all demanded instant redress, and that was the condition of our soldiers and sailors and airmen and marines. We had to demonstrate that our own commitment to security was equal to that of the troops. We had to give them the tools they urgently needed to do their ever more difficult task. We had to show the troops that we cared, and we had to care. And we had to do that by making dramatic improvements in their pay and their housing -- their living conditions. We had to restore their faith in the support of the Nation. We had to secure for them the admiration of the Nation, which so rightly belongs to our troops.

Well, sir, we accomplished a great deal. But the really important thing is how little our men and women ask. As you and I know, Mr. President, every time we've had a chance to visit our troops -- and you've discussed it with me and I've mentioned to you -- we have been struck by how much they really want to do that job and how proud they are of what they're doing. They are a very special breed of young people, and they're led by an exceptional cadre of officers and noncommissioned officers, and we are fortunate beyond all expression to have them.

Of course, they rightly deserve the tools that are required to defend freedom and keep the peace for us. We've given them those tools. They are using them with extraordinary skill. And to have those tools available, we had to invigorate research and development efforts. We had to begin plans for new ships and aircraft and ground forces. Frequently, I was asked: When will you be done?

We had to see to it, of course, that many of the systems that were on the drawing board were deployed. And we had to shore up the nuclear deterrent with long overdue improvements, because that was the only defense we had. We had to have new bombers and ICBM's and submarines, and some of these had been sacrificed before. From strategic and conventional systems to mobilization, to reforms of our acquisition system, we had to regenerate America's ability to defend herself in her interests.

And you, Mr. President, set us on a course that will ultimately strengthen deterrence even more. Because you asked us, as you so frequently did in Sacramento, to reject the conventional wisdom. ``Maybe,'' you said, ``it isn't so wise.'' You asked us to make sure that our people do not have to remain always vulnerable to ballistic missiles.

You asked us to join you in a bold move to study and then to deploy strategic defenses. And already we are a long way toward that beckoning goal. Faced with predictable demands that we trade away our right to deploy defenses, which I suppose to my mind is one of the most dangerous ideas ever to infect our political discourse, you redoubled your efforts to move our nation toward a safer world. And we as a nation will always be grateful to you for that.

I am, of course, thankful that we have been as successful as we have, because that success can be seen in a renewed respect for the United States throughout the world -- for freedoms won in Grenada, for freedoms not lost in threatened lands, and for the clear support for our military that now comes from the American people.

I am thankful, of course, as always, to have served under a man of your unique vision, unmovable moral courage, and a penetrating understanding of the principles and goals of our nation. And of course, it's impossible to express my thanks to those of you in the Department of Defense -- those of you who served and worked with me and with Jane every day, those of you who are here in Washington, those of you on the ships at sea and in the air, and at every one of our military installations throughout the world. To all of you, I owe a measure of gratitude that can never properly be paid and that I can never express fully.

President, some here were worried about the weather today. It's one of the things I never worried about, because I don't believe I've ever been at a public function with you that the rain didn't hold off and, possibly, even the sun come out. And I think it's just one of the things that goes with being Governor of California and that you've continued that as our President. And so, that is a great blessing among others that you have brought to us today.

Most of all, I would like to say that I am thankful to have had the good fortune to have grown up in the freest, most prosperous, and yes, the most just society that the world has ever known. Mr. President, I am very proud to have joined with you in the service to our nation and to have participated in that noblest cause for which so many of our countrymen have given the last full measure of their devotion. So, now, I'd like to say thank you, goodbye, and God bless and keep all of you.

Because teachers are among the most important role models in our society, it is truly fitting that we set aside African American Education Week to encourage young African Americans to pursue careers in the field of education.

Americans have always deeply valued the rewards and the advancement that education makes possible. No task is more vital to the strength and security of our Nation than that of providing good education for all our citizens. So that America continues to remain a land of opportunity for all people, we should encourage a wide representation of African Americans as teachers and continued concern for African American students. The National Alliance of Black School Educators is committed to these goals. By inspiring students with a vision of excellence, we can touch the lives of countless youngsters in present and future generations for the better.

The week in which Thanksgiving falls is a most appropriate time in which to pay proud and grateful tribute to the millions of Americans who care for aging members of their families. The care these family members offer to those who once cared for them, or who share other ties of family life and love, is a beautiful reminder for all of us of the strength of love, of selflessness, and of the family.

Many family caregivers are women -- wives, daughters, and daughters-in-law. Many must forego employment to have the time for the family care. Many are aged spouses, and some are in need of care themselves. All family caregivers can use assistance in their duties and respite from them. Countless families work together to provide care for aging members, sharing expenses and aiding with daily tasks such as hygiene, medical needs, transportation, shopping, and household maintenance.

Nation's devoted family caregivers and express our gratitude to them for their kindness, compassion, and hard work. We can do so, of course, both in word and in deed, helping in our own families, among our friends, and in our neighborhoods. In this way we can befriend, honor, and show our love to family caregivers -- and to the elderly family members and other senior citizens who have done so much for us and for our communities and our country through the years.

You know, every time I see a gathering of teachers, something just gets into me. I was thinking on the way over here about a story I used to tell out on the campaign trail last year. I won't give you the context, because as you probably know, we've been negotiating with the Hill recently, and I don't want to do anything to upset the bipartisan budget settlement that we're trying to reach.

I guess you could say the young man was missing the point -- [laughter] -- but unlike him, you're here today because your fellow Americans have not missed the point. And that point is: your dedication to your profession and your service to others. John Erskine suggested once that a good teacher is so rare that the rumor of him or her spreads like a scandal. Well, Washington, after all, is a city that loves scandals -- [laughter] -- so it won't surprise you that the rumor of your work has been heard here. We've asked you to come to the White House, this complex I mentioned, so that I might, as President, on behalf of a grateful nation, extend to each of you our warmest thanks.

I know that praise and thanks make most of you a little uncomfortable. It's no secret teachers don't get a lot of it in their day-to-day work, which frankly reminds me of another story -- [laughter] -- about a teacher I knew back in Dixon, Illinois, named B.J. Frazier. He not only taught English, but -- and I don't know whether principals still do this today or not -- he was also principal. And I remember one day I was in his office. It wasn't exactly a social visit. [Laughter] And I remember the conversation, because at one point, he said to me -- he probably saw the look on my face -- that it didn't matter to him what I thought of him at that time, that the only thing he was concerned about was what I might think of him 15 years from then. And I must say, after 15 or more years had passed and before he departed this Earth, I'm grateful that I had the opportunity to tell him what I thought of him and what he had meant to me. And as the years went by, I'd come to realize how much he did mean to me and to so many others.

I think this does illustrate my point: Anyone interested in immediate feedback or instant gratification doesn't belong in your profession. Henry Adams put it very well when he said a teacher affects eternity. He or she can never tell where his or her influence stops. And for most of you, knowing that 10 years or 15 years from now someone will remember you and be grateful is thanks enough. As someone else once put it: Teaching is the most responsible, the least advertised, the worst paid, and the most richly rewarded profession in the world.

I haven't used this in a while, but it's really one of my favorite bits of poetry that says it all about your profession. It was written by Clark Mollenhoff, a former Pulitzer Prize-winning reporter with the Des Moines Register and now a member of the faculty at Washington and Lee.

He's right, of course. Whether you're Christa McAuliffe following her dream into the stars and into grateful memory of her countrymen or whether you're inspiring young people day after day, you too can be all the difference. You too can become a symbol of hope.

We've seen the college board scores go up. We've seen an emphasis on basics. We've seen a new interest in math and science. We've seen 32 States increase their requirements in math and 26 States increase their requirements in science. And parents are more active and involved with local schools and their children's education.

We as a nation owe you our thanks for preparing our next generation. In order for our children to be able to compete in the next century, they must have the proper education, and an emphasis on math and science is critical. This is your special work and your dedication to ensuring our children's future, and we thank you. And the fact that you're here today is further proof that Americans care about their schools and care about their teachers. I urge you to continue your wonderful work, and if future historians say our time saw a renaissance of American education, you can be sure those of you here today are the ones who made it happen.

The report of the congressional committee investigating the Iran-contra affair confirms the information contained in the Tower board report and summarizes testimony that we all watched on television this summer. As shown by this report, the President did not know of the diversion of funds. When he found out, he acted immediately to begin the many investigations that have looked into this matter.

President has cooperated every step of the way, providing hundreds of thousands of pages of documents to the committee, to the Independent Counsel, and to the Tower board. As these investigations have unfolded, the President made it clear that he accepts responsibility and understands that mistakes were made in the conduct of these policies. On March 4, following the Tower board report, the President said: ``What began as a strategic opening to Iran deteriorated in its implementation into trading arms for hostages. This runs counter to my own beliefs, to administration policy, and to the original strategy we had in mind.

Also in the process of these investigations, the President began to make the orderly changes in government that would prevent these kinds of instances from happening again. He brought in a new team at the National Security Council, headed by Frank Carlucci, to make those changes. The President instituted new recording procedures. He created a new post of an NSC legal adviser to ensure greater sensitivity to the matters of law. He recommended that a congressional joint committee on intelligence be formed to oversee the intelligence community. He reached an agreement with existing congressional intelligence committees on the sharing of information. He revised the operations of the NSC to strengthen the interagency processes of decisionmaking, and in general, he has even gone beyond the Tower board recommendations in changing the foreign policy decision-making process in the White House.

This new report reflects the subjective opinions in not even the unanimous judgment of the committee. There is a minority report and separate dissenting views. But the committee should be commended for its long, arduous work over the last many months. It has given the American people, through its televised hearings, direct access to the information in this case. The American people have had the opportunity to make their own judgments, and it serves no purpose for us to argue with the opinions of the committee members.

In view of the ongoing Independent Counsel investigation, we feel that it is inappropriate to make legal judgments. This report is but another step in the investigatory process. But, it does culminate the long summer of self-examination for America and for the administration, and now we are through it. We are moving on, and we trust that out of this experience has come a new wisdom about the process of governing in America.

Senator Long, I appreciate this opportunity to join you in commemorating the 25 years of service of the Office of the U.S. Trade Representative. This office was organized in 1962 -- and maybe you've been told that already -- to enable the Executive Office of the President to provide leadership and coordination in the conduct of our trade policies.

I want to extend a personal word of congratulations to Clayton Yeutter for the terrific job that he's been doing, along with the rest of you, in championing the cause of free and fair trade among the nations. Clayton, I'm grateful for all you've done. The U.S.-Canada Free Trade Agreement and the Uruguay Round negotiations are two examples of the outstanding contributions you and your staff are making to achieve a more open world trading system. You've got a lean, mean fighting machine here, Clayton.

I understand that a new fellowship you've just been told about, and I've just learned about, has been established to provide advanced training for your USTR negotiators in honor of Senator Russell Long. He served for 15 years as chairman of the Senate Finance Committee and was always a champion of responsible trade policy. Senator, I hope our future negotiating team will be as tough and responsible as you always were.

Well, there's bad news and good news about trade. The bad news is that the trade deficit remains far too high, and we must remain absolutely diligent in our efforts to bring that deficit down. And that's the bad news. The good news is that solid progress has been made. The latest figures give us reason for hope -- not reason to let up, mind you, but reason for hope. September figures released last week show both an $800 million increase in exports and an $800 million decrease in imports. The trade deficit dropped by 1.6 billion, down to 14.1 billion, the best showing in 4 months. Manufactured exports were up a strong 1.1 billion.

Progress against the trade deficit is taking place on a wide front and in every major trading market. The trade deficit with Japan dipped slightly. And it's still far from satisfactory, but better than the previous month's $4.9 billion high. At the same time, imports from the European countries, or the European Common Market, I should say, fell by $400 million, while exports rose by 325 million.

Perhaps one of the greatest misconceptions about today's economy is the idea that our country is no longer producing those products, that, somehow, America's becoming deindustrialized. Well, to paraphrase Mark Twain, the reports of the death of America's industrial base have been greatly exaggerated. In fact, as a percentage of real gross national product, manufacturing has remained almost constant since 1960. Now, that's not to suggest stagnation. In fact, we've been living through a time of great change in American manufacturing. Foreign competition -- which is one of the positive and indispensable roles such competition plays -- has spurred on our domestic producers to improve quality, bring down costs, and to invest in state-of-the-art technology.

One of the goals of our economic recovery program, early in the administration, was to encourage much-needed investment in America's manufacturing infrastructure in order to meet foreign competition. Today, we can see it beginning to pay off. Our working people are still the most productive in the world because they've got the modern tools and equipment needed to keep them competitive. In fact, worker productivity in manufacturing grew at an annual rate of nearly 5 percent since the recovery began. Now, that's the right way of protecting American jobs, and it seems to be working. Manufacturing output during this expansion has increased 37 percent. And while the service sector has grown faster, manufacturing has still moved forward. Manufacturing profits are up, and those September figures tell us that manufactured exports are 20 percent higher than a year ago.

What we must do now, and much of this falls on your shoulders, is make certain that our manufacturers get as fair a shake overseas as importers get here. Now is the time to be opening markets and hammering out agreements that will increase the flow of trade and not restrict it. So, we're all counting on you to be aggressive in promoting the interests of our country and in furthering the cause of an open and fair trading system. All I can say is: I have absolute confidence in you, and I appreciate the fine work that you're doing.

We all talk about the difficulties of getting around in Washington when it snows -- it's 5 hours to get home and that sort of thing -- but it's taken us 2 weeks to get here. [Laughter] I appreciate this opportunity to be with you today. First and foremost, this occasion gives me a chance to extend to you my personal thanks for all the United States Chamber of Commerce has done -- in the arena of commerce and industry and the political arena, as well -- to lay the foundation for the tremendous economic strides America has made and that Mr. Delchamps referred to.

A special thank you to both Chairman Ollie Delchamps and to Vice Chairman William Kanaga. I'm sorry one of your leaders, a friend of mine, couldn't be with us today: Chamber President Dick Lesher -- the man who is to Federal tax rates what Conan the Barbarian was to anyone who got in his way. [Laughter] Seriously, we've been part of a team that has accomplished much, and we have every reason to be proud. I understand you just saw a film entitled, ``Making It,'' which documents America's entrepreneurial spirit as evidenced in six small, but growing companies; and believe me, I'm honored to have just been able to meet the stars of that film here on stage.

I happen to believe that -- I know you agree with me -- that it is this spirit of enterprise that is the secret of our country's success. Over the 200 years of our Republic, our economy has produced more wealth, more opportunity, and a higher standard of living for more people than has ever happened before. In these last 7 years together, we have sought to unleash that same creative and economy-building spirit of enterprise that built America.

The collectivism, excessive regulation, and high tax rates of the last decade brought our people unbearable inflation, sky-high interest rates, economic decline, and national pessimism. Instead of trying to harness the energy and resources of the American people, which seemed to be the goal of our liberal predecessors, we have sought to set them free. And I've always felt, and I think events have proven me right, that the best thing the Government can do for free people is to get out of their way.

So, that's what we set out to do. It was tough going just to clear away the deadweight of excessive regulation, to get the massive increases in Federal spending under control -- and we were only partially successful at that -- and to bring down the tax rates from the economy-killing levels they were at. And then we had to stick to our guns while our program had time to work its magic.

And much to the dismay of those who said it would never happen in the first place, it just kept coming and coming. Last month we passed a milestone, and today it's fitting that I've come here to recognize it with all of you. It couldn't have happened without you. Together we put in place growth-oriented tax, regulation, and spending policies that have brought our fellow citizens 5 years of uninterrupted economic growth -- the longest peacetime expansion on record.

This expansion is not just statistics; it's meant a better life for our fellow Americans. I've received letters from people all over this country telling me the wonderful things that they have been able to accomplish. Of course, everyone hasn't been satisfied, especially those who opposed our reforms in the first place. And even though this undeniably has been a period of tremendous economic renewal, there's been a constant drumbeat of doom and gloom, rumors, and misinformation. Will Rogers once said: ``Rumor travels fast, but it don't stay put as long as truth.'' So, I'd like to touch on a few of the myths that have made the rounds of late.

First, we've heard time and again that America's industrial base is eroding, that our manufacturers are noncompetitive, and that our country is becoming deindustrialized. Well, the facts tell a far different story. Manufacturing, as a percentage of our total real output, has stayed virtually the same for the last two decades. Some manufacturing industries have gone down, no doubt. Others, however, have gone up.

But while the overall percentages have remained about the same, pervasive change has been the order of the day in America's basic industries, and there's always a certain degree of apprehension and employee dislocation during such times. The picture coming into focus now, however, is not of American manufacturing surrendering and fading into oblivion but of renovation, revitalization, and computerization on a grand scale. Instead of pessimism, what we see is reason for confidence and optimism.

For a year now, our manufacturing output has been rising steadily. Giants in the manufacturing of new technologies are emerging. Some traditional industries, all but written off a decade ago, are now making dramatic strides. Steel is, perhaps, the most impressive example. Business Week reports that U.S. steelmakers are now among the world's most productive.

One of the primary goals of our economic recovery program was encouraging investment to keep our companies competitive. Well, now it's paying off. Real investment has risen to about one-sixth of the gross national product, and along with a new spirit of cooperation from the assembly line to the boardroom, it's keeping us competitive and ensuring that the American worker remains the most productive in the world. And speaking of working people, we currently have a higher percentage of our work force employed than ever before in our history. An incredible 14 million new jobs have been created since the expansion began. I think that's something to crow about.

Yet even as we beam with pride, a myth has spread that the new jobs being created are actually low-paying, dead-end jobs. Well, again, this information may have wide circulation, but as an old Virginia lawyer once told a hometown jury: T'ain't so. According to Department of Labor figures, nearly two-thirds of the new jobs have been in higher paying occupations, and only 10 percent in lower paying, low-skill occupations. Over 90 percent of the new jobs are full-time. In short, these are, by and large, better paying, more competitive, more challenging, and more rewarding jobs.

And this new opportunity is being shared by all Americans, of every race. In the last 5 years, black employment has soared forward twice as fast as white employment. Hispanics have found over 2 million jobs since the recovery began.

Perhaps one aspect of this expansion of which I am most proud concerns the advances made by less fortunate citizens. In the late 1970's, an ominous increase in the poverty rate began. Black Americans were among the hardest hit.

One of the myths being heard today is that we're in a time when the poor are getting poorer and the rich are richer. Well, in fact, we have at long last turned around the increasing poverty rate that we inherited from those who now criticize us. Black Americans, whose standard of living began dropping in the late 1970's, now are on the way up. Real family income in the black community is up, and since 1982 it has grown almost 40 percent faster than white income.

Our goal has been an America with freedom and opportunity for all; an America where, as John Kennedy once said, a rising tide lifts all boats; an America where people can rest assured that their life savings will not be decimated by double-digit inflation; an America, as our Founding Fathers wanted her to be, where government is the servant, not the master; a vital, future-oriented America being catapulted forward by the hard work, creativity, and enterprise of its people; a compassionate and caring America, where the people don't wait for government and bureaucracy, but reach out themselves to help one another and to assist those in need.

A few weeks ago was Halloween. You know, there's a story about a fellow who dressed as the devil for a costume party. And at the party he had a little too much to drink. Being tipsy, he got lost on his way home.

When the market turned down, no one who owned stock wanted to be in the group that bore the brunt of a loss, which was expected as part of a long-awaited adjustment. A stampede was the result. It has, as one would expect, unnerved many throughout the country and throughout the world. In making an assessment of the situation, I cannot help but point out that the stock market today is about where it was at the end of 1986, after 4 years of economic growth. It is roughly twice as high as it was when the expansion began. So, while there's every reason for concern, there's no reason to be apocalyptic.

And if explanations are needed, let us not accept myths or unfounded statements about our economy. The Wall Street slide coincided with the following positive economic news: The gross national product was picking up steam, rising to an impressive 3.8-percent annual rate. Inflation, after a brief spurt, was settling back to a modest 2.7 percent. The unemployment rate went to its lowest level in 8 years. New third-quarter statistics from the Department of Commerce underscored that the economy was strengthening almost across the board.

There are those, of course, who suggest that nervousness about the high level of Federal deficit spending contributed to skittishness on Wall Street. Well, excessive spending and large deficits have been and remain a vexing problem.

The important thing from my view is where we go from here. I believe that the movers and shakers of commerce, industry, and investment are most concerned about how and if we will handle the Federal Government's deficit spending. We must make certain that growth forces prevail and that recession is avoided.

It's up to us, because the course we follow, the policies we pursue, will determine the future. Let me say without reservation that I see no reason to believe that the market drop should drag our country into recession, because the adjustment still leaves us with a market almost twice the size of when our economic expansion began.

Prize winning economist Paul Samuelson has quipped that Wall Street has predicted nine of the last six recessions. [Laughter] To be specific, stock market drops have happened, and on a surprising number of occasions the economy has kept moving up. The continuing volatility of the market, however, necessitates that great care must be taken with major economic decisions. Two significant stock market declines in this century that had two different aftermaths can help us determine our best course of action. In 1929 the market crashed, and later the economy sank and stayed sunk. In another case, in 1962 the stock market, over a 4-month period, lost almost a third of its value. This market slide was followed by the most robust period of growth in United States history.

What made the difference? Well, after the 1929 market drop, President Herbert Hoover signed into law protectionist trade legislation; and in 1932, at the depth of the market crash, the Congress, taking exactly the wrong action, passed tax increases that condemned the people of America to the Great Depression. In stark contrast, in 1962, with a market in a critical decline, the Trade Expansion Act was passed; and President Kennedy proposed dramatic tax rate cuts. Our economy took off, and the American people enjoyed an unprecedented period of high growth and low inflation.

Another difference between 1929 and 1962 was the liquidity provided to the economy by the Federal Reserve System. And I'm pleased that our new Federal Reserve Chairman, Alan Greenspan, is taking all the steps needed to provide the banking system with the necessary liquidity.

The country is now looking for cooperation among all responsible government leaders to bring down the unacceptably high level of deficit spending, but we must do it in a way that will not threaten the economy. The Senate on Tuesday showed that it can do its part when it voted to prevent consideration of legislation exceeding congressional budget targets. And I applaud the Senate's courage.

There's been a lot of talk in Washington the past several weeks about reducing the Federal budget deficit. My representatives have been meeting with negotiators from the House and Senate, attempting to craft a package that will deal fairly with all elements of the Federal budget, place the deficit on a downward slope, and avoid the automatic cutting device, a sequester. While the final package may not be all that I might want, it will not be all that Congress wants either. But it is vital that the negotiators complete their work now. Any agreement that comes from these sessions probably will not be the final word on reducing the Federal budget deficit, but it will be the right signal at the right time and will show our determination to work together to solve this problem.

Now is the time for final action, and now is the time for fairness. I urge the negotiators to produce a budget plan that is enforceable and gets the country on a path toward long-term deficit reduction. Whatever understanding is reached, it must bolster economic growth, and that certainly means it must encompass more than simply extracting more money from the taxpayers' pockets.

Now, as popular as the notion seems to be within the Beltway, I cannot bring myself to operate under the assumption that our citizens are at fault because they're undertaxed and selfishly putting themselves above the national interest. During this administration, the tax revenues of the Federal Government have risen from $600 billion to $854 billion. Between 1980, the final year of the last administration, and the fiscal year that ended September 30th, 1987, Federal revenues then increased not 5 percent, not 10 percent, not even 25 percent, but 65 percent. The people aren't undertaxed.

In fiscal year 1987 we made substantial progress in slowing the growth of Federal spending. I am absolutely committed to working with Congress to ensure that this represented the beginning of a downward trend that will bring our budget back into balance in the not-too-distant future. Hard choices have to be made. The Federal Government can not be all things to all people. Some spending programs are more important than others, and some are a downright waste of taxpayer money. There are cuts out there to be made, and it's in the national interest to make them. More than anything else, in formulating a solution, we must be realistic.

You know, I used to tell a little joke about the Federal Government compared to the private sector and even local and State governments and all. And then I got out of the way of telling that story. But now, with their attitude toward the deficit spending on the part of some of them up there on the Hill, I remember it. And that was the local town that decided to raise its traffic signs from 5 feet of height -- its direction signs -- up to 7 feet to make them more visible to the motorists. And the Government came along and said, oh, we have a program to do that for you. We're going to lower your streets 2 feet. [Laughter] You know, it's imperative, now more than ever, that decisionmakers in this country learn the lessons of history. Ben Franklin once wrote: ``If you will not hear reason, she'll surely rap your knuckles.'' Well, we don't need our knuckles rapped.

It was 58 years ago, on December 5th, 1929, that President Herbert Hoover stood here and addressed a group of business leaders not unlike yourselves. He acknowledged the stock market panic and reassured everyone of the fundamental strength of the American economy. And this is where the parallel ends. We're not rushing forward to increase tax rates as the Congress did in 1932. In fact, next year a tax rate reduction, the main phase of our tax reform package, will kick in just when we need it the most. The impact will be forceful and energizing, like a gigantic shot in the arm.

As far as raising tariffs, like the Smoot-Hawley catastrophe, we're moving in just the opposite direction, toward a historymaking, near-total elimination of trade barriers with our biggest trading partner, Canada. And make no mistake, our free trade agreement will be a boon to both our peoples and a major stimulus to economic growth.

I have long felt that the people who came to the New World, especially here in North America, have a mission to perform in proving to the world there is a better way. Canada and the United States will soon be doing just that: demonstrating to all humanity that there are, indeed, no limits to what people can accomplish when they are free to follow their dreams. Once this step has proven successful, there's no reason others should not use our success as a model. Ours is a dream of an open world where all are free to trade and do business together, to enjoy the fruits of prosperity, and to live in peace with one another. And we're making that dream a reality. It is the American dream.

America's best days ahead? You bet they are, and together we're making certain of that. Any budget compromise will prove again that freedom is right and it works, that we Americans can make the tough decisions, can find the common ground necessary to keep our nation growing and moving forward. And I welcome this chance to thank you, all of you, for what you are doing. God bless you.

Note: The President spoke at 10:55 a.m. in the Hall of Flags at the U.S. Chamber of Commerce building to local business leaders. He was introduced by Oliver H. Delchamps, Jr. In his opening remarks, the President referred to a meeting with the chamber that had been scheduled for November 12 but was canceled because of a snowstorm.

Dr. Gerry Cox, your president of the Business Partners, and your president-elect Joan Whalen, and all of you. It's a very great pleasure to be here with you in a group that so exemplifies the spirit of enterprise. Now, I think that's a combination the foreign competition is never going to be able to beat. [Laughter] I know that your organization, Business Partners, is a dynamic group of Americans on the move, representing a growing force, economically and politically.

I realize there are a number of people I should be recognizing here today, but let me just single out one. It's a Presidential appointee of whom I am exceptionally proud, a hard-working member of the Federal Reserve Board, Dr.

Earlier in my administration there was a lot of talk about a so-called gender gap and a supposed shortfall in support of me by the women of America. Well, as much as was said about that phenomenon, I'm proud that in 1984 our ticket was reelected and that 57 percent of the women who voted supported our cause. [Applause] Now, that did include some of you, didn't it? [Laughter] I don't think there's any doubt as to why we got the support we did. Americans want a strong, free, and prosperous America. We all have a common goal. We want to keep the economy growing and opportunity for all citizens expanding. We want to keep -- well, we want safe streets and security for our families.

I know you've been briefed on all the latest figures, so it will suffice for me to say that we inherited a battered and teetering economy back in 1981. We promised the American people, not business as usual but a dramatic change of direction. Together, and that includes many of you, we worked and struggled to put in place growth-oriented tax, regulation, and spending policies. And did it work? I think all of us can be proud that last month our country enjoyed the 59th month of uninterrupted expansion, which is the longest peacetime expansion on record in our history. [Applause] Now, that is something to crow about.

I was just over at the Chamber of Commerce this morning, and I mentioned that one thing about which I'm most proud is the all-inclusive nature of the economic progress that we've been enjoying. A wide spectrum of our fellow citizens have seen their lives and those of their families improve. Since the start of the expansion, women have created one out of every four new businesses. Today, more than three million businesses are owned by women, and that number is growing two times as fast as the number of businesses men own. In the last 5 years, employment for American women has jumped nearly 17 percent, which is much faster than the overall increase. At the same time, unemployment for women has dropped 4.1 percentage points. And the ratio between the weekly earnings of women and men has risen from 62.5 percent in 1979 to 69.2 percent in 1986 -- still aways to go, but it's coming in the right direction.

Well, the facts tell a far different story, and women are rapidly moving into an expanding number of professional jobs. Since 1979 the percentage of women employed in the higher-paying occupations has escalated dramatically. The percentage of women accountants and auditors rose from 34 to 45 percent; women computer programmers rose from 28 to 40 percent; computer systems analysts rose from 20 to 30 percent; lawyers from 10 to 15 percent; and managers and administrators from 22 to 29 percent. Now, I think the record will show this to have been one of the greatest periods of expanding opportunity for American women in the history of our Republic. And I'm proud that it's been our economic reforms that laid the foundation for this dramatic social progress.

It was, of course, President Kennedy who said: A rising tide lifts all boats. And in the last 59 months, the American people have enjoyed a rising tide of economic growth and expansion. Together, our task now is to ensure that our country moves forward from here. And considering the powerful forces still trying to pull America back to the failed policies of the past, ours is no easy responsibility. The volatility all too evident in the stock market suggests that we must proceed with care in meeting the challenges ahead, especially in coming to grips with the dual deficit problems -- the trade and Federal budget deficits.

Well, there's reason, however, for hope about both deficits. On the trade deficit, even as the stock market was falling a few weeks ago, the latest figures tell us progress is being made in narrowing the trade gap. In fact, the September figures released last week show an $800-million drop in imports and an $800-million increase in exports. Progress on the trade deficit is being made on a wide front. Now, this is no reason to let up. We must continue to narrow the gap. But it's reason to be suspicious of any draconian protectionist measures that could well knock the legs out from under the world trading system and send our economy reeling at the same time. I recently received a letter of support, cosigned by 38 Members of the Senate, pledging to oppose enactment of any economy-killing protectionist legislation.

The second challenge is the continued high level of Federal deficit spending. And here, too, progress has been made. Most people have failed to realize that this year the Federal red ink was reduced by one-third, a drop of $73 billion in the level of deficit spending from 1986 to 1987. And I think there's evidence of a new commitment, a bipartisan spirit of cooperation in tackling the remaining deficit.

One thing I can tell you is that everyone knows now that the problem will not be solved simply by raising the taxes of the American people. The tax rate reductions, for example, that we fought so hard to get in last year's reform bill, will not be touched; of that you can be certain. We've been working with the leadership of both Houses of Congress, and I can report to you I'm hopeful that this problem is going to be solved and solved in the right way.

I just came across some figures that I was wondering about. Having looked for my first job back in the days of the Great Depression, I was a little interested because then they had had the great stock market crash. And then President Hoover went before the people and said we had to make things right. So, among the things they did was the Smoot-Hawley tariff, which just made the Depression worldwide -- a protectionist measure. But then our Congress raised the income taxes. One and a half percent was the bottom bracket; they raised it to 9 percent. They raised the 25 percent top rate to 63 percent, and the result was a 21-percent drop in Federal revenues. So, when people talk about taxes as an answer to deficit spending, it's an answer all right: It'll just make the deficit greater.

I also see evidence of bipartisan cooperation in meeting the responsibility we share in bringing the Supreme Court up to strength. After the travails and wrangling of the past months, I think a consensus is emerging behind an individual who'll serve our country with honor and distinction, Judge Anthony Kennedy. Many of you may be aware that I've known Judge Kennedy for some 15 years. He's a jurist who believes in our constitutional system of enumerated powers and can be trusted to move forward within the spirit of the Founding Fathers. He realizes the importance his decisions will have on each of us and on the safety of our families. He has a wonderful family of his own, and I couldn't help but admire them when I announced his nomination last week.

As a member of the Ninth Circuit Court of Appeals, Judge Kennedy has proven himself to be a tough and fair jurist. He's the kind of jurist of whom all Americans can be proud, and I hope he'll have your support as he moves through the confirmation process. [Applause] God bless you. Thank you. I would also hope that the Senate acts expeditiously so that the highest court in the land is able to conduct its business with a full complement of nine justices.

We're about to enter into an election year, and during the next 12 months we'll again demonstrate to the world that, in a free and democratic society, competition and good will can go hand in hand. And whoever is elected and takes my post, all Americans will wish that President the very best of luck. And I hope you agree there's ample reason for every American to look ahead with confidence.

This period of growth, 59 months of it, was just a prolog to the great advances ahead. America's leading mankind into a new age of peace, freedom, and prosperity -- an age of opportunities beyond our imagination. And many of you are part of the entrepreneurial revolution that is keeping America out front.

I want to thank all of you for the support you've been to me over these last 7 years. And now I'm going to do something I've been doing recently. I have a new hobby, and, so, I try to share it. That hobby is, I've been collecting stories that I can find are told by the Soviet citizens among themselves. And those stories reveal they have a great sense of humor, but also they've got a certain amount of cynicism about their system. And I just thought I'd close by telling you one of the more recent ones I've heard.

They came into General Secretary Gorbachev, and they told him that there was an elderly lady there in the Kremlin who said she would not leave until she had had a chance to speak to him. ``Well,'' he said, ``send her in.'' So they did.

Management, in consultation with the heads of other Executive departments and agencies, shall review and revise, as necessary and to the extent permitted by law, personnel policies and regulations in order (a) to ensure that government managers have the flexibility to organize in the most effective and efficient manner to achieve levels of productivity comparable with those of private industry, and (b) to reduce any adverse effects of productivity improvements on employees.

We do well to set aside the week in which Thanksgiving falls to honor the achievements of American Indians, the first inhabitants of the lands that now constitute the continental United States. Native Americans' assistance made a significant difference for early settlers. Since then, American Indians have continued to make valuable contributions to our country.

American Indians when it stipulated, ``the Congress shall have Power To . . . regulate commerce with foreign Nations, and among the several States, and with the Indian Tribes; . . . .'' This unique government-to-government relationship continues today and has been reinforced through treaties, laws, and court decisions. During the Bicentennial of the Constitution, it is especially fitting that we recognize and celebrate the many contributions of American Indians.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this nineteenth day of November, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

Roosevelt captured a vital truth years ago when he said, ``We cannot as a Nation get along at all if we haven't the right kind of home life.'' ``The right kind of home life'' is exactly what adoption is all about; during National Adoption Week we do well to remember that and to encourage this loving, proud, and beautiful way to create or enlarge families.

The family is something all of us need. Wholesome family life is not only the basis for stable communities and a strong country but also the best way ever devised to nurture, raise, and love children and to instill in them confidence, compassion, and understanding of right and wrong. Family life is a precious gift, and it is something adoption affords both children and parents in a truly special way.

In recent years many Americans have been discovering adoption and all its blessings, but for many it remains an untapped opportunity. Thanks to the efforts of devoted citizens, though, much progress has taken place in finding permanent homes for thousands of children, including some of the more than 30,000 youngsters with special needs across our country who await adoptive families. These children are older, or have emotional, physical, or mental disabilities, or are of minority heritage, or are sibling groups who cannot be separated. These wonderful children have a great deal of love to offer their adoptive families.

What is required of people considering adoption is the ability to love and the desire to help children. Adoption of children by their relatives or their step-parents has always been common, but in recent years we have begun to see the benefits of adoption by single, foster, and handicapped parents, as well as by parents with biological children. Members of the military have also shown great interest in adoption.

Many single women have realized that adoption is the best solution to crisis pregnancy. Often under the most difficult circumstances, they have rejected abortion and given their babies the gifts of life and of a loving adoptive home. Many dedicated Americans help these expectant mothers during and after pregnancy, but all of us, as individuals and as a Nation, need to do much more to support and encourage the brave women who heroically choose life.

National Adoption Week and throughout the year we should do all we can to make adoption a true national concern. There is much that each of us can do to foster awareness of adoption -- in schools, churches, businesses, communities, and government. The new report by the Interagency Task Force on Adoption will help us find innovative ways to encourage adoption and eliminate barriers to it, and that is good news for everyone.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 19th day of November, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

The destiny of America is shaped not only by events within the councils of government, industry, and finance, but also by the hand of God and the life and the love in each and every home in our Nation.

America's families are a tremendous source of strength and faith and freedom for our children and our country, and during National Family Week we recognize this truth and pay glad tribute to the families of our land.

The family is a source of well-being, a place to give and receive love and to learn and live our traditions and the virtues and the values of responsibility, selflessness and self-reliance, loyalty, mutual respect, fairness, and the power of faith. In families we also come to know our inherent dignity and worth as individuals and to enjoy the God-given rights that are the basis of freedom.

We must remember during National Family Week, and especially during the Bicentennial of the Constitution, that freedom, the family, and the individual have everything to do with each other. That is a truth that the Founders of our country knew well. The more the integrity of the family is fostered -- the more social and public policy influences that weaken the family are eliminated -- the stronger is freedom and the healthier is society. Let us forever remember this personally and as a people, for the good of our families and the good of our country.

Significant declines in rail employment have eroded the pension fund's contribution base. Refinancing legislation enacted in 1974, 1981, and 1983 has failed to provide long-term solutions for the rail pension system. The Railroad Retirement Board's chief actuary is again predicting cash-flow problems and recommends an upward adjustment in the rail sector's contributions.

Rail industry pensions should be fully financed from rail sector resources. As long as the Federal Government has a fiduciary responsibility for rail pensions, I will work to ensure that rail sector contributions are adequate to finance rail retirees' benefits. I therefore concur with the chief actuary, Board Chairman Gielow, and Board Member Chamberlain that the rail sector's contributions should increase to prevent the pending financial crisis and to ensure adequate financing for rail industry pensions. I renew my August recommendation for a 3-percent rail sector contribution rate increase on January 1, 1988, and a 1.5-percent increase on January 1, 1989.

I strongly oppose suggestions by some to restart American taxpayer subsidies to the rail sector by transferring Federal income taxes collected on rail pensions to the rail industry pension fund. As the Congress recognized in 1983 and 1986, rail pensions -- the amounts above social security equivalent levels -- are private pensions and should be treated like all other private industry pensions. Income taxes collected on these private pensions should go to the general fund, not be converted to subsidies to the rail sector.

The long-term solution for the rail pension system lies in the private sector, where all other industry pension systems reside. Rail labor and management should be allowed to determine pension financing and payment provisions free from Federal intrusion and participation. I therefore reaffirm my position that the rail pension system should be restored to the private sector and terminated as a Federally administered program.

Since my last report, the Tribunal has rendered 14 awards, for a total of 318 awards. Of that total, 237 have been awards in favor of American claimants; 142 of these were awards on agreed terms, authorizing and approving payment of settlements negotiated by the parties, and 95 were decisions adjudicated on the merits. The Tribunal has dismissed a total of 21 other claims on the merits and 44 for jurisdictional reasons. Of the 16 remaining awards, one represented a withdrawal and 15 were in favor of the Iranian claimant. As of October 9, 1987, total payments to successful American claimants from the Security Account held by the NV Settlement Bank stood at approximately $983 million.

The Tribunal also continues to process claims of U.S. nationals against Iran of less than $250,000 each. As of October 15, 1987, a total of 139 small claims have been resolved, 12 of them since my last report, as a result of decisions on the merits, awards on agreed terms, or Tribunal orders. Two contested claims were decided in awards issued by the Tribunal since my previous report, raising the total number of contested claims decided to 13, eight favoring the American claimant. These decisions will help in establishing guidelines for the adjudication or settlement of similar small claims. To date, American claimants have also received 20 awards on agreed terms reflecting settlement of claims under $250,000.

Since my last report, the three Tribunal Chambers have selected 65 claims for active arbitration, bringing the total number of small claims currently under active Tribunal consideration to 206. The Tribunal has held hearings in two of these claims since my last report, and the Department of State has filed additional pleadings in 45 such claims.

The Department of State continues to coordinate efforts of concerned governmental agencies in presenting U.S. claims against Iran, as well as the response of the United States Government to claims brought against it by Iran. Since my last report, the Department has filed six pleadings in government-to-government claims based on contracts for the provision of goods and services. Two such claims have been settled, so 35 government-to-government claims remain pending.

This was the position advocated by the United States. The Tribunal further stated that each of its three chambers may decide in each case whether interest should be awarded and how it should be calculated.

While a decrease in the number of fatalities is encouraging during a time of economic prosperity and lower gas prices, the loss of approximately 120 lives per day on our Nation's highways is still too high. Also, with the increasing motor vehicle travel, we are faced with the threat of an even higher number of traffic fatalities. Therefore, there is a continuing need for effective motor vehicle and highway safety programs.

I would like first to note the United Nations Secretary General's October 29 announcement of the appointment of a new Special Representative of the Secretary General on Cyprus, Oscar Hector Camilion. Mr. Camilion is a former Foreign Minister of Argentina and a distinguished diplomat with long and varied experience in the art of negotiation. Our best wishes and full support go with Mr. Camilion as he begins his efforts in the cause of establishing a long-lasting and equitable peace on Cyprus.

There was considerable dialogue on the Cyprus problem during this period between the United Nations Secretary General and the parties to the dispute and also between United States representatives and a wide range of interested parties. In the context of the opening of the 42nd United Nations General Assembly session, the Secretary General met separately, in early October, with both Cypriot President Spyros Kyprianou and Turkish Cypriot leader Rauf Denktash, as well as with the Foreign Ministers of Greece and Turkey. The Secretary of State held discussions with Cypriot Foreign Minister Iacovou, Greek Foreign Minister Papoulias, and Turkish Foreign Minister Halefoglu.

We continued to consult actively with U.N. representatives, allies, and concerned groups and individuals on the problem. In discussions regarding the Cyprus dispute, United States representatives emphasized the need for the parties to give the fullest cooperation to the efforts of the U.N. Secretary General.

We also added our voice to that of the Secretary General in reiterating concern about the potentially dangerous military buildup on the island, a serious situation that the U.N. Secretary General once again pointed to in his latest ``Report of the Secretary-General on the Work of the Organization,'' released on September 9. We find merit in the Secretary General's effort to address the issue through his proposal that the United Nations undertake a force verification role on Cyprus. Although the parties to the dispute have not agreed with this concept, we would hope that constructive reviews with the Secretary General of this or other ideas can be pursued in the interest of strengthening stability.

Also on this topic and further to my last report to the Congress, there have been additional reports of withdrawals of Turkish tanks from Cyprus. Recent reports indicate that Turkey has continued to remove older model tanks from the island, consistent with earlier Turkish statements that a modernization program had caused a temporary rise in the number of tanks.

The recent difficulties for the United Nations Force in Cyprus (UNFICYP), caused by the Swedish decision to withdraw its soldiers from the Force, have been resolved through the magnanimous offer of replacement troops by the Governments of Austria and Canada. On October 3, the UNFICYP spokesman released details of the arrangements under which the Canadian and Austrian soldiers will be deployed along the cease-fire line. These troops, added to the already sizeable contingents from those two countries and the other troop-contributing nations, will enable UNFICYP to continue its invaluable role on the island without interruption. Unfortunately, UNFICYP's funding problems have not been resolved, and we continue urging other countries to increase their contributions to the voluntary fund supporting UNFICYP.

The President. I have a statement to make here. This country has been held captive by the threat of ever-increasing deficits, and it became apparent several weeks ago when our nation was stunned as the stock market took a dramatic dive. There were many reasons given for the drop, but few wanted to take responsibility.

It became clear, though, on that day that it was time for action, and immediately we took the necessary steps to deal with our Federal budget problems. For the past 20 days, my representatives have been meeting with negotiators from the Congress, hammering out a credible and reliable deficit reduction plan, a plan that's both fair and responsible, a plan that meets our short-term concerns while laying the foundation for long-term solutions. And today I'm pleased to announce that a bipartisan agreement has been reached on the budget not just for 1 year but for 2, a blueprint that sends a strong signal both at home and abroad that together we can and will get our deficit under control and keep it that way.

This agreement is probably not the best deal that could be made, but it is a good solid beginning. It provides the necessary services for our people, maintains our national security, and does so at a level that does not overburden the average American taxpayer -- in a word, fairness. And while there will be other reports to reduce the deficit, today we're sending the right message at the right time.

So, let me extend my personal thanks to the congressional leadership and to the budget negotiators for the spirit of cooperation they have shown. All of us, Republican and Democrat, Senator and Congressman, must roll up our sleeves and go to work so that we can complete this important job. And the challenge before us is to make our case to the American people and to urge them to join with us in reaching our goal: a sound and enforceable budget.

Our commitment is to continue on a path of growth and opportunity. And we have today committed ourselves to a fiscal path that will lead to continued economic growth and opportunity and provide a solid base for economic stability in the future.

Everybody gives some; nobody gets everything he wants -- not the President, not the Congress, not Democrats, nor Republicans. It is a real set of deficit reductions. It isn't painless for the very reason that it is real and not cosmetic. I believe it is a demonstration that in time of stress the administrative and executive and the legislative branches of government can work together, even when they are in the hands of different political parties.

Byrd. This is a demonstration that the executive branch and the legislative branch can work together, that they have demonstrated the discipline and the will and the determination to reach an agreement that is a positive one, that is a substantive one. We think that this is a good message to send to the markets and to the people, and we are pledged to give our support to it and the full implementation of it. And I want to personally thank the President and his representatives and Tom Foley and the Members on both sides of the aisle in both Houses, who have worked so long in preparing this package, which I think is a very good birthday present for me.

Foley. Thank you, Mr. President. I think we see this agreement as a milestone in our efforts to bring about a reduction of the deficit. It represents a consensus between both parties, the Congress, and the President. And this is a good, solid plan. It does not have budgetary gimmicks or smoke in mirrors, as sometimes the words are used. It is an achievable reduction to the targets of Gramm-Rudman this year and substantially more next year.

The President. Well, I think we've indicated up here that this is something that must be ongoing, but that it is a good beginning. And as to selling it to our -- all of us that you see up here are going to go to work on that right now.

The President. Well, it isn't original with me; I wouldn't plagiarize. [Laughter] But a man sent me a letter the other day. And he just pointed out that with Wall Street looking for so many outside areas as being responsible for the volatility of the marketplace -- he said even a farmhand cleaning out the stalls in a barn knows that what he's cleaning out didn't come from outside; it was produced in the barn.

Well, Mr. President, how do you plan to go out and vigorously sell $9 billion in new taxes, when you just the other day at the Chamber of Commerce said taxes were not the way to go on this? How are you going to sell that?

The President. I would like to remind you that in the budget last January that I sent up to the Congress I had proposals in there for $9 billion in revenues. And this has been part of our proposal all the way. But they are not taxes dealing with changes in the income tax or taxes that we think would be deleterious to the economy. But these sources of revenue are -- they've been there laying on the shelf since January.

Mr. President, people on Wall Street wonder why this deal was put together many days ago -- the basic numbers were in place many days ago -- and they're saying, why has it taken so long to produce so little?

The President. Well, because I think when you get dealing here in government -- and two branches of government and two parties involved and all -- there are people who have their own ideas and who like to make suggestions. And some are accepted, and some are denied. And we've finally come to an agreement.

Speaker Wright. I don't think it is achievable in this climate to have rate increases, and I think it would be unrealistic for me to expect to pass any rate increases. As you know, I have said early on this year that my personal preference might be to extend the rate as it is, not have rate reductions for those at the top of the economic spectrum. But that isn't going to happen this year. It isn't in the House bill.

Each automatic spending increase that would, but for the provisions of the Act, take effect during fiscal year 1988 is permanently sequestered or reduced as provided in section 252. The programs with such automatic spending increases subject to reduction in this manner are: National Wool Act; Special milk program; and Vocational rehabilitation.

All reductions and sequestrations shall be made in strict accordance with the specifications of the November 20 report of the Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the requirements of section 252(b).

As usual with economics, it's the figures that tell the story. During the third quarter of this year, our gross national product rose at a healthy annual rate of 3.8 percent. This was spurred in turn by new business investment, which is soaring at a truly remarkable rate of 24 percent. Inflation is down.

Manufacturing productivity is up. Real exports, too, are up and rising at an annual rate of nearly 17 percent. One set of figures is especially important: the figures that concern the more than 14 million new jobs that have been created since this economic expansion began some 59 months ago. That's 2\1/2\ times more new jobs than have been created in the other major industrialized countries since 1982, and you might think it's something for us Americans to take pride in.

But some have tried to pooh-pooh this tremendous achievement, distorting the record in the process. Last December, for example, a study was presented to the Joint Economic Committee of Congress, which claimed that, while millions of new jobs have indeed been created, most of these are basically bad jobs, with well over half paying only about $7,000 a year or less.

The Department of Labor has put out evidence showing an exactly opposite trend toward higher paying jobs. And last month the prestigious American Enterprise Institute here in Washington called a press conference to present the results of its own exhaustive and scholarly study.

Well, you should know that when the misleading Joint Economic Committee study was first released, it made virtually every network news show, national magazine, and major newspaper. But when the American Enterprise Institute study was released, only one major newspaper, one major magazine, a handful of local journalists, and not a single television network sent reporters. So, as I said, our economy is in fundamentally good condition. And when you hear reports of doom and gloom to the contrary, well, please take them with a grain of salt.

And now to tell you about our success this week in reaching an agreement that will reduce the Federal deficit still further: When the stock market took its dramatic plunge last month, it became clear that the time had come for dramatic action. And for some 20 days, my representatives met with negotiators from the Congress, struggling to work out a credible and reliable deficit reduction plan. Just yesterday I was able to announce that a bipartisan agreement was indeed reached, an agreement that would cut the deficit not just for one year but for two.

As with all agreements that result from long and difficult negotiation, this agreement is probably not the very best deal that could have been struck. But we have to begin somewhere, and I believe this agreement represents just that: a good, solid beginning. It provides the necessary services for our people, maintains our national security, and does both at a level that will not overburden our taxpayers -- in a word, fairness. And while efforts to cut the deficit still further must certainly continue, this agreement will send the right message at the right time, both to our own financial markets and to markets and governments around the world: Decisively, doggedly, and in a spirit of cooperation, the United States has chosen to act.

My thanks and congratulations to the congressional leadership and the budget negotiators for all their hard work. Now each of us, Republican and Democrat alike, must work to reach our vital goal: a sound and enforceable United States budget. We have built a solid economic foundation that has made our economy stronger, more competitive, and better prepared than ever to meet the challenge of tomorrow. If we pursue the right policies, our future will be even brighter.

The President. Well, let me welcome all of you here today. And I'm going to begin exactly the way you would expect me to by saying how proud I am that someone with as illustrious a record as Frank Carlucci will be taking over at Defense. As you know, Frank has earned a reputation as an experienced and skillful administrator -- a man who knows the bureaucracy, knows the Hill, and knows how to work with both to achieve remarkable results for our national security. I've worked closely with Frank here at the White House; it's been a privilege to come to know him well. He's earned my respect, my full trust, and confidence. I know firsthand of his deep commitment to a strong defense. And I look forward to working with him in a capacity -- the importance of which I've stressed from day one of this administration -- the national defenses and military readiness of the United States.

I'm not going to recite all of Frank's accomplishments, because I know they're so well known to all of you. But it should be noted that his background as national security adviser, an intelligence manager, a career diplomat, a businessman, and Deputy Secretary of Defense makes him the most qualified individual in history to assume this post.

Frank, there are going to be extraordinary challenges, and I'm certain you're up to them. As you know, you'll face the day-by-day task of strengthening our military preparedness and the longer term work of using our military technology -- through programs like SDI -- to make this a safer world for peace and freedom. But there's also the difficult but honorable work of maintaining one of this administration's proudest accomplishments: the return of pride in our Armed Forces and the appreciation of those devoted young men and women who wear our country's uniform.

I think Frank knows better than anyone the importance of that last point I've just mentioned. A few years back, when all the experts were telling him differently, Frank persevered in supporting democracy in Portugal. And due in no small part to this personal commitment, today that nation is free and strong, and it set an example for democratic progress elsewhere in the world. That sort of grit has to come from something very deep in a person. Yes, Frank is the grandson of an Italian stonecutter; he knows in a special way not only what this nation means to all of us but to the entire world. The fact that he's reached the heights he has in his own life says a great deal about him and his family, but it also says something about this great nation and the cause of world freedom for which it stands.

Carlucci is living proof to all of us and to the world that ``only in America'' is more than just an easy cliche: it's a great ringing truth. So, Frank, Marcia, today all of us extend to you our congratulations, our best wishes, and our warmest support.

Carlucci. Thank you, Mr. President, for those very kind and challenging words. I know it's customary to focus on one's new responsibilities in this kind of situation, but, Mr. President, I'd just like to take a minute to comment on my experience here at the White House under your leadership.

You have made a tough job seem easy. I also want to thank you for your willingness to tolerate my viewpoint even when you've known that it has not accorded with yours. We've had some spirited discussions in the Oval Office, but always in an atmosphere of friendship and cordial debate. And I will miss those discussions, although I will be back to see you in my new capacity.

Let me also express my appreciation to Howard Baker, Ken Duberstein, and the White House staff for the extraordinarily cordial relationships that we have had and for the support that they have given to me and to the NSC. Someone said, Mr.

Cap just handed me a letter as I came in, which I suspect goes back to the days in 1980 when he asked me to be his deputy in Defense. And after wavering a bit, I said yes. And I said, ``Cap, you know I have only one goal, and that is to help make you the finest Secretary of Defense in our nation's history.'' And I'm proud to say, Mr. President, that I have played some small role in achieving that goal, because surely, as you said the other day, Cap will go down in history as our finest Secretary of Defense. And, Cap, I will try to carry on in your tradition.

I would like to express my appreciation to the NSC staff that has been so supportive and to my wife, Marcia, who has been very supportive throughout my days in the White House. It is a big job in the Pentagon, Mr. President, but it's a special department, because you head it. You are the CINC, the Commander in Chief. I know that you have a special feeling in your heart for our men and women in uniform and for the thousands of civilians that support them. And solid in that knowledge, I know that I can work with you to build on the very significant achievements of your administration to date and continue the fine Pentagon tradition that makes our Armed Forces the greatest in our country's history.

The President. I think the man that I appointed has served as Frank's next-in-command, his deputy. I have seen him operate, and I think he is excellent for that particular job. And I don't think that wearing our country's uniform and a few stars take away anything from that.

President has taken the first steps to ensure continued market access for approximately $100 million in U.S. meat product sales to the European Community (EC). He has instructed the U.S. Trade Representative to hold public hearings on products for inclusion in a retaliatory action against the EC.

To ensure that U.S. access to the Community does, in fact, remain unimpeded, the President will raise tariffs on about $100 million of EC exports to the United States effective soon after January 1, 1988, but will then immediately suspend the tariff increases so long as U.S. meat exports to the European Community continue uninterrupted.

President is optimistic that the EC will permit dispute settlement to proceed in the interim in order to reach a permanent agreement based on scientific evidence. The EC contends that its ban is motivated by health concerns, but the U.S. Food and Drug Administration and a prestigious panel of international scientific experts have concluded that use of such hormones poses no health hazards.

President's action illustrates how his discretionary, flexible authority under section 301 of our unfair trade laws protects American interests. Congress may wish to review this and other effective uses of section 301 before considering any changes in the law that would attempt to force the President to retaliate at times when it would be counterproductive.

Well, thank you very much, and welcome to the Old Executive Office Building. And I think it'll keep right on getting older, too. They tell me that the granite walls are 4 feet thick. They don't make them like that anymore.

Well, one thing left to do, one of the great challenges of these next months, will be seeing if we can work out with the Soviet Union a better answer to nuclear weapons. As you know, I'll be meeting here in Washington with General Secretary Gorbachev unless some hitch develops that we can't foresee. But if all goes well, we'll sign an agreement that will for the first time in history eliminate an entire class of U.S. and Soviet nuclear missiles. It's a good bargain: For every nuclear warhead of our own we remove, they'll have to give up four.

It would, however, be hasty to assume that we're at the point where we're ready to put pen to paper and sign the treaty. For one thing, in at least one important area, verification, the treaty is not yet complete. Any treaty that I agree to must provide for effective verification, including on-site inspection of facilities before and during reduction and short-notice inspection afterward.

We have come this far only because we've been patient and unwavering in our commitment to a strong and vital national defense. Contrary to what some have said, we've been at this for some time. As I said at West Point, we made this proposal -- this treaty that we're talking about -- we made this proposal nearly 6 years ago. Our opponents dismissed it as unrealistic, because it was too one-sided in our favor. And then the Soviets tried to get us to eliminate the SDI program. I refused. The moral is that patience, consistency, firm negotiating, and clear objectives count much more with the Soviets than good intentions. And I am for this agreement not because I have any illusions about the Soviet system but because of the good deal for the United States and its allies. That's why I'm asking for your support and help in convincing the Senate -- if we once sign, and when we once sign this -- to ratify this treaty.

We're also moving ahead when negotiation -- or with negotiations on our proposal to reduce U.S. and Soviet strategic arsenals by half. Our Geneva negotiators have made progress. And the Soviets must, however, stop holding strategic offensive missile reductions hostage to measures that would cripple our research and development of SDI.

Soviet Red Shield program actually dwarfs our SDI. Yet there's been a strange tendency by some in Congress to discuss SDI as if its funding could be determined by purely domestic considerations, unconnected to what the Soviets are doing. SDI is too important to be subject to congressional logrolling. It's a vital insurance policy, a necessary part of any national security strategy that includes deep reductions in strategic weapons. In decades to come, it will underwrite all of us against Soviet cheating on both strategic and intermediate-range missile agreements. SDI leads us away from the days of mutual assured destruction to a future of mutual assured safety. And it goes hand in hand with arms reductions. We cannot, we will not, bargain it away to get strategic arms reductions.

So, no, SDI is not a bargaining chip. It is a -- [applause] -- thank you. It's a cornerstone of our security strategy for the 1990's and beyond. We will research it. We will develop it. And when it's ready, we'll deploy it. Just remember this: If both sides have defenses, it can be a safer world. You know, with the present deterrent that we have -- the MAD policy, mutual assured destruction -- I've never been able to feel very safe with the knowledge that if they blow us up we'll be blowing them up at the same time. [Laughter] I'd like to leave them around if they'll leave us around. [Laughter] If we leave the scientists -- or the Soviets with a monopoly in this vital area, our security will be gravely jeopardized, and we mustn't let that happen.

With our aid, the Nicaraguan freedom fighters have made impressive gains in the field and brought the Communist Sandinistas to do something that they never would have done otherwise: negotiate. I hope the Members of our own Congress will not forget this important fact: Without the freedom fighters, there would be no Arias peace plan, there would be no negotiations and no hope for democracy in Nicaragua. An entrenched, hostile Communist regime in Nicaragua would be an irreversible fact of life, and the Sandinistas would have permanently consolidated and fortified a new Cuba on the American mainland.

Within the next few weeks, Congress will have to vote on further aid to the freedom fighters. Without that aid, the Sandinistas will know all they have to do is play a waiting game. They'll have no incentive to negotiate, no incentive to make real concessions to fulfill the peace agreement. If Congress pulls the plug on the freedom fighters, they will have accomplished what billions of dollars in Soviet aid could not: extinguishing all hope of freedom in Nicaragua and leaving the neighboring Central American democracies naked to Communist aggression.

It's the Nicaraguan freedom fighters who brought the Sandinistas to the negotiating table. It is the freedom fighters -- and only the freedom fighters -- who can keep them there. If we're serious about the peace process, we must keep the freedom fighters alive and strong until they can once again return home to take part in a free and democratic Nicaraguan society. They're brave men, and they've sacrificed much in the cause of freedom, and they deserve no less. There will be few more important votes in Congress than this one, and as I have so often in the past, I'll be counting on your active support. With your help, I know we can win this one.

Now, as you know, on Friday we announced a bipartisan agreement on the budget that will cover not just 1 year but 2. Now, this may not be the best deal that could be made, but it is a good, solid beginning. It provides the necessary services for our people, maintains our national security, and does so at a level that does not overburden the average American taxpayer. We have committed ourselves to a fiscal path that will lead to continued economic growth and opportunity and provide a solid base for economic stability in the future.

And finally, I'd like to say a few words about another subject of great importance to all of us: the confirmation of Judge Kennedy as an Associate Justice on the Supreme Court. In choosing to nominate Judge Kennedy to the Supreme Court, I kept in mind the fact that criminal cases make up the largest category of cases the Supreme Court must decide. These cases are especially important to the poor, the inner-city residents, and minority groups, since these Americans are victimized by crime to a disproportionate extent.

Kennedy's record on criminal law is clear; indeed, he has participated in hundreds of criminal law decisions. He has earned a reputation as a jurist who is tough, but fair. His decisions have helped, rather than hindered, the search for truth in the courtroom. And he's been sensitive to the needs of law enforcement professionals, who each day risk their lives in the real world of street crime and violence.

Every day that passes with the Supreme Court below full strength impairs the people's business in that crucially important body. Judge Kennedy has already won bipartisan praise from the Senate, and I know you join me in looking forward to prompt Senate hearings, conducted in a spirit of cooperation.

Well, obviously we've got our work cut out for us, and as I said, there will be no resting on our laurels. In politics, as in life, if you're not moving forward, you're slipping back. So, we're turning on the gas. We're putting the pedal to the metal -- as they say -- and we're making tracks. And when I say ``we,'' believe me, I'm talking about all of us here together, because you've been so much a part of everything that we've accomplished so far. And now, in these 14 months remaining, let's just pin some of those things down so they won't disappear once we're not working together.

Baker. Mr. President, the group you have here is a representative group from the Wall Street community, from the industrial community, from labor, and from the farming sector, from associations such as the Chamber of Commerce, and other representatives of important sectors of the economy. It's been our privilege and pleasure to have lunch together and to talk about the package just negotiated between the White House and Congress in an effort to reduce the deficit and to avoid a sequester. It's been a good conversation. And I think there's a general consensus that you are entitled to high marks for having taken this initiative, and we were fortunate that we were able to produce a result. They each have their own views on the various aspects of it, and I'm sure they would like very much to discuss this with you.

The President. Well, I want to thank you all for coming today, especially on such short notice. I thought that it was important quickly to begin a series of meetings with a wide range of opinion leaders to tell you what is in and what is not in our agreement on the budget. And I know that you have received a rather detailed assessment from Howard and Jim Baker and Jim Miller.

Let me mention three things about this agreement that I believe are important to reiterate. As I said on Friday, this agreement must not be the last word on deficit reduction. This is a good first step, a basic framework to work within for this year and next. And we can and should do more.

Second, let me share with you the personal assurances that I have from the congressional leaders as well as the chairmen of the tax writing committees that they have committed to hold the level of taxes to no more than the $9 billion this year and the $14 billion next. They've also committed to leave our tax reform intact. There will be no change in marginal rates or indexing, and there will also be no new broad-based taxes, such as a sales tax or new excise taxes. I know that you're concerned about provisions I haven't mentioned, like taxing mergers and acquisitions. Just let me say that this agreement does not preclude us from vetoing any or all of the legislation that comes out of this agreement, and I will veto any bad tax bill.

I believe, and I think that you will agree, that this package is better than the automatic sequester under the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings law. It prevents the otherwise indiscriminate, across-the-board cuts of a sequester, especially those that will cripple our national defense, and it provides for more reforms in entitlement programs, reforms that will provide lasting reductions. It calls for the imposition of over $1 billion in user fees to advance my policy of requiring people to pay for the services they receive. And perhaps most importantly, it shows that the executive and the Congress can come together to produce a credible package rather than to have to rely on the autopilot approach of Gramm-Rudman-Hollings. I think that's what the American people are looking for: the ability of this government to make choices.

Phelan. Well, I would merely echo what others have said, Mr. President, that I think one of the important things about this agreement and this accord is not that it's an end, but it's a beginning. As you've said, it must continue in some way. It's much better than sequester. I think this at least sends a message both domestically, but more importantly abroad, that the leadership in this country is willing to sit down to work on an agreement, realize the seriousness of it. And I think that a lot of people don't understand the impact of interest rates that all of this has had not only on our domestic markets but overseas, as well. And I think, without a voluntary agreement like this, that would certainly be viewed in foreign markets and by foreign governments as an extremely serious situation in which it was not possible to get an agreement of this country, and I think that would be to the long-term detrimental interest of this country. It certainly is the beginning.

The President. Yes. I have just a very brief statement. I'm pleased to report that en route to Denver, here, I received a call from Geneva. And it appears that all of the remaining issues on reaching an INF agreement have been resolved, including a reliable and credible verification package. This treaty will be finalized when General Secretary Gorbachev and I meet in Washington next month.

Thank you very much, and thank you, Mr. Pownall, General Abrahamson, the rest of my companions up here in the top shelf, and Senators Wallop and Wilson and Congressmen Hefley and Schaefer, who are here with us. I am convinced now that with some of the difficulties we've had with regard to getting enthusiastic support in some circles for this program the answer is a conducted tour of those individuals here to see what I have seen here so far today.

America that I was born into was acclaimed for its liberty and opportunity, yet that opportunity for which we were so proud has been expanded today beyond anything that Americans of my youth could possibly have imagined. Affordable, worldwide communications and transportation have not just extended, they have eliminated horizons. Computer capability, which a short time ago was available only to large corporations, is now being put to use by small business and individual entrepreneurs.

We're in an age when the common man can do and experience what in past times was enjoyed only by royalty, aristocracy, and the elite. Jefferson, Washington, and Madison laid the foundation for liberty and equality. Edison, Einstein, Goddard, and others like them, like many of you, built on that foundation. It's been technology and freedom, together, that have pushed America forward and made her the land of abundance and progress that we love so dearly.

Balfour once noted: ``Science is the greatest instrument of social change, the most vital of all revolutions which mark the development of modern civilizations.'' Science and technological-based resolutions in health care and food production, communications, transportation, manufacturing, and other endeavors have changed how we live and the quality of our lives. Before joining you here, I was given a classified update on some of the key elements of the program that you're working on. It's clear that the project is bounding forward, and I couldn't be more pleased. After what I've seen today, I believe that mankind is again on the edge of a revolution that will change the basic assumptions upon which we base our decisions and reshape the world in which we live.

Until now, mankind's search for security often focused on expanding the ability to lash out, to kill, to destroy. Technological advances throughout the ages increased man's destructive power, and those nations that did not keep pace soon felt the sting of defeat and the pain of subjugation.

You are laboring to develop a defensive system that will change history. Once you've completed your work, the world will never be the same. I suggest it will be a better and a safer world. And what better legacy can this generation leave than a safer world? Our Strategic Defense Initiative offers mankind security through protection rather than retaliation. I must tell you that I have never been able to see the safety -- or feel the safety of knowing that if someone blew us up we'd be blowing them up at the same time. It's a scientific advance that will be judged a success based not on how many lives it is capable of taking -- which is none -- but on how many it is able to protect. It's a moral as well as a scientific endeavor worth every minute and hour that you are dedicating to it. Our goal is to strengthen deterrence by moving as soon as we're ready to increasing reliance on defenses to keep the peace.

I realize that being a government project, with all the politics that goes with that reality, your work can be frustrating. Wernher von Braun once said: ``We can lick gravity, but sometimes the paperwork is overwhelming.'' [Laughter] I appreciate the extraordinary effort that each of you is making. Your mental prowess and creativity and, yes, your hard work will make or break the program. And I want you to know that what you accomplish will be put to good use in protecting your country, the free world, and perhaps all mankind against the threat of nuclear holocaust. You're not working to build a bargaining chip. It will not be traded away.

Yes, there are those who complain about the cost. Well, Benjamin Franklin, himself a man of science and politics, once observed: ``The expenses required to prevent a war are much lighter than those that will, if not prevented, be absolutely necessary to maintain the war.'' Well, mirroring that thought, I'd say that what we spend to protect ourselves from nuclear missiles is much lighter than the cost, human and otherwise, if even one nuclear missile is fired, even if by mistake, and we have to suffer the consequences, because there's no way to stop it. In the case of SDI, America cannot afford not to do everything necessary to develop this missile defense system and put it into operation.

Union, even as they criticize and try to cripple our SDI research effort, has been aggressively moving ahead on its own antiballistic missiles defense. They have spent roughly $200 billion in the last 10 years and have concentrated the energy and talent of their brightest scientific minds. More than 10,000 skilled scientists and engineers are working on military lasers alone with thousands more developing high tech weapons that use particle beams and kinetic energy.

Soviet Government wages its propaganda campaign against our SDI research, even while they work overtime to develop their own SDI-like system. Well, we must not be lulled into reducing our commitment. Their military program, which includes everything from killer-satellites to the modernized antimissile system that protects Moscow, dwarfs our SDI program already. Those who would cut or eliminate funds for our effort would grant a clear monopoly in this vital area to our adversary, which would undermine the present basis of deterrence. Because the question is not, Will strategic defense be developed? The question is rather, Will the Soviet Union be the only country to possess them? The choice is ours.

Furthermore, the Strategic Defense Initiative is not aimed at protecting us and our allies against the Soviet Union alone. Francis Bacon once wrote: ``He that will not apply new remedies must expect new evils, for time is the greatest innovator.'' Well, in the decades ahead, who knows what governments will obtain ballistic missile technology? Who knows how rational or competent those governments will be? I spoke before a meeting of the American Council of Life Insurance last week, and I called SDI an insurance policy. And that's what it is.

SDI is not a weapon of war but an insurer, a protector of the peace. It is totally within the limits of the ABM treaty. And let me add, the United States has observed the ABM treaty, but with the construction of the huge phased-array radar at Krasnoyarsk, the Soviets have violated one of the treaty's key provisions. This is but one -- but another example, I should say, of why it's important not to rely on words alone. The Strategic Defense Initiative, you see, underwrites our efforts to achieve offensive arms reduction agreements. With a defensive system in place, the possibility that one side has cheated and has a few missiles in hiding, is far less threatening. SDI then makes further reductions more likely: A system that makes ballistic missiles less effective, makes those missiles more negotiable.

Now, there are those who may be pessimistic about the chances of deep reductions in U.S. and Soviet nuclear arsenals, but let us not forget that in 1981 when I first proposed our zero option it, too, was all but written off by many commentators. In the time that has followed, we persevered and stuck to our principles. We held firm against the advocates of a so-called nuclear freeze. We followed through on our modernization program and, in close cooperation with our allies, installed the cruise and Pershings in Europe. When at long last it was realized that we in the alliance had the courage to protect our own longrun interests, progress toward a mutually beneficial treaty ensued.

We hope to sign an historic treaty that will eliminate a whole class of U.S. and Soviet nuclear-armed intermediate-range missiles from the face of the Earth, the first mutually agreed upon reduction in our nuclear arsenals ever. And this could well be just a beginning. We have just had word from Geneva, where Secretary Shultz is, that we are right to speak so optimistically about the upcoming treaty, the INF treaty. They have made great progress there.

We hope we can see forward movement on a number of other fronts. The United States, for example, has proposed a 50-percent reduction in U.S.-Soviet offensive strategic forces. Much progress has been made toward a START agreement, as we call it, and more is possible. But let there be no doubt: Giving up the Strategic Defense Initiative and the protection it will provide is too high a price to pay for any agreement.

Neither the INF treaty we hope to sign during the upcoming summit nor any other agreement that follows will be built on trust. Agreements with the Soviet Union must be based on reciprocity, verification, and realism. And while we want to bolster the peace and do our part to improve relations, no agreement should ever be signed simply for the sake of signing an agreement, for the sake of atmospherics. Improving the general tone of relations between our countries, as I've outlined on several occasions, will require much more movement from the other side toward the solution of regional conflicts, a far greater respect for human rights, and progress on a number of bilateral issues between our countries. As I explained to General Secretary Gorbachev, our countries do not have differences because we're well-armed; we're well-armed because we have differences.

Even with all the talk of openness and glasnost, much change needs to take place before trust, like that we have with democratic governments, can come into play. The Soviet peoples themselves -- even though there has been some change -- still tell stories and joke about their plight. I heard one about a fellow who went to the KGB to report that he lost his parrot.

I have even learned a couple of Russian words that I have used in my previous meetings with the General Secretary. It is a proverb. It says, Dovorey no provorey. That means ``Trust but verify.'' And we will.

President could be prouder or more grateful than I am to all of you and your fellow colleagues around the country for what you are doing. You, indeed, are reshaping the world, and for literally all time to come.

The alternative proposal exempts only the Strategic Defense Initiative, based on the priority of the program, and multi-year/firm fixed-price contracts, based on the need to preserve the economies inherent in our acquisition strategy. The exemptions in the alternative proposal are offset by reductions distributed uniformly across all other programs and accounts.

In making calculations for this joint resolution, we have used account outlay rates identical to those used in the November 20, 1987, sequester report issued by the Director of the Office of Management and Budget. The outlay increases that would result from adoption of the alternative sequestration reductions in my report would be offset by the outlay reductions also contained in the report.

I have been informed that certain persons, in unlawful combination and conspiracy, have engaged in the violent criminal seizure and detention of persons and property in the vicinity of Atlanta, Georgia. Their actions have made it impracticable to enforce certain laws of the United States there by the ordinary course of judicial proceedings.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 24th day of November, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

Section 1. Units and members of the Armed Forces of the United States will be used to suppress the violence described in the proclamation and to restore law and order in the vicinity of Atlanta, Georgia.

Section 2. The Secretary of Defense is authorized to use such of the Armed Forces as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of Section 1. To that end, he is authorized to call into the active military service of the United States units or members of the National Guard, as authorized by law, to serve in an active duty status for an indefinite period and until relieved by appropriate orders. Units or members may be relieved subject to recall at the discretion of the Secretary of Defense.

Section 3. Until such time as the Armed Forces shall have been withdrawn pursuant to Section 4 of this order, the Attorney General is further authorized (1) to coordinate the activities of all Federal agencies assisting in the suppression of violence and in the administration of justice in the vicinity of Atlanta, Georgia and (2) to coordinate the activities of all such agencies with those of state and local agencies similarly engaged.

Section 4. The Secretary of Defense is authorized to determine when Federal military forces shall be withdrawn from the disturbance area. Such determinations shall be made in the light of the Attorney General's recommendations as to the ability of civil authorities to resume full responsibility for the maintenance of law and order in the affected area.

Following the 1986 ouster of Jean-Claude Duvalier, the provisional government of Haiti, the Provisional Electoral Council, and -- most importantly -- the Haitian people have moved resolutely towards the goal of true democracy. The path has not been easy or smooth. We, along with other friends of Haiti, have been concerned by the all too frequent violence which has marked the process, especially that which was directed at electoral authorities and candidates.

Despite these disturbing events, we are heartened by the evident determination of the Haitian public not to be denied their voice in choosing those who will lead their country in a new, freer era. Now all Haitians can take pride in this historic process. Each has a responsibility: the electoral authorities to supervise the voting in an orderly and free manner, the government to ensure an environment of security and confidence, and the voting public first to express their preferences and then to respect the outcome of this process.

I have named an observer delegation to witness this historic event. They carry with them my hope and confidence in Haiti's success. After next February's inauguration, my government will work closely with the newly elected President of Haiti and his government to move towards the prosperous and happy future Haiti so richly deserves.

I was very pleased that the two Ministers cleared away remaining obstacles to completion of an INF treaty. While details remain to be worked out, I look forward to signing this historic agreement with General Secretary Gorbachev at the Washington summit next month. This brings to realization the objectives which I laid out in my zero option proposal of 1981 and to which we and the allies have adhered firmly through all these years of INF negotiations.

I was also briefed on the results of the discussions that were held on human rights, regional, bilateral, and other arms control issues. I will be pursuing these issues with General Secretary Gorbachev. I am pleased that we also have agreement with the Soviets on a summit schedule that emphasizes the businesslike nature of the meeting and includes ample opportunity for the General Secretary and me to exchange views on a wide range of issues.

We have also included social and other events that will provide the General Secretary insight into our intellectual and business communities. He will also be in contact with Members of Congress. Nancy and I look forward to receiving General Secretary and Mrs. Gorbachev.

Legislature, the Congress, and as mayor, he dedicated his life to the service of his fellow Chicagoans. He was a dedicated and outspoken leader who guided one of our nation's largest cities through the 1980's.

Washington will truly be missed not only by the people of Chicago but also by many across the country for whom he provided leadership on urban issues. Nancy and I extend our condolences to his family and to the city he served for so long.

November 20, the Leadership of the House and Senate joined with me to announce to the American people a bipartisan agreement to bring about meaningful reductions in the Federal deficit and maintain confidence in our Nation's economy. The agreement reflects a bipartisan commitment to reduce the deficit substantially over the next two years. It maintains vital government services, upholds our national security, and preserves the integrity and fairness embodied in last year's tax reform legislation.

In an agreement of this magnitude that results from tough bargaining, it is not difficult to find something with which to disagree. Nevertheless, the agreement is our best hope for achieving deficit reduction without resorting to indiscriminate across-the-board cuts that would devastate essential services.

I pledge to continue working with the Congress to complete this vital task begun by our negotiating teams. We must join together in a bipartisan way to preserve our economic gains and keep our Nation strong.

In a moment I'd like to talk with you about the coming summit meeting between myself and General Secretary Gorbachev. But first I wonder whether you'd join me in doing again now what so many of us did with our families just 2 days ago: pausing to consider all that we have to be grateful for.

Thanksgiving is a time to think especially for the less fortunate among us, then surely we must give thanks during this economic expansion that the number of Americans living in poverty has fallen to the lowest level in 5 years. With economic growth, too, has come an increase in private charity. Private contributions to charity have set new records in each of the past 4 years. Who can doubt that we do indeed owe our Creator a profound debt of thanks? For after 200 years, ours is still a nation of freedom and, yes, of goodness.

As you know in 10 days' time, I will be meeting in Washington with General Secretary Gorbachev. If all goes well, he and I will sign an agreement that will for the first time in history eliminate an entire class of U.S. and Soviet nuclear missiles. But this agreement must be seen in the context of our wider relations with the Soviet Union.

Our administration has insisted from the first upon dealing with the Soviets in each of four crucial areas. Human rights is one. Human rights, after all, is what our nation is all about. In this area, we've seen a certain amount of progress: Some political prisoners in the Soviet Union have been released, immigration rates have seen a slight rise, and there's been talk about granting the Soviet peoples some very limited new economic freedoms.

Expanding bilateral relations, especially people-to-people exchanges, is the second area we've stressed. Here, too, we've seen a certain amount of progress, notably in cultural exchanges following my first summit meeting with Mr. Gorbachev in Geneva. The Bolshoi Ballet has toured the United States, and many American artists have visited the Soviet Union in turn. I think in particular of the historic return to Moscow last year of pianist Vladimir Horowitz -- his first visit to Russia in more than 60 years.

Regional conflicts represent the third major point in U.S.-Soviet relations, and the American position can be stated very simply: Wherever in the world the Soviets or their clients are seeking to advance their interests by force -- in Nicaragua, in Afghanistan, in Angola, in Cambodia, or elsewhere -- they must stop and let the people of these countries choose their own destinies. And I can assure you, this will be at the top of my agenda for Mr. Gorbachev. I will remind him that Soviet conduct in these areas remains a major impediment to improved U.S.-Soviet relations.

This brings me to the fourth major topic on our agenda, namely, my search for a better way to deter aggression and ensure security than through the threat of offensive nuclear retaliation. One answer has been our Strategic Defense Initiative, or SDI -- our work on a defensive system that will shield us and our allies while threatening no one. A second answer has been arms reduction negotiations with the Soviets, negotiations that have produced the INF agreement that Mr. Gorbachev and I expect to sign. This agreement, as I said, will eliminate an entire class of Soviet and American intermediate-range missiles. For every deployed warhead of our own that we remove, they will give up almost four.

Since the Soviets have a record of violating arms agreements, we're insisting on the most stringent verification regime in arms control history. And we will go on to press the Soviets for progress in the START talks, where we've proposed 50-percent reductions in both sides' strategic arsenals. But the Soviets are going to have to drop their tactic of holding strategic arms reduction hostage to their efforts to cripple our SDI program.

Make no mistake, the Soviets are and will continue to be our adversaries, the adversaries, indeed, of all who believe in human liberty. Yet as we work to advance the cause of liberty, we must deal with the Soviets soberly and from strength and in the name of peace.

I am pleased to sign H.R. 1451, the Older Americans Act Amendments of 1987. The bill authorizes a number of worthwhile Federal programs that help provide community-based services important to the Nation's rapidly growing older population and promote economic development in Native American communities.

I believe, however, that certain provisions of H.R. 1451 must be carefully construed and administered to avoid raising substantial constitutional questions under the equal protection clause. The bill amends the Older Americans Act of 1965 to require providers to attempt to provide services to low-income minority individuals in at least the same proportion as the population of low-income minority individuals bears to the population of older individuals of the area served by such provider. While I share the Congress' concern that older Americans programs reach all eligible populations, I expect that the attempt to provide services to low-income minority individuals will be made in a manner that is not racially preferential. It is appropriate, for example, to conduct outreach efforts to identify and inform those who qualify for services, including members of the minority communities.

The bill also amends the Native American Programs Act by requiring the Secretary of Health and Human Services to disclose to the Congress, on request, the recommendations of review panels concerning applications for financial assistance and the Secretary's reasons for following or deviating from such recommendations. This provision is considerably less problematic than provisions, as were included in predecessor legislation, that require routine reporting of individual decisions and the grounds therefor. Even so, it is important to note that I understand this provision does not detract from the President's constitutional authority not to disclose information to the Congress where necessary to protect the integrity and confidentiality of the deliberative process within the executive branch.

Our instructors, our negotiators, I should say, were instructed that only an enforceable agreement was acceptable, and I'm sure that they've made that clear to you already. It's tough to come up here last and hope that you aren't repeating things that have already been said. [Laughter] I said I would not agree to something like we had a few years ago and that when the tax part was to come to my desk several weeks before the spending part, but the spending part was to have $3 in cuts -- spending cuts -- for every dollar of increased revenue.

I approved the taxes, and then the cuts in spending somehow got lost out there on Pennsylvania Avenue and never arrived. This time I'm taking the advice of that 19th century political sage, Finley Peter Dunne. He said: Trust everybody, but cut the cards. [Laughter] This time the tax and spending bills are to arrive close enough together for me to sign -- or veto -- them together. As I've said many times, the result of these negotiations is not a perfect deal, far from it. But it's an adequate deal, the best we could get, and it's a good first step. It's worth the support of everyone here and of those who've stood with me for so long in the Congress.

First, the economy. The best thing about this deal is what it didn't do. It didn't touch marginal income tax rates, the very heart and soul of incentive economics. The second round of tax rate cuts will go into effect on January 1st, right on schedule. The top income tax rate will drop to 28 percent, and that's the lowest rate since 1931. Indexing, despite some attempts to do away with it, will remain. Taxes will stay lower and flatter, paving the way for strong, robust growth through 1988 and beyond.

Congress at that time decided to increase the income tax rates. The bottom rate was 1.5 percent. They raised it to 9. The top rate was 25 percent. They raised it to 63 percent. And total revenues declined by 21 percent. So, our tax rate cuts haven't lowered revenues one bit. In fact, just as we predicted, cutting tax rates produced a healthy, expanding, vibrant economy that enlarged tax revenues. Since 1984, the first year that our tax cuts were really in effect, revenues have climbed roughly 18 percent, after inflation. And they're continuing to grow.

So, here's the bottom line on taxes in the budget deal: no rate manipulation, no tampering with indexing, no new broad-based taxes such as a sales tax or a new excise tax, no revenues other than the kind that we called for in our budget -- the one I submitted last January. And as I said, this agreement does not preclude me from vetoing a bad tax bill -- and I will. Now, I've heard some talk about all of this being a surrender. Well, I can't help thinking that if every surrender were like this one the British would still be camped at Yorktown.

Now for the second reason that makes this a good deal. We actually came out of this ahead on defense, with about $3.5 billion more in defense outlays than last year. No, that $3.5 billion is a lot less than we need, but it's better than the $16-billion cut in defense budget authority we would have had to suffer under sequestration. The difference between these two approaches means that we have to make far smaller cuts in our defense programs. It means a more stable operating budget with more flying days for our planes and more steaming days for our ships. We won't have to stretch out maintenance schedules as much. And that means a military that is better trained and more ready to do its duty, whether our duty calls halfway around the world or for right next door, as it did in Grenada.

The agreement also means that we can continue to modernize our military at a pace that makes sense. The difference here comes down to simple numbers. For example: more than 400 tactical missiles, 8 helicopters, 2 F - 15 fighters, $200 million worth of ammunition, and $300 million worth of spare parts, 1 attack submarine, 36 M - 1 tanks, 3 Trident II missiles, and 1 Peacekeeper missile. Well, with years of arms reduction negotiations about to bear fruit this is no time to be cutting the very systems that have given us bargaining leverage. If we're to give up something we ought to get something from the Soviets in return. And with negotiated missile reductions coming, we'll need even more urgently a strong conventional force to deter the Soviet Union's massive conventional strength. This agreement will preserve our national defense at this critical time.

But let me be clear about something. No one part of this agreement was enough to get me or the congressional leaders to go along. The total package is what we bought, and we'll all be watching closely over the next few weeks to see that the agreement is fully implemented. To put it most simply: So far as we at this end of Pennsylvania Avenue are concerned, it's all or nothing. A partially implemented deal is no deal. When Jim Wright, Bob Byrd, Bob Michel, and Bob Dole stood with me 10 days ago, we all pledged together to put the country on the right course toward a balanced budget. That pledge means no additional spending. It means no taxes that will harm the economy. It means we will not compromise our vital national security interests. That's the pledge we took, and that is the pledge that I trust we will maintain.

Now that we're in it, for anyone to pull us out would be a calamity. The entire world has been looking for a sign that, despite political differences, America is getting its fiscal house in order -- and has rightly taken the budget accord as that sign. From Britain to Japan, governments have hailed the agreement and said that lower interest rates would follow.

From the Germans, in particular, this was a welcome step toward economic policies that, like our own, stimulate growth. In today's world no nation is an island unto itself. Lower interest rates and more growth abroad help us here in America. Higher interest rates abroad helped drive our rates up; as they come down, ours can come down, too.

And as other nations grow faster, our exports can expand even faster than they have and our trade imbalance can correct itself. Lower interest rates, more exports -- put them together, they mean more investment, more new businesses, more growth, and more jobs for all Americans. That's our stake in the way the other major industrial nations are responding to our budget accord.

Seven years ago, when I assumed this office, America was in the worst economic crisis since the Great Depression. Today we're in the longest peacetime economic expansion on record -- 59 months of uninterrupted growth.

Just last week we learned that in the third quarter, the gross national product patched out at a hot rod speed of 4.1 percent a year. In recent months exports and business investment have been the tigers in our tank. Real business investment grew at an annual rate of 26 percent. Real exports rose at a 19-percent yearly pace.

All these economic numbers add up to something very simple: America is strong, stronger than the critics think. But then, for more than 200 years, when you've added things up that's the answer you've come up with. There is a power in America that has always seemed to surprise the critics and to carry our nation through, even when we in Washington stumbled. It's a power that comes not from government, but from towns and farms, from neighborhoods, schools, and churches all over America. It's the might and wisdom of a free people in a free land.

For several months, before the financial markets started falling and rising like leaves in the autumn wind, I was warning that after 4 years of economic growth, we in Washington faced a choice. In one direction, continuing the economics of growth -- low tax rates, less government spending, getting control of our deficit, open international trade. In the other direction, higher taxes, more spending, bigger deficits, protectionism -- and if all that happened, perhaps a depression.

With this budget package, Congress and the administration have joined hands and begun to lead Washington cautiously, very cautiously, in the direction of continued trust -- not in the Government's checkbook, but in the strength of the American people. So, today it's important for all of us, you and me, to join together. While it's only a first step, it's the right step at the right time because as guardians of that trust it's imperative that we act and act now. So help us keep Washington on the right path so the economics of growth can be our legacy to our children and their children and generations to come.

In the last 10 years, with Ed at the helm and with the constant support and vision of Joe Coors, Heritage has transformed itself from a struggling and valiant coterie of conservatives to, well, a struggling and valiant coterie of conservatives -- [laughter] -- though today the influence and importance of Heritage is widely recognized in Washington and, indeed, by policymakers around the world.

Well, we've stood by each other. All of you today, who've been so generous, have stood by the cause and demonstrated the kind of dedication that has made conservatism the dominant intellectual and political force in American politics today. When we think of those people who have helped shape American politics, one special name comes to mind -- a voice of patriotism, reason, and conservative values. That voice is now silenced, but the memory of our great and good friend, Clare Boothe Luce, will continue to speak loudly, not just to a new nation of conservatives but to all Americans, to all people who cherish freedom, who know it's worth the struggle.

Clare once remarked that no matter how great or exalted a man might be, history will have time to give him no more than a single sentence. George Washington founded the country; Abraham Lincoln freed the slaves; Winston Churchill saved Europe. But I can't help but think that Clare will prove the exception to her own rule. History will have to take time to chronicle all of her great achievements. Or if there is a single line, it will be: Clare Boothe Luce, she did everything superbly.

I get to the main body of my speech, there are two subjects I'd like to discuss. Really, I want to ask for your support. The first, our nomination of Anthony Kennedy to the Supreme Court. He's tough on crime. He believes, as we do, that judges should interpret the law, not make it. He knows that there are victims of crime as well as criminals, and he doesn't confuse the two. He's served for 12 years as a judge on the Ninth Circuit Court of Appeals where he's won the respect of the entire legal community. He's been on my short list from the very start because he's second to none in his commitment to the philosophy of judicial restraint. But one of the best things about Anthony Kennedy is, he's only 51 years old. And you know those Californians -- [laughter] -- they're all health nuts, and they have a way of sticking around for a long time.

The second thing I need your support on is the budget deal that we hammered out with Congress. Now, I know some people are disappointed with that deal. I don't expect people to be jumping up and down in ecstasy. But let me tell you about two important aspects of the deal that should be reassuring to conservatives, indeed, to everyone: Marginal income taxes -- the heart of incentive economics -- have not been touched. The second round of rate cuts will go into effect just as scheduled on January 1st. That's vital for a strong growth year in 1988. There are no new across-the-board taxes. There are user fees, loophole closings, increased compliance, and the like. In fact, I had $22 billion of them in my own budget this year, but we've kept our pledge to the American people to hold the line on taxes.

And we actually came out ahead on defense. Now, some people said we would have been better off with sequestration. Well, sequestration would have cut as much as an additional $16 billion of defense budget authority, reducing the defense programs to a level 10 percent below fiscal year 1987 in real terms. That large a cut, coupled with its indiscriminate across-the-board application, would quickly return us to the hollow Army of the seventies.

Flying hours would be reduced by 25 percent, steaming days for the Navy by 20 percent, with severe reductions in maintenance and spare parts. Critical weapons development, such as the Stealth program, could be delayed for years. With this deal, we ended up with $3.5 billion more in defense outlays than last year. We may have bid farewell to Cap Weinberger, but, as I said to him, we know that the magnificent job he did rebuilding our defenses is nowhere near complete, and we're not slacking one iota from that commitment. It's not all that he or I wanted, but it's far superior to the alternative.

Well, today I want to give you a translation. I want to talk to you about relations between the United States and the Soviet Union -- relations that focus upon four critical areas. First -- and in many ways primary -- human rights; second, negotiated settlements to regional conflicts; third, expanded exchanges between our peoples; and fourth, arms reduction. Now, let me begin with the last because in this area particularly, our realism, patience, and commitment are close to producing historic results.

I remember when I visited Bonn back in 1982, when we were planning deployment of our Pershings and cruise missiles in Europe. Thousands of demonstrators chanted and marched, demonstrators out there -- that I couldn't help thinking, what irony. For it was to secure the peace they sought and the freedom they were exercising that we are deploying the missiles they were protesting. Despite intense political pressure, NATO held firm. The two-track policy of arms reduction negotiations and deployment stayed -- well, it stayed on track. And yes, it was when we showed our determination, our willingness, if need be, to meet force with force that the Soviets after first walking out of the negotiations -- said they wouldn't come back -- they eventually returned and began to talk seriously about the possibility of withdrawing their own INF missiles.

This treaty, as any treaty I agree to, will provide for effective verification, including onsite inspection of facilities before and during reduction and short-notice inspection afterward. In short, it will be the most stringent verification regime in the history of arms control negotiations. I would not ever settle for anything less. I urge you to join in the support of this historic treaty.

We're also pressing ahead on an agreement to reduce our two nations' strategic arsenals by half. Our Geneva negotiators have made progress but, as I've said repeatedly, I've waited 6 years to get an agreement that is both reliable and verifiable. We must never be afraid to walk away from a bad deal -- on that point there is no negotiation. Meanwhile, the Soviets must stop holding strategic offensive missile reductions hostage to measures that would cripple our research and development of SDI.

Research and development in some parts of the Soviet strategic defenses -- we call it the Red Shield -- began more than 15 years ago. The Red Shield program dwarfs SDI, yet some in Congress would cut funding for SDI and bind us to an overly restrictive interpretation of the ABM treaty that would effectively block its development, giving the Soviets a monopoly in antiballistic missile defenses. This effort makes even less sense when the Soviets aren't abiding by the ABM treaty. Virtually all experts, even some of our biggest critics, agree that the Soviet construction of the large, phased-array radar at Krasnoyarsk is an out-and-out violation of the ABM treaty. We will not sit idly by and fail to respond to these violations. As I promised Cap Weinberger 2 weeks ago in his farewell at the Pentagon: We are not unilaterally disarming in this area or any other area.

A recent report released by the Department of Defense, called ``The Soviet Space Challenge,'' warns that the Soviet space program points in one direction: ``The methodical pursuit of a war-fighting capability in space.'' Well, this report raises an ominous specter. Together with the longstanding Red Shield Program and the construction of the Krasnoyarsk radar as part of an updated early warning and tracking system, the Soviets may be working toward a ``breakout'' from the ABM treaty, to confront us with a fait accompli that, without SDI, we would be totally and dangerously unprepared for.

There's been a tendency by some in Congress to discuss SDI as if its funding could be determined by purely domestic considerations, unconnected to what the Soviets are doing. Well, SDI is a vital insurance policy, a necessary part of any national security strategy that includes deep reductions in strategic weapons.

Now, let me just say a few more words about two of the other subjects I'll be discussing with General Secretary Gorbachev -- first, human rights. There has been a lot of speculation about glasnost recently. Is it merely an effort to make the economy more productive, or will this first breath of openness inspire peoples in the Soviet Union to demand real freedoms? Those of us who have lived through the last 70 years remember earlier moments of promise in Soviet history -- temporary thaws soon frozen over by the cold winds of oppression.

Glasnost -- a promise as yet unfulfilled. Still, it inspires brave souls throughout the Soviet Union to take a chance, to come out of hiding and declare proudly their commitment to human and national rights and to speak openly about their religious beliefs.

Just last August, over 200 underground Ukrainian Catholic Church leaders and laity fearlessly and for the first time disclosed their names in an appeal to General Secretary Gorbachev to legalize their church. Joseph Terelya, the brave Ukrainian Catholic human rights activist, recently released from the Soviet Union after 21 years in Soviet labor camps, prisons, and psychiatric hospitals, delivered the appeal personally. Few moves on the part of the Soviet Government could do more to convince the world of its sincerity for reform than the legalization of the Ukrainian Catholic Church. One of the truest measures of glasnost will be the degree of religious freedom the Soviet rulers allow their people -- freedom of worship for all, including Protestants, Jews, Catholics, Orthodox, and followers of Islam.

Finally let me just touch on the subject of personal -- or of regional, I should say, conflicts. Today, even as their economy flags at home, the Soviets spend billions to maintain or impose Communist rule abroad, from Eastern Europe to Cuba, Cambodia, South Yemen, Angola, Ethiopia, Nicaragua, and Afghanistan. It's estimated that the Soviet war on Afghanistan costs them between $5 billion and $6 billion a year. The Soviet bloc has supplied some $1 billion annually to the Communist Angolans and $2 billion to the Sandinistas in military hardware alone.

International support for the brave Afghan freedom fighters is more solid than ever. Three weeks ago the U.N. General Assembly, with a record vote, called overwhelmingly for the withdrawal of all foreign forces from Afghanistan. The Soviets have talked of setting a timetable for withdrawal from Afghanistan, but that timetable is too long and too conditional. It's time for them to pack up, pull out, and go home. It's time they set a date certain for the complete withdrawal of all Soviet troops from Afghanistan.

They should respect the voice of the Afghan people and negotiate with the resistance, without whose assent no political solution is possible. And they should face reality and allow a process of genuine self-determination to decide Afghanistan's destiny, for the present regime in Kabul is discredited and doomed. Its days are clearly numbered. From comments we hear the Soviets making in many parts of the world, it's beginning to look as if even they are writing off that regime. The Soviets pride themselves on recognizing objective reality.

Well, it's time for them to bite the bullet. The goal of the U.S. remains a genuinely independent, nonaligned, neutral Afghanistan free from external interference. Once the Soviet Union shows convincingly that it is prepared to withdraw promptly and permit self-determination, the United States will be helpful diplomatically. In the meantime, the struggle against tyranny will continue.

Jonas Savimbi's freedom fighters inflicted another crushing defeat on the Soviet-backed MPLA forces. This fall's Communist offensive, the biggest ever in Angola, ended in a rout for the Soviets and their proteges. The heroes of the Lomba River did it again, pushing back the massive Soviet assault, capturing hundreds of operational trucks and tanks, and shooting down a substantial number of helicopters and Cuban-piloted planes. The Soviets truly are beginning to feel the sting of free people fighting back.

On the other side of the continent, the Soviets must take their share of responsibility for the situation developing in Ethiopia. Once again, famine threatens that poor land. No doubt weather plays a role; nevertheless, a major share of the responsibility rests squarely on the shoulders of Ethiopian Marxist rulers. More than one relief agency has accused the Ethiopian Communist government of manipulating the famine and relief efforts in the civil war against their own people. And the systematic suppression of all private initiative in Ethiopia will guarantee chronic shortages for years to come, if not reversed.

During the last famine, while the rest of the world sent food and medicine, the Soviets sent their clients in Ethiopia weapons of war. And I think all of us are aware that many times the movement to get those weapons out where they wanted them replaced the movement to get the food out to the starving people. The Soviet Union must do more, much more, to press for immediate reforms in Ethiopia that will prevent the horror of famine from happening again. The first time it was a tragedy; the second will be a crime.

Otherwise, there can never be a true glasnost, true openness, between his nation and ours. I'll also make it clear that one of the greatest stumbling blocks to increased cooperation and exchange between our two nations is Soviet support for Communist tyranny in Nicaragua. With our support the Nicaraguan freedom fighters have made impressive gains in the field and brought the Communist Sandinistas to do something that they never would have done otherwise -- negotiate.

Members of our own Congress will not forget this important fact: Without the freedom fighters, there would be no Arias peace plan, there would be no negotiations and no hope for democracy in Nicaragua. An entrenched, hostile, Communist regime in Nicaragua would be an irreversible fact of life. The Sandinistas would have permanently consolidated and fortified a Communist beachhead on the American mainland.

Within the next month Congress will have to vote on further aid to the freedom fighters. If Congress says no to this aid, the Sandinistas will know that all they have to do is play a waiting game. They will have no incentive to negotiate, no incentive to make real steps toward democracy.

If we're serious about this peace process, we must keep the freedom fighters alive and strong and viable until they can once again return home to take part in a free and democratic Nicaraguan society. They are brave men, and they have sacrificed much in the cause of freedom, and they deserve no less. There will be few more important votes in Congress than this one and, as I have so often said in the past, I'll be counting on your active support. With your help, I know we can win this one. The fact is, as you all very well know, we have no choice -- we have to win this one.

Well, we've got so much more left to do in these next 14 months or so. If anything, we're stepping on the gas because of the limited time. We want to get as much pinned down of what has been accomplished so far and the changes that have been made. And, you know, there's one thing that might encourage you sometimes when the going gets a little tough. Do you realize how short a time it has been that both parties are talking about eliminating the deficit? [Laughter] For 50 years they told us that we didn't have to worry about the deficit -- we owed it to ourselves. Now we're not arguing anymore about, no, you shouldn't spend that money. We're just arguing about how we're going to cut. And we've had more practice at that then they have, so we'll try to get our way.

U.S.-France Agreement is similar in objective to the social security agreements already in force with Belgium, Canada, the Federal Republic of Germany, Italy, Norway, Sweden, Switzerland, and the United Kingdom. Such bilateral agreements provide for limited coordination between the United States and foreign social security systems to overcome the problems of gaps in protection and of dual coverage and taxation for workers who move from one country to the other.

Second, the proposed Joint Resolution would repeal the last sentence of Section 104(e), which purports to strip United States courts of jurisdiction over commercial litigation now pending in the Federal courts between Palau and certain of its creditors. This attempt to grant Palau sovereign immunity for a single case relating to a power plant project is inconsistent with United States law and policy as embodied in the Foreign Sovereign Immunities Act of 1976. Repeal of this provision would protect the reputation of the United States as an international financial center and allow Palau and its creditors to pursue the rights and remedies available to them through the judicial process.

Approval of the enclosed Joint Resolution would enable the United States to bring the Compact into effect and end application of the 1947 Trusteeship Agreement with the United Nations Security Council, under which the United States has administered Palau. The end of the trusteeship would mean the beginning of a new era of political, economic, strategic, and cultural partnership between the United States and Palau.

The comfort of familiar surroundings and the loving care and attention of family members often give an important measure of relief to patients recovering from illness or injury, including those on early release from hospitals or nursing homes. Many Americans who understand this and who decide to care for their loved ones at home find welcome assistance in occasional services offered by home health care providers.

A variety of groups make such care available. Thousands of home health agencies -- large and small, urban and rural, public and private, hospital-based and independent -- provide nursing services; physical, speech, and occupational therapy; social services; and home health aide services. The dedication of these organizations and their thousands of employees and volunteers has eased the path to recovery for countless Americans.

The high-quality services of home health care providers give aged and disabled citizens an exceptional opportunity to take advantage of this Medicare-covered benefit and recuperate in their own homes, where they can most effectively draw upon the constant support and concern of their families. That strengthens family life and individual independence alike, and is good reason for all of us to celebrate National Home Health Care Week and to thank and salute the men and women who supply home health care.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 30th day of November, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

The President. You are living proof of something that I have said over and over again: Orange County is where the good Republicans go before they die. But, thank you, Dr. Cobb. And thank you for that great music, both here and outdoors.

I've given him some of the most sensitive and difficult tasks that we've had, and he's never let me or the country down. When you ask who led the fight to lift excessive regulations off of the shoulders of America's economy or who reassured our allies about deployment of INF missiles and set the stage for the INF treaty or who ran the initial policy meetings that led to our rescue of Grenada, or when you ask which candidate for President is on your side and America's side: George Bush is that man.

But as I listened to George Bush and his opponent debate, I couldn't help thinking the problem with those fellows on the other side is not camera angles or lighting; it's not whether their candidate is likable or not. No, it's the very thing that they've spent this campaign trying desperately to hide. When our liberal friends refuse, until the last week of the campaign, even to whisper the ``L'' word and insist that this election is not about ideology, it's about competence, they're just acknowledging that where they want to take America, America doesn't want to go.

Well, you know the facts, and so do the American people. Our liberal friends have spent the last 3 months trying to dress up their agenda in our clothes -- and now in Harry Truman's clothes or F.D.R.'s clothes -- but somehow nothing fits.

Since our expansion began, we have created over 18 million new jobs. That is more new jobs than Europe and Japan combined. And overall, job for job, those jobs pay better than the jobs that existed before our expansion began. Today we're in the longest peacetime economic expansion ever recorded. We're exporting more than ever before in our history. And a greater proportion of our potential work force and a greater number of Americans are at work today than ever before in the history of the United States of America.

Let me explain that term ``potential work force'' to you. That is considered by the statisticians to be everyone in the United States, male and female, 16 years of age and up, all the way, including the retirees and all. Today 62.7 percent of that pool of Americans are employed.

Think of what this means to you when you leave school. There'll be jobs and opportunities waiting for you. It's a good time to begin a career and maybe get married to that special someone and start a family. Perhaps now or in a few years, you'll want to start your own business. Well, it's a great time for that, too. Think of how lucky you are not to have graduated in the late seventies when things looked so different. Think of how lucky you are to be graduating in our country and not some other country.

What you heard in a recent debate I've heard echoed in my talks with the leaders of many other nations: Today the United States of America is the envy of the world. Yes, we've come a long way in the last 8 years, but, my friends, everything that you and I and George Bush have worked for in these last 8 years, everything, could be lost faster than you can say furlough. Now, our opponents say they're in the tradition of F.D.R., Harry Truman, and John Kennedy; but from the economy to national defense, they've taken positions only a McGovern could love. They're so far out in left field that not even Kirk Gibson could hit a ball that deep.

They'd cut the B - 1 bomber, the mobile MX, our strategic defense against ballistic missiles, and they would eliminate two carrier battle groups from the Navy. In fact, what they plan for the Navy is so bad that when they get through Michael may have to row the boat ashore.

The President. And you're going to have him. You know, if they'd shut up and listen, they'd learn where George was. You know, every time this happens, I wonder if some of the people who are doing that realize that maybe if they had their way about the government people wouldn't be able to do what they're doing.

The President. All right. Okay. Well, now, for that other party, and for an example of their so-called profamily agenda, they propose Federal child-care assistance. A little while ago, I told an audience that under this proposal if parents want assistance and they also want to leave their child with his or her grandmother the grandmother will have to be licensed by the Federal Government.

Hearing all this, maybe it won't surprise you that this year we have an opposition candidate for President whose appointees to his State's supreme court have been described, in the words of legal authorities who've studied their record, as ``fervent proponents of the liberal social agenda committed to imposing it through judicial decree.'' They have opposed the death penalty and opposed mandatory sentences for drug dealers. They believe that directing teachers to lead classes in the Pledge of Allegiance is unconstitutional and have voted to strike down a ban on child pornography.

Now, our friends on the other side have promised that come January the Reagan era is over, and their era will be just beginning. Well, let me ask you something else, and again: Could you give me an answer loud enough so they can hear it all the way to Boston? Come January, do you want Washington run by those whose only pledge of allegiance is to more government and more spending and who have never let the taxpayers' dollars out on furlough?

This election campaign is not over. And the only poll that means a thing is the one on election day. And that's why it's so important for you to vote. It's disturbing to me that so many of America's young people so far don't show up at the polls to vote. With so many years ahead, you have a big stake in this election.

Earlier this year, I had the privilege of doing something I never thought an American President would be able to do. There, in the Soviet Union, in the Lenin Hills, I spoke to students at Moscow State University; and my speech was about the glories of human individual freedom. Now, think of those students.

George. You've been a great Governor, and this fall you've been a terrific quarterback for the Republican team. And I'd like to add a special thank you to seven of the best darn high school bands in America. You did yourselves proud. Now, will you promise me you'll do all of America proud and just say no to drugs? [Applause] Well, now you just did me proud.

The President. Thank you. But you know, I'll feel just fine about leaving Washington because nobody knows better than I do just how capable are those two hands I expect will be taking the wheel come the 20th of January. I can't think of a man alive today who's more prepared to take a hold of America's gearshift, rev up America's engine, and then downshift into America's future than my good friend and valued colleague, George Bush.

The President. All right. I'm here today, though, to talk to you about the great Republican ticket from the White House to the statehouse and make sure everybody who shares our hopes for the future turns out to vote on November 8th. We need people in the Senate who will work for a thriving economy, a strong national defense, and the preservation of our family values. And that means reelecting one of America's very best Senators, California's own, Pete Wilson. We need people in the House who will work for a strong national defense. The Democratic Congressman from this area is a man who has bragged openly about opposing more military funding than any Congressman in history. And he's been in Washington for 24 long, liberal years.

The President. I didn't think so. No, San Bernardino needs a Congressman who'll do his constituents credit, a man who understands that his country needs to stand tall and fight for freedom. Well, there's only one guy in this race who'll do that, and if you will agree with me, he's going to be the next Congressman from the 36th District: John Paul Stark.

American economy from the confiscation of the ``malaise'' years. When we came into office, families everywhere were reeling from tax rates that were draining this nation's initiative. Well, we took that money out of the grasping hands of the Washington bureaucrats and put it back in the wallets of the people from whom they'd confiscated it in the first place -- the working men and women of America.

Since our expansion began, we've created more than 18 million new jobs. We reduced the unemployment rate to nearly the lowest it's been in 14 years. And today a greater proportion of what is called our potential work force -- that means everybody, male and female, from the age of 16 and up, including all students and retirees -- yes, a greater proportion of that work force, 62.7 percent, is employed today. That's more than ever before in the history of the United States.

Now, we didn't do all that. No, my friends, you did it -- you and every hardworking man and woman in this country. What George and Pete and John, Paul and every Republican understands is that there's no greater force for change, no greater engine for progress, than the American people. We just turned you loose and got out of your way. We cleared away the wrecks the liberals left behind, waved the green flag, fired the starter pistol, and watched you go to the races. We also went to work on our nation's defenses. We're once again respected in the world.

None of our triumphs -- no, not one -- would have happened if our opponents had had their way. There would have been no INF treaty or rollback in Afghanistan or democratic revolutions around the globe. They opposed rebuilding our military defenses, and even today they want to cancel and eliminate two supercarrier task forces from the Navy.

Of all the changes we've made, the one I may be happiest about is this: Our young men and women are once again proud to wear their country's uniform. And because of them, over these past 8 years, not 1 inch on this good Earth has fallen to the Communists.

Now, another area where we differ is our understanding of the Constitution. We've appointed serious-minded judges who respect the Constitution and know the meaning of the word ``punishment.'' Their judicial nominees -- in the State of Massachusetts and in the State of California -- have been, you might say, for the birds. Are those the kinds of judges we want on the United States Supreme Court?

Well, violent crime has fallen significantly in this country since 1981 because we put criminals on notice: Make one false move, and the next sound you hear is the clang of a jail cell door slamming shut. My friends, we believe there are no citizens more precious than the men and women who guard us: our State and local police. And George Bush and I stand united behind them. We must protect them from those vicious killers. Now, the other fellow opposes the death penalty.

All that we've achieved, everything, can be undone faster than you can say Pledge of Allegiance if our liberal friends are successful. Remember how my successor here in California undid so many of our accomplishments before George Deukmejian rode him out on a rail? We don't want that to happen again this year. And remember what happened after the 1980 census, when a Democratic Congressman redesigned California and thwarted the will of the people by gerrymandering the State into a map that looked like a piece of shattered glass?

The President. We actually had more votes for Republican Congressmen than they had, but they elected more Democratic Congressmen because of the way they have divided up this State in their gerrymandering. We don't want that to happen again this year, and that means voting for a great slate of Republican candidates at the State and local levels, like Paul Woodruff and Bill Leonard, David Masters and Brian Carroll.

Ladies and gentlemen, America needs the strength, the vision, and the true grit of George Bush and Pete Wilson. And with your help and God's grace, we'll all have cause to cheer just one week from today. As we head into the final lap, it's time to push the pedal to the metal and shift into overdrive. You know, some people are saying it's time for a change. Well, ladies and gentlemen, we are the change. The change began 8 years ago.

That's sort of like the United States Congress. [Laughter] But in the Congress, they have an old and wise saying: There are two types of Senators: showhorses and workhorses. Chic Hecht is not a showhorse; he's a workhorse. He gets the job done for the people of Nevada. Chic doesn't grab headlines; he doesn't showboat. Chic's the kind of Senator who doesn't make a lot of noise. He just gets things done for his State. He works hard, he's effective, and he has the respect of his colleagues and the admiration of the President and Vice President of the United States. And both of us sure want to have him in the Senate next year. I think George Bush wants him there even more than I do because George is going to need Chic's help.

But through three Congresses, Chic and I have worked together, fighting special interest to cut taxes on America's working people. We backed strong measures like Gramm-Rudman to put a collar on congressional spending. We worked for a strategic defense against ballistic missiles, for judges and Justices who would respect the Constitution and get tough on criminals, for a strong national defense, and to support brave freedom fighters in our hemisphere and around the world. And if that's what you believe in, too, I think Chic Hecht has earned 6 more years. Don't you?

You know, up until Sunday, the opposition objected to being called liberal, not because it was false, but because it was true. But now they've come clean, and they admit it: They're liberals. Of course, the liberals now are saying that they're on your side. I guess they think that that will make it easier for them to reach their hand around and put it in your pocket. [Laughter] But if you care about fiscal responsibility -- that means keeping the politicians from stealing your wallet -- here is all you need to do on election day: Step into the voting booth, put your hand on the lever, and say right out loud, ``Read my lips: No new taxes.'' Of course, on election day, I don't think that's what the Governor of this State plans to do. I think he's going to vote for a liberal Governor from New England. Doesn't that tell you something about how he would vote in Washington, and doesn't that tell you something about who you ought to vote for for the Senate?

Yes, the bottom line in this election is that Chic Hecht is a strong conservative, and unlike his opponent, he will never have to take orders from the liberal leadership of the other party. And that makes a difference not just on taxes and national security but also when it comes to confirming judges and fighting crime, two issues where the liberal leadership in Congress has gone so far left that today voting against them has become a matter of self-defense.

So, let me ask you to do something, and I want to hear your answer: Will you promise me that on November 8th you'll go to the polls and from top to bottom, and especially for Chic Hecht, you'll give your support to our Republican candidates? [Applause] And you know, on election day, thanks to Chic Hecht, when you go to the polls, you won't have to crawl there.

Now, from top to bottom, from President to Congress to local office, especially here in Nevada, this is what is at stake. This election year is a referendum on liberalism. But the opposition, even after finally admitting their liberalism, is still trying to deny that they've left the mainstream behind and now belong to the party of McGovern and Mondale. That's the type of liberals they are.

No, the fact is, today if you want America to be what F.D.R., Franklin Delano Roosevelt, called a great arsenal of democracy; if, like Harry Truman, you want to continue to help those resisting communism; if you believe in lowering tax rates like John F. Kennedy did, and in the traditional values that you grew up with; then you should vote for our Republican ticket because that's what we believe in, and the self-proclaimed liberals don't.

Back when I took office, America was in the worst economic crisis since the Great Depression. But today America is in the longest peacetime expansion ever recorded and, as you've been told, going on now 72 months. We've cut taxes, slashed inflation by two-thirds, and sliced interest rates in half. Since the economic recovery began, we've created over 18 million new jobs -- good jobs, more than three-quarters of them the kind that pay $20,000 a year and up -- and the unemployment rate in Reno has been cut nearly in half. And statewide, real personal income is up by over 30 percent.

Today in America, a greater proportion of our potential work force is employed than ever before in the history of the United States. Now, I'm not just looking at the unemployment rate. That is because there are always people between jobs and newcomers coming into the job market. But that potential employment pool -- that is considered to be, and hear this, everyone in the United States from 16 years of age and up, all the way, including the retirees and so forth -- that is considered to be the potential employment pool. Well, today 62.7 percent of that group of citizens are employed in jobs in this country.

The President. Thank you. Of course, the self-proclaimed liberals still don't understand how we were able to get rid of their economic crisis, their ``malaise,'' their inflation, and their gas lines. So, in this campaign they're treating good times as if they're a given, as if it just happens. Well, their message is: You can take prosperity for granted. It's time for a change, so take a chance on us. Well, that's sort of like someone telling you that you've stored up all the cold beer you could want, so now it's time to unplug the refrigerator. [Laughter] But whether it's a well-stocked refrigerator or our economic policies, you can't unplug what's working and expect things to stay the same.

And with the work and the support of Chic Hecht, a key member of the Senate Intelligence Committee -- a man who, in fact, served his country as an intelligence agent -- our country is once again respected in the world. Our Armed Forces are strong, and America is at peace. And we and our NATO allies stood firm in the face of Soviet missiles pointing at the heart of Europe and Asia, and Mr. Gorbachev got the message. He did business because we meant business, and we still mean business.

Now, one of the most important ways to show that we still mean business is to reelect strong, conservative Republicans to the Congress, people like Chic Hecht and Barbara Vucanovich, and to elect good Republican challengers like Lucille Lusk down in Las Vegas. I'm asking you on election day to send a message that will literally be heard around the world.

The fact is, if the liberals had had their way, there would have been no INF treaty or rollback in Afghanistan or democratic triumphs around the globe. They opposed rebuilding our military defenses. They opposed the deployment of the missiles in Europe to counter the Soviet threat. They opposed the liberation of Grenada. They opposed the raid on terrorist Libya. They oppose our policy of helping freedom fighters fight communism and advance the cause of liberty around the world. But Chic has advanced our cause every step of the way, and that's one of the reasons I can tell you today that in the past 8 years we haven't lost 1 square inch of ground to communism and, in fact, have returned one small country, Grenada, to freedom.

This one is up to you. On November 8th, you can help Nevada and help America hit the jackpot by sending Chic Hecht back to the United States Senate. This election is about what type of Senator Nevada will have and what type of Congress the next President will have. Some people say that it's time for a change. Well, ladies and gentlemen, we are the change. It began when you sent us to Washington 8 years ago. And now it's up to you to keep that change alive by reelecting Chic Hecht.

I am signing H.R. 3515, the ``Medical Waste Tracking Act of 1988.'' This bill is an important step forward in the protection of our environment and public health because it will ensure that those who generate, handle, or dispose of medical waste are accountable, and it will encourage proper handling and disposal of such potentially dangerous waste. I am also pleased to sign this bill into law because it contains the explicit law enforcement authority for the Environmental Protection Agency (EPA), which this Administration actively sought.

The enforcement provisions of this Act, however, must be read to respect the President's authority under Article II of the Constitution to direct his subordinates where necessary to resolve internal Executive branch disputes.

In addition, the Attorney General may not authorize the EPA Administrator to bring a civil law suit against another Executive branch agency because all Executive agencies, including EPA, are accountable to the President. Such a law suit would not constitute a ``case or controversy'' for a court to resolve under Article III of the Constitution.

I have also been advised that section 11007 of this bill, which authorizes States to take enforcement actions against any person ``to the same extent as the Administrator,'' may raise serious constitutional problems. To the extent that Congress provided for States to prosecute crimes or exercise other executive branch authority, it could be inconsistent with the Appointments Clause of the Constitution.

Finally, section 11010(b) providing for exemption of the Act's implementing regulations from the Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980 is inappropriate. The Paperwork Reduction Act affords the public an important opportunity for comment and protects citizens and businesses from overly burdensome reporting requirements.

I'm here today to ask everyone in Wisconsin who plans to vote for George Bush and against far-out liberalism in the White House to also vote against far-out liberalism in the Congress and to make sure that the next United States Senator from Wisconsin is Susan Engeleiter. Susan represents everything that for more than a century has made Wisconsin a model for the Nation.

Yes, it's true what they say. Susan Engeleiter is a Wisconsin original. But she's more than merely qualified on one critical issue after another. She stands with George Bush, and her opponent stands with a certain liberal tank driver.

Susan has been a leader in the fight against crime, and in particular against drugs. She led in reforming welfare, and the Nation has in many ways followed her. And she's for a strong defense. Meanwhile, both her opponent and the head of that ticket are tax-and-spend, antidefense liberals. Now, they'd be the worst thing for America's defenses since Pearl Harbor. Together, they're a textbook example of why the liberals are cruisin' for a bruisin' from the American people this year.

The problem with the other side is not camera angles or lighting. It's not whether their candidates are likable or not. No, it's the very thing that they've spent this campaign trying desperately to hide. When our liberal friends refuse, until the last week of the campaign, even to whisper the ``L'' word and insist that this election is not about ideology, it's about competence, they're just acknowledging that where they want to take America, America doesn't want to go.

But, my friends, we're making some progress. After all of these months and all of this time, George's opponent has finally come out of the closet. He has finally embraced the ``L'' word. He has confirmed that the American people -- or what the American people have known all along: He's liberal, liberal, liberal! And come next week, the American public will say no to the Massachusetts liberal who preaches higher taxes, big spending, and a weak defense.

Think of what cutting inflation to a third of what it was means to families who are seeking to protect their life savings. And think of what our tax reduction program has meant to families, most of whom now pay a top rate of 15 percent.

We've achieved arms agreements with the Soviets and a new warmth in relations, not through weakness but through our policy of peace through strength. You'd think our liberal friends would have learned from that.

Yes, it's the same Carter-Mondale liberal agenda they're pushing: less defense and more big government. For example, as a part of their so-called profamily agenda, they support Federal child-care assistance. Now, a little while ago, I told an audience that under this proposal, their proposal, if parents want assistance and they also want to leave their child with his or her grandmother the grandmother will have to be licensed by the Federal Government.

And look at crime. The top of their ticket and their candidate for Wisconsin's Senate seat both say that no matter how horrible and brutal the crime they're opposed to capital punishment. Well, George Bush and Susan Engeleiter believe that for the most horrible crimes, like when a drug dealer murders a policeman in cold blood, that kind of killer deserves and should receive the death sentence. If you ask me, there are no Americans braver and no citizens more precious than the men and women who guard us: our State and local police.

By the way, you've heard that George's opponent says he's on your side. But you know better. In the Governor's 1989 budget, State debt is projected at some $10 billion, nearly double the debt when the Governor took office. And what did this debt buy? Well, here are the words of a leader of his own party in the State legislature: ``Not only has this been the worst spending spree in Massachusetts history, we have almost nothing to show for it in better services, just a bigger payroll and a huge pension liability . . . .'' Yes, George Bush is the one, and the only one, who's on your side. And that's not negative campaigning: That's the truth.

You may have guessed, I feel strongly about giving George Bush a Congress where he has more friends than he had on that Pacific island where he was shot down during World War II. Ours is a system of three equal branches of government. Two branches, Congress and the President, are chosen by election, and the third branch, the court, is chosen by the other two. When you vote for a candidate for the Senate or the House, you're voting for the direction of the country and the world as much as when you vote for President.

But what I really want to tell you is -- and point out -- in the 50 years up and through 1980 the Congress of the United States, both Houses, was in the hands of the Democrats for 46 of those 50 years. And in those 50 years, there were only 8 scattered years in which the budget was balanced. For a half a century, they were carrying out -- and I remember making some speeches when I was a citizen against this, and something should be done about it -- and the reply always was the deficit spending maintains our prosperity. And we don't have to worry about it. We owe it to ourselves.

So, whose deficit is it? Because then, beginning in 1965 when President Johnson's War on Poverty began -- which poverty won -- [laughter] -- in the 15 years from there to 1980, the budgets of the United States increased to five times what they had been; and the deficit increased to 52 times what it had been in that first 50 years. So, a great important thing is we've had gerrymandering every 10 years because they've been in the saddle. And the time has come for us to get back on the track and continue in the way we've been going. And I just have to tell you that I think you have a very great addition -- in a small package -- but a great addition to the United States Senate in this young lady who is your candidate.

Let me tell you, it's great to be here in a community that's a symbol of all we've accomplished in the past 8 years. They tell me that the three automobile plants near here are running close to capacity, and they're all staffed up now at the steel mill in Cleveland. You have all proven what happens when Americans put their nose to the grindstone, and which is probably why Berea is the grindstone capital of the world. You know, some people in Washington were counting America out in 1980, the way they were counting out the Cleveland area. They decided to play doctor and said the American people were suffering from some kind of malaise.

Well, in November 1980 you gave them a message. You said, ``Physician, heal thyself.'' And every one of you here proved them wrong and showed them there's no greater engine for change and economic growth and prosperity than the hard-working men and women of the United States of America, and there is nobody more hard-working in this country than the people of Cuyahoga County.

And one of the people who's been responsible for the change around here is with us today. He's the man who saved the city of Cleveland, a guy who knows what it means to do what's right and to do it right.

The President. But I'll give you a little secret. When I'm out of here, so they can't accuse me of doing it for myself, I'm going to see if I can't talk the people of America into canceling that amendment because it is not an infringement on the man in office, it's an infringement on the democratic rights of the people of America.

But now, as I said, come January I'll be going home, but I'm going to feel just fine about that because nobody knows better than I do just how capable are those two hands I'll be passing the torch to come the 20th of January.

The President. I'm here today to talk to you about the great Republican ticket, from the White House to the statehouse to the county seat, and make sure that everybody who shares our hopes for the future turns out to vote on November 8th.

You know, the liberals are going around saying they're on your side. You know better than that. Let's talk about crime. Our side believes people who want to protect their home and family from an armed intruder have a constitutional right to own a gun; the liberals are against it.

The President. Now, I want to ask you a question, and would you shout out yes or no loud and clear so that our friends in the press know just where you stand. Do you believe the liberals are on your side?

The President. All right. You know, the truth is, those others -- they only come around on your side when they want to get their hands on your wallet. I remember the last time the American people heard that kind of talk in 1980. The American people let them know they weren't on your side; they were on your back. Yes, the liberals were off-sides in 1980; they're even further off-sides now; and on November 8th, the people are going to throw the penalty flag and let the liberals know they're so far off-side that they're way out of bounds.

American public will say no to liberals who preach higher taxes, big spending, and a weak defense. When we came into office, families like yours were reeling from tax rates that were draining this nation's initiative. Since our expansion began, we've created more than 18 million new jobs. We've reduced the unemployment rate to nearly the lowest it's been in 14 years.

We've had 71 months of economic recovery; that's the longest peacetime recovery in the history of this great nation. And today a greater proportion of our potential work force -- that means everybody, male and female, from 16 years of age and up, in this country, students and retirees included -- a greater percentage of that work force is employed today than ever before in the history of the United States of America: 62.7 percent have jobs.

You know, some people think that maybe I've changed, that I don't believe the things that I believed when I came into office. Well, I'm here today to tell you that's not true. I'm a believer in a philosophy of world affairs summed up in a phrase I quoted to Mr. Gorbachev: Trust everybody, but cut the cards.

Just listen to what the liberals said no to. They opposed the liberation of Grenada. They opposed the deployment of our missiles in Europe. They oppose our policy of helping freedom fighters advance the cause of liberty around the world.

You know, my friends, we believe there are no citizens more precious than the men and women who guard us: our State and local police, and we must stand united behind them. We must protect them as they protect us. And that's why we believe with all the conviction we have that a crack dealer with a machinegun who murders a police officer in the line of duty should face the death penalty.

Yes, ladies and gentlemen, when our liberal friends run away from their agenda and falsely invoke the greats to cover for them, they're just acknowledging that where they want to take America, America doesn't want to go.

They're the people who've stolen the Democratic Party away from its heritage. I know because I was once a Democrat. And the truth is that when the left took over the Democratic Party leadership many like me who were inspired by F.D.R. and Harry Truman took over the Republican Party. So, I want to ask those of you some people call Reagan Democrats to join me and come home with me today. Come home to the Republican Party.

Now, please, don't cancel out your vote for President by picking a tax-and-spend liberal for the Senate. Remember, it takes the President and Congress working together to move America forward. So, if we have to ride two horses at once, shouldn't they both be headed in the same direction?

Now, probably somebody back up there being cynical is going to say, ``Well, wait a minute: This is Wednesday, and Tuesday is election day.'' I know that. But it's the day after election day that we do the cheering. And you know, some people are saying it's time for a change. Well, ladies and gentlemen, we are the change. The change began 8 years ago.

No, we haven't been able to balance the budget, because the President not only can't spend money, he can't save money. Only the Congress can do that. If a Department or Agency's got some money left over, the Congress says they've got to spend it. That's why we've got an awful lot of warehouses with office furniture in them -- because the only way they know, sometimes, to spend up the surplus is to buy new furniture.

But then we came into office in 1981, and for 6 years, we had one House, the Senate, on our side. Between '86 and now, we have cut the Federal deficit by some $70 billion. And we're continuing on a path of cutting. But as I say, those 6 years -- they've gone by, and now we're back where we were with them in charge of both Houses. We couldn't have made all the gains we've made if we had not had that one House. So, that's why this man sitting back here -- it's so very vital that we get him there, so that once again, a President can have at least one House that will help him curb the spending habits of the liberals.

I am withholding my approval of H.R. 3621, which would establish, among other things, an Indian Development Finance Corporation that would be authorized to provide development capital to Indian businesses that meet certain criteria.

The bill would have created an expensive and unnecessary new bureaucracy and duplicated currently existing programs. It would not have addressed the underlying problems of economic development in Indian country. Finally, the legislation places the Government at risk of substantial financial loss and does not provide sufficient authority for governmental oversight of the financial activities that could result in such loss.

I would also emphasize that H.R. 3621, with its further proliferation of Federal credit programs, is contrary to this Administration's long-standing and ongoing efforts to manage more effectively Federal credit programs.

Because this legislation takes the wrong approach to Indian economic development, I am withholding my approval of H.R. 3621. I note that this bill also contains an unrelated and beneficial provision relating to the transfer of Federal land in Southern California to several bands of Southern California Mission Indians. My disapproval of H.R. 3621 does not affect this needed legislation, which was also included in H.R. 2677, an omnibus Indian affairs bill that I have already approved.

I am withholding my approval of S. 2751, a bill ``to designate certain lands in Montana as wilderness, to release other forest lands for multiple use management, and for other purposes.'' My Administration's National Forest System Land and Resource Management Plans for Montana already strike the appropriate balance among competing economic, environmental, and cultural interests in the National Forests of Montana. The provisions of S. 2751 would have severely disrupted that balance.

Enactment of the bill would injure the economy of Montana. It could cost jobs and eliminate vast mineral development opportunities. It also would reduce the flexibility the Federal Government needs in managing the Nation's natural heritage.

The legislation would constrain the ability of the Federal Government to obtain strategic and critical minerals. These minerals are necessary to supply military, industrial, and essential civilian needs during national defense emergencies and are not now found or produced in the United States in sufficient quantities to meet those needs.

Finally, the legislation would have provided for the Federal Government to exchange revenue-producing Federal land for nonrevenue-producing land. The resulting loss in revenue to the Treasury would have increased the Federal deficit and imposed an unwanted and unneeded burden on the American taxpayer.

Half a century ago, in 1938, the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act was signed into law by President Franklin Delano Roosevelt. This legislation was the start of modern food and drug regulation. That this year is the 50th anniversary of that legislation reminds each of us to be grateful for our American legacy of concern for protecting the public health.

To this day, the Food and Drug Administration uses the provisions of the 1938 Act, as amended over the years, to establish rigorous standards for food and drug safety that are widely respected and emulated.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this second day of November, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and thirteenth.

Geographical influences that have helped determine the discovery and development of this country, and global conditions that have given rise to wave after wave of immigration to our shores, make ours a history that cannot be understood without a ready knowledge of world geography. In order for our Nation to maintain its special heritage and retain its position of global economic and political leadership, it is essential that our citizens have a sound appreciation of basic geographical facts and principles.

Today, however, as recent studies -- including a major report last summer from the National Geographic Society -- have affirmed, many young people and adults lack knowledge of elementary geography. The situation among 18- to 24-year-olds is particularly disturbing, with these young Americans ranking last in basic knowledge in this multination report.

We can do better. A free society has no greater enemy than ignorance, and there is no greater waste than the underuse of a child's God-given ability to learn and explore. Fortunately, our Nation has begun to give new attention in the past decade to the need for educational reform and educational focus. Young people need to be challenged early and often; and subjects like geography, and closely related studies like history and civics, can be taught in ways that promote curiosity and help young people stretch their minds and engage their imaginations as they view the map and all the many frontiers and horizons it charts.

Truly we live in a world rich in wonder, variety, and mystery. During Geography Awareness Week, 1988, we can resolve to share more of these qualities with our children and to encourage them in their understanding of the social, economic, and political influence of geographic issues and conditions.

In restaurants, diners, and clubs across our country, jukeboxes have long provided patrons with music for dining and dancing. The jukebox is to many a symbol of good, clean fun. It is also an inexpensive source of entertainment for young and old alike, and a treasury of memories for listeners of every generation. The centennial of the jukebox now gives all of us an excellent opportunity to celebrate its enduring place in American life.

The President. I, as you know, have a little announcement here for you. I know it's early, but I don't think it's ever too early for good news. I have some very, very good news for all Americans, and bringing good news like this to the American people is one of the great joys of the Presidency. We've just received the October employment numbers. And I'm delighted to report they're the best we've seen since June, and they're the best they've been in more than 14 years: 5.2 percent, down from 5.3 in September. It's a moment of pride, I think, for us all.

We're setting off for Chicago now for a last push in our effort to help George Bush become the next President of the United States. And this is the message we're going to be taking to every home in America: The future is bright, and it's getting brighter because we've been bringing good jobs and hope and opportunity to all the citizens in this country.

October, we Americans created 323,000 new jobs. That brings the total number of jobs we've created in this country since the recovery began nearly 6 years ago to 18.4 million. So, America is hard at work and growing. I believe George Bush is going to be the next President because as every day passes it becomes ever clearer that our policies have worked, and they're working, and they'll continue to work and nothing's going to stop us now. And I'm going to have to run for that bird out there.

United Press International], I'm just saying one thing, and I know I have to run and I can't go on taking questions here. But let me just say one thing: When I voted my first time in 1932, for what became the New Deal -- Franklin Delano Roosevelt and all of them -- the platform of the Democratic Party in that day and in that election called for a 25-percent cut in Federal spending, the elimination of useless Boards and Commissions, and the restoring to local communities, the people, and the States authority and autonomy that had been unjustly seized by the Federal Government.

Now, there's only one party today that is running on that platform, and that's the Republican Party. There has been a very definite switch as to where the two parties stand. In those days, the Republican Party was the party of protectionism and high tariffs, and today it's the other way around.

During the Second World War, mankind witnessed the most heinous of crimes: the Holocaust. And after the war, the nations of the world came together and drafted the genocide convention as a howl of anguish and an effort to prevent and punish future acts of genocide. The United States signed the convention, and in 1949 President Truman requested the Senate's advice and consent to ratification. In 1986 the Senate gave its consent, conditioned upon enactment of implementing legislation. We finally close the circles today by signing the implementing legislation that will permit the United States to ratify the convention and formally join 97 nations of the world in condemning genocide and treating it as a crime.

I'm delighted to fulfill the promise made by Harry Truman to all the peoples of the world, and especially the Jewish people. I remember what the Holocaust meant to me as I watched the films of the death camps after the Nazi defeat in World War II. Slavs, Gypsies, and others died in the fires, as well. And we've seen other horrors this century -- in the Ukraine, in Cambodia, in Ethiopia. They only renew our rage and righteous fury, and make this moment all the more significant for me and all Americans.

Under this legislation, any U.S. national or any person in the United States who kills members of a national, ethnic, racial, or religious group with the specific intent of destroying that group in whole or in substantial part may spend his or her life in prison. Lesser acts of violence are punishable by as much as 20 years in prison and a fine of up to $1 million. While I would have preferred that Congress had adopted the administration's proposal to permit the death penalty for those convicted of genocidal murders, this legislation still represents a strong and clear statement by the United States that it will punish acts of genocide with the force of law and the righteousness of justice.

That night, Nazis in Germany and Austria conducted a pogrom against the Jewish people. By the morning of November 10th, scores of Jews were dead, hundreds bleeding, shops and homes in ruins, and synagogues defiled and debased. And that was the night that began the Holocaust, the night that should have alerted the world of the gruesome design of the Final Solution.

This legislation resulted from the cooperation of our administration and many in Congress, such as Congressmen Henry Hyde and Jack Davis and John Porter and Senator Bill Proxmire, to ensure that the United States redoubles its efforts to gain universal observance of human rights.

Fifty years ago, on the night of November 9 - 10, 1938, German Nazis committed a nationwide pogrom against Jewish people. By the next morning, scores of Jews were dead, hundreds were injured, and many synagogues, shops, and homes lay in ruins. This vicious attack became known around the globe as ``Kristallnacht'' -- ``crystal night'' or ``the night of broken glass'' -- from the mute evidence of shattered window glass it left in so many streets. Half a century later, we mourn every victim of this pogrom and we rededicate ourselves to preventing repetitions of such brutality anywhere and everywhere.

The world had been ignoring many warning signs in Germany and elsewhere of increasing anti-Semitism, disregard for human rights, and eugenically motivated assaults on individual dignity and worth. Kristallnacht surely should have alerted everyone that time had run out -- that the ``peace in our time'' proclaimed hopefully by British Prime Minister Neville Chamberlain only a few weeks before was not to be. It took World War II to eliminate the Nazi threat to humanity and to our most sacred values.

Fifty years later, in our Nation's Capital, we have now laid the cornerstone for a national museum to commemorate those who perished in the Holocaust foreshadowed by Kristallnacht. We are determined as Americans to keep their memory fresh and enduring. We resolve to remind ourselves of the enormous evil of which mankind is capable and to remain vigilant.

We know that anti-Semitism is still present in the world and that there are still those who oppress others for their race, creed, or color and their simple desire for self-determination and a better life. We know where such racism and prejudice can lead. Let us ever recall that a remedy exists; it is our profound belief in and our readiness to defend the immortal declaration ``that all men are created equal, that they are endowed by their Creator with certain unalienable Rights, that among these are Life, Liberty and the pursuit of Happiness.'' If we hold fast to these truths we will find the inspiration and the power to prevent inhumanity on the face of the earth.

The President. Well, I think we're all disappointed by that. At the same time, I think we could recognize, however, that this is something they themselves have said is temporary, and they have repledged themselves to totally bring their troops out by February 16th. So, I think we have to stand by that.

Thank you very much, and good morning, Chicagoland. It's great to be here with your fine Governor, Jim Thompson, and your Congressman, Jack Davis. And thank you all for being here. And a special hello to the great kids of the Andrew High School Band. You've done yourselves proud. Now, will you all do -- and all make America proud and just say no to drugs? [Applause] And let me say a special thanks to all of you who have braved this terrible weather to be here today. With spirit and dedication like this, George Bush and I are lucky to have you on our side.

And it's the kind of news that makes this job worthwhile. The unemployment rate has fallen to 5.2 percent, which means it's the best it's been in more than 14 years. And I'm here to tell you if you like news like that and you want more, you'll make George Bush the next President of the United States.

Yes, in the last 8 years, we've set our sights once again on our enduring values and our hopes for the future, and you've seen the results. They say they're on your side, those other fellows, but that's just an empty promise. They promise, but you know we deliver. Yes, the last 8 years have been good years; but I've got a hunch that when George Bush gets in the saddle, as someone said in an old movie, ``You ain't seen nothin' yet.'' He knows that prosperity has a purpose. Prosperity gives all America the opportunity to raise a healthy family in the right way, to reach out to those who need help in our communities, to dream, and to make all our dreams come true. And he knows that freedom, glorious freedom, works.

Yes, we Americans hold history in our hands, but only if we vote. Earlier this year, I had the privilege of doing something I have never thought an American President would be able to do. I spoke to students in the Soviet Union, in Moscow, about the glory and wonder of human freedom. Think of those students. Only if they're very lucky and rise high in the Communist Party will any one of them ever have the influence on the course of their country's history and world history that each of you can have just by going into the voting booth.

The President. Thanks, Governor Jim, for that great introduction and the great work that you've done quarterbacking our team in Illinois. And let me add a special thank you to the guys and girls in the Stag High School Band. You've all done yourselves proud. Now, will you promise me to do America proud and just say no to drugs? [Applause] And if you keep studying and practice hard, maybe you'll end up as brilliant and fluent as the wonderful musicians in the Chicago Symphonic Wind Ensemble.

The President. Thank you all very much, and I'd like to just say something to you about that. You know, once I'm out of office, where no one can accuse me of doing it for myself, I'm going to see if I can't stir up a storm about changing that constitutional amendment because I believe it's an infringement on your democratic rights to vote for whoever you want to vote for.

But now I'd like to say hello to Sam Skinner, George Ryan, and two friends I usually see in Washington, Harris Fawell and Jack Davis. Now, they're the kinds of Members of Congress that keep the Washington bureaucrats from causing too much trouble out here in the real America. And also there's someone else I'd like to see in Washington, and that is John Holowinsky.

American voter for 56 years; in fact, I cast my first ballot in a Presidential race for Franklin Roosevelt in 1932. I've seen them come, and I've seen them go. Some were great. Some were good. And some were bad. But I have to say I've never been more enthusiastic about my choice than this year. I've been President for 8 years now, and nobody knows better than I that the most qualified man alive in the world for the job, yes, the best man alive for the job, is the man who is going to be President of the United States after you cast your ballot next Tuesday -- and his name is George Bush.

You know he stands for the policies that have brought peace and prosperity back to our great land. You've learned that he stands for the bedrock Judeo-Christian moral principles that guide us and our children. And you know that he stands for a strong America -- yes, an America that fights for freedom and will not yield in that struggle until the oppressed peoples of the world breathe free.

The President. Well, I know who's on your side, because he's been on my side, and that's George Bush. He has stood by me for 8 years. And so, if you want to know who's on the side of the little guy, well, I'll tell you: It's the big guy, the big guy from Texas. I know because I've worked more closely with George Bush than with any other member of the administration. I've seen him keep a cool head in a hot crisis. I've seen his leadership, and I've been guided by his vision. I have given him some of the most sensitive and difficult tasks that we've had, and he's never let the country down. No, he's done us all proud.

You know who led the fight to lift excessive Federal regulations off the shoulders of America's economy? It was George Bush. It was one of the first things we'd done. I asked him to head up a task force to see how many Federal regulations we could get rid of. And let me give you the estimated score. They've done their task; and as of now, we estimate that the Federal paperwork imposed upon you, the people, and on the communities and the States has been reduced by 600 million man-hours a year.

You know, with the election so close, some people are saying it's time for a change. Well, ladies and gentlemen, we are the change. The change began 8 years ago. Eight years ago we started liberating you from the confiscations of the ``malaise'' years. When we came into office, families across this country were suffering from tax rates so high they made Michael Jordan look like Pee-Wee Herman.

Well, we took that money out of the grasping hands of the Washington bureaucrats and put it back in the wallets of the people they'd taken it from in the first place: the hard-working men and women of America.

And look what happened: the longest peacetime recovery in our history, 71 months, and as of now, 18.4 million new jobs. Now there are more people at work over the age of 16, including students and retirees, men and women, female, male -- all from 16 years of age on up. And the highest percentage of that population pool is employed than ever before in our history -- 62.7 percent of all of those people have jobs today. And today we heard the great news: that October unemployment was the lowest it's been since June, which means the lowest it's been since May of 1974. And because of our tax reform, most families in this area saw their tax rates slashed to 15 percent.

Now, the task is not complete. We've got to keep going and to extend our recovery to every American home and every American family. And given the success we've had so far, I think you'll agree the best man for that job is the guy who's already on the job: George Bush.

The President. When we arrived in Washington, we faced a nation in which criminals were running rampant because liberal judges were so interested in protecting the so-called rights of the bad guys they were placing the good guys at risk. We came in and appointed judges who respect the law, respect the Constitution, and know the meaning of the word ``punishment.'' Violent crime has fallen significantly since 1981 because we put the bad guys on notice: Make one false move, and the next sound you hear is the clang of a jail cell door slamming shut.

Our greatest bulwarks against crime are those citizens who have devoted their lives to guarding us: the noble men and women of our State and local police. And George Bush and I stand united behind them. We believe that there are no citizens more precious than they, and we must protect them as they protect us.

Now, the other fellow opposes the death penalty. He opposes it absolutely and in every case. But as for George Bush and Dan Quayle and me, we believe with every ounce of our conviction that a crack dealer with a machinegun who murders a police officer in the line of duty should face the death sentence.

I'm happy to see Congressman Jack Davis here today because he's been in the forefront of our crusade against illegal drug use. Yes, when it comes to fighting crime, I think it's pretty clear just who's on your side: Jack Davis and George Bush.

We also went to work on our national defenses. And once again, America is strong, and we're at peace. We and our NATO allies stood firm in the face of Soviet missiles pointing at the heart of Europe and Asia. And Mr. Gorbachev got the message. He did business because he knew we meant business. And we still mean business.

None of our triumphs -- not even one -- would have happened if George Bush's opponent had had his way. There would have been no INF treaty or Soviet pullout from Afghanistan or democratic revolutions around the globe. He opposed rebuilding our military defenses, and even today, he wants to cancel or eliminate two supercarrier task forces from the Navy.

Now, just listen to what the liberals have said no to. They opposed the liberation of Grenada. They opposed the blow we struck against terrorist Libya. They oppose our policy of helping freedom fighters advance the cause of liberty around the world.

And of all the changes we've made, the one I may be happiest of is this: Our young men and women are once again proud to wear their country's uniform. And because of them, over these past 8 years, not 1 inch of ground on this good Earth has fallen to the Communists.

This weekend, you and hundreds of thousands of volunteers will be working in their precincts to turn out the Republican vote and to bring our message of hope and opportunity to all Americans. I'm convinced that volunteer support put me over the top in many States in 1980, and Illinois was one of them. And once again I ask for your help. Go out there and turn out our voters to ``punch 36'' [vote the straight Republican ticket].

Yes, my friends, when you accept the blessing of every American that is the right to vote, when you go into that booth, you're not only choosing the direction this country will take for the next 4 years, you're casting a vote for your children and your children's children. It's critically important that the fate of our great nation be placed in the capable, strong, and still gentle hands of a man who has been a hero in war and a leader in peace, a friend to me and to all Americans.

I've learned some time past that in the Soviet Union the people there have taken to making up jokes which they tell among themselves, and they display a great sense of humor. But they also display a certain cynicism about their system. And I have been collecting these jokes. I even told a couple to the General Secretary Gorbachev. [Laughter] Most of the others it would be tactless to tell him, but this one was about an order went out that anyone caught speeding, anyone, no matter who it was, should get a ticket. Now, you have to realize that in the Soviet Union only a few private citizens own an automobile.

All those cars you see in the newsreel shots belong to the bureaucrats. As a matter of fact, for an ordinary citizen to order a car there, he's got to wait 10 years for delivery. But he lays the money down 10 years in advance.

Well, Gorbachev came out of his dacha, his country home, one morning, and he was late getting to the Kremlin. There was the limousine with his driver, and he said to the driver, ``You get in the backseat. I'll drive.'' And down the road he went. But he passed two motorcycle cops. And one of them took out after him. And in a very short time, he's back with his buddy.

I mentioned that 10 years and the automobile, I'll conclude with another one, and then I have to go. Having mentioned that, this was a Russian that went in, had his money together and everything to order a car.

I'm here to ask everyone in New Jersey who supports the change we've been bringing to America these last 8 years to vote, from top to bottom, for the entire Republican ticket, including our Republican candidates for the House of Representatives and, in this district, for the man who has put the Federal Government into the battle to end the ocean dumping -- you missed me [The President referred to a loud noise in the background.] -- [laughter] -- end the ocean dumping of sludge and medical waste off New Jersey's shore, Jim Saxton, and to ask you to vote for one of the best men I've ever known to run for United States Senate or any other office, Pete Dawkins, and for the next President of the United States, George Bush.

You know, I'm dedicating myself this autumn to making sure that all we've begun these past 8 years -- all the changes, all the new hopes for all Americans and for all the people in the world -- that all this continues. On every level -- in local races as well as in the House of Representatives, in the Senate, and in the White House -- the election this year is about what the Vice President called the other day the big issues: peace, prosperity, the respect of government for family and community, the safety of law-abiding citizens, and the values that have made America the greatest and freest nation on Earth -- as Lincoln said, ``the last best hope'' of all humanity. And we're determined to keep it that way.

Well, you know, our liberal friends talk about it being time for a change. But where have they been for the last 8 years? We are the change. We began it 8 years ago. And the choice this year is to go forward with the change or to go back to the stagnant status quo out of the past.

And let me pause here and say that there is no change of which I'm prouder than that our young men and women once more take pride in wearing the uniform of the United States of America. And you know, thanks to their valor, in the last 8 years, not 1 square inch of land has been lost to communism. And in fact, in one tiny nation, Grenada, we've pushed communism back.

When we took office, America was in the worst economic crisis since the Great Depression. We turned that around. Think of what reducing the mortgage rates, as we have, by a third means to young families seeking to purchase a new home. Think of what reducing inflation to a third of what it was means to families seeking to protect their life savings.

And think of what our tax reduction program has meant to families, most of whom now pay a top rate of 15 percent. And think of what this means to you. And think about the great news we received today: October unemployment down to 5.2 percent, the lowest since June and the lowest in more than 14 years. Think of what that means to all Americans. Yes, what you heard in a recent debate, I've heard echoed in my talks with the leaders of many other nations: Today, the United States of America is the envy of the world.

If I could just interject something here about that unemployment rate. There will always be an unemployment rate -- not because of hard times and people who can't find a job -- there will always be a percentage of our people who are, by their own choice, between jobs, have changed to another place to live, and young people coming into the job market. Well, on Sundays I've gotten in the hobby lately of reading the help-wanted ads in the paper. [Laughter] I don't really read the ads; I count the number of pages. And when in Washington, in the Washington daily paper on Sunday, you pick it up and see 70 full pages of those tiny help wanted ads, employers looking for people to come to work, you know that we've done something about employment and jobs.

Not long ago, former Defense and Energy Secretary James Schlesinger, who served in administrations of both parties, wrote that their ticket this year seems to be, in Secretary Schlesinger's words, ``viscerally antimilitary.'' They would cut the B - 1 bomber, the MX missile, our strategic defense against ballistic missiles, and two carrier battle groups eliminated from our Navy.

Now, you've heard the liberals say they're on your side. They're on your side the way the ice was on the side of the whales. For example, Pete Dawkins' opponent refuses to rule out higher taxes. He calls higher taxes a ``last resort,'' which in translation from politician language to the English language means he's going to do everything he can not to read the next President's lips. On the other hand, if they need it, and many of them will, Pete Dawkins will give lip-reading courses to the entire Congress: ``last resort'' on one side; ``read my lips, no new taxes'' on the other. Tell me now: Who's on your side, Pete Dawkins' liberal opponent or Pete Dawkins?

Now, let me ask you: biggest job growth in the industrial world or one of the slower rates in the Nation -- in a mess like that and you tell me, who's on your side, that liberal Governor or George Bush?

Now, our liberal friends have promised that come January the Reagan era is over and their era will be just beginning. From top to bottom, the election this year is a referendum on liberalism. Ours is a system of three equal branches of government. Two branches, Congress and the President, are chosen by election, and the third branch, the courts, is chosen by those other two. When you vote for a candidate for the Senate or the House, you're voting for the direction of the country and the world as much as when you vote for President. And since we must ride two horses, Congress and the President, across every stream, shouldn't they both be going the same way? [Applause] Everyone on our ticket led by George Bush, Pete Dawkins, and Jim Saxton is going the same way. And come to think of it, that's my way, too.

You know, let me pause here and say a word about a man I admire immensely -- the man I hope will be your next Senator -- and the campaign against him. His opponent is a far-out liberal who opposes Gramm-Rudman, the line-item veto, the balanced budget amendment, and in fact, every move we've made to cut spending -- unless it's defense spending. He talks tough on crime, but he opposes the death penalty. All this is bad enough, but there's something more. We've seen a new lack of stability creeping into the way the opposition in Congress operates. I have to deal with it every day, and I believe that, when all is said and done, it's bad for America. You won't normally see most of what I'm talking about, but here in this Senate race, Pete Dawkins' opponent has brought that style of political fighting back home.

The President. Yes, in the Congress, as well as the White House, it all comes down to exactly the same thing, and that's the kind of future we want for America, the values we believe in, the way we were brought up, and a few simple words like ``freedom'' and ``family'' and ``peace'' and ``hope.'' I believe that the next 8 years can be a time of economic growth and unprecedented hope for America and the world. I believe we can see democracy come to every nation of Latin America. I believe we can continue the progress we've made with the Soviets. I believe we can move the world toward making nuclear terror a thing of the past with our Strategic Defense Initiative, SDI. Now, I believe this is our future if we put our nation in the right hands. And who has those hands? Jim Saxton, Pete Dawkins, and George Bush are those men.

This election campaign is not over. The only poll that means a thing is the one on election day. And that's why it's so important for you to vote. Not long ago, I did something I thought no American President would ever have an opportunity to do. There in the Moscow Hills, at Moscow State University, I addressed Soviet students and told them about the wonder and glory of human freedom, individual freedom. Now, think of those students. Only if they are very lucky and rise high in the Communist Party will any one of them have the influence on the course of history that each American has just by walking into the voting booth.

But you and I still have work to do. As Yogi Berra said, ``It ain't over till it's over.'' And this election is a package deal: We need to win in both Congress and the White House for it to count the way it should count. I hope that someday your grandchildren will tell of the time that a certain President came into town and asked their grandparents to join him in setting America on the course of the new millennium, and that a century of peace, prosperity, opportunity, and hope followed.

I shouldn't do this, but I'm going to. I just did it at the last stop, and it gets to be a habit with me. I have a new hobby. I'm collecting stories that I can actually prove are made up by the people of the Soviet Union and told among themselves. And it reveals they've got a great sense of humor, and they also have a kind of cynical attitude towards their system.

Education requires devotion and hard work from student and teacher alike, and good teachers are inseparable from learning at any age. Education is a lifelong process that benefits individuals and entire communities and countries and helps lay the foundation of the future. We should all express our gratitude to the teachers among us who seek to offer pupils a thirst for knowledge, a solid education, and the inspiration to achieve and excel throughout life.

Teachers do an incalculable amount of good as they teach pupils how to study and learn; provide instruction in the skills of reading, writing, mathematics, languages, history, the sciences, and other disciplines; and transmit understanding of and appreciation for the many influences that have shaped our land of liberty and justice. Teachers do much good as well as they offer vocational instruction, continuing education, and education for special needs. By word and deed, teachers foster intellectual and all-around development; they must do so in conjunction with the example and guidance parents and families give their youngsters.

Our country's great teachers often make many sacrifices as they fulfill their countless responsibilities. They have earned, and truly deserve, the utmost gratitude and esteem of students, parents, and community members.

Communication systems are the essential circuitry of democracy, the lifelines of information and ideas that provide the motive power for economic growth, social development, and personal enrichment. Throughout our history as a Nation of great size and dynamic opportunities, America has relied on the creation and extension of new lines of communication as a primary means of achieving greater cohesion and more rapid transfer of knowledge and services.

National Farm-City Week, we pause to recognize formally this aspect of our heritage and to rededicate ourselves to the goal of open and effective communication between rural and urban people, groups, and institutions. The pace of change in this regard has been truly extraordinary over the past century -- with, for example, rural free delivery, the telephone, radio, and television. From the vantage point of the late 20th century, it may be hard for us to imagine how significant these and other developments in urban-rural communication actually were.

Advances in communication are even more vital today, when an average of 112 people rely on a single American farmer for their supply of food and fiber and agriculture is the focus of increasing international commerce and competition. The range of agricultural issues has grown, too, to include public concern over the environment, recreational areas, water, wildlife, food safety and nutrition, and, of course, the productivity and profitability of farming itself. Fortunately, new means of communication are facilitating the rapid transfer of the ever more complex data needed to support our Nation's thriving mix of urban and rural activity. From satellites to on-line communications, from specialized newsletters to general trade publications, America's city-dwellers and farm families have an array of impressive new tools for sharing the fruits of their intelligence and their labor in the pursuit of a better life for all.

For the past 34 years, the theme of urban-rural dialogue and communication has been a regular part of our national celebration of Thanksgiving Week. Let us pause again this year to acknowledge our gratitude for the bounty of energy and invention God has bestowed upon our land.

After a vibrant and fractious and exciting year, we will at last be going to the polls on Tuesday and exercising our most important right: the right to choose our future, the right to vote. There's nothing more glorious than the blessing that is our God-given freedom to choose those who will lead us, and there's no sight more moving than a lone American walking to that voting booth, casting a ballot in secret, and thereby determining the destiny of this great country.

Don't listen to the cynical pundits who tell you this election isn't about the issues. Oh, yes, it is. In fact, it's about more than the issues: It's about the direction this country's going to take over the next 4 years and beyond.

The choice is yours. But, yes, my fellow Americans, there is a choice, a very, very important choice. A vote for Vice President George Bush is a vote for optimism, an expression of faith in the American experiment. It's an endorsement of what we've done these past 8 years, and of our heartfelt promise that tomorrow and the days to come will be brighter still.

No one knows better than a man who has sought the highest office in this land what an awesome responsibility it is to be the vessel of change, the selection of a people in control of their present and their future. It's truly humbling. And I'd like once again to thank all of you who placed your faith in me, and I'd like to tip my hat to those who supported others but took their responsibility as citizens of a democratic society seriously and with care. I have heard your voices, like those before me and those after me. I have heard your voices, and I hope I have justified your faith.

You know the two men who wish to succeed me on Tuesday. You know, also, so many others -- tens of thousands of candidates on State and local and school board ballots from Hawaii to Maine. And there are ballot propositions on issues from gun control to the size of cows' stalls. And, yes, every one of these choices is vital. Every one is crucial. Every one gives you an opportunity to say: This is what I want the future to look like. This is the country I want to live in. And I believe you must take every choice, from county sheriff to President of the United States, with equal seriousness.

Now, compare that kind of society with the democratic societies where the last two centuries have seen the expansion of opportunity and freedom, steady increases in standards of living, and a constant belief that things will get only better.

You can imagine how very moved I was last May to be in the Lenin Hills at a podium before an audience of students at Moscow State University speaking to them about the wonder and glory of human freedom, individual freedom. Think of those students. Only if they're very lucky and rise high in the Communist Party will any one of them ever have the influence on the course of their country's history and world history that each of you can have just by going into the voting booth.

The President. Thank you all very much. And now that I won't be doing it for myself after January, I think I will start raising a holler that they ought to get rid of that law because it's an infringement on your right to vote for who you want to vote for.

Governor Romney, Ronna, and thank you Jack Kemp for that great introduction. I know, ladies and gentlemen, it's no surprise that Jack Kemp is here in Michigan talking to all of you with his characteristic vigor and honesty and excitement. Jack Kemp, who was first campaigning on the idea of tax cuts back in the seventies -- he had an enormous impact on government policy in American politics. And, Jack, for just a young fellow, you've had a brilliant past, but I'm willing to predict in your case the best is yet to come.

Well, as you've been told already, I'm here today on behalf of a great candidate for the Presidency of the United States. But before I even mention his name, I want to ask each one of you: Will you give George Bush the kind of support he needs in the Congress by sending Doug Carl to Congress?

And it's great to be back here at Macomb Community College, a college that is the third biggest institution of higher learning in this great State, the kind of college that lives up to its name because it's the pride of this community just as it's the pride of Michigan. And, yes, it's great to be in Michigan again. I'm here because I love your people and I love your State.

Well, that's another reason I've come here today. We're now at the end of a long political journey that marks for me my last campaign as an officeholder. Nancy and I are so proud to have had the chance to serve all of you in Washington. And I'm proud to be here in Michigan and Macomb County with a special word, what I hope is an uplifting word to all of you in the closing hours of this campaign. It's always something to get out of Washington and on the campaign trail and get the chance to see heartland America and all of your hopeful, shining faces.

You know, it wasn't so very long ago that all I had to do to start an unfriendly campus riot was show up. [Laughter] And now on campaign stop after campaign stop, in State after State, I've seen so many young Americans, like yourselves, coming out to say hello. And today I just wanted all of you to know how delighted and grateful I am for that. If you ask me, as Robert Palmer has been singing recently, you are simply irresistible. That's why I'm glad to be here today and why I've been so glad to be on so many campuses around the country.

You see, people my age do deeply believe that it is our duty to turn over to you the same opportunity and freedom that our parents and grandparents handed on to us. And when we look at you, when we see your openness and your enthusiasm for America and for life itself, it gives us heart, the kind of heart it's taken to fight and win this long campaign.

Bush has that kind of heart. He has it because he cares about your future. He knows how far we've come in the past 8 years, and he doesn't want to see it squandered or thrown away. Throughout our history, whenever this great and blessed land has searched for true leadership, it has found it, and this year is no exception. I've worked more closely with George Bush these two terms than with any other member of the administration. I've seen him keep a cool head in hot crises. I've seen his leadership and vision. I've given him some of the most sensitive and difficult tasks that we've had, and he has never let me or the country down.

When you ask who led the fight to lift excessive regulations off the shoulders of America's economy or who reassured our allies about deployment of INF missiles and set the stage for the INF treaty or who ran the initial policy meetings that led to our rescue of Grenada, or when you ask which candidate for President is on your side and America's side -- George Bush is that man.

I gave him. I asked him to head up a task force to see how much we could reduce the Federal regulations imposed on the people. Well, they finished their task, and I think you might like to know that the regulations that they eliminated have led to a savings of paperwork imposed on you and on communities and States for the Federal Government that we estimate amounts to 600 million man-hours a year of paperwork that you don't have to do anymore.

He cares that courts won't allow children in public schools to open their day with a simple, silent, voluntary prayer. He believes that we must have judges on our courts who interpret the law and don't try to legislate, and who care not just about the rights of the criminals but about those of the victims of crime.

And that's just why I want George Bush to be the next President of the United States. You know, I once said that he was a great Vice President. But I know, and I've seen that it didn't come easily. George Bush is a man of action, a man accustomed to command. The Vice Presidency doesn't fit easily on such a man. But George Bush is also a patriot, so he made it fit, and he served with distinction no one has ever matched in that position.

And that's why I'm here today: to bring home the simple fact that all the progress we've made is on the line. Today's activities are part of a get-out-the-vote campaign. And I just want to tell each one of you to go to the polls on Tuesday and get your friends to go, too, to cast their and your votes for George Bush -- and, again, to remember your great congressional candidate, Doug Carl, and a man who will make a great United States Senator, Jim Dunn.

You see, way back in August, on the day I arrived in New Orleans for the Republican Convention, I said the one thing George Bush and our party had to do was get our message out to the people who live in places like Macomb County, the people who gave us our great victories in 1980 and 1984. And I noted a line by our opposition that very few people had noticed, a line in which George Bush's opponent said this was an election about competence, not ideology. Well, I said then that that line was nothing but a smokescreen to hide the liberal agenda the opposition was going to force on Americans if it was elected. And that's why everywhere I've gone I've said that, from top to bottom, from President to Congress to local office, especially here in Michigan, the election this year is a referendum on liberalism -- or whether we let George Bush's opponent take America where America doesn't want to go.

You know, the fact is a lot of Democrats around the country are saying that their party leadership has swung so far to the left, so far out of the mainstream, that the national Democratic leadership has lost touch with the rank and file of the Democratic Party. Now, I'm a former Democrat, and I have to say: I didn't leave my party; my party left me.

Now, whether it's their opposition to voluntary prayer in school, support for gun control, or the leftwing judges appointed in a State like Massachusetts, or a weak-kneed defense policy, their views can only be described by the dreaded ``L'' word: liberal, liberal, liberal. That once-proud party of hope and affirmation has become the party of obstruction and negativism. The party of F.D.R. and Harry Truman has become the party of McGovern and Carter and Mondale and Dukakis. The party of ``yes'' has become the party of ``no.'' Well, the liberal leadership of the Democratic Party in Washington has been saying no to the rank-and-file Democrats of Michigan, and now it's time for you to start saying no to them by saying yes to George Bush and the entire Republican ticket.

The President. Well, if you ask me, there are no Americans braver and no citizens more precious than the men and women who guard us: our State and local police. And George Bush and I stand behind them all the way, as I know you do. And that's why George and I believe that for horrible crimes, like a drug dealer who murders a policeman in cold blood -- that kind of killer deserves and should receive the death penalty.

And then there's the issue of defense. Look at the accomplishments of the last 8 years. We're once again respected in the world. Our armed forces are strong, and America is at peace. We and our NATO allies stood firm in the face of Soviet missiles pointing at the heart of Europe and Asia. And Mr. Gorbachev got the message. He did business because he knew we meant business. And we still mean business.

I know because I once was one of them. And the truth is that when the left took over the Democratic Party, many rank-and-file Democrats like me who were inspired by F.D.R. and Harry Truman took over the Republican Party. So, I want to ask those of you some people call Reagan Democrats to join with me and come home with me today. Come home to me and George Bush.

I just happen to think America's on a roll. We've just received the October unemployment numbers, and I'm delighted to report it's 5.2 percent. That's the best it's been in more than 14 years. And this is the message we're going to be taking to every home in America: The future is bright, and it's getting brighter because we've been bringing good jobs and hopes and opportunity to all the citizens in this country. In just the month of October, we Americans created 323,000 new jobs. Now, that brings the total number of jobs we've created in this country since the recovery began nearly 6 years ago to 18.4 million. And let me also add -- I thought this might want to interest the people in Macomb County -- that for the first 10 months of this year, average domestic auto sales are up from 1987.

So, we've got to do all we can to get our message out. We must guard against complacency and overconfidence. This election isn't over yet, not by a long shot. And as Winston Churchill once said: We must continue the struggle until victory is won.

Yes, my friends, when you accept the blessing of every American -- it's the right to vote -- when you go into that voting booth, you're not only choosing the direction this country will take for the next 4 years, you're casting a vote for your children, and your children's children. It's critically important that the fate of our great nation be placed in the capable, strong, and still gentle hands of a man who has been a hero in war and a leader in peace, a friend to me and to all Americans. Yes, there's only one man I trust to bring this country forward, ever forward, toward its destiny of greatness. And so, I ask you on November 8th to make George Bush the next President of the United States.

Thank you very much. And I know when I tell the story of this to George, he's going to be a very happy man. But I'm so grateful to you for what you have just said and what all of you are doing. Again, I thank you all very much. This is a great day.

You know, I keep a special place deep in my heart for Texas -- for every cowpoke or wildcatter, astronaut or rancher, and every man, woman, and child who remembers the Alamo and knows the story of the battle of San Jacinto.

Well, all that, as they say, is history -- or should I say, ancient history, which at my age is a subject that I'm regarded as an expert in. [Laughter] But I've come here today to talk about the future, and there's no better place to do that than Texas. That's because no one in America understands more clearly than you that today America stands on the brink of an era of national greatness that will exceed anything that any country on Earth has ever known before. And that's certainly true here in Texas.

But while we eagerly look to the future, the naysayers, the liberal fearmongers, and the Washington gloom-and-doom-ocrats -- [laughter] -- talk about how they plan to manage America's decline. But tell me, do you believe that this, the greatest nation on Earth, is in decline?

The President. The truth is that to a degree never before seen in human history, one nation, the United States, has become the model to be followed and imitated by the rest of the world. Nation after nation is turning to democracy. Heads of state from all over the world, when they see me now, tell me about their plans for reducing taxes and doing the things that we've already done. Our economic recipe has become the world's model. Communism is in retreat, and freedom is on the march around the world. And, yes, American culture and technology dominate the world to such a degree that from television's ``Dallas'' to Disneyland to the space shuttle Discovery, an entire planet is watching and following us. And, yes, America truly is the envy of the world.

I know that during the Vice Presidential debate the liberal opposition laughed and snickered when Dan Quayle said that America is the envy of the world, but they're going to get their answer soon. You see, the election this year, from top to bottom, from President to Congress to railroad commissioner to State supreme court and State legislature -- especially here in Texas -- is a referendum on liberalism. And I've got a hunch that where the liberals want to take America -- backwards -- the American people and the people of Texas don't want to go.

This is a chance to vote for the values that make America great and for the policies that turned this country around. I know that times have not been easy in Texas the last 3 years. But our national recovery has taken hold here, and we're going to keep it going until Texas becomes a roaring engine of prosperity to lead America forward, and the Lone Star lights up the sky.

I know we see that unemployment rate, but there's always going to be an unemployment rate. There are always going to be people who, on their own, are voluntarily between jobs. And there are always going to be newcomers coming into the job market. But what I learned since I've been here is that the statisticians consider the potential employment pool of the United States everyone, male and female, from the age of 16 and up. That includes all those millions still getting an education, those retirees who are out there on the golf course. But that's the potential pool. Well, today 62.7 percent of that entire population pool are employed.

In fact, a lot of Democrats around the country are saying that their party leadership has swung so far to the left, so far out of the mainstream, that the national Democratic leadership has lost touch with the rank and file of the party. Whether it's higher taxes, their opposition to school prayer, the appointment of leftwing judges, or a weak-kneed defense policy that only a McGovern could love, their views can only be described by the dreaded ``L'' word: liberal, liberal, liberal.

First, let's talk about crime and the right to bear arms. Our team believes that law-abiding people who want to protect their home and family have a constitutional right to own guns. But the liberals favor gun control.

And George Bush, Tom Phillips, and I stand behind them all the way because we're on their side. Unlike liberals, we believe that when a drug dealer murders a policeman in cold blood, that kind of killer deserves and should receive the death sentence.

On school prayer -- we're for it; they're against it. But the self-proclaimed liberals say they're on your side. I say that they're so way out on the far-left side that if this were a football game the opposition would be called off-side. Actually, they wouldn't even be off-side; they'd be over the sidelines, which is where we're going to send them come election day.

I want to take a moment to say something to the mainstream rank-and-file Democrats here today. You know I'm a former Democrat. And it's often said that the once proud Democratic Party of Franklin Delano Roosevelt and Harry Truman is dead and gone, that the leadership of the Democratic Party has been taken over by the left. The party of F.D.R. and Harry Truman couldn't be killed. The party that represents people like you and me, that represents the majority of Americans -- that party hasn't disappeared. The fact is it's stronger than ever. You see, the secret is that when the left took over the Democratic Party leadership, we took over the Republican Party. We made the Republican Party into the party of working people; the family; the neighborhood; the defense of freedom; and, yes, the American flag and the Pledge of Allegiance to ``one nation under God.'' So, you see, the party that so many of us grew up with still exists, except today it's called the Republican Party. And I'm asking all of you to come home and join me: Come home to the Republican Party.

Let me just interject here, if I will. My first vote was cast in 1932 for Franklin Delano Roosevelt. Do you know what platform he ran on? Reduce Federal spending by 25 percent. Eliminate useless boards and commissions. And return to the local communities, the people, and the States the authority and autonomy that had been unjustly seized by the Federal Government. Well, which party today is running on that kind of platform? Ours.

The leftwing Democratic leadership in Washington expects its members to take orders and support its radical agenda. Phil changed parties and became a Republican so he could work for the working people of Texas and be a champion of freedom. On election day, just by voting for the whole Republican ticket, you can be a champion of freedom, too. Here in Mesquite, you can say no to the liberal Democrats by electing Lon Williams to Congress. And that will give Dick Armey, Steve Bartlett, and Joe Barton the help they need in Washington. And you know, there's only one man in this election who really wants to join Phil Gramm as the other Senator from Texas, and that man is Beau Boulter. And, yes, it's Chief Justice Tom Phillips and the Republican candidates for the Texas supreme court who want to clean it up and believe that in Texas justice is not for sale. So, remember again, it's Beau Boulter, Lon Williams, Kent Hance, Tom Phillips, and Vice President George Bush. This is the team that is on your side.

And one of the issues where there's the biggest difference is defense. Just look at what Vice President Bush and I have done over the last 8 years. Today we're once again respected in the world. Our Armed Forces are strong, and America is at peace. We and our NATO allies stood firm in the face of Soviet missiles pointing at the heart of Europe and Asia. And Mr. Gorbachev got the message. He did business because he knew we meant business. And we still mean business.

I know there've been some people that have worried a little about Gorbachev and me in these summit meetings. And they think maybe I'm kind of -- well, I've gotten a little easier here. But I just want you to know I made it plain to him from the very beginning with an old American saying: Trust everyone, but cut the cards.

But none of our triumphs -- no, not one -- could have happened if the liberals had their way. There would have been no INF treaty or rollback in Afghanistan or democratic victories around the globe. They opposed rebuilding our military defenses, and even today they want to cancel out of the Navy two carrier battle groups. What they're planning for the Navy is so bad that by the time they get finished Michael will have to row the boat ashore.

No, they opposed the liberation of Grenada. They opposed the raid on terrorist Libya. They oppose our policy of helping freedom fighters fight communism and advance the cause of liberty around the world. There is a sign behind you on that. George and I did all those things, and I'll tell you proudly right now: We'd both do every single one of them over again.

Yes, these have been a great 8 years, but America's greatest days are still to come. For me, this trip to Texas is very special. The election is in just 3 days, and I'm on my final campaign swing. And although, come January, I'm going to be riding off into the sunset, I feel a little like I'm on the ballot myself this year; because on election day what you're really choosing is more than a slate of candidates -- it's a vision of America, a dream we share. You know, I can't think of a better place than the Mesquite Rodeo to ask you this question: If you have to change horses in midstream, doesn't it make sense to get on one that's going the same direction you are?

America has saddled up, and we're riding into the future. We're keeping a promise that is as old as this land we love and as big as the sky. It's the vision of creating a new nation of free people, a country that would be a light unto the Nation and a shining city on a hill. On November 8th, the people of Texas will have the chance to vote their children the brightest future the world has ever known and to elect a proud Texan as the next President of the United States. Let's also elect the strong, conservative team that he and Governor Clements need.

As the brain progressively deteriorates, tasks familiar for a lifetime, such as tying a shoelace or making a bed, become bewildering. Spouses and children become strangers. Slowly, victims of the disease enter profound dementia.

Alzheimer's disease affects nearly 2\1/2\ million Americans. Half of all those admitted to nursing homes have this diagnosis. Among older individuals, Alzheimer's disease is the most common cause of severe intellectual impairment and contributes to the major causes of death.

Alzheimer's disease is precisely that, a disease of the brain. It is not a normal consequence of aging. Scientific studies of families with an abnormally high incidence of Alzheimer's disease have revealed a possible genetic connection in some patients to chromosome 21. Encouragingly, new knowledge about the brain's neurotransmitters -- chemicals that ferry messages between nerve cells -- is enabling scientists to develop experimental drugs to try to slow or halt the relentless progress of the disease.

Within the Federal Government, research into the cause, diagnosis, treatment, and ultimately the prevention of Alzheimer's disease is led by the National Institute of Neurological and Communicative Disorders and Stroke, the National Institute on Aging, and the National Institute of Mental Health. Federal research efforts are augmented in the private sector by the work of voluntary health organizations committed to the conquest of dementing disorders. Through forceful leadership, these groups aid distressed families, inform the public, and attract young investigators to the challenge of Alzheimer's disease research.

While I applaud efforts to increase the amount and quality of children's television programming, the Constitution simply does not empower the Federal Government to oversee the programming decisions of broadcasters in the manner prescribed by this bill.

Conditioning license renewals upon the Federal Government's determination as to the adequacy of a licensee's programming would violate the First Amendment. It would inhibit broadcasters from offering innovative programs that do not fit neatly into regulatory categories and discourage the creation of programs that might not satisfy the tastes of agency officials responsible for considering license renewals.

The bill's limitation on advertising revenue for certain types of programming places the Federal Government in the inappropriate position of favoring certain kinds of programming over others. This type of government regulation may well undermine its stated purpose by discouraging commercial networks from financing quality children's programming. In addition, it raises constitutional issues both by virtue of the difficulty of defining ``children's television programming'' in a manner consistent with the Supreme Court's proscription of either overinclusive or underinclusive regulation of speech and by virtue of the manifest incongruence between the stated purpose of the provision and the means chosen to effectuate it. See Posadas de Puerto Rico Associates v. Tourism Company of Puerto Rico, 106 S. Ct. 2968, 2977 (1986).

The bill simply cannot be reconciled with the freedom of expression secured by our Constitution. Moreover, despite its laudable goals, it is likely to be counterproductive. Accordingly, I am compelled to disapprove this measure.

Eleven million Americans suffer from diabetes. The disease strikes men, women, and children of all races. It takes many forms and is likely to have many causes, but the long-term outcome is the same -- over the years, diabetes damages the heart, blood vessels, kidneys, eyes, and nerves. The disease and its complications affect individuals and our country heavily in terms of illness, disability, and economic loss.

Through research, we are learning how diabetes occurs, how it causes complications, and how in the future we may short-circuit its effects. We are also improving the understanding and management of diabetes, thereby helping people with this disease to minimize the threat of complications.

Nevertheless, much work lies ahead. As research continues to provide insights, the communication of new information to those in the forefront of managing this disease -- primary care practitioners and people with diabetes -- will permit new advances to be put into practice.

Through research we can find a way to eradicate this disease, and through public awareness we can keep those with diabetes healthier than ever before. The continued cooperation of the Federal Government, the scientific community, and private individuals and organizations makes our success in both these realms possible.

Diabetes Month, and I call upon concerned governmental agencies, health care providers, and the people of the United States to observe this month with appropriate programs, ceremonies, and activities.

Americans are thankful for the inspiration and achievements of the millions of us who have disabilities. Through the years, and in more and more spheres of endeavor, disabled Americans have demonstrated their capabilities and their desire to make the most of the opportunities life can offer. Still, much more remains to be done by each of us so all citizens with disabilities can reach their potential.

To reach this goal, for the past 20 years a partnership between governments at all levels and the private sector, including groups and individual volunteers, has fostered opportunity for disabled citizens. National Disabled Americans Week, 1988, allows each of us to salute efforts aimed at developing and utilizing the skills and insights of disabled people -- and to honor the spirit and accomplishments of Americans with disabilities in these efforts and in communities everywhere.

Hospice care helps terminally ill people cope physically and emotionally with illness and helps their families cope with grief. To achieve these goals, hospices offer an intimate approach for both patient and family that encompasses medical care, relief from pain, and encouragement to continue in loving family relationships. Observance of National Hospice Month, 1988, provides Americans with the chance to learn more about hospice care and its purposes.

Hospices offer compassionate, planned care by interdisciplinary teams of doctors, nurses, therapists, home health aides, homemakers, volunteers, social workers, and pastoral and other counselors. All of these people see to the varied needs of patients and families. At present, small hospices, staffed largely by volunteers, are supplying much of the care to those in need, often without charge. But hospice care is increasingly a part of health care in America. Medicare has begun certifying hospices; Medicaid programs will provide hospice care; and many private insurance companies already offer hospice benefits.

During this special month of observance and in the future, we can all be aware that hospices make it possible for terminally ill people to have a natural death in the comforting knowledge that their loved ones will not face their loss unprepared or alone. We can be grateful for the reverence thus shown for the sanctity of life and human dignity.

Throughout our history, women have been among the patriots who have defended our land and liberty from every enemy. Many women have served in the military, in occupations from pilot to nurse and in both peacetime and war. We owe all of them a special debt of gratitude for their part in advancing the promise of freedom. We do well to recall that we owe appreciation to our many veterans of military service who are women.

Today, the number of women serving in the military, and thus the number of women veterans, continues to grow; women veterans now comprise 4.4 percent of the total veteran population. They continue to enrich our country in civilian life as they bring their skills and patriotism to bear in communities across America. Let us use the welcome occasion of National Women Veterans Recognition Week, 1988, to honor the service, sacrifice, and love of country so gladly given by our women veterans.

The President. Thank you all very much for that welcome, and thank you, George, for that great introduction. Thank you all very much. It is great -- and I do mean great -- to be here in Long Beach. It feels good to come home.

I came here to talk about a very good friend of mine, but I know he'd agree that there's one important thing that has to be done first. Can you let me hear, loud and clear, what Long Beach has to say about those world champion Dodgers? [Applause] I'll bet they heard you back in Washington. In fact, what I tell them back East is that to listen to Long Beach is to listen to the future. Your great -- anybody got a Stinger? [Laughter] No, he's one of ours.

The President. I'm not going to take credit for that. [Laughter] But that story was one worth remembering in a political campaign. The candidates can send out their messages and try to move the voters, but in the end the great American public does not move. Instead, the public decides; the people choose the candidate who has steered the truest course and most closely followed the beacon of light that represents our fundamental values and the truths that we hold dear. And that's what we mean when we say that in America there are no rulers; it's the people who rule.

You know, I get a great deal of pressure many times when I have an opportunity to speak to young people. But almost every nation has a Constitution. And then, what is so remarkable about ours? Well, all those other Constitutions are documents containing many of the same things ours does, except that it's the Government that is telling the people what they're permitted to do. Ours is the only one that says ``We, the people'' tell the Government what it can do.

That was where I had my first meeting with George Deukmejian, and from here, he became one of the greatest Governors in the history of California. Now, this is also the home of Dan Lungren, an outstanding Congressman, who's leaving office this year, but who I expect to see serving the people of California again in the future.

I want to ask you something. Your votes tomorrow may be the most important ones cast in America. They will determine how California goes, and California may send the next President to the White House. So, tell me -- I'm going to ask a question you've been asked before: Can I count on each one of you tomorrow to help turn out the vote for the man at the top of the ticket? [Applause] He's my personal choice and my good friend, George Bush.

This is my last campaign trip as your President. And its been my privilege to have served you these past 8 years. But today, above all, I'm excited about the future. This is the advent of a new beginning of continued change, clear direction, and experienced leadership -- a new beginning for America.

For the past 8 years, George Bush and I have worked together to rebuild our economy, to get America on the move again, to make the United States once again the great arsenal of democracy, a light unto the nations, the champion of freedom around the world. During the 8 years that we've worked side by side in the White House, I've come to know George Bush very well. And I also know what is required to be President of the United States. I know who should be the man at the desk, and ladies and gentlemen, George Bush is that man.

Bush and I took office 8 years ago, America was in the worst economic crisis since the Great Depression. But today America is in the longest peacetime expansion ever recorded. We're going into our 72d month. Since the expansion began, we've created 18.4 million new jobs. They're good jobs. And the unemployment rate in this area has fallen by about a half. And statewide, real personal income is up by more than 25 percent. And today in America a greater proportion of our population is employed than ever before in the history of the United States. And let me put a number with that. I had to go to Washington to find out that the statisticians consider the potential employment pool in America is everybody, male and female, from 16 years of age and up -- all of those thousands that are getting their education yet, all of those people that are retired. And so, all are considered in that pool. Well, 62.7 percent of that population pool today is employed.

Now, what Vice President Bush and I have done with the economy is very important, and it must continue. But what we believe in is much more than that. Our greatest treasure as a nation is our precious moral heritage: the basic values of faith and family that makes ours a great nation. Yes, ladies and gentlemen, the family is the bedrock of America.

And besides restoring our economy and defending our values, we want to also work on our nation's defenses. We're once again respected in the world. Our Armed Forces are strong, and America is at peace. We and our NATO allies stood firm in the face of Soviet missiles pointing at the heart of Europe and Asia. And Mr. Gorbachev got the message. He did business because we meant business. And we still mean business.

Now, tomorrow, I feel confident that the people of the United States are going to do exactly what I did 8 years ago: They're going to choose George Bush. This year one of the best qualified men -- yes, as you were told by the Governor -- to ever seek the Office of President is on the ballot. I think you know his record of service in Congress, at the United Nations, in China as de facto Ambassador, and as Director of the CIA. And for the past 8 years, George Bush has served with the greatest distinction of any Vice President in the history of the United States.

Many years later, in 1980, after receiving the Republican nomination for President, once again I stood before Lady Liberty, this time at the event to kick off my run for the White House. And that year, as in each race, just like today, I've come back to California for the final day on the trail. And there is no place on Earth I would rather be right now. This is my last campaign, and seeing all of you, and people like George Deukmejian and Dana Rohrabacher, and seeing the Queen Mary again, it's like closing a circle, like sailing into the harbor after a long and wonderful voyage to be greeted by old and beloved friends.

Well, one of the ``big strapping lads'' who served in that war was a man named George Bush. He flew 58 combat missions in the Pacific. He was the Navy's youngest pilot and was decorated for his heroism. Many years later, in 1980, he earned my lasting respect when he won a Presidential caucus in the place where the race for the White House began, a place called Ioway.

The President. You've all been so kind, and I've heard you say 4 and 8 and so forth, and the number of years. May I just say one thing to you? When I get out of the job, so nobody can think I'm doing it for myself, I'm going to do everything I can to see if we can't rise up and get rid of that amendment because it's an infringement on your democratic rights.

The President. Thank you very much, and, good Duke, thank you very much for that kind introduction. I think some thanks should go also to the Coronado High School Band and the Torrey Pines High School Band. And also I understand that some people that played a helping hand in bringing this all together happened to be my fraternity brothers from San Diego State, my fellow TEEK's. Thank you. I was told back there at Eureka College when I became a member of Tau Kappa Epsilon that it was a fraternity for life. But now let me say hello to Earl Cantos; to Congressmen Duncan Hunter and Bill Lowery; and to a great future Congressman we'll all be proud of, Rob Butterfield; and to one of America's greatest Governors, George Deukmejian; and to one of the finest Senators I know, Pete Wilson.

Now, please forgive me if from time to time over the next few minutes, there seems to be a lump in my throat and a catch in my voice. This is a special moment for me in a special place and, yes, with special people. I closed both of my campaigns for the Presidency right here in San Diego. And you see, there was a reason for that. You see, when the parades have ended, the shouting is over, the speeches are done, and the final bell has sounded, a fighter wants to return to his corner and be with family and friends while he waits for the verdict of the judges. And whenever I finish in San Diego, I feel I'm with family, and I know I'm with friends. I love San Diego.

The President. No, no -- unless you count the one that someone up there casts when your time is done and the moment has arrived for His verdict, which, when all is said and done, is the only election that really counts. But if my name isn't on your ballot tomorrow, something more important is: a principle, a legacy. No, this is not the end of an era; it's a time to refresh and strengthen the new beginning we started 8 years ago. At stake are the very things you and I have been working for and fighting for ever since we first joined together almost a quarter of a century ago and set out to restore our State and then our nation. They add up to the difference between candidates who promise that come January ``the Reagan era is over'' and those who say, ``Read my lips: No new taxes.'' Yes, it's the difference between the liberals and the men and women on the Republican ticket, candidates like this district's next Congressman, Rob Butterfield; Senator Pete Wilson; and the next President of the United States of America, George Bush.

And that's why I'm here today: to ask you to turn out to vote tomorrow for our entire Federal, State, and local Republican ticket so that our principles survive, our legacy endures, and our truth goes marching on. I've dedicated myself this autumn to making sure that all we've begun these past 8 years continues. In the House of Representatives, in the Senate, in the White House, and in the State legislatures -- which will redraw congressional district lines after the 1990 census, and through that act profoundly shape the course of the entire Nation in the next decade -- yes, on every level, the election this year is about what the Vice President called the other day the big issues: freedom; peace; opportunity; respect of government for family and community; the safety of law-abiding citizens; and whether we remain true to our national mission of standing with those who, like our Founding Fathers, would battle against tyranny and for liberty. It's about the values that have made America the greatest, freest nation on Earth -- as Lincoln said, ``the last best hope'' of humanity. And we're determined to keep it that way.

I've seen some press reports these last few weeks noting how I've been campaigning so hard for Republican candidates. And they say few other Presidents have done what I've done. Well, of course, few other Presidents have had the opportunity to be succeeded by a man as good as George Bush or to stump for candidates as good as Pete Wilson and Rob Butterfield. But I'll let you in on a little secret: I'm not doing this just for George Bush or Pete Wilson or our Republican candidates on all levels around the Nation. I'm doing it for the country, of course, but for someone else as well -- actually for two other people.

He was the best storyteller I've ever heard and the strongest man of principle I've ever known. He believed in honesty and hard work. He was filled with a love of justice and a hatred of bigotry. Once he was out on the road -- he was a shoe salesman, traveling around northern Illinois in the winter. And this was in the depths of the Depression. And in a midst of a blizzard, he went into a smalltown hotel in the town he was going through.

And as he signed his name and the clerk saw the name, which was a very Irish name -- ``Oh,'' he said, ``you're going to love it here.'' And then he told him why: because that hotel would not allow people of a certain faith to stay there. And this man picked up his suitcase and said, ``Then I don't stay here.'' And he spent the night in his car in the snow, caught near-pneumonia, and a short time later had the first heart attack of the several that led to his death.

We called him Jack. And just as he was strong, his wife, Nelle, was filled with goodness and love. In the darkest days of the Depression, when they themselves could barely scrape by, no one ever came to their door in need of a meal who Nelle sent away emptyhanded. I'm proud of many things I've done in my life, including more than a few in the last 8 years; but nothing has ever given me as much satisfaction as when, after several years in California, I could bring my mother and father out here and give them a home, the first they had ever owned. So, you see, I'm campaigning this year also for them. A son of Jack and Nelle Reagan never walked away from a battle on principle. This year's election is that kind of fight. And by darn, we're going to win it.

Young people just getting out of school, looking for their first job, and able to find it because our recovery has created an average of a quarter of a million new jobs each month for the last 71 months. Young couples looking for their first home, who can afford it because we've brought mortgage rates down by a third since we took office. Mothers and fathers trying to keep within the family budget -- cutting inflation by two-thirds and bringing the top personal income tax rate that most families pay down to 15 percent has made their lives a lot better.

But these aren't the only people who depend on our success. Tomorrow on the plains of Afghanistan and in jungles around the world, freedom fighters will huddle close to their radios, hoping to catch word that the administration in America will remain their friend. In cells across the globe, political prisoners will await anxiously for assurance that America has chosen strength over weakness, because for many of them, our strength is all that keeps their hope alive.

Just on the plane coming out here I read a letter I had just received. It was a couple thanking me for the fact that they are now in the United States after having spent more than 7 years in the prisons and psychiatric wards of the Soviet Union. But all these people -- they depend on us, and so help me God, we won't let them down.

And there's some other very special people we won't let down, either. There's no change during our administration of which I'm prouder than that our young men and women once more take pride in wearing the uniform of the United States of America. Thanks to their valor, in the last 8 years not 1 square inch of land anywhere in the world has been lost to communism. And in fact, we've rescued one tiny nation, Grenada, from communism.

This year, we're facing a liberal campaign of unusual deception. First our opponents wanted to conceal their ideology. It took us 3 months to drag the ``L'' word out of them. [Laughter] And now they're trying to hide what side they're on.

They say that they're on your side, but you tell me, yes or no, and shout it loud and clear: When their candidates for President, U.S. Senator and Congress refuse to rule out raising your taxes and have already made their marks as world-class big spenders in State or Federal Government, are they on your side?

The President. Our liberal friends just never seem to learn: You can't be for big government, big taxes, and big bureaucracy and still be for the little guy. In the race for the White House only one guy is for the little guy, and that guy is George Bush. And in the Senate race, that guy is Pete Wilson. In this district, in the House of Representatives, it's Rob Butterfield. And in the State legislature, it's Byron Wear, Steve Baldwin, Carol Bentley, and our other great Republican candidates.

Consider for a moment the people you'll be sending to Washington tomorrow. Congress and the President are equal branches of government. When you vote for the Senate or for your local congressional seat, you're voting for the direction of the country and the world as much as when you vote for President. And since we have to ride two horses, Congress and the President, across every stream, shouldn't they both be going in the same direction? [Applause] Everyone on our ticket -- led by George Bush, Pete Wilson, and Rob Butterfield -- is going the same way.

Pete Wilson, George Bush, and I have been a team: The Three Musketeers -- one for all and all for the taxpayers and against the special interests. Now, you know, in Washington, Pete's been named ``Watchdog of the Treasury'' -- five times he's been named that. He's guarding it against liberals like his opponent. He'll work with the new President and not try to cut him off at the knees every chance he gets. Nancy and I cast our absentee ballots last week.

Last week a major national newspaper ran a story about one of our own liberal California Congressmen. In it, he spelled out to the reporter how he tells constituents he's for a strong defense, while voting for less defense, and how he opposed the death penalty amendment to the drug bill, but says he's for the death penalty when he's back home. And then he got down to business. Quoting now: ``He wants it understood that a President Bush would get no quarter from him. Any budget proposal will have to include higher taxes, he says, whether a President likes it or not. `Otherwise, we're going to go after him.''' Well, if you ask me, it's time we went after them, and some of the people to do it are Bill Lowery, Ron Packard, Duncan Hunter, and Rob Butterfield.

We must not forget what we're up against, but we all must never forget what we're for. A poet once wrote: ``I have fallen in love with American names,'' and Americans love no name better than the name of freedom. Well, in this campaign, and so many others, I've heard America singing, and its song is freedom. You can hear it in the shipyards near here, as men and women go to work. You can hear it in offices, factories, schools, and stores all over our land. You can hear it when a young man or woman dreams of striking out alone and becoming part of the great boom in entrepreneurship that has created virtually all of the new jobs in America in recent years: 84 -- or 80.4 million new jobs in these several years. You can hear it in the prayers from every church, synagogue, temple, and mosque in our land. Yes, ``one nation, under God, indivisible'' -- all in the name of glorious freedom.

You know, some years ago two friends of mine were talking with a Cuban refugee who had escaped from Castro. In the midst of the tale of horrible experiences, one friend turned to the other and said, ``We don't know how lucky we are.'' And the Cuban stopped and said, ``How lucky you are? I had someplace to escape to.'' Well, let's keep it that way.

Adams once said that: ``The way to secure liberty is to place it in the people's hands. . . .'' And that's what America is: we, the people, holding liberty in our hands. This year I did something I thought that no American President would ever have an opportunity to do. There in the Lenin Hills, at Moscow State University -- no TEEK chapter there -- [laughter] -- I addressed Soviet students, spoke to them, and my speech was about the wonder and glory of human and individual freedom. Now, think of those students. Only if they're very lucky and rise high in the Communist Party will any one of them ever have the influence that each American has just by walking into the voting booth.

The President. The same thing I'm asking you I've asked our country this year. Eight years ago, America said it's time for a change. Well, we've heard some talk like that in this campaign. Well, we are the change. Won't you stand by the change? We started it 8 years ago. Stand by the Republican ticket, and I don't mind if you stand by me.

So, now we come to the end of this last campaign, and I just hope that Nelle and Jack are looking down on us right now and nodding their heads and saying their kid did them proud. And I hope that someday your children and grandchildren will tell of the time that a certain President came to town at the end of a long journey and asked their parents and grandparents to join him in setting America on the course to the new millenium, and that a century of peace, prosperity, opportunity, and hope had followed. So, if I could ask you just one last time: Tomorrow, when mountains greet the dawn, would you go out there and win one for the Gipper?

The funds authorized by the Act support a number of major Federal programs to assist the homeless. The Federal Emergency Management Agency's Emergency Food and Shelter Program funds the work of nonprofit organizations and local governments in providing shelter, food, and supportive services for the homeless. The Department of Housing and Urban Development's Emergency Shelter Grants Program provides funds to State and local governments for renovation of buildings for use as emergency shelters and for shelter operation. The Department's Supportive Housing Demonstration Program of grants for development of innovative approaches to providing transitional housing for homeless families with children and persons with physical or mental disabilities also will continue.

Act authorizes funds for a program of particular importance that serves both the medical needs of the homeless and the national objective of a drug-free America -- the Department of Health and Human Services' Primary Health and Substance Abuse Services Program of grants to public or private nonprofit organizations for health and substance abuse services for the homeless.

Act expands the scope of the path-breaking Job Training Partnership Act in which the private and public sectors cooperate to assist individuals in developing marketable skills that bring economic independence. This expansion of the Job Training Partnership Act should be administered in coordination with the work arrangements of the Family Support Act of 1988 that I signed last month.

Those provisions in this Act that purport to require the heads of departments and agencies to submit legislation or recommendations to the Congress must be implemented in a manner consistent with the constitutional authority and duty of the President to recommend to the Congress from time to time ``such measures as he shall judge necessary and expedient.'' Also, ensuring orderly and effective representation of the interests of the United States in the courts will require implementation of section 1045 of the Act, which relates to legal representation for the Secretary of Agriculture, in a manner consistent with the authorities and duties of the Attorney General.

Craniofacial conditions of some kind affect approximately 465,000 people in the United States each year. Hereditary and congenital conditions such as Down Syndrome and cleft lip and palate are the leading reasons for facial disfigurement. Hundreds of thousands of others suffer facial disfigurement from cancer. Advanced medical technology can save people who might otherwise die from accidents or burns, but their faces remain affected. People with craniofacial conditions often experience emotional isolation and rejection and live in seclusion from society.

Now, various foundations and institutions are addressing their needs. They have begun to fund programs for research and education regarding craniofacial conditions, to initiate the funding of surgical and nonsurgical treatment for people from our country and around the world, and to seek people who can be helped.

Mutual support organizations now forming are dedicated to helping the facially disfigured, their families, and the professionals who care for them. Through newsletters and computer linkages, people throughout our Nation offer shared experiences and resources for recovery. These praiseworthy mutual support groups encourage people to esteem the person behind every face.

Because of the difficulties of looking ``different,'' it is important that the public understand the exceptional challenges confronting people with craniofacial conditions. Personal and community outreach efforts to befriend and assist these people deserve our cooperation, participation, and recognition.

Craniofacial Awareness Week. I call upon the people of the United States and concerned organizations to observe that week with appropriate programs, ceremonies, and activities that foster awareness about craniofacial conditions and the continuing efforts to lessen the suffering of people afflicted.

Board. There is established, a board of three members to be appointed by the President to investigate this dispute. No member shall be pecuniarily or otherwise interested in any organization of railroad employees or any carrier. The board shall perform its functions subject to the availability of funds.

Nancy and I congratulate George Bush and Dan Quayle on their historic victory. Their mandate will continue the changes that create jobs, prosperity, and peace for all Americans. This has been a long and vigorous campaign. Now we must pull together and help the Vice President accomplish the goals he has laid out for the Bush administration. I look forward to working with George and his team on a smooth transition.

The requirement for the General Services Administration to obtain the approval of the Public Works and Transportation Committee of the House of Representatives in exercising the authority granted by Section 2 to lease office space is unconstitutional. In granting authority by law the Congress may not reserve to its committees approval or veto power over the exercise of that authority. The reservation of such power to congressional committees clearly conflicts with the constitutional principles the Supreme Court enunciated in INS v. Chadha, 462 U.S. 919 (1983). Moreover, the legislative history of the Section indicates that the committee approval requirement is not severable from the grant of leasing authority to the General Services Administration. Accordingly, the General Services Administration may not exercise the discretionary authority that Section 2 purports to grant.

The bill would create a substantial amount of unnecessary and complex Federal bureaucracy that would hamper the achievement of the bill's goals. Under the bill, the Secretary of Agriculture and the Secretary of Health and Human Services, acting jointly, would bear responsibility for nutrition information collection and analysis, planning for research and grants, and government-wide nutrition program budgeting. The bill also would create an Administrator of Nutrition Monitoring and Related Research, an Interagency Board for Nutrition Monitoring and Related Research, and a Nutrition Monitoring Advisory Council.

The bill would impose a substantial new burden on the American taxpayer in future years to pay for Federal Government grants. First, the bill would require the Secretaries, acting jointly, to develop a comprehensive plan for a coordinated nutrition program. Then it specifies that the program must include at least two new programs of Federal grants, under which the Federal Government would make awards of taxpayers' dollars. The bill then further specifies that the comprehensive plan shall ``constitute the basis on which each agency participating in the coordinated program requests authorizations and appropriations for nutrition monitoring and related research.'' Thus, the bill would effectively program substantial new grant funding into future Federal budgets.

Experience shows that once the Federal Government begins handing out money under a new grant program, a political constituency develops that demands greater funding for that program. Greater scrutiny should be given to the need for the proposed new grant programs before they are locked in as a future expansion of the Federal budget, especially given the likely urgent future needs in other areas of the Federal budget.

My decision not to approve this bill is based on the following reasons. First, the bill would unnecessarily restrict the form of the race question in future censuses. Second, it would require the Census Bureau to use a form of race question that the Bureau has tested and found to be less accurate than the one it plans to use in 1990. Third, it would specifically require questions relating to plumbing facilities and heating and cooling equipment in housing units that would not produce data sufficiently useful to justify their inclusion. Adequate data on plumbing and heating will continue to be available through the census and other sources. Finally, these changes would increase administrative costs and add to the paperwork burden imposed on the public by the census.

There are always more questions proposed for the census than can be accommodated. The Administration has proposed a questionnaire that represents a careful and reasonable balancing between the Nation's need for information and the reporting burden the census places on respondents.

The meeting came a day after the American people have freely decided who will govern our country. This is the same right for which the valiant Afghan freedom fighters have been struggling over the past 9 years.

History records the efforts of many different nations and empires to subjugate the Afghans. In the end, none has succeeded. So it is today that we see this valiant nation struggling for its freedom, which is now closer than any time in the past decade.

We are disappointed by recent Soviet statements indicating that Soviet troop withdrawal has been suspended. We expect the Soviet Union to honor its pledge to withdraw all of its troops from Afghanistan by February 15, 1989.

Meanwhile, the Soviets' launching of extensive bombing raids against the Mujahidin, using their latest high performance aircraft and long-range missiles for the first time in this war, call into question Moscow's commitment not to launch offensive operations in Afghanistan. We find these developments disturbing. Moreover, they are futile. These steps will not intimidate either the freedom fighters or their Pakistani friends, who have our unshakable support in the face of continued Soviet pressure.

The fight of the Afghan people to regain and to preserve their freedom has provided a lesson for free people around the world. The commitment of the American Government and people to the Afghan people's cause is not new, and it will not waver. It will continue so long as the Afghan people require it to regain their freedom.

Actually, though, I have some figures here that I thought you and the rest of the country might be interested in. According to my calculations, it's only 1,188 days to the Iowa caucus. [Laughter] Now, I think the country has heard quite enough political speechmaking from all of us in the past few months, so I just want to make one or two simple but heartfelt points.

First I want you to know, Mr. President-elect and Mr. Vice President-elect, how proud I am of both of you of the extraordinary perseverance and character and grit that you've shown in this difficult year. And I think, too, your worthy opponents would agree what a challenge to human endurance the Presidential campaign has become. So, I want to congratulate both of you, as well as Governor Dukakis and Senator Bentsen, in taking on the great challenge, and your sense of public duty in seeing it through to the end. Each of you is better for it, and so is the country.

Now in this hard-fought campaign, George and Dan, I also want to complement you for going to the people on the issues and asking for a mandate on critical matters like the taxing and spending power, the nature of judicial appointments, the strength of our defenses, and the firmness of our foreign policy. I think that mandate has been unmistakably delivered, and I know in carrying it out you will be true to your promises and faithful to the people's wishes.

George Bush and Dan Quayle, I feel our achievements are secure, our change now a permanent feature of American government. But I also believe your mandate will make it possible not just to continue but to build upon the achievements of the past 8 years. This is not the end of an era but a time to refresh and strengthen our new beginning. In fact, to those who sometimes flatter me with talk of a Reagan revolution, today my hope is this: You ain't seen nothin' yet.

And finally, let me say that despite the long months of campaigning, the seemingly endless controversy, and the sheer human exhaustion of it all, choosing our leaders is, after all, a decision critical to our own future, to the future of this much-loved nation, and to the cause of human freedom. And that's why today Americans of every political persuasion and background can come together as one. Even as we accept the verdict of the majority, and pledge to protect always the rights of the minority, we've put behind us the divisions and controversies of the immediate past and begin anew. So, it's a day for congratulations, yes, but it's also a day for remembering that whatever may temporarily divide us is far outweighed by that which unites us. America has much to be proud of today. Pledges of a new President and a new Vice President, and pledges of support from the loyal opposition, Republican, Democrat, independent -- today we're one nation, one people, and our national treasure, our national mission -- the cause of human freedom -- continues to prosper and light the world.

President. And all I will say just in the shadow of the office that you ennobled: We're very, very grateful to you. I don't believe there's a case in modern Presidential politics where a President has worked so hard to help someone else achieve this office. And I will always be grateful. I can hardly believe it, but it's sinking in now, the enormity of what has taken place -- peaceful election, eventually a peaceful transfer of power. And I just think for all the Bush family, and I expect I speak for Marilyn and Dan on this one, we are grateful to you and to Nancy for going that extra mile. I really believe that the results would have been entirely different if we hadn't had this loyal, steadfast campaign support. And I know they would if I hadn't learned from a giant the good things about the United States of America. Thank you, sir.

President-elect, yesterday the American people overwhelmingly placed their trust and their confidence in your leadership. And I'm delighted to be a part of that team, ready to go to work and to continue to change America and make it even greater. Thank you both very, very much.

I am pleased to announce that Chief of Staff Ken Duberstein will serve as transition coordinator for my administration's team that will assist in the smooth transfer of power to the next Presidency. Ken will be assisted in this important task by Colin Powell, M.B. Oglesby, A.B. Culvahouse, John Tuck, and Danny Crippen. We will work closely with the President-elect Bush and his team to ensure that the transition is handled efficiently and effectively.

Since my report of April 29, 1988, fewer than 50 applications for licenses have been received with respect to Nicaragua, and the majority of these applications have been granted. Of the licenses issued in this period, most either authorized exports for humanitarian purposes, covering medical supplies and animal vaccines, or extended authorizations previously given to acquire intellectual property protection under Nicaraguan law. (Donations of medicine are exempt from the prohibition on exports to Nicaragua, while commercial exports of medicine and medical supplies are authorized by general license.

Donations of medical supplies, on the other hand, must be authorized by specific license.) Certain licenses authorized the exportation of equipment to La Prensa, an opposition publication that had been shut down by the Sandinista regime for a period of time and has since resumed operations. Similar licenses have also been issued for other opposition press groups. Also, supplies have been licensed for export to certain vocational schools sponsored by labor groups in Nicaragua. In addition, during August, a license was issued to the U.S. Agency for International Development for the exportation by certain U.S. private voluntary organizations and international relief organizations of humanitarian aid for medical care and other relief for children who are the victims of Nicaraguan civil strife, pursuant to Public Law No. 100 - 276.

Since my last report, the Department of the Treasury completed the following enforcement actions: (a) Four principals of a U.S. aircraft company pleaded guilty to charges of conspiracy to export aircraft parts to Nicaragua in a case brought in the United States District Court for the Southern District of Florida. Two of the persons were sentenced to jail terms of 15 and 13 months each, while the other two defendants received sentences of probation and performance of community service, respectively. The company was ordered to pay a $1,000 fine.

Court for the Southern District of Texas by an organization and certain individuals seeking to donate food, medicine, clothing, vehicles, and other items to Nicaragua. Under the International Emergency Economic Powers Act, articles such as food, clothing, and medicine, intended to be used to relieve human suffering, are exempt from export prohibitions. The Government took the position that vehicles, such as passenger cars, trucks, and buses, are fit for a variety of uses and thus do not automatically fall within the exempt category for food, medicine, clothing, and other articles whose intended use is confined to the relief of human suffering. Consequently, Treasury would not permit the transfer of the vehicles to groups in Nicaragua without a specific license. The trial court rejected the Government's position and on September 29, 1988, issued a judgment declaring that the President has no authority to regulate or prohibit, directly or indirectly, donations to an embargoed country of articles that the donor intends to be used to relieve human suffering and that can reasonably be expected to serve that end. The Government is now considering an appeal to the United States Court of Appeals for the Fifth Circuit.

The expenses incurred by the Federal Government in the period from May 1, 1988, through November 1, 1988, that are directly attributable to the exercise of powers and authorities conferred by the declaration of the Nicaraguan national emergency are estimated at $233,975, all of which represents wage and salary costs for Federal personnel. Personnel costs were largely centered in the Department of the Treasury (particularly in the Customs Service, as well as in FAC and the Office of the General Counsel), with expenses also incurred by the Department of State and the National Security Council staff.

Good afternoon. We award the Medal of Freedom, this nation's highest civilian honor, for the purpose of celebrating those whose lives have been dedicated to the cause of freedom -- nurturing it where it's young, defending it where it's grown frayed or troubled, and battling for it where it's denied. Over the past 8 years, we've honored 83 of you, and of you it can be said: They lived well because they fought for freedom.

Now, that's why it is such an honor to have you all here today, and why we yet mourn those of your fellows who've gone to a better place. The world is made smaller and more insignificant by their absence. All of you, with us or elsewhere, have justly earned the gratitude of all Americans of good will for being champions and defenders of the cause of freedom.

No, my friends, despite the millions upon millions of words expended to describe its meaning, the truth is that the word ``freedom'' is deceptively simple. It's a word that describes the God-given condition of the human soul.

For what we know is this: God created us free, just as he created us man and woman. Indeed, since Adam ate of the Tree of Knowledge, there's nothing that defines us human beings so much as the fact that we're free.

Some people say Americans take our freedom for granted. I think that may be the most glorious gift of all. The Constitution we have makes it possible for all Americans to assume that political freedom is their birthright from the moment they open their eyes. What you've all done, what you've all made clear to us, is that we cannot be content with our own freedom. No, we must bring it to others, must make it their birthright as well.

There are people who try to will freedom away. They try to legislate it away. Worse yet, they even go so far as to deny the validity of certain segments of our freedom -- as, for example, those people who believe human beings are free until they step into the marketplace, at which point they should be subject to full or partial state control. We call this idea socialism. Socialists believe humankind would be better off without economic freedom, and so they seek to replace it with rules and regulations. And if there's one tragic lesson the 20th century has taught us, it is that the social engineers cannot tailor the human soul to fit the fashions of the present day, no matter how they try. For the truth is, men cannot design humankind.

The world has come to acknowledge that socialism is a failed ideology. But there are worse. From the dawn of time, but especially from the dawn of a dark day in November 1917, there have also been those who have tried to throttle freedom.

But the ungodly force called tyranny still cannot rid the human soul of its freedom, no matter how hard it may try. Tyrants can defy the benefits -- or deny the benefits, I should say -- of freedom to their peoples, can kill freedom by killing free people. But freedom itself they cannot have. For one thing, people like you won't allow it. Nor will that Higher Being allow it.

Like the Nation itself that has nurtured us and made us all whole, you have chosen life, and you've given others the courage to choose life as well. In a society like ours, where all men are created equal, the best a human being can hope to achieve is to make himself or herself an example to clear a path to righteousness that others may follow. This you've done. And because of you, oppressed peoples now breathe free. Because of you, the hopeless now have hope. And it's because of people like you and the Nation we live in that, I believe, with all my heart, as I told an audience at Georgetown University not long ago, we are living in a time that will come to be known as the age of freedom.

We should especially recognize the heroism and unwavering purpose of those who took part in the battles and campaigns of the China-Burma-India Theater of Operations, scene of some of the most intense fighting during the war.

Each year, fires claim some 6,000 lives in our country and destroy property worth $10 billion. The toll would be much higher were it not for the skilled and dedicated individuals who are our Nation's firefighters. These Americans, our friends and neighbors, confront danger every day as they protect our lives, homes, and communities. They exemplify the very best in the American spirit. On National Firefighters Day, 1988, and all year long, we owe municipal, volunteer, and all other firefighters our heartfelt thanks, our utmost respect, and our thorough cooperation in their fire prevention, rescue, and safety efforts.

Last year, 127 firefighters gave their lives in the line of duty. Let us pause in solemn and prayerful remembrance of these fallen heroes and of all firefighters who have given their lives through the years. Let us also be sure to extend our support and sympathy to their brave families.

From the days of firefighters' hand-drawn rigs in the 18th century to those of 19th-century horse-drawn engines, and on to today's modern fire and rescue vehicles, Americans young and old have thrilled, during many a parade on many a Main Street or Maple Avenue throughout our land, to colorful and exciting displays of powerful firefighting equipment. But we have thrilled even more in understanding and appreciation of firefighters' critical mission and their indispensable spirit of courage, service, and sacrifice. May such recognition always inspire us to salute and thank America's firefighters for all they do for each of us.

Those who live today remember those who do not. Those who know freedom remember today those who gave up life for freedom. Today, in honor of the dead, we conduct ceremonies. We lay wreaths. We speak words of tribute. And in our memories, in our hearts, we hold them close to us still. Yet we also know, even as their families knew when they last looked upon them, that they can never be fully ours again, that they belong now to God and to that for which they so selflessly made a final and eternal act of devotion.

For all time, they are what we can only aspire to be: giving, unselfish, the epitome of human love -- to lay down one's life so that others might live. We think on their lives. We think on their final moments. In our mind's eye, we see young Americans in a European forest or on an Asian island or at sea or in aerial combat. And as life expired, we know that those who could had last thoughts of us and of their love for us. As they thought of us then, so, too, we think of them now, with love, with devotion, and with faith: the certainty that what they died for was worthy of their sacrifice -- faith, too, in God and in the Nation that has pledged itself to His work and to the dream of human freedom, and a nation, too, that today and always pledges itself to their eternal memory.

I guess I don't need to tell you I think the United States of America did itself proud with the selection of George Bush as the 41st President of the United States and Dan Quayle as his Vice President. George Bush has gotten his mandate from the American people, the mandate to continue the policies that have brought peace and prosperity, to bring hope and opportunity to all Americans, and to expand the frontiers of freedom around the world.

You know, all year long people were saying it was time for a change. Well, by your choice this week, you proved we were right when we said we -- George Bush, Dan Quayle, and the Republican Party -- are the change. It began 8 years ago, and it's going to continue.

Only twice in our history -- during the dark days of our Civil War -- has anyone dared to question the wisdom of the American people as they chose their President, dared to deny the validity of the selection. In other nations, a disgruntled group of defeated politicians might try to stage a coup d'etat or might even follow our disastrous mistake from the 1860's and go to war -- brother against brother -- rather than consent to the will of the people. But here we Americans are, just 4 days after one of the most important nights in our history, working or playing or just enjoying our weekend. We've made our choice, and life goes on. We don't even need to give it a thought. But when we do, I think it's cause for us to wonder at our freedom.

We continue to enjoy our freedom because of those brave Americans among us who have legitimately taken up arms in the service of their country, protecting and defending the United States of America. This weekend, we commemorate America's veterans, those who did their duty so that we could be free and strong, so that tyranny could find no quarter, so that we could live in peace.

I think of the example of Staff Sergeant Carlos Stallard, one of the Gold Star men in World War II. In a 1944 letter to his parents, Carlos wrote: ``I believe in making that future a place where little children can go swimming and playing around their homes without being mangled for life from bursting bombs and flaming debris that was once their homes, so that they can have a mother's care instead of being left in some dark corner shivering with cold and dying with hunger and wondering if mother, in a concentration camp, is being cruelly beaten or if she is dead. That's what we are fighting for, and I would gladly give 10 lives if I had them.'' Well, like all of us, Carlos Stallard had but one life to give for his country. He died in action in France on July 26, 1944.

Every veteran in this country deserves our thanks and gratitude this weekend of all weekends. And, my friends, on this, the last Veterans Day I will commemorate as President, I would like to say that if there is one change George Bush and I made that touches me most profoundly it would probably be this: Once again our young men and women are proud to wear the uniform of their country -- Flight Lieutenant George Bush sure was.

The President. Yes, of course. Until it's completely eliminated, this type of political prisoner -- and we have had great success, and the General Secretary has been more cooperative than any Soviet leader before him. And I assume that we have these names that have been mentioned here.

The President. Well, I only know this thing -- that apparently -- that there has been an indication that they are willing to abide by [U.N. Security Council Resolution] 242 and hope it's true because then that would mean some progress, although I think there are many problems yet to be solved.

Well, good morning. In nearly 2 weeks, America will celebrate Thanksgiving, a time when the Nation looks back, takes stock, and gives thanks for the personal and economic freedoms with which Americans are blessed. As a nation, we have much to be thankful for. We've continued to enjoy the longest peacetime expansion in our nation's history. Real gross national product has risen by 26 percent since the recovery started 6 years ago. American industry is again the class of world class competition.

Today's ceremony reflects both the progress we've made and the promises that we have yet to keep. America's economic strength depends on industry's ability to improve productivity and quality and to remain on the cutting edge of technology. And that's why the Malcolm Baldrige National Quality Award is so important. The award recognizes the contribution that companies across the country are making to our economic growth -- companies that make the highest quality products.

And today we salute three corporations that reflect American industry's dedication to quality. Each of them, and thousands of others, help keep America strong by making American products the best products available. They and others like them exemplify the belief that quality counts first, foremost, and always. The one trait that characterizes these winners is that they realize that quality improvement is a neverending process, a companywide effort in which every worker plays a critical part. They realize that customer satisfaction through better quality is the goal. And they know that America's economic strength and future depend more and more upon the quality of its products.

This award was established and carried out in the spirit of cooperation between government and the private sector. And that's the way it should be. We owe a debt of gratitude to the foundation that helped support this award and the many private sector individuals, especially the examiners, who made the award possible through their own dedication to quality. And a word of thanks to Bill Verity and the Commerce Department's National Institute of Standards and Technology. They have worked very well with the private sector to ensure that this award truly sets a national standard.

This award has a special meaning for me because it's a fitting way to honor a good friend, Malcolm Baldrige, a dynamic businessman and a great Secretary of Commerce. Today we honor Mac with a lasting tribute to quality.

The President. You know, this is a real treat for me -- having you here and to have, in a little while, the chance to answer some of your questions. Let me also offer a special hello to those of you who are watching on C-SPAN and -- or the Instructional Television Network.

This marks the beginning of American Education Week, and I'm particularly pleased to be talking to American students in this, the first in a series of speeches that I'll be giving before I leave office. But before we begin here, I have a special message from my roommate. She says to please -- for your families, for your friends, for your country, and most of all for yourselves -- just say no to drugs.

Now, last week the United States did something so exceptional that people around the world marveled at it. Last week the American people freely elected our government. Some ballots were cast by people who were rich and famous, and others were cast by most ordinary people, but each person had the same, one vote. These ballots were cast in secret, and they were counted in the open, not the other way around. And when the votes were totaled, those holding or seeking the highest positions in the land all surrendered to the will of the people. Soon, power will be peacefully transferred from those leaving office to those taking office. And, yes, we do this every election year, and that's what so much of the world marvels at. What we in America take for granted is something that's rare in history and all too remarkable on this globe, the Earth.

United States is the world's oldest democratic government. And at my age, when I tell you something is the oldest in the world, you can take my word for it; I'm probably talking from personal experience. And it's not just that our government is the oldest of its kind, but that it's based on the world's most revolutionary political idea. You can see that concept in the very first line of our Constitution, and it begins with three simple words: ``We the People.'' In other countries, in their constitutions -- they all have constitutions, and I've read a great many of them, those other ones -- and the difference is so small, but it's found in those three words. Because their constitutions are documents by the Governments telling the people what they can do. And in our country, our Constitution is by the people, and it tells the Government what it can do. And only those things listed in the Constitution, and nothing else, can Government do. So, in America, it is the people who are in charge. And one day you'll be those people out there voting and creating the Government.

That vision of self-government was the basis for the American Revolution, the first revolution of its kind and one of the most important historic events not just for our own nation but for all humanity. Because most revolutions have always just been a case of replacing one set of rulers for another set of rulers. Ours was that kind of a constitution where, for the first time, it was announced -- what I've told you before already -- that the people were in charge of the Government, not the other way around.

Now, the Revolution may seem like something they say happened a long time ago -- to me 200 years seems just like yesterday -- but I think it'll prove to be America's most important guidepost for the future. I believe that the chief moral task for America in your generation -- a period destined for great change -- will be not so much to chart a new course or launch a new revolution, but to keep faith with the original American Revolution and that remarkable vision of freedom that has brought us two centuries of liberty and is still today transforming the world.

Over these 200 years, country after country has followed our path, and I believe that ultimately all nations will do so. It's no exaggeration to say that the political vision of our Founding Fathers has become the model for the world.

This is true not just in the many countries that have turned from despotism to democracy these last years, it's also true even where it's least apparent. It's remarkable to realize that in this century even brutal totalitarian dictatorships kneel at the feet of our Founding Fathers when they try to counterfeit the practices and institutions of democracy in order to claim legitimacy for their ruling their people. Dictators today from Afghanistan to Nicaragua do not want to be called Czar or Commissar; they want to be called Mr. President and to pretend that they rule in the people's name, even if they don't. Yes, even Communist dictators holding power through force, against the will of the people, acknowledge the triumph of the American idea when they go through the motions of holding phony elections, forming rubberstamp legislatures to ratify constitutions that will not be honored, and then using our words to call their regimes democracies or republics.

But when dictators, even in this fraudulent way, acknowledge the basic truth that the right to rule comes from the consent of the governed, the door to freedom begins to crack open, and it can't very easily be closed again. John Adams said that long before the opening shots of America's war for independence -- he was one of our Founding Fathers, as you know -- our revolution had already occurred ``in the hearts and minds of the people.'' And today from Asia to Africa to Latin America and behind the Iron Curtain, the world is in the midst of a democratic revolution that was foretold by the creation of the United States.

From the beginning, the American vision was that our country would be the cradle of freedom for all mankind. Two hundred and thirteen years ago, in Philadelphia, James Allen wrote in this diary that: ``If we fail, liberty no longer continues an inhabitant of this globe.'' But our Founding Fathers didn't fail.

And now it's our duty to bring the values of the American Revolution to all the peoples of the world, and this is happening. Today, to a degree never before seen in human history, one nation, the United States, has become the model to be followed and imitated by the rest of the world.

America's world leadership goes well beyond the tide toward democracy. We also find that more countries than ever before are following America's revolutionary economic message of free enterprise, low taxes, and open world trade. These days, whenever I see foreign leaders, they tell me about their plans for reducing taxes and other economic reforms that they're using, copying what we have done here in our country. I wonder if they realize that this vision of economic freedom -- the freedom to work, to create and produce, to own and use property without the interference of the state -- was central to the American Revolution when the American colonists rebelled against a whole web of economic restrictions, taxes, and barriers to free trade. The message at the Boston Tea Party -- have you studied yet in history about the Boston Tea Party, where, because of a tax, they went down and dumped the tea in the harbor? Well, that was America's original tax revolt.

But beyond politics and economics, we find that American culture has also spread around the world. Whether it's young people in Europe or Africa going to an Eddie Murphy movie or Japanese children visiting Mickey Mouse at the new Disneyland in Tokyo or the international jazz festivals or the American soft drinks and rock music and blue jeans that are the choice of young people from Berlin to Beijing, from Managua to Moscow, the fact is that an entire planet is watching and following us.

The same thing is true with science and technology. We lead the world in Nobel Prizes for science, and virtually all of the most important developments in computers, communications, and biotechnology have been made in the United States. And I can't be the only one who's noticed that the Soviet space shuttle that's supposed to go up at 10 p.m. tonight now -- if they can get it off -- it looks very familiar, an awful lot like ours. Other countries may try to copy what we do, but as the rate of progress accelerates, our leadership will become even greater. And these are the technologies that in your lifetime will change the way people all over the world live and change things for the better.

You know, I've seen remarkable technological change in my lifetime. Maybe I'm just going to date myself as belonging back with the dinosaurs or something when I tell you this, but just think, I can still remember my first ride in an automobile. Before cars, we went by horse and buggy. The horse was very fuel-efficient but kind of slow. And if you wanted to supercharge one, you fed him an extra bag of oats. But in pursuing your education, there is one thing I would like to pass along to you. We should always remember that there are the things that change and the things that don't change. The machines will change -- the horse and buggy to the automobile and so forth -- but the people don't.

I say, permanent. The basic values of faith and family will be just as true when people are living on distant planets as they are today. So, for America to gain greatest benefit from all the exciting new technologies that lie ahead, we will also need to reaffirm our traditional moral values, because these values are the foundation on which everything we do is built. So, yes, I would encourage you to study the math and science that are at the basis of the new technologies.

And, again, I would say that the most important thing you can do is to ground yourself in the ideas and values of the American Revolution. And that is a vision that goes beyond economics and politics. It's also a moral vision, grounded in the reverence and faith of those who believed that with God's help they could create a free and democratic nation. They designed a system of limited government that, in John Adams' words, was suited only to a religious people such as ours. Our Founding Fathers were the descendents of the Pilgrims -- men and women who came to America seeking freedom of worship -- who prospered here and offered a prayer of thanksgiving, something we've continued to do each year, and so that we'll do it again on Thursday of next week.

By renewing our commitment to the original values of the American Revolution and to the principles of ``We the People,'' we can best preserve our liberty and expand the progress of freedom in the world, which is the purpose for which America was founded. Here, on a continent nestled between two oceans, our country is unique in the world. We have drawn our people from virtually every other nation on Earth, and what we've created here as Americans has touched every corner of the globe.

Here in the White House there's a famous painting of the signing of the Declaration of Independence. And it shows many of the great men of that time assembled in Independence Hall in Philadelphia. But when you look closely at the painting, you see that some of the figures in the hall are just outlines, waiting to be filled in, the faces have not yet been drawn. You see, this great painting isn't finished. But what the people who gathered in Philadelphia two centuries ago set out to do is not yet finished, either. And that, I suppose, is why the painting is the way it is. America is not yet complete, and it's up to each one of us to help complete it. And each one of you can place yourself in that painting. You can become one of the those immortal figures by helping to build and renew America.

And we're entering one of the most exciting times in history, a time of unlimited possibilities, bounded only by the size of your imagination, the depth of your heart, and the character of your courage. More than two centuries of American history -- the contributions of the millions of people who have come before us have been given to us as our birthright. All we can do to earn what we've received is to dream large dreams, to live lives of kindness, and to keep faith with the unfinished vision of the greatness and wonder of America.

Now it's time for me to ask you for your questions, but first I'd like to ask you one: What are some of the things that you're proudest of and some of the things that are best about America? And maybe I can just take a couple of comments if someone has a comment to make.

And what you were talking about in your freedom is something that, for example, in one country, as I have been told, the Soviet Union -- when it comes time to graduate, government representatives come in and point out to the individuals where they will report to work after they have graduated. The Government tells you what you're going to do, not like ours, where we decide, each one of us, what we want to do and then set out to do it.

The President. Well, yes, I am already. And we have appropriated quite a sum of money for the drug battle. And we have actually gotten more convictions of drug peddlers and longer sentences for them than any other administration. And we have intercepted more drugs and planes and boats and trucks and cars that carry them than has ever been done before. But that isn't the answer to the drugs. They'll still -- with the borders we have and the coastlines -- they can still get drugs into our country. It has to begin with you, the young people. You have to decide no to drugs. In other words, if we can't keep all the drugs from reaching the customers, let's have the customers turn against the drugs. And that is really the answer. And there is some success in that. A few years ago, 1 out of 9 high school seniors had tried drugs. Today it's less than 1 out of 30. So, we're gaining on it.

My name is Yvette Ross, Jefferson Junior High School. I'm an eighth grade student. Mr. President, do you feel that in your two terms as President your administration has carried out the ideas of the Founding Fathers?

The President. Have we carried out the plan set by the Founding Fathers? I think we have subscribed to that. When we came into office, there were some things that we thought were very wrong, including the fact that there were more people unemployed, inflation was robbing the people of their earnings and their money, interest rates were high and all. And in these last several years, we have not only restored prosperity, but we have created almost 18\1/2\ million new jobs, added to those jobs that were already there so that unemployment is so far down that today of all the Americans, 16 years of age and up, to whatever age, that pool of people -- 62.7 percent of those people have jobs, are employed today. But also, more important than that, I think we have restored the belief in America's freedom and the obligation that we have to our country. I think there's more patriotism today.

The President. I could sum that up very briefly: the Federal deficit -- the fact that for over a half a century our government has been spending more money than it takes in. And we have a plan working now that is aimed at 1993, of bringing us down each year. Last year we reduced the deficit by around $70 billion, and this year we're aiming at about another 30 so forth. But that is the thing.

Now, you probably don't know what that means, but I'll explain very quickly if I can. The line-item veto -- the Congress when they have ways of putting in bills a number of things instead of just a bill to get one thing accomplished. And then with all these hidden things -- and some of them are appropriations, spending bills and so forth -- the President either has to veto the whole bill or let it become law. And sometimes they attach them to a bill that you just can't veto. Line-item veto is what I had as a Governor.

Forty-three Governors in the States have line-item veto. It means that you can go into that bill and pick out that single item that has nothing to do with the whole bill and veto that. And I think the President should have it, like the Governors do.

The President. No, I don't believe that it is that big a problem. You mean our Federal deficit? No, I think that with this thing we have going along -- yes, there will be a time when in the future, when government bonds come due and so forth -- whether it be the taxpayers at that time that are paying them off. But if we can get this plan we're working on into effect, that will come along gradually as those bonds come due. And that, I don't think, will be a great threat to our economy. Truth of the matter is, bad as our Federal debt is, it is much milder than many other countries as a percentage of our gross national product.

My name is Cameron Fitzhugh, and I'm from St. Agnes School in Alexandria, Virginia. I was wondering if you think that it's possible to decrease the national debt without raising the taxes of the public?

The President. I do. That's a big argument that's going on in government. And I definitely believe it is because one of the principal reasons that we were able to get the economy back on track and create those new jobs and all was we cut the taxes. We reduced them because, you see, the taxes can be such a penalty on people that there's no incentive for them to prosper and earn more and so forth because they have to give so much to the Government. And what we have found is that at the lower rates the Government gets more revenue. There are more people paying taxes because there are more people with jobs. And there are more people willing to earn more money because they get to keep a bigger share of it.

Mr. President, for past years, the educational opportunities for blacks and other minorities has not been -- there hasn't been a great deal of them. And I want to know, during your term in office, what have you done to increase those educational opportunities for us?

The President. Well, we have vastly increased the amount of Federal money that is going into education, although remember that education has always been in the province of the State and the local communities. So, the share of cost of education is not as great for the Federal Government, but we have increased it. We've increased the money that is available for scholarships and for workfare programs for students that have to work their way through, as I did, and also for loan funds for students.

I can assure you that, with regard to any hint of discrimination, we have done more than any other generation -- or administration, I should say, to punish those who attempt to discriminate and to make sure that the opportunities are equal for all. And one of the great things that our administration did when we came in here was immediately turn on to helping something that I think is historically wonderful in our country, and that is the Negro private colleges and universities. And in fact, we helped one of them out that was facing bankruptcy, and bailed it out so that now they are proceeding in a better situation than they've had in the past. But those opportunities are there.

The President. Yes, I think the new frontier in the whole world is out there in space. And we've made such progress in it, and it has proved so rewarding. This isn't talked about much, and many of you probably don't realize that experiments conducted on the shuttle when they're up there in space -- on all kinds of things that had nothing to do with space -- have brought benefits to us back here. Firemen, for example -- a fireproof fabric has changed and made their fireproof garments that they have to wear in battling a fire much lighter -- and that they can do that. Medicines -- certain medicines in which only up in the gravity-free space can they achieve certain mixtures. And they've come up with things that have been beneficial in that way. So, this is very important that we continue to do this.

The President. Gun ban? Well, I think there has to be some control. But I thought that in California we had a system that probably was the best. I have never felt that we should, for the law-abiding citizens, take the gun away from them and make it impossible to have one. I think the wrong people will always find a way to get one. But what we had was -- even if today when I go back to California, if I want a gun and go in a store to buy a gun, I have to give them the money, but I have to wait a week, no matter who I am. I have to wait a week and come back then to get the gun, because in that week, my name is presented to investigative element there in the State that checks to make sure that I have no criminal record, that I have no record of mental problems or anything of the kind. Then, and only then, can you pick up the gun and take it with you.

But if I could, I know we're running out of time, but let me just tell you something that -- I got the strangest letter when I was Governor. There was talk about having a gun ban in California. It didn't go through.

The President. Well, I don't have very much of a quarrel with the very cheap weapon and so forth that makes it so easy for the wrong people to have a gun. I would like to see us concentrate on what I described in California: of making sure that anyone who buys a gun is a responsible citizen and not bent on crime.

The President. I don't know, but believe me, I'm certainly not against it. I have a feeling, though, that probably the first thing that'll happen is there will be a woman Vice President; and then that will kind of open a door to that. But I have no quarrel with women being President at all.

As a matter of fact, the statesman in the world that I have met that I respect the most is the Prime Minister of England, Margaret Thatcher; and she's done a remarkable job for England. But I guess it takes a little getting used to on the part of some people. But I think it's inevitable that in this country there will be a woman President because they've come up in so many different fields. But it's just my feeling that probably, rather than one of them just entering the fray to run for President to begin with, that maybe it probably would start with one of them -- as we did in the election in 1984, have one running for Vice President. She didn't make it, but that might be the start of it, and I'd welcome it.

I just want to tell you one little added thing about our country, and then I leave. This, again, is a letter I received not too long ago from a man, who wrote and told me this: He said, ``You can go to France to live in France, but you cannot become a Frenchman. You can go to live in Germany or Japan; you cannot become a German or a Japanese, or a Turk, or Greece a Greek. But the one place in the world,'' he said, ``where anyone from any corner of the world can come: America -- come to live and become an American.'' And no other country has that but ours. This continent, I've always believed, must have been put here for a purpose, between the two great oceans, because it had to be found by people who were dissatisfied with the lack of freedom or religious persecution or whatever in their own countries and came and melded together in this great melting pot and created the United States of America.

The President. I have just completed a highly useful and productive discussion with Chancellor Kohl, on this, the sixth anniversary of his first visit to the White House as Chancellor of the Federal Republic of Germany. The many conversations we've had together demonstrate not only the close ties that exist between the Federal Republic of Germany and the United States but the warm personal relationship that has developed between us. Chancellor Kohl is a close friend of the United States. His views are greatly valued, and his commitment and personal efforts to strengthen German-American ties have made an enormous difference in the relationship between the United States and West Germany.

Chancellor briefed me on his recent visit to Moscow. We agreed that important progress has been made in East-West relations, but that much still remains to be done in arms control, in ending regional conflicts, and with respect to human rights. We also noted that the Vienna Conference on Security and Cooperation in Europe, which is entering its final stage, required a balanced and substantive outcome.

I reaffirmed the strong American commitment to Berlin and underscored our determination to pursue the Berlin initiative I first outlined in June of 1987 when I spoke at the Berlin Wall. That divided city of Berlin remains a powerful symbol of a divided Europe and a litmus test of East-West relations.

We reviewed the positive state of the NATO alliance. While seeking security and stability at lower levels of armaments, the United States and West Germany, together with our allies, will ensure that our conventional and nuclear forces are kept up to date. We also agreed that, for the foreseeable future, there is no viable alternative to NATO's defense strategy of deterrence based on flexible response and a forward defense. The Chancellor voiced support for an international conference on chemical weapons, and we reaffirmed our common goal of negotiating a global ban on these terrible weapons.

West Germany and the United States continue to seek ways to share early the risks, burdens, and responsibilities, as well as the benefits, of our common defense. We reviewed the difficulties each country faces in doing more, but pledged we would each do our fair share. In this regard, I paid special tribute to the German people for the sacrifices they bear on the front line of freedom, which is also America's front line of defense, and reiterated my condolences for the victims of the tragedy at the Ramstein air show last August.

We also revised trade and economic -- reviewed, I should say, trade and economic issues. Both the Chancellor and I expressed satisfaction with the present state of the world economy. I congratulated the Chancellor on the decision of the European Community member states to take major steps toward closer economic integration by the end of 1992 and expressed our concern that this be done in a manner that promotes fair trade internationally. We agreed that trade protectionism must be avoided and reiterated our support for an amicable resolution of the U.S. and European Community trade issues and for real progress during the midterm review of the Uruguay round trade negotiations. I'll have something more to say on that point later in the week.

Helmut, this marks my last meeting as President with you. Six years ago, we stood together as I announced the formation of a Presidential Commission to commemorate the tricentennial of the first German settlement in the United States. Six years to the day, I'm proud to announce a product of that commission: the dedication of a garden here in Washington as a symbol of the friendship between our two countries. In a few months, I'll be leaving the White House. But the garden -- and all it represents -- will remain, to be nurtured and sustained by the friendship between Germans and Americans and by the leadership that you have provided. I'm asking Charles Wick, the Director of the U.S. Information Agency, to represent me today at the dedication of the German-American Friendship Garden.

Helmut, I hope you will convey to the German people my personal thanks for their prayers and support over the past 8 years. And let me just add a final personal word to you for your friendship and counsel. Thank you, Helmut, and may God bless you, and may God bless our two great nations.

President, for the warm words of friendship which you have found for my country. The friendship between the United States of America and the Federal Republic of Germany is of existential importance to our country. It has always been that way, and it will remain so in future. It was the idea of freedom which brought us together, and today, more than ever, we know how important it is to stand together to defend our freedom and unity.

Ron, you already mentioned this. Today I met with you for the last time during your term of office. For 6 years, we have worked together excellently. Our meetings have always been meetings between friends. And I would like to thank you from all my heart for this personal contact and personal friendship which we have, for the exchange of experiences and views which we had, and also for the friendship which the elder statesmen gave to the younger statesmen. During our respective terms of office, the relations between Bonn and Washington have become ever closer. And one of the hallmarks of this cooperation has been the fair and open consultation about all matters interesting us over all these years.

Let me cite as an example the alliance consultations parallel to the U.S.-Soviet INF negotiations. They were absolutely crucial to the success of the negotiations. I should also, of course, like to thank you, Mr. President, for your bold and resolute commitment to improving East-West relations. Any kind of worsening of the situation between East and West will be felt like an earthquake in our country, in the Federal Republic of Germany, and of course, first of all in Berlin. I should like to thank you very much also for the sympathy and the interest which you have always shown to us and to the interests of our country, which is a divided country, of course. And your speech very near to the Berlin Wall, at the Brandenburg Gate, is unforgettable to all of us. This wasn't only just a speech but it showed a very personal commitment to the cause of Berlin.

And during your two visits to the Federal Republic of Germany, you have always also raised the issue of human contacts between the United States and the Federal Republic of Germany, and you also paid particular tribute to the contributions which those citizens of the United States of German origin have made to this country. And you've pointed out that these people sort of have had built a human bridge between our two countries.

And today, dear Ron, as you also pointed out, the German-American Friendship Garden is being opened not far from here in Washington. And if Charles Wick and Ambassador Ruhfus go there on our behalf, representing us to inaugurate and open up this Friendship Garden, I think this is a show of friendship and of solidarity which will have validity for the future. And I should like to thank all of those who were involved in making this sign of our friendship and solidarity possible here in the city of Washington.

These have been good years. I think that both of us have paved the way for development which will be pursued by your successor in office. And I should, at the end of my remarks, mention one important example. I should like to mention the agreement and the commitment which we have made to exchange young people, students, but also other young people who travel from your country to our country and from our country to your country. That is to say, we try to plant young trees so that a strong forest may grow, which serves as a shade for all of us.

Currently, the major focus of licensing activity for FAC relates to the importation of certain non-fungible Iranian-origin goods, principally carpets, which were located outside Iran before the embargo was imposed, and where no payment or benefit accrued to Iran after the effective date of the embargo.

Of that total, 284 have been awards in favor of American claimants: 170 of these were awards on agreed terms, authorizing and approving payment of settlements negotiated by the parties, and 114 were decisions adjudicated on the merits.

These decisions will help in establishing guidelines for the adjudication or settlement of similar small claims. To date, American claimants have also received 46 awards on agreed terms reflecting settlements of claims under $250,000.

Since my last report, the three Tribunal Chambers have selected 82 small claims for active arbitration, bringing the total number of small claims currently under active Tribunal consideration to 214. The Tribunal's small claims docket will be maintained at approximately 225 active cases. This represents a significantly increased commitment of Tribunal resources to small claims.

In coordination with concerned Government agencies, the Department of State continues to present United States Government claims against Iran, as well as responses by the United States Government to claims brought against it by Iran. Since my last report, the Department has filed pleadings in nine government-to-government claims, while three claims have been settled; of these, one settlement resulted in a payment of $18.85 million to the Commodity Credit Corporation of the U.S.

Iran's claim in Case No. B/1, Claim 5 for damages for allegedly defective helicopters sold by the United States to Iran under the Foreign Military Sales Program. The Tribunal found that the United States could not be found liable for breach of warranty or any other contractual obligation or latent defect.

August 31, 1988, the Tribunal issued a partial award in Case No. B/1, Claim 4. The Tribunal held that the United States has no obligation under the Algiers Accords to return to Iran certain Iranian-titled military equipment, as the Algiers Accords make the return to Iranian property subject to U.S. law, and return of the property at issue was barred by the Arms Export Control Act. The Tribunal found that Iran is entitled to the monetary value of the equipment, which is to be determined in subsequent proceedings.

It is important that we acknowledge their countless contributions, sacrifices, and achievements because they participated in one of the most heroic chapters in our nation's history. Just as they stood with their brothers in Pleiku and Cu Chi, just as they died with them at Chu Lai and Qui Nhon, women have earned the right to stand for all time in a place of honor at the Vietnam Veterans Memorial.

The President. Prime Minister Thatcher, here is a story from our Old West. It's said that a cowboy went out riding one day and suddenly stumbled into the Grand Canyon. And he's supposed to have said, ``Wow, something sure has happened here!'' [Laughter] Well, Prime Minister Thatcher, when we contemplate the world as it is today and how it was when we first met here 8 years ago, we too have a right to say: Something sure has happened.

When we first met on these grounds in 1981, economic crisis beset both our countries: Inflation and unemployment were reaching dangerously disruptive levels. The aggressive designs of squalid dictators, large and small, were seen everywhere. Totalitarian expansion was underway on four continents. Terrorism was growing. And in the face of the most massive arms buildup in human history, our own defenses had fallen into disrepair and decline. A new nuclear missile was aimed at Europe and Asia. There was talk of unilateral cutbacks and American withdrawals and nuclear freezes and questions about the alliance. Our alliance, the great alliance built with such difficulty and daring since the last world war, was in grave danger. All of these problems spoke to an even deeper crisis: a crisis of faith, a crisis of will among the democracies. Here in our own nation, there were those who questioned whether our democratic institutions could survive, whether the modern world had made them obsolete.

Well, now it's changed. Now the excitement and vigor and energy in the world is with the cause of freedom. As the United States and Great Britain and other free nations have prospered, we have seen an almost Newtonian revolution in the science of economics. We are learning that the way to prosperity is not more bureaucracy and redistribution of wealth but less government and more freedom for the entrepreneur and for the creativity of the individual.

Change, extraordinary change has come upon the world. And that's why at this moment, Prime Minister Thatcher, we're especially glad to be welcoming you here to our shores and to have this opportunity to acknowledge the special role that you and the people of Great Britain have made in achieving this remarkable change.

It was my privilege, last June, shortly after my return from Moscow, to note in a speech at Guildhall your extraordinary role in the revitalization of freedom. Today, in welcoming you to these shores, I and the American people again restate our gratitude. In the critical hour, Margaret Thatcher and the people of Great Britain stood fast in freedom's defense and upheld all the noblest of your island nation's traditions; yours was the part of courage and resolve and vision.

Bismarck reflected once that the supreme fact of the 19th century was that Great Britain and the United States shared the same language. And surely future historians will note that a supreme fact of this century was that Great Britain and the United States shared the same cause: the cause of human freedom. And together we've come a long way in striving for that cause. Even in the terrible disappointment following the last world war, when we realized all we had striven for in that great conflict -- world peace and freedom -- would once again elude us and that we would have to begin again and stand together again in facing the menace of war and totalitarian tyranny, even then we did not lose heart.

And stand together we have. When first you were here, Prime Minister Thatcher, we referred to a ``decade fraught with danger.'' We can hope today that in meeting those dangers we have transformed this decade into a turning point, a turning point for our age and for all time.

In continuing this work, it is profoundly reassuring to me and to all who care about freedom that you will continue to share with America your vision and your steady hand. And this is especially critical to us at this moment of transition in our government.

The Prime Minister. Mr. President, may I thank you most warmly for those kind words of welcome and for this marvelous ceremony, which I shall never forget. It is a great honor to be your last official guest after 8 historic years of your Presidency, one of the greatest in America's history. It's an opportunity to affirm anew the deep friendships not only between ourselves but between the British and American peoples, an opportunity to salute all that you have accomplished over these 8 years on behalf of this great nation and of free people everywhere, and an opportunity to look ahead to the bright promise of the future.

President, when you welcomed me to the White House on my first official visit to Washington under your Presidency, you forecast two things: first, that the decade would be less dangerous if the West maintained the strength required for peace, and second, that Britain and America would stand side by side in that endeavor. Both promises have been honored, and honored handsomely. We thank you for being such a staunch and loyal ally and friend to our country. Together our nations have faced the challenges of our time and have not flinched. We forged ahead with strengthening the peace, spreading prosperity, and safeguarding liberty. Your conviction, Mr. President, that the only sure peace is one founded on a strong defense has enabled us to take a first historic step in the reduction of nuclear arms.

You, sir, have presided over a period of economic expansion unparalleled in peacetime in recent American history. But, above all, Mr. President, you have restored faith in the American dream, a dream of boundless opportunity built in enterprise, individual effort, and personal generosity. As a result, respect for America stands high in the world today.

And thanks to your courage and your leadership, the fire of individual freedom burns more brightly not just in America, not just in the West, but right across the world. We in Britain, Mr. President, have been proud to be your partners in that great adventure. We counted it a privilege to join you in enlarging freedom and furthering the democratic way of life.

The Prime Minister. Well, first my thoughts are sad. And I thought the ceremony this morning was most impressive, and I shall always remember it. And so, this morning we'll be looking back and seeing what a different world it was when we both began in the early 1980's. But because it's in the nature of both of us, we shall also be looking forward, because although I may not see the President in this capacity again, I'm sure I shall see and talk with him many more times.

George Bush, too, will have his own style. But I think we're all very fortunate in the Western World: For the first time we shall have continuity of policies stretching over a second Presidency following a first, and that gives enormous stability and confidence to the feeling of the world.

The President. You know, I don't get involved in the guest list there, and I don't know why, whether this was some other engagement or not, but -- so I don't know the answer to that. And believe me, he will be welcome anytime to the White House.

The Prime Minister. You'll just recall, I think, the first time that we were actually photographed together as being interested in politics was when the President came to see me, when he was Governor of California and I was leader of the opposition. So, he came to see me in the House of Commons, in my room as leader of the opposition. And we talked then about what we wanted to achieve and how we were going to do it. And that was about 1977, or something like that.

The Prime Minister. They're mixed, obviously. I'm so pleased to see him and have the chance of thanking him for everything he's done for freedom in the world. But, of course, I'm sad that I'll not sit in this position with him sitting in that chair again, because we knew one another before the President was the President and before I was the Prime Minister. And we had the same political dreams and the same ways of achieving them. And we both were just recalling a moment ago that I remember the time when Governor Reagan came to see me in my room in the House of Commons when I was leader of the opposition. So, there are lots of times to recall. But I think the nicest thing of all is it's a very different world now, and a very much better one, and a very much more hopeful one than it was then.

The President. Yes. And the things she says about the state of the world -- she has played a major role in bringing those things about -- these improvements. And I think when you stop to think today that the unity we have with the other allies in NATO -- I don't think very much of the world can remember when more than four decades of peace have followed as a result of that.

Today marks the close of round 10 of the nuclear and space talks between the United States and the Soviet Union. Throughout these negotiations, my objective has been to achieve agreement with the Soviet Union on deep, equitable, and verifiable reductions in the strategic nuclear arsenals of both sides as part of a comprehensive effort to enhance strategic stability and reduce the risk of war.

We have made significant progress in these negotiations. We have concluded and begun implementation of the INF treaty, the first to eliminate an entire class of U.S. and Soviet missiles, with the most extensive verification provisions in any arms control agreement.

In the Strategic Arms Reduction Talks (START), we have also made progress toward our goal of securing reductions in the most destabilizing of nuclear forces, fast-flying ballistic missiles, especially heavy intercontinental ballistic missiles with multiple warheads. The negotiators have recorded extensive and significant areas of agreement, as well as remaining areas of disagreement, in a joint START draft treaty text. This joint draft treaty also reflects the areas of agreement which General Secretary Gorbachev and I reached during our meetings in Geneva and Reykjavik and at the Washington and Moscow summits, as well as progress made at the U.S.-Soviet ministerial meetings and in 10 rounds of negotiation in Geneva.

START we are well on our way toward an agreement which will significantly reduce the levels of U.S. and Soviet strategic nuclear arsenals. We have agreement on 50-percent reductions in deployed strategic forces, to a ceiling of 6,000 warheads on 1,600 strategic nuclear delivery vehicles, and sublimits of 4,900 ballistic missile warheads, and 1,540 warheads on 154 heavy missiles. Both sides have agreed that there will be approximately 50-percent reduction in throw-weight for Soviet ballistic missiles, to equal ceilings for both sides. Agreement has been reached on the number of warheads attributed to each existing type of ballistic missile and on some of the counting rules for heavy bomber armaments.

Agreement has also been reached on the outlines of a verification regime, including several kinds of on-site inspection, data exchange, and measures to reduce the possibility of cheating. Both sides have presented detailed proposals in these areas.

In the defense and space talks, we have continued to seek agreement on how we and the Soviets could jointly manage a stable transition to increased reliance on effective defenses, should they prove feasible. SDI is our best hope for a safer world, one in which deterrence is increasingly based on defenses -- which threaten no one -- rather than on the threat of retaliation. It has also been an important incentive for the Soviets to negotiate for nuclear arms reductions. We will not bargain SDI away or accept restrictions on SDI beyond those actually agreed in the Anti-Ballistic Missile treaty.

Finally, continued Soviet unwillingness to dismantle the large phased-array radar at Krasnoyarsk, which is a significant violation of a central element of the ABM treaty, remains a matter of deep concern. We have made it clear to the Soviets that we will not accept less than full compliance with the treaty, and that we will not be able to conclude any further strategic arms control agreements until that violation is corrected in a verifiable manner that meets our criteria.

In the nuclear and space talks we have come a long way toward agreements that will strengthen our security and that of our allies. But we want good treaties, not quick ones, and we will not take shortcuts. We leave the next administration a solid foundation upon which to build in the future, and I am confident that, if the Soviets are prepared to make further progress, we will be able to resolve the difficult remaining issues.

Telephone Association in Washington, DC. Prior to this he was with Rochester Telephone in Rochester, NY, since 1957 serving in several capacities: president and chief executive officer, and executive vice president-finance and corporate development.

Well, Prime Minister Thatcher, I think you can imagine how humbling it is for an American to read such an account. Such a tribute from Sir Winston, a man so unselfish himself in pursuit of the cause of freedom, a man who led Britain when Britain stood bravely and unselfishly alone, is only a reminder of how deeply runs the mutual admiration on both sides of the Atlantic.

When you were here 8 years ago, I first mentioned that despite all the troubles that beset us, we had every right to have hope in the future, to turn our gaze to the bright sunlit uplands of freedom. I suggested then that the totalitarian impulse had exhausted itself and that collectivism could well be at the terminal stage. Well, we've recently seen evidence that all of this may be coming about.

Tonight we can hope this is so and that it will continue. We can hope that the altruism that has stood at the heart of the alliance of democratic nations in the postwar era will continue to bear fruit until the whole world is safe and free.

In this quest, those who love freedom have not had a better friend than our distinguished guest this evening. And so I hope, Prime Minister, it will not embarrass you if I take a moment now to record, for personal reasons and for the sake of history, our debt of gratitude to you.

Throughout my Presidency, Prime Minister Thatcher has shared with me the benefits of her experience and wisdom. The Prime Minister's untiring support for NATO has encouraged other allies to make the difficult decisions necessary to keep the alliance strong. Her successful fight to unshackle the British economy from government intervention and to provide greater economic freedom has been a powerful example around the world. She is a leader with vision and the courage to stay the course until the battles are won. And on occasion, she has borne the added burden of heavy criticism incurred on America's behalf.

I've been fortunate over these 8 years and for several years before that to enjoy such a close professional and personal rapport and a genuine friendship with Margaret Thatcher. Some of our predecessors were lucky enough to have had a similar partnership: Lloyd George and Woodrow Wilson, Winston Churchill and Franklin Roosevelt. In each instance, both our nations have been enriched. At the same time, I believe we've added to the great stream of Anglo-American history and helped strengthen the tradition of a special relationship between the leaders of our two nations.

The impact of Mrs. Thatcher's leadership at home and abroad secures her place in history. When we look back to 1979, the year she led the Conservative Party into office, the United Kingdom, like the United States, was suffering through a period of intense economic and social stress. British unemployment was increasing; inflation was approaching 20 percent; productivity, which had been stagnant for years, showed no sign of improving. Britain's best minds were often seeking economic opportunity abroad and frequent labor unrest made economic policy decisions difficult to implement.

I will not recite the impressive evidence showing how brilliantly the Prime Minister has succeeded over the last 9 years in leading Great Britain to a renaissance of both economy and spirit. They need no elaboration. Through her force of character, her determination to wrest Britain from her doldrums, her personal example of hard work and standing up for what is right, Margaret Thatcher reminded us of the crucial role strong leadership plays in a democracy.

When the Prime Minister applied her formidable talents to foreign policy, the results were much the same. She approached Great Britain's role among nations with a clear vision of what she wished to accomplish and how she intended to go about it. Central to her view of the world and to mine is the NATO alliance, an alliance of mutual security and shared responsibilities. Together the nations of NATO have succeeded in doing what almost no one would have dreamed impossible -- or possible. I don't need the ``im'' on there. We have preserved the peace and provided the foundation for the longest period of growth and prosperity in Europe's history.

Today we're faced with a Soviet leadership eager for a change and for better relations with the West. We stand ready to work with the Soviets to resolve our differences. But we must not lose sight of the policies and vision that have served us well in the past, and that the spirit and leadership of Prime Minister Thatcher have strengthened and sustained. And we must not lose hold of her patience in pursuit of our long-term objectives: vigilance in defense of our liberties and determination in advancing the cause of human rights. Beyond Europe's boundaries, Britain and America are working together to advance an ideal, the return to democracy for many nations that have lost it.

Prime Minister was already well established in office when I began my first term almost 8 years ago. As I prepare to depart this office in January, I take considerable satisfaction in knowing that Margaret Thatcher will still reside at Number 10 Downing Street, and will be there to offer President Bush her friendship, cooperation, and advice.

Ladies and gentlemen, will you please stand to join me in expressing admiration and appreciation for Prime Minister Margaret Thatcher of the United Kingdom of Great Britain and Northern Ireland, and in raising a toast to Her Majesty the Queen.

Mr. President, I have a particular feel this evening. You were so very generous in your remarks about me, then very kindly said that I was still going to be around. And I think the important thing about this evening is that we all want to pay a very great tribute to you for your Presidency for which we're all so grateful. And I'm really rather proud that it falls to the 49th Prime Minister of the United Kingdom to pay a great tribute to the 40th President of the United States.

Now that is quite historic. There haven't been many times when the Prime Minister of the United Kingdom has been Prime Minister throughout two consecutive Presidencies of the same person in the United States. Indeed there are only three of us so far. One was Pitt the Younger, who was in Number 10 Downing Street while George Washington was President. Lord Liverpool was also Prime Minister throughout the whole time of James Monroe as President. And the third one is me. [Laughter] And fortunately, I'm here to pay tribute to you, sir.

And as I look back over the past 8 years of our time in office together, what I remember best -- I remember the dark days of the early part of this decade when both our countries were grappling with inflation and recession. You referred to it in your speech. And when you told me, at the British Embassy in 1981, that for all our economic difficulties we would be home safe and soon enough -- it's a lovely phrase. Only you could have thought of it -- home safe and soon enough. We could never be wholly without economic problems, but you can rightly take tremendous pride in the 71 continuous months of expansion of the American economy.

President, you've been more than a staunch ally and wise counselor; you've also been a wonderful friend to me and my country. A friend whose cheerful bravery in the face of personal danger and of illness overcome we have all admired, and whose optimism and kindness have never been worn down by the pressures and preoccupations of your high office. Mr. President, it's when you believe in something as strongly as you do that you are given strength to take you through difficult times. And your belief has taken you through those difficult times.

Ten years ago, Mr. President, in a letter to a young Republican, you explained what it meant to be an American, and in describing the personality of the people of this land, you cited Winston again, Winston Churchill's observation that Americans seem to be the only men who can laugh and fight at the same time.

In celebrating your qualities and achievements, I also pay tribute to that special person who stood by your side in all your endeavors. You don't need me to tell you, Mr. President, that in the First Lady of the United States you've had a companion and partner whose charm, dignity, and quiet but sure courage have won the hearts of millions. We all thank her for the lead she's given in the war against drugs. She's inspired not only the young people of America, but the whole world. Nancy, for that, and for so many other things, we salute you, too.

Looking back on it all, what do we see? I can do no better, Mr. President, than repeat your own favorite verdict on a film script. ``That story,'' Sam Goldwyn once said, ``is wonderful! It's magnificent! It's prolific!'' [Laughter] So, too, Mr. President, have been the Reagan years. And we draw strength from the knowledge that your successor is someone who represents all that is best in America, whose loyalties to its values and its institutions is unswerving. We warmly congratulate you, Mr. Vice President and Barbara, on your victory. And we look forward to further great achievements under your Presidency and to working with you as a true and trusted friend.

The President. Thank you, Paul. And let me begin with a special greeting to the ambassadors and officials of the 96 nations that are contracting parties to the GATT. I thank you for accepting my invitation to be with us this morning.

Well, that's our story too -- wonderful, magnificent, and prolific. I've told our economic success story a hundred times across our nation -- how we came into office to find the worst economic mess in over 50 years; how we rolled up our sleeves, cut taxes and cut regulations; and how the economy responded as inflation and interest rates fell from near-record highs to the lowest they'd been in more than a decade, while growth, productivity, and incomes all seemed to wake from the dead. And more people are at work today than ever before in the history of the United States of America.

But the history we've written is more than economic history. The philosopher Ludwig von Mises once wrote, in his words: ``A nation is the more prosperous today the less it has tried to put obstacles in the way of the spirit of free enterprise and private initiative.'' Well, in the years before we took office, much of mankind had lost sight of the enduring and fundamentally moral link between freedom and prosperity. Nations that had once known the full fruits of freedom had fallen into a kind of statist trance and saw their material standards slowly drift downward. Others fell even deeper into the stagnating pool of state-commanded economic life.

Two hundred years ago, a minuteman stood at Concord Bridge and fired the shot heard round the world. And sometime in these last 8 years, our modern minutemen -- America's entrepreneurs -- fired another shot heard round the world. Yes, when we cut taxes, regulation, inflation, and interest rates, all we were really doing was what Paul Revere did after seeing those two lanterns in the Old North Church. We were riding through the countryside, calling on brave souls to come out and risk all and to help build the Nation anew. And like the minutemen, they came running. Most of the new jobs created in our expansion were created by companies 5 years old or less and companies with 20 or fewer people -- entrepreneurial companies, companies that are the product of American freedom.

Today, America is the envy of the world. And if I may add a personal note, I'm mighty grateful that -- with George Bush picking up the lease on the store, after Nancy and I have packed our jalopy and headed West -- [laughter] -- this truth will go marching on.

Yet though we have transferred the world these last 8 years, we still have work to do. And in no area is the march ahead more critical to the future of America and the world than the area of international trade. The great 19th century British historian and statesman, Thomas Macaulay, once noted that, ``Free trade, one of the greatest blessings which a government can confer on a people, is in almost every country unpopular.'' But not in America. In the past year of campaigning nothing was a surer kiss of death than protectionism and taxes. And why not? From George Washington's time to the Depression of the thirties to this very moment, when America's total international trade has expanded, the number of jobs has expanded; when it's contracted, so has the number of jobs. And today, more than 10 million American jobs depend on imports, exports, or both; and we're exporting more than ever before in our history.

And as for consumers, only 2 years ago, the headlines gave us all a lesson in the cost of protection. That was when, under pressure from our Federal Trade Commission, New York State abolished a domestic trade barrier. It let in milk from New Jersey, and in no time, the average price of a gallon of milk on the Lower East Side of Manhattan dropped by 40 cents. Now, that was just one product traded not between two nations but between two States. Put that on a world scale and you can see why Americans have said over and over again this year that protectionism is destructionism, and they don't want any part of it. It's just this simple: America and the world need more trade, not less. And we're determined to keep trade alive.

Today we're pursuing a three-pronged policy. From the Plaza agreement to the Tokyo summit to the Toronto summit this year, we have worked with the other major industrial nations on the first prong -- expanding international coordination in monetary, fiscal, and macroeconomic policy.

And meanwhile, as the second prong, we've been using every tool that our existing international agreements allow to pry open foreign markets. We've become the first administration ever to initiate unfair trade practice cases, not waiting for industry to take the first step. And not long ago, we added up all the cases administration and industry initiated and found that during this administration, the United States has challenged more unfair trade practices than in any other administration in our country's history. And from agricultural products and legal services to construction contracts in Japan, to insurance and intellectual property in Korea, to agricultural trade with Europe, we've got results.

Four decades ago, America accounted for half of the world's economy. We were so big compared to everyone else that we could ignore most unfair practices abroad. Today we're down to about a quarter. And it's time for everyone to play by the rules, if they want to play with us. This is not, as some would have it, a case of American decline. In fact, our share of world output has risen since 1980. But the Depression and the Second World War taught us that our peace, prosperity, and freedom are secure only when the peace, prosperity, and freedom of our friends are secure. In trade, everyone ends up a winner as markets grow. It's not a fight, and you're not going for a knockout, although that's the way some critics seem to think about trade.

Yes, mutual benefits are why we've pursued the third prong of our three-pronged strategy -- bilateral and multilateral negotiations. In a couple of weeks, the Uruguay round of trade talks will have its mid-term review in Montreal. I can't think of any matter in the last 8 years that has achieved the same breadth of support within our government as these talks. In putting fast-track provisions into the trade bill, Congress showed its support. President-elect Bush has been on board every step of the way. And anyone who thinks that American policy in this area might shift with the new administration or the new Congress is deluding himself. In fact, the President-elect and I intend to meet with Trade Representative Clayton Yeutter and Agriculture Secretary Dick Lyng before the mid-term review to reiterate our mutual support for this negotiation. Yes, as far as the trade talks are concerned, it's steady as she goes and full steam ahead.

I took up my current line of work, I got to know a thing or two about negotiating when I represented the Screen Actors Guild in contract talks with the studios. After the studios, Gorbachev was a snap. [Laughter] But I found that there's nothing like a deadline to concentrate bargaining wonderfully. And that's what's happened here. The fact that the mid-term review was coming up has focused and accelerated talks so much that, in my judgment, by the time the meeting convenes, it will have already succeeded.

Now, we aren't trying to negotiate the entire Uruguay round in Montreal. We're taking this thing one step at a time, and the steps for this meeting are simple. Like mountaineers getting ready for the final stage of the big climb, we want to make sure we all agree on just where the summit is, on the path we're taking to it, and on when we intend to arrive.

The agenda includes intellectual property, services, investments, reducing trade barriers abroad for our products, and improving the way GATT resolves disputes. These are the big thorns in the side of international trade today and the big gaps in the GATT system. For example, although trade in services is growing more rapidly than almost any other areas of international trade, GATT has no rule covering it, and intellectual property protections simply don't exist. In 1986 alone, the computer and software industries lost over $4 billion due to the lack of intellectual property protections. Well, it's time we did something about this, and I'm confident we will.

One of the biggest areas we must talk about is agriculture. Who can be happy with government policies in agriculture around the world today? Has there ever been a better example of how bad things can get when governments get too involved?

Expensive, destructive, taken together the role of governments in agriculture hurts consumers. It hurts the economies of the less developed countries. It even hurts farmers. What Von Mises said about nations also goes for industries and sectors -- the fewer the obstacles to private initiative, the better off they are.

We've said that the GATT parties should agree to end, by the turn of the century, policies that distort agricultural trade. Some other nations say that timetable is unrealistic. Well, they may have a point. And so I'm announcing today that when our team shows up at Montreal, they'll be ready to discuss flexible adjustment. They'll be flexible about timetables, so long as everyone agrees on nailing down an adjustment plan with specific dates for ending trade-distorting subsidies and market access barriers. The final goal is what is important.

Some countries are also worried that if trade barriers in agriculture disappear, they'll be left at the mercy of others if food supplies run short. Well, again, they may have a point. And so, in Montreal we'll be ready to talk about government stockpiles, land purchases, and other ways of dealing with what has been called food security. You might say that in Montreal we'll be ready to talk turkey, and wheat and sorghum and whatever. We've been told that the truck of agricultural trade talks is stuck in the potholes of rigid timetables and food security. Well, this proposal represents a major effort by the United States to pull the truck out, fill in the holes, and make sure the talks hum along to their 1990 destination.

What's at stake here is more than a few products or a few sectors. The world is perched on the threshold of a new era. New technologies, new opportunities beyond all imagination just a few years ago are coming into being. They hold unparalleled promise for humanity. Biotechnologies, information technologies, medical technologies and more might conquer disease, end world hunger, and do all the work we're doing now and even more, while doing less to the environment. Yet nothing is more certain than to the way to cut this new era short is to start throwing up trade barriers again around the world.

Think of the computer. In the 1960's, a computer handling a million instructions per second cost nearly $2 million; today it's around $1,000. Today's typical desktop PC is not the product of one country but three or four, and its semiconductors may come from any of more than 10 nations, with no one knowing for sure just which one. We can't separate the blooming of new technologies from the world marketplace that has nurtured them.

Some years ago, Friedrich Hayek, the economist and philosopher, wrote that, and I'll quote: ``While there is nothing in modern technological developments which forces us toward comprehensive economic planning, there is a great deal in them which makes infinitely more dangerous the power a planning authority would possess.'' And yet the current technological revolution may be making central authority less, rather than more potent. Today's desktop PC has more computing power than a whole roomful of 1960 computers. And yet one of America's leading research directors predicted not long ago, that in less than 15 years, a single computer chip would equal the power of 20 of today's most advanced supercomputers.

Author George Gilder has argued that putting such power in the hands of every hacker and entrepreneur will make the calculations of central planners more and more meaningless. The greater the pace of innovation, the more futile it will be for state authorities to try to keep up, to push, or to guide. The most governments will be able to do is provide broad and unfettered markets that can fertilize innovation and give invigorating home bases for companies that want to compete in international commerce.

That's why, even as we have been working on lowering trade barriers around the world, we have sought to eliminate most barriers with our most important partner -- Canada. As far as the United States is concerned, the free trade agreement is an example of cooperation at its best. It is a testament to the commitment of our two governments to the principles of the open market and to economic cooperation. It is also, as the leaders of the major industrial economies concluded at the Toronto summit, a catalyst for the rest of the world trading system.

As we pursue global trade negotiations, the United States believes that the future belongs to those who lower trade barriers. These are the countries that will be in the forefront of technology. These are the countries that will see their living standards rise most quickly. And these are the countries that will lead the world in the years ahead. We can go forward into the future or slip back into the protectionist past. It comes down to this: Every time countries any place in the world have taken a step together toward freer trade, the results were just what was expected -- more productive and competitive economies, more jobs, and greater benefits for the citizens of each country.

And I believe that there's something in the human soul -- a spirit of hope, a yearning for a brighter future for one's children, a prayer for peace -- that will finally, after much hesitation perhaps, propel all of us forward. It'll give us the courage to face the future, to turn to the morning light, and, as our forefathers did for us, to build a better world for our children and their children and generations to come.

I am today signing into law S. 2102, a bill prohibiting the licensing or construction of certain facilities on portions of the Salmon River and the Snake River in Idaho. The principal object of the bill is to prevent the construction of a dam on stretches of the Salmon River and the Snake River. I have no objection to this part of the bill.

I am constrained to note, however, that one provision of the bill is unconstitutional. Section 2 of the bill prohibits the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission from issuing a license or permit for a hydroelectric power plant at Lake Tobesofkee in Bibb County, Georgia, without the prior approval of the governing body of Bibb County. The approval requirement in this provision is unconstitutional because it authorizes officials who have not been selected in a manner consistent with the Appointments Clause, Article 2, Section 2, Clause 2, of the Constitution to perform significant authority pursuant to the laws of the United States. Because the approval requirement is severable from the rest of section 2, I understand the effect of section 2 is to prohibit the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission from granting any license, permit, or exemption for a hydroelectric power plant at Lake Tobesofkee.

I am signing S. 2186, the Public Buildings Amendments of 1988. In signing this bill into law, I note, however, that one provision of the Act warrants construction in order to avoid constitutional difficulty. Section 5 permits the Administrator of General Services, ``whenever the Administrator considers it desirable,'' to assign to a State the authority of the United States to ``administer criminal laws and health and safety laws with respect to lands or interests in lands under the control of the Administrator'' located in the State. This provision does not specify whether the laws to be administered are State or Federal laws. We understand this provision as merely permitting the waiving of exclusive Federal jurisdiction in circumstances when it would be useful to permit State administration of State law. Authority to administer Federal laws, however, could not be conferred on State officials who are not appointed as officers of the United States in accordance with the Appointments Clause, U.S. Const. art. II, sec. 2, cl. 2. Thus, to satisfy the underlying purpose of the section and to avoid reading it as conferring unconstitutional authority, we interpret the section only to permit the assignment to States of the authority to administer State laws.

Finally, it should be understood that Federal funding of the Steel Initiative Program will be undertaken within budget constraints and that the program will be implemented to maximize non-Federal cost-sharing and to focus Federal funds on projects that could not be undertaken by industry without additional Federal support.

President's Committee on the Arts and Humanities. And it comes at a time of reflection for me, a time to look back and see what we've done and how we did it. And I don't mind telling all of you how very proud I am of the work that you all have done and how proud I am that this administration has lived by the philosophy that when it comes to the arts and humanities the Nation is best when government intrudes the least.

At the beginning of this administration, there were many who believed we were antagonistic to the arts because in our search for ways to cut the Federal budget we looked at arts funding as critically as we looked at everything else.

But that idea was nonsense. In fact, what opposition there was to government funding for the arts was rooted in a deeply held conviction that it is not the place, and should not be the place, for government officials to determine what is good art and what is bad art. That path is a dangerous one for a democratic society -- well, for any society, to take. No, the determination of such things should be left to women and men of taste and education, and indeed, finally, to history itself.

And yet we faced a very real dilemma. If not the Government, then who? How could the arts, the lively arts and the visual arts, spread across the country instead of being concentrated in just a few cities where there was enough private support? And that's where you all came in. This Committee, which was created by Executive order in 1982, has been instrumental in expanding arts funding in this country, devising innovative methods of fundraising from private sector sources in tandem with Federal and State resources. And in the process, you've revolutionized the way Americans think about the arts and humanities and have made American business understand that a literate and cultured America is a better America, an America better able to compete internationally. With this system in place, we do not have to fear American artists becoming the handmaidens of government power.

And one final word: I hope that the national dialog about the central role played by Western culture in the very concept of the humanities will continue. Western culture represents the flowering of the best that has been thought and said by humankind and is every American's birthright. Let us never forget that and let us aim to bring its bounties to every American.

Let me assure you, I'm going to read this and share it with George. So, I thank you all again, and God bless you. And now Nancy and I are going over there in front of the fireplace and hope we'll have a chance to shake hands and have our picture taken with each one of you.

Thank you, Harold. Thank you all very much. It's a delight to join you tonight as we honor a dear friend of mine and Nancy's. But what brings me here is a lot more than our friendship. It is to recognize and express my gratitude for the remarkable job Charles Wick has done at USIA. To put it simply: Charles is the man who brought our international communications agency into the 20th century.

Now, people have asked me how I discovered this very effective public servant. Well, I just looked for someone with the balance of two qualities: a greatness of vision, yet still able to understand Washington. [Laughter] And when I found the man who would produce the classic film that combined Snow White and the Three Stooges -- [laughter] -- I said, I have found that man.

But the truth is that Charlie has played a central role in making U.S. information policy, a key part of our international activities in foreign policy. He's worked in concert with the top policy officials at the State Department and on the National Security Council and has served as my principal adviser on international information and cultural matters.

Charlie's direction, that produced the dramatic video presentation we took to the United Nations to show the world what happened in the final minutes of that doomed flight. And as the Soviet Union began to introduce glasnost, Charlie arranged the U.S.-Soviet information talks to address key issues on the bilateral flow of information. With his ongoing efforts, new understandings were reached on disinformation and on the exchange of films and publications. The Voice of America is no longer jammed by the Soviets. And they have granted permission for the first time for Voice of America to open a bureau in Moscow.

The genius of Charlie Wick lies in his ability to recognize how changing information technology, especially satellite communications, has transformed the international political landscape. He understands the need for the United States to convey its message to the people of the world if we're to succeed internationally. And he knows how to do it better than it's ever been done before.

One thing that he also knows so well is that the United States Government can't do it alone. We couldn't have done it without you. All of you who have participated in the private sector committees and been so generous in your support have been a critical part of our success. Private sector volunteers, people like you working in such areas as medicine, labor, publishing, public relations, marketing, engineering, radio, television, and other fields have done much more than help USIA to do its important work. You've made it possible for us to show the world the essence of the American idea and to present to the planet our truest face: the one that says, ``We the People.'' Only in a country in which it really is the people who rule would the Government depend so greatly on private citizens like yourselves to help America share our message with the world. And only in a country as great as America would the response be as great as yours has been.

We've accomplished great things these past 8 years. Under Charlie's inspired leadership and with your strong support, USIA has undergone a rebirth of vision and a renewal of capability that will guide it well into the next century and for which America is truly grateful.

We're here to honor those of you who honor us with your respect for our past and concern for our future. ``The future of our civilization,'' the historian Lewis Mumford once wrote, ``depends upon our ability to select and control our heritage from the past, to alter our present attitudes and habits, and to project fresh forms into which our energies may be freely poured.'' Well, today we're here to honor all of you who have intertwined our hopes for the future of our civilization with a deep respect for the glories of our heritage.

Over the past 20 years, private enterprise has shown an increasing awareness of the advantages in preservation. Working independently, these organizations and individuals have maintained and adapted historic resources for modern use.

Rehabilitation projects have provided facilities for businesses, housing, and community centers. Obviously, many programs unrelated to historic preservation have benefited from the creative use of our older resources.

In an earlier time, many thought that preservation work was expensive, time-consuming, and limited in its outcome. We have evidence in this room to prove that notion false. In fact, well-informed, planned, and coordinated enterprises prove that you can show cost-effective results and generate social and economic benefits beyond the original scope of the project.

The renovation of one building can inspire similar undertakings in the surrounding area and result in overall neighborhood improvements. The rehabilitation of one small area can lead to the revitalization of an entire downtown business district and stimulate progress in that town's economy.

The ability of private enterprise to enrich our heritage so effectively provides us with daily evidence of the cultural values that have sustained this nation. The presence of historic properties as working and productive assets in our communities gives us an important link between the past and the present and reminds us of what we were, who we are, and where we hope to be.

What could be better tribute to our guests than to honor them as people who were foresighted enough to see that our national ethic is actually a conservative ethic in the most literal sense. If we can learn to observe beforehand that our history and our culture are of great value in giving us our sense of identity as Americans, then we will all work to preserve that heritage, just as these honorees have done.

In every corner of our society, people are fighting the purveyors of this evil and are just saying no. And the numbers are encouraging. One in particular gives us great hope: Cocaine use by our nation's high school seniors dropped by one-third last year, from 6.2 percent in 1986 to 4.3 percent in 1987. And that's the lowest level in a decade. And the total number of users has leveled off.

Several months ago here at the White House, we honored those heroes who gave their lives in this battle. Heroes like DEA Special Agent Enrique Camarena Salazar and a young rookie cop from New York named Eddie Byrne. With us today are Matthew and Ann Byrne, who join us as we give their son's comrades the valuable tools they need to carry forth the fight for which young Eddie so valiantly gave his life. We salute Eddie Byrne. We salute his family for their determination that his death will not have been in vain.

This bill is the product of a bipartisan effort. And I'm obliged to note that several provisions of the bill purporting to require international negotiations must be construed and applied consistent with my constitutional authority to conduct such negotiations. I'm also very concerned that the congressionally mandated changes in our zero tolerance policy at and around our nation's borders could greatly hamper our drug interdiction effort.

In addition, important language was dropped from the final version, most notably the easing of the exclusionary rule and random drug testing. Fortunately, the Department of Transportation has been able to proceed with proposals for random drug testing where drug abuse endangers the public safety. While the language that was dropped would have provided effective methods to enhance drug enforcement, the final product nevertheless strikes a balance between tough law enforcement and protection of victims' rights with the constitutional guarantees of the rights of criminals.

The provision providing the death penalty for narcotics kingpins and drug-related murderers, along with tough new provisions dealing with everything from money laundering to international interdiction and State and local drug enforcement are just the weapons Eddie and Enrique's comrades in arms need to fight an effective war.

Also included in the bill are harsh new laws to deter the greedy and heartless who sell or distribute obscene material or child pornography. With fines up to $100,000 and prison terms of 20 years, we hope to put these people out of business for good.

Her daughter, Linda, was kidnaped, drugged, repeatedly raped, and then brutally murdered. Who could do such evil things? Three men working for a pornographer. The pornographer was making a movie and, in his words, told those three to ``use a blond.'' Well, simply because she happened to be in the wrong place at the wrong time, she was killed. Well, Linda is now in the Lord's hands. Just try to tell her mother that pornography is a victimless crime.

Our battles aren't fought by any single person nor can they be won by a single bill, but with the measures we have taken over the past 8 years and the significant additions made today, we are one step closer to an America free of the degrading and dehumanizing effect of obscene material and child pornography and an America that is drug free.

Eight years ago we set a course. We stuck to it. And the path we blazed is marked by the success of our accomplishments. Our ultimate destination: a drug-free America. And now in the eleventh hour of this Presidency, we give a new sword and shield to those whose daily business it is to eliminate from America's streets and towns the scourge of illicit drugs.

The policy of the United States is to have sufficient capabilities at all levels of government to meet essential defense and civilian needs during any national security emergency. A national security emergency is any occurrence, including natural disaster, military attack, technological emergency, or other emergency, that seriously degrades or seriously threatens the national security of the United States. Policy for national security emergency preparedness shall be established by the President. Pursuant to the President's direction, the National Security Council shall be responsible for developing and administering such policy. All national security emergency preparedness activities shall be consistent with the Constitution and laws of the United States and with preservation of the constitutional government of the United States.

Effective national security emergency preparedness planning requires: identification of functions that would have to be performed during such an emergency; development of plans for performing these functions; and development of the capability to execute those plans.

This Order does not constitute authority to implement the plans prepared pursuant to this Order. Plans so developed may be executed only in the event that authority for such execution is authorized by law.

This Order does not apply to those natural disasters, technological emergencies, or other emergencies, the alleviation of which is normally the responsibility of individuals, the private sector, volunteer organizations, State and local governments, and Federal departments and agencies unless such situations also constitute a national security emergency.

The Director of the Federal Emergency Management Agency shall serve as an advisor to the National Security Council on issues of national security emergency preparedness, including mobilization preparedness, civil defense, continuity of government, technological disasters, and other issues, as appropriate. Pursuant to such procedures for the organization and management of the National Security Council process as the President may establish, the Director of the Federal Emergency Management Agency also shall assist in the implementation of and management of the National Security Council process as the President may establish, the Director of the Federal Emergency Management Agency also shall assist in the implementation of national security emergency preparedness policy by coordinating with the other Federal departments and agencies and with State and local governments, and by providing periodic reports to the National Security Council on implementation of national security emergency preparedness policy.

National security emergency preparedness functions that are shared by more than one agency shall be coordinated by the head of the Federal department or agency having primary responsibility and shall be supported by the heads of other departments and agencies having related responsibilities.

Each Federal department and agency shall work within the framework established by, and cooperate with those organizations assigned responsibility in, Executive Order No. 12472, to ensure adequate national security emergency preparedness telecommunications in support of the functions and activities addressed by this Order.

With the assistance of the heads of other Federal departments and agencies, provide management direction for the stockpiling of strategic and critical materials, conduct storage, maintenance, and quality assurance operations for the stockpile of strategic and critical materials, and formulate plans, programs, and reports relating to the stockpiling of strategic and critical materials.

Support the Secretary of Health and Human Services in the development of human services educational and training materials, including self-help program materials for use by human service organizations and professional schools.

Coordinate with the Secretary of Agriculture regarding the emergency preparedness of the rural electric supply systems throughout the Nation and the assignment of emergency preparedness responsibilities to the Rural Electrification Administration.

Develop plans, in cooperation with the heads of other Federal departments and agencies and State and local governments, to restore community facilities, including electrical power, potable water, and sewage disposal facilities, damaged in national security emergencies.

Develop and implement plans for the management, control, allocation, and use of public land under the jurisdiction of the Department of the Interior in national security emergencies and coordinate land emergency planning at the Federal, State, and local levels.

Emergency management and control of civil transportation resources and systems, including privately owned automobiles, urban mass transit, intermodal transportation systems, the National Railroad Passenger Corporation and the St.

Coordinate the Interstate Commerce Commission's development of plans and preparedness programs for the reduction of vulnerability, maintenance, restoration, and operation of privately owned railroads, motor carriers, inland waterway transportation systems, and public storage facilities and services in national security emergencies.

Support the Secretary of State in plans for the protection of international organizations and foreign diplomatic, consular, and other official personnel and property or other assets in the United States.

Develop, in coordination with the Secretary of Defense, plans to assure the provision of potable water supplies to meet community needs under national security emergency conditions, including claimancy for materials and equipment for public water systems.

Support the Administrator of General Services in efforts to promote a government-wide program with respect to Federal buildings and installations to minimize the effects of attack and establish shelter management organizations.

Recapture or authorize recapture of special nuclear materials from licensees where necessary to assure the use, preservation, or safeguarding of such materials for the common defense and security, as determined by the Commission or as requested by the Secretary of Energy.

Chairman of the Interstate Commerce Commission in the development of plans for operation and maintenance of inland waterway transportation in the Tennessee River System during national security emergencies.

In coordination with the Secretary of State's exercise of telecommunications functions affecting United States diplomatic missions and consular offices overseas, maintain the capability to provide television and simultaneous direct radio broadcasting in major languages to all areas of the world, and the capability to provide wireless file to all United States embassies during national security emergencies.

Develop plans for keeping the President informed of the activities of government agencies, continuing the Office of Management and Budget's management functions, and maintaining presidential supervision and direction with respect to legislation and regulations in national security emergencies.

Order applies whenever State or local governments, either individually or together, decline or fail to prepare commercial nuclear power plant radiological emergency preparedness plans that are sufficient to satisfy Nuclear Regulatory Commission (``NRC'') licensing requirements or to participate adequately in the preparation, demonstration, testing, exercise, or use of such plans.

Principles and Directives. (a) Subject to the principles articulated in this Section, the Director of FEMA is hereby authorized and directed to take the actions specified in Sections 3 through 6 of this Order.

Emergency Preparedness Planning. (a) FEMA assistance in emergency preparedness planning shall include advice, technical assistance, and arrangements for facilities and resources as needed to satisfy the emergency planning requirements under the Atomic Energy Act of 1954, as amended, and any other Federal legislation or regulations pertaining to issuance or retention of a construction permit or an operating license for a nuclear power plant.

FEMA's planning for Federal participation in responding to a radiological emergency within the scope of this Order shall include, but not be limited to, arrangements for using existing Federal resources to provide prompt notification of the emergency to the general public; to assist in any necessary evacuation; to provide reception centers or shelters and related facilities and services for evacuees; to provide emergency medical services at Federal hospitals, including those operated by the military services and by the Veterans' Administration; and to ensure the creation and maintenance of channels of communication from commercial nuclear power plant licensees or applicants to State and local governments and to surrounding members of the public.

FEMA shall take all actions necessary to carry out the evaluation referred to in the preceding Subsection and to permit the NRC to conduct its evaluation of radiological emergency preparedness plans including, but not limited to, planning, participating in, and evaluating exercises, drills, and tests, on a timely basis, as necessary to satisfy NRC requirements for demonstrations of off-site radiological emergency preparedness.

Radiological Emergency. (a) In the event of an actual radiological emergency or disaster, FEMA shall take all steps necessary to ensure the implementation of the plans developed under this Order and shall coordinate the actions of other Federal agencies to achieve the maximum effectiveness of Federal efforts in responding to the emergency.

FEMA shall coordinate Federal response activities to ensure that adequate resources are directed, when an initial response is needed, to activities hindered by the absence or inadequacy of advance State and local commitments.

FEMA shall assume any necessary command-and-control function, or delegate such function to another Federal agency, in the event that no competent State and local authority is available to perform such function.

In any instance in which Federal personnel may be called upon to fill a command-and-control function during a radiological emergency, in addition to any other powers it may have, FEMA or its designee is authorized to accept volunteer assistance from utility employees and other nongovernmental personnel for any purpose necessary to implement the emergency response plan and facilitate off-site emergency response.

Order. (a) FEMA shall issue interim and final directives and procedures implementing this Order as expeditiously as is feasible and in any event shall issue interim directives and procedures not more than 90 days following the effective date of this Order and shall issue final directives and procedures not more than 180 days following the effective date of this Order.

Immediately upon the effective date of this Order, FEMA shall review, and initiate necessary revisions of, all FEMA regulations, directives, and guidance to conform them to the terms and policies of this Order.

To the extent permitted by law, FEMA is directed to obtain full reimbursement, either jointly or severally, for services performed by FEMA or other Federal agencies pursuant to this Order from any affected licensee and from any affected nonparticipating or inadequately participating State or local government.

Accidents (``Commission''). The Commission shall be composed of nine members who shall be appointed by the President. The members shall represent a broad range of views and interests and shall be appointed in a manner that ensures that not more than a mere majority of the members are of the same political party. Any vacancy in the Commission shall be filled in the manner in which the original appointment was made.

The Commission may request any Executive agency to furnish such information, advice, or assistance as it determines to be necessary to carry out its functions. Each such agency is directed, to the extent permitted by law, to furnish such information, advice, or assistance upon request by the Chairperson of the Commission.

Director of the Federal Emergency Management Agency shall provide, to the extent permitted by law and subject to the availability of funds, the Commission with such facilities, support, funds, and services, including staff, as may be necessary for the effective performance of the functions of the Commission.

Each member of the Commission may receive compensation at the maximum rate prescribed by the Federal Advisory Committee Act for each day such member is engaged in the work of the Commission. Each member may also receive travel expenses, including per diem in lieu of subsistence, under sections 5702 and 5703 of title 5, United States Code.

The functions of the President under the Federal Advisory Committee Act that are applicable to the Commission, except the function of reporting annually to the Congress, shall be performed by the Administrator of General Services.

In order to permit an increase in imports of certain cheeses from Uruguay, the provisions set forth in item 950.10 in part 3 of the Appendix to the TSUS and subheading 9904.10.42 of the HTS must be modified. This modification does not affect any existing quota allocations other than the allocation for Uruguay. This modification increases the annual aggregate quantity of quota cheese allocated to 111,000 metric tons.

As a beneficiary, Guyana also may become eligible for investments using funds generated in Puerto Rico under section 936(d)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code and re-lent to eligible Caribbean Basin countries at favorable rates, and for the convention expense tax deduction under section 274(h) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, by entering into an exchange of information agreement with the United States on tax matters.

Designation is an important step for Guyana in its effort to revitalize and rebuild its weakened economy. Designation also is significant because it is further tangible evidence of the constructive cooperation between the United States and the peoples and governments of the Caribbean Basin.

My decision to designate Guyana flows out of discussions concluded last month between this Administration and the Government of Guyana regarding the designation criteria set forth in section 212 of the CBERA. Guyana has demonstrated to my satisfaction that its laws, practices, and policies are in conformity with the designation criteria of the CBERA. The Government of Guyana has communicated on these matters by letters to Secretary of State Shultz and Ambassador Yeutter and in so doing has indicated its desire to be designated as a beneficiary (copies of the letters are enclosed). On the basis of the statements and assurances in these letters, and taking into account information developed by the U.S. Embassy and through other sources, I have concluded that the objectives of the Administration and the Congress with respect to the statutory designation criteria have been met and that designation is appropriate at this time.

I am mindful that under section 212(e) of the CBERA, as amended, I retain the authority to suspend, withdraw, or limit the application of CBERA benefits from any designated country if a beneficiary's laws, policies, or practices are no longer in conformity with the designation criteria. The United States will keep abreast of developments in Guyana that are pertinent to the designation criteria.

Administration looks forward to working closely with the Government of Guyana and with the private sectors of the United States and Guyana to ensure that the wide-ranging opportunities opened by the CBERA are fully utilized.

The family, society's most fundamental unit, is part of God's design for human happiness. Belonging to a family is a natural and vital component of life, and every child deserves to be a member of a loving and nurturing family. For many children, this becomes possible through life in an adoptive family. That is good reason for all Americans to celebrate adoption and to commend and cooperate with those in the private sector and public service who work to find loving, lasting homes for waiting youngsters.

For some children, the waiting is much too long. More than 30,000 children now in foster care are in need of permanent homes. Most of these fine youngsters have special needs; some are of school age, in sibling groups, members of minorities, or affected by physical, mental, or emotional disabilities. But all of them have two things in common -- they need families of their own, and they have great love to offer new parents. We can all learn much from the wonderful experiences of adoptive families already blessed with special-needs adoptive children.

Thousands of marriages in our country are childless, and many families are anxious to adopt. Many single people also desire to know the happiness of adoption. Adoption brings immeasurable joy to adopted children and adoptive parents alike. It also gives us cause for hope -- that more youngsters will find lasting homes and that ever more Americans will find within themselves the generosity, courage, and love to make adoption their personal alternative to the cruelty of abortion. Prolife pregnancy counseling centers exist in cities and towns across our land to help mothers choose life for their unborn infants. These mothers give their babies not only the gift of birth but also the gift of a bright future with a loving adoptive family. These brave women, and those who decide to raise their babies themselves, deserve our admiration, friendship, and help while they are expecting and after.

There is more each of us can do to encourage adoption, from making our neighbors and communities aware of this option to making room in our own homes for special-needs children and adoptive infants. As a Nation, we must continue to promote adoption and to eliminate barriers to it. We must also offer our appreciation and encouragement to the millions of our fellow citizens -- such as adoption caseworkers, foster care supervisors, judges, lawyers, clergy and religious, physicians, teachers, pregnancy counselors, and countless volunteers -- who help children and families with adoption. In this way we can aid more and more Americans in discovering the special joy of building a family through adoption.

I have today signed into law S. 11, which will provide a cost-of-living increase for beneficiaries of veterans' compensation and Dependency and Indemnity Compensation (DIC), grant judicial review of veterans' claims, and make a number of improvements in other veterans' benefit programs, including vocational rehabilitation, life insurance, disability pension, health care, and memorial affairs.

Act provides a 4.1 percent cost-of-living increase in the compensation paid to the nearly 2.2 million Armed Forces veterans with service-connected disabilities. In addition, it will provide the same percentage increase in the payments to approximately 323,000 surviving spouses and dependents of veterans whose deaths were service-connected. These increases will become effective on December 1, 1988.

I must note, however, that several provisions of the Act raise serious constitutional questions. However, I do not believe these particular constitutional difficulties impair the fulfillment of the bill's principal objectives.

Act also purports to require the U.S. Court of Appeals for the Federal Circuit to, among other things, ``set aside'' statutes that it finds to be arbitrary and capricious. The reference to ``statute'' appears to have been included by mistake, and I urge the Congress to correct this unconstitutional delegation of legislative power to the judiciary.

I am approving this measure after having approved H.R. 5280, an Act that provides for the minting and sale of coins commemorating the Bicentennial of the United States Congress. Under section 8(a) of H.R. 5280, some of the proceeds from the sale of these coins are to be deposited in the Capitol Preservation Fund for the use of the United States Capitol Preservation Commission, a body consisting of members of Congress. The balance of these proceeds is to go into the general fund of the Treasury.

President-elect's transition team has recently issued a statement regarding the ethical standards that will apply to all individuals serving in the President-elect's transition. A copy of those transition standards of conduct is attached.

President-elect has indicated that specific individuals (including both private citizens and detailees from the Government) will be designated to serve as members of the transition teams assigned to specific Departments and agencies, as contemplated by the Presidential Transitions Effectiveness Act (P.L. 100 - 398).

Accordingly, in order to ensure an effective and orderly transition, while maintaining public confidence, I am directing that the personnel of each Federal Department or agency cooperate with authorized transition team members, to the extent permitted by law and consistent with the performance of official duties. The White House Chief of Staff will verify those individuals of the President-elect's transition team designated to work in your Department or agency. The Office of the White House Chief of Staff will confirm that the designated transition team members have provided statements concerning their most recent employment and sources of funding, as required by P.L. 100 - 398, and copies of their written agreements to comply with the President-elect's standards of conduct.

Any information regarding noncompliance with the standards of conduct of the President-elect should be referred by you, or your designee, to the General Counsel of your Department or agency, who should consult with the Counsel to the President as to the appropriate action to be taken. The Counsel to the President may consult as appropriate with the Counsel to the President-elect.

I will disqualify myself from involvement in any particular transition matter which to my knowledge may directly conflict or appear to conflict with a financial interest of mine, my spouse, minor child, partner, client or other individual or organization with which I have a business or close personal relationship.

I will conserve and protect any federal property entrusted to me, and shall not use federal property, including equipment and supplies, other than for purposes directly related to transition activities.

Pursuant to the terms of Section 1204(b)(1) of the Act, I have determined that certain modifications to the HTS are necessary or appropriate in order to implement the future outstanding staged rate reductions for products of countries entitled to most-favored-nation treatment, as set forth in Annex I to this Proclamation; the future outstanding staged rate reductions for products of Israel, as set forth in Annex II to this Proclamation; and the applicable provisions of statutes enacted and Executive actions taken after January 1, 1988, and before January 1, 1989, along with certain necessary technical rectifications, all of which are set forth in Annex IV to this Proclamation.

Americans have so much for which to be thankful. Think of the great expanse of our nation, the rolling hills of our immense farmland. Even in years of drought, as this year has been, the plows and the sweat of America's farmers call forth from our good Earth more food than we can possibly eat -- so much food that, taken together, our harvests of wheat, corn, soybeans, fruits, vegetables, and all the other bounty of our land make up one of our most important exports. Not only we but the entire world can be thankful for that.

Now, think of our manufacturing centers. After almost a decade of hard, often painful work, cultivating our industrial fields to meet a whole new generation of world competition, this year we can see the first harvest of that work.

Almost every American industry is zipping along at near-full capacity. A few years ago, journalists were calling the Midwest the Rust Belt. Now the Boom Belt would be more like it. From Lehigh Valley in eastern Pennsylvania to Dayton and Detroit and beyond, the factory whistles again sound in the old factory towns, and we hope they'll blow soon where they don't now. By the way, often those whistles are at the plants of entirely new companies, providing new products and services to the Nation and to the world.

In the past year, America added 425,000 new manufacturing jobs, and when it comes to world competition, no one can stop us now. And that's not the only good news. According to one of the foremost authorities in manufacturing, Peter Drucker, the old myth about low wages and low manufacturing costs may be dead for good. In this age of high technology, factories, highly paid skilled workers -- America's kind of workers -- produce so efficiently that no one can touch them. That's why it's gratifying, but not surprising, to find out that America's manufacturing productivity has grown at one and a half times the postwar average during our expansion. And that's why this year, even as European and Japanese manufacturing employment has stagnated, our manufacturing employment has increased.

But prosperity is not an end in itself. It helps us pay attention to the more important things: raising our children as we want them to be raised, helping others in need, and bringing nations together in peace.

This week, world peace has been very much on my mind. Here in Washington, we've received visits from two of America's friends, Britain's Prime Minister Margaret Thatcher and Germany's Chancellor Helmut Kohl. In our meetings, these two great leaders and I talked about the prosperity that all the nations of the industrial world enjoy and about the cuts in taxes and the return to the principles of the free market that have made it possible. And we talked about the success over the past 8 years of our policy of peace through strength.

We will give thanks for these and one thing more: our freedom. Yes, in America, freedom seems like the air around us: It's there; it's sweet, though we rarely give it a thought. Yet as the air fills our lungs, freedom fills our souls. It gives breath to our laughter and joy. It gives voice to our songs. It gives us strength as we race for our dreams.

Think of those around the world who cannot bow their heads in prayer without risking their lives. Think of those countries where to write an honest word or even to own a child's simple toy printing press is a crime. Think of how many countries where to dream of striking out on your own and starting a business is to take a chance not on a better life for yourself and your children but on a long stay in a prison cell. And then think of how blessed we are to be Americans.

The family, the birth- and dwelling-place of natural and self-sacrificing love, is the first of all social contracts. Rooted in the designs of the Creator and reinforced through the wise devices of the law, the family is the sum of a nation's heritage and the heart of a nation's strength. It is, moreover, the original mirror of mankind's hope for a world founded on bonds of tradition and affection, where the individual is cherished for his unalienable worth, the past revered for its accumulation of knowledge and insight, and the future honored for its power to restore and renew.

With all the diversity of its population, the United States has drawn unmatched strength from the confluence of peoples who value and celebrate the importance of family life. During this particular week, as families gather around the table of thanksgiving, it is especially appropriate that we pause as a Nation to acknowledge the blessings of love and fealty that families confer on their members and, through them, on the larger community.

It is also appropriate that we use this occasion to reflect on the truth that even though the family has proven to be the most durable of all institutions, its vitality is not guaranteed under all conditions. In the past few decades, as a host of new pressures have placed fresh strains on the health of family life in our society, a process of restoration has begun. Policymakers at all levels of government, and leaders in religion and the social sciences, are taking a closer look at the cultural and legal forces undermining the well-being of families. Recognition is at last being given to the fact that no strategy for reducing the tremendous costs of remedial efforts to combat crime and poverty will succeed if we fail to focus first on strengthening the family.

In the years to come, this process of rebuilding must continue. As it does so, we can all take heart in knowing that, to paraphrase a famous epigram, reports of the death of the family have been greatly exaggerated. For as long as the human heart wills to keep for itself a special place of understanding, welcome, and healing -- in short, a hearth and a home -- the family will endure and prosper.

Home care enhances life for people of all ages who are ill or disabled. The home should be the setting of first choice for care and treatment, because it is conducive to healing; in the home, family members can supply caring and love.

The combination of professional services with such situations can add to the effectiveness of home health care. National Home Care Week, 1988, reminds us of the good that results when families and home care providers put into practice the respect we all owe to everyone in need of such care.

In recent years, home care programs have grown in number and in importance in health care delivery. We should all be grateful that these programs enable millions of Americans to receive fine care at home. The employees and volunteers of home care agencies, private and public alike, need our cooperation and attention as they work with family members across our land to offer the excellent care patients at home require and deserve.

But this is truly a wonderful occasion, the culmination of years of hard work and remarkable generosity, and all of which was due to the good grace of the estimable board of trustees of this foundation. To the trustees and also to my dear friend Holmes Tuttle, I thank you for that and for a hundred other things the brief time I have here could not do justice to.

This is, of course, a most humbling moment for me. As my time in Washington draws to its close, I've had occasion to reflect on the astonishing journey I've been privileged to make from the banks of the Rock River and to this glorious site overlooking the mighty Pacific. The journey has not just been my own. It seems I've been guided by a force much larger than myself, a force made up of ideas and beliefs about what this country is and what it could be. The story that'll be told inside the walls that are yet to be built here is the story not only of a Presidency but of a movement -- a determined movement dedicated to the greatness of America and faith in its bedrock traditions; in the essential goodness of its people; in the essential soundness of its institutions; and, yes, faith in our very essence as a nation.

What we know best is this: We owe all we have to our forebears who built our land and our government and gave it to us as a sacred bequest. And today, in this stunning setting, we begin to pay our debt to them and to our own posterity by breaking ground for this library that will bear my name and house the collected ruminations and reflections of the Presidency that has borne my name as well.

I must say that it is not my Presidency, any more than the White House has belonged to me these 8 years. The Presidency of the United States is a trust -- a public trust from the great people of this land, who every 8 years vest that trust in someone who must be humble enough to do their will and firm enough to make sure their will is not thwarted by the twin demons of expediency and fear.

In the same way, I have vested my trust in thousands and thousands of women and men whose ideas of matters ranging from the seating arrangements at informal dinners outside the White House to a strategic defense against nuclear blackmail will form the archives of this administration -- this institution, I should say.

And what this library will house is the record of the ideas and policies that undergirded our accomplishments. These have, indeed, been years of intellectual ferment. They have featured discussions on the most important matters facing our nation: What kind of government should we have. How much government is too much government. How best to expand the frontiers of freedom around the world. How best to pay our national bills.

Yes, there'll be much to study here, much to discuss, and much to mull over. This library will allow scholars of the future to cast their own judgment on these years, and I would not presume to predict the result of their researches. But I have to believe that scholars of good will, upon examining the historical record that will be contained herein, will judge our efforts well. But as for us, at present we can only say this: We have done our best, and we pray it has been enough.

I would add just one thing that recently came to me in a letter. A man wrote and found it necessary to say this, and I'm pleased that he did. He said, you can go to live in another land -- you can go to live in France, but you can't become a Frenchman. You can go to live in Germany, but you can't become a German. You can go to live in Japan or Turkey, and you cannot become Japanese or Turkish. But anyone, from any corner of the world, can come to live in the United States and become an American.

I extend my congratulations to Prime Minister Brian Mulroney, whose Progressive Conservative Party won a majority of seats in the House of Commons in yesterday's Canadian national election. In recent years, relations between the United States and Canada have been marked by cooperative dialog and a remarkable record of mutually beneficial achievement.

The United States looks forward to working together with Canada to further strengthen the ties of friendship and cooperation between Canada and the United States. In particular, we look forward to the early implementation of the free trade agreement, which we believe will be a positive factor in the economic future of both countries and on the Uruguay round negotiations.

Fair and impartial governance is the hallmark of our constitutional democracy. Current laws concerning the conduct of current and former Federal employees were designed to secure that fairness and impartiality. They prohibit conduct that produces conflicts of interest between Federal employees' official duties and their personal interests. Specifically, current law is designed to prevent two primary abuses -- the misuse of confidential information or the exercise of improper influence over Government action by former Federal employees and less-than-faithful performance of official functions by current Federal employees to favor a future employer.

While there are some positive aspects of the bill, the Post-Employment Restrictions Act would have prohibited conduct of former Federal employees unrelated to genuine ethical concerns. In effect it would have punished them for their service to the Nation. For example, in certain circumstances, the bill would have prohibited a senior former employee of an agency from communicating with a senior current employee of a different agency with whom he is not personally acquainted to seek assistance his employer or client needs on a matter with which the former employee had absolutely nothing to do while in Federal employment. The bill would make that communication a Federal crime punishable by imprisonment and fines.

The law already precludes a former Federal official from representing private parties in specific matters in which that official was involved while in Government and also imposes a 1-year cooling-off period during which a former official generally cannot contact his agency on any matter. It is excessive and unjustifiable also to insist, as this bill would, that former officials not represent any client before any senior Executive official wherever located and no matter how unrelated to the former officials' Government service.

That kind of unnecessary and drastic criminal prohibition is unfair to those who have served their country. It is already difficult to recruit talented people into the senior ranks of Government. This bill would have begun to make former senior Federal employees unemployable in the private sector after their Government service. Many of the most talented might never sign up to serve their country, and the country would be the worse for it.

The bill also unreasonably favors the Congress with restrictions lighter than those that would apply to the Executive branch. Under the bill, all Executive branch employees would have been subject to certain prohibitions, but most congressional employees would have been subject to none. Even for senior congressional personnel, the restrictions would have been substantially less rigorous than the restrictions placed on Executive branch employees of equivalent responsibility. Members of Congress and senior staff would be subject only to 1-year cooling-off periods of very modest scope and would not be subject to the lifetime and 2-year particular matter bans currently imposed on all Executive branch officials. The Congress' relatively favorable treatment of itself in imposing restrictions in comparison with its treatment of the Executive branch may indicate some congressional recognition that a number of the bill's restrictions are overbroad and, to the extent of that overbreadth, unfair. In future consideration of post-employment restrictions legislation, the Congress should determine what restrictions are reasonable and necessary to protect the integrity of Government and then apply them equally to both the Congress and the Executive branch.

The limitations of offenses under H.R. 5043 to acts done for compensation also is of concern. There may be circumstances in which a current employee who misuses official authority or a former employee who misuses influence should be subject to penalties even though no compensation is involved. In that respect, the provisions of H.R. 5043 would have failed to reach conduct that should be prohibited and thus would have significantly weakened current law. The Attorney General and the Director of the Office of Government Ethics find this provision to be particularly objectionable.

I support several positive aspects of H.R. 5043 that would substantially improve the effectiveness of Federal post-employment restriction laws. The bill would have granted the Attorney General the power to seek civil penalties for violations of the post-employment restrictions and to obtain injunctions from Federal courts to prevent impending violations. The bill also would have permitted the Attorney General to distinguish between misdemeanor and felony violations of the restrictions in charging individuals. The bill also would have adjusted the 1-year ban on certain contacts with a former employee's former agency to make clear that it applies to matters in which the United States has a direct interest, even if that particular agency does not have a direct interest. Finally, the bill would have eliminated the compartmentalization of the Executive Office of the President for purposes of post-employment restrictions. I urge that future legislation on post-employment restrictions incorporate these positive aspects of H.R. 5043.

Above all, in considering future post-employment restrictions legislation, the Congress should focus on drafting legislation that will be clear and understandable to current, former, and future Federal employees. The bill would create a confusing patchwork of different requirements for seven categories of covered officials: ``senior'', ``other senior'', ``very senior'', all Executive branch, Members of Congress, congressional employees, and former Presidents and Vice Presidents. The law should be clear so that employees joining the Government will understand what will be expected of them when they leave, former employees will know reliably the limits on their conduct, and Federal officials charged with enforcing the law and providing advice can discharge their duties effectively.

In withholding my approval of H.R. 5043, I am well aware that there will be criticisms. But I must act on this bill according to my judgment of what is best for the country. While this bill would not have affected me or my Administration, it is fundamentally flawed and would have made securing good government for America substantially more difficult. I urge the Congress and the new Administration to address effectively and fairly the standards of conduct for Federal employees when the Congress convenes.

These laws should be fair, impartial, easily understood, and should not erect barriers to public service. The hallmark of our democracy is a government that serves the people, and our citizens deserve the most talented and dedicated public officials that are available. They also deserve public servants who do not misuse their positions. We support laws that protect and encourage a high-caliber government work force at all levels and does so in a fair and equitable manner.

President calls on the new Congress and the President-elect to consider a fair and effective law that strengthens existing statutes without the inequities of the Post-Employment Restrictions Act. While there are some good provisions in this bill, and even though it would not apply to President Reagan and this administration, the President will withhold his approval of H.R. 5043. The President recognizes that this disapproval may not be good politics, but it is good government. However well-intentioned, this bill would seriously impair the Government's ability to recruit and retain skilled, experienced personnel. It would add a new layer of complexity, making it even more difficult for honest government employees to understand the restrictions on them.

While this bill includes the first attempt to extend ethics statutes to include the Congress, it is not enough. It still perpetuates a double standard in the treatment of executive branch personnel versus Members of Congress and staff.

Ironically, a major failing of this bill is that it weakens current law by applying only to lobbying activities that result in compensation. The Attorney General and the Office of Government Ethics recommended a veto of this bill for the above reason. In addition, no member of the Cabinet recommended approval.

The new law would bar contact by most White House staff and Executive Levels I and II Agency personnel with any executive in government -- I repeat, any executive in government. The result must be obvious. Instead of extending a welcome hand to talented people to spend time in the Government, this provision says: Warning, government service may be hazardous to your career. It's a warning that can only lead to a government that never feels the invigorating influence of new blood. The incentive is to leave government, not to join it.

Thoreau once wrote, ``are the treasured wealth of the world, the inheritance of generations and nations.'' In the love of books and the accumulated learning they represent lie the heritage and the hope of mankind. For us in America, that love by tradition and experience has been a decisive force in our existence and development as a free people. We proclaimed it so for all eternity in the First Amendment to our Constitution, and we proved it so at the dawn of the American Revolution when we chose as our foremost weapon the printing press.

National Book Week, we pause to recall all that books have had to do not only with the founding and building of this land, but also with the transmission of those ideas and practical achievements that form the basis of our culture.

Published maps, journals, and accounts of explorers, adventurers, and missionaries inspired the early pioneers to follow them across new horizons of discovery in the Americas. Likewise, the writings of political philosophers and scholars from ancient times onward imparted wisdom and knowledge to the lovers of liberty who declared our country's independence. Another book, the Bible, gave them enduring inspiration and deep confidence in the transcendent value of their struggle.

Anyone who doubts the power or permanence of books need only look today at countries around the world where the mere composition, printing, binding, and distribution of a book is a prosecutable act of defiance against the state.

Even the rulers of these regimes must secretly acknowledge the futility of their aims. For the printed word is an implacable enemy of tyranny, whether that tyranny comes in the form of official censorship by government or fashionable neglect by academia. In every society, the goals of education must include such a wide experience of the best books that intellectual independence and critical thinking become the natural assets of each citizen.

We can all resolve during National Book Week to take stock of our own reading practices and our attentiveness to sharing books with others, especially the young. Technological change and specialized publications -- electronic books, braille and large-print media for the visually impaired, recorded books and other forms -- have greatly increased the accessibility of all kinds of literature. Promoting even broader dissemination of book learning, including efforts to achieve 100 percent literacy in our Nation, is the proper concern of all Americans. Truly we owe it to future generations to understand, preserve, and pass on the wisdom of the ages found only in books.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-third day of November, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and thirteenth.

Over the years, our Nation has benefited greatly from persons who have developed their vocational and technical skills and used those skills in helping to build strong and vibrant communities. Today, America's industries and businesses are facing new challenges in a more competitive international environment, and to continue to prosper they must achieve a higher level of innovation and productivity than ever before. To assist in meeting this challenge, young people must have a firm foundation in the basic skills that will enable them to fill jobs that require advanced vocational and technical training.

Various studies have projected that the future job market will consist more and more of such technically intensive occupations. If our economy is to have a sufficient crop of candidates for these occupations, it must be able to rely upon a large and growing pool of trained vocational educators. Fortunately, there are dozens of State and national groups committed to quality education in vocational specialties, and these groups are attuned to economic trends and supportive of professional educators in the technical-vocational fields. General public awareness is important, too. During Vocational-Technical Education Week, all Americans can pause to consider the need for strong vocational education programs that enjoy the full support of our communities.

This week, as we prepared for Thanksgiving, Canada held an important election, and I'm pleased to again send my congratulations to Prime Minister Mulroney. One of the important issues in the Canadian election was trade. And like our own citizens earlier this month, our neighbors have sent a strong message, rejecting protectionism and reaffirming that more trade, not less, is the wave of the future.

Here in America, as we reflect on the many things we have to be grateful for, we should take a moment to recognize that one of the key factors behind our nation's great prosperity is the open trade policy that allows the American people to freely exchange goods and services with free people around the world. The freedom to trade is not a new issue for America. In 1776 our Founding Fathers signed the Declaration of Independence, charging the British with a number of offenses, among them, and I quote, ``cutting off our trade with all parts of the world,'' end quote.

And that same year, a Scottish economist named Adam Smith launched another revolution with a book entitled ``The Wealth of Nations,'' which exposed for all time the folly of protectionism. Over the past 200 years, not only has the argument against tariffs and trade barriers won nearly universal agreement among economists but it has also proven itself in the real world, where we have seen free-trading nations prosper while protectionist countries fall behind.

America's most recent experiment with protectionism was a disaster for the working men and women of this country. When Congress passed the Smoot-Hawley tariff in 1930, we were told that it would protect America from foreign competition and save jobs in this country -- the same line we hear today. The actual result was the Great Depression, the worst economic catastrophe in our history; one out of four Americans were thrown out of work. Two years later, when I cast my first ballot for President, I voted for Franklin Delano Roosevelt, who opposed protectionism and called for the repeal of that disastrous tariff.

Ever since that time, the American people have stayed true to our heritage by rejecting the siren song of protectionism. In recent years, the trade deficit led some misguided politicians to call for protectionism, warning that otherwise we would lose jobs. But they were wrong again. In fact, the United States not only didn't lose jobs, we created more jobs than all the countries of Western Europe, Canada, and Japan combined. The record is clear that when America's total trade has increased, American jobs have also increased. And when our total trade has declined, so have the number of jobs.

Part of the difficulty in accepting the good news about trade is in our words. We too often talk about trade while using the vocabulary of war. In war, for one side to win, the other must lose. But commerce is not warfare. Trade is an economic alliance that benefits both countries. There are no losers, only winners. And trade helps strengthen the free world.

Yet today protectionism is being used by some American politicians as a cheap form of nationalism, a fig leaf for those unwilling to maintain America's military strength and who lack the resolve to stand up to real enemies -- countries that would use violence against us or our allies. Our peaceful trading partners are not our enemies; they are our allies. We should beware of the demagogs who are ready to declare a trade war against our friends -- weakening our economy, our national security, and the entire free world -- all while cynically waving the American flag. The expansion of the international economy is not a foreign invasion; it is an American triumph, one we worked hard to achieve, and something central to our vision of a peaceful and prosperous world of freedom.

After the Second World War, America led the way to dismantle trade barriers and create a world trading system that set the stage for decades of unparalleled economic growth. And in one week, when important multilateral trade talks are held in Montreal, we will be in the forefront of efforts to improve this system. We want to open more markets for our products, to see to it that all nations play by the rules, and to seek improvement in such areas as dispute resolution and agriculture. We also want to bring the benefits of free trade to new areas, including services, investment, and the protection of intellectual property. Our negotiators will be working hard for all of us.

Yes, back in 1776, our Founding Fathers believed that free trade was worth fighting for. And we can celebrate their victory because today trade is at the core of the alliance that secure the peace and guarantee our freedom; it is the source of our prosperity and the path to an even brighter future for America.

The President. Well, you recognize that officially it didn't make any difference whether I did or not because, under the law, that is the province of the Secretary of State. But, yes, I agree very much with his decision.

President announced today his determination with respect to the Department of Commerce's investigation of the impact of imports of antifriction bearings on the national security. After reviewing the Department's initial report and the supplemental Commerce/Defense assessment of the impact of recent administration initiatives on the industry, the President approved the recommended finding of the Secretary of Commerce that antifriction bearings are not being imported into the United States in such quantities or under such circumstances as to threaten to impair the national security.

Commerce forwarded to the President his investigation of the effect of antifriction bearing imports on the national security. This study was conducted under section 232 of the Trade Expansion Act of 1962, as amended. It found that bearings are essential components in virtually all machinery and equipment and that the domestic bearing industry would be able to meet most, but not all, national security requirements in the event of a major conventional war.

August 5, 1988, the President accepted the Secretary of Commerce's recommendation and deferred a final decision pending a supplemental assessment by the Departments of Defense and Commerce of the impact of a number of current administration initiatives on the bearing industry's ability to meet national security needs. This assessment has been completed and has found that conditions for the industry have improved since the July report.

Soldier, author, orator, and statesman, Sir Winston Churchill was one of the towering figures of our century. A man of powerful intellect and deep personal courage, his fierce dedication to freedom changed the course of modern history and left his countrymen, and people everywhere, with an immortal example of the invincibility of the human spirit.

Winston's unflagging pursuit of his vision of a world freed from the threat of tyranny rallied his countrymen to their ``finest hour.'' In the darkest days of World War II, his eloquent speeches and his tenacious character spurred the citizens and fighting men on both sides of the Atlantic to continue their struggle until victory was finally won.

The qualities that stood England in good stead during the War had been formed many years earlier, during Churchill's military service in Cuba, India, Egypt, and South Africa, where he wrote the brilliant dispatches and accounts that first brought him to the attention of the domestic populace. These writings, plus additional biographical and autobiographical works, were the precursors of his celebrated multi-volume history of World War II and the four-volume A History of the English-Speaking Peoples. Both his actions and his writings bear witness to the seriousness with which he took Santayana's observation that those who cannot remember the past are condemned to repeat it. For his achievements in the world of letters, he was awarded the Nobel Prize in literature in 1953.

The close ties that Churchill forever championed between the people of the United States and Great Britain are evident in the details of his personal biography. He was the son of Randolph Churchill, a British citizen, and Jennie Churchill, an American. In his correspondence and books, in his speeches and his travels, he was a consistent and forceful advocate of transatlantic cooperation and unity. He saw our nations as joined by historic destiny in the struggle to prevent the drawing down of the curtain of tyranny over all mankind. On April 9, 1963, 2 years before his death, the United States recognized the extraordinary contributions of Sir Winston Churchill and granted him honorary American citizenship. It is wholly fitting that our Nation pause again to honor a great friend of liberty for whom no final word of praise and thanks may ever be written.

President today announced his intention to appoint Paul B. Henry to serve in an advisory capacity as a member of the Board of Trustees of the James Madison Memorial Fellowship Foundation for a term of 2 years.

My friends, we need have no regrets; we deserve to be proud. Day in and day out, you faced the opposition and fought the tough battles. In fact, when I told Bob Hope I was coming here tonight, he thought I was to do a U.S.O. show.

I want to also salute the Senate spouses. Between the considerable work that you do and your campaign efforts and the terrible work hours those Senators keep, I think you, the spouses, have been nothing less than valiant.

Well, to those just elected to the Senate -- and I worked with most of you in the past -- it was great to see you along the campaign trail. We're so glad you made it, and I know that great things lie in store for you. To those of you who are leaving office, let me say, again, thank you. Life is a book with many chapters. You have written great things in that book which no one can erase, and your greatest chapters still lie ahead. And to all of you who will continue to serve in this great body, the foundation of our great Republic, I know that you will continue to do honor to America and that you will give George Bush the same friendship, support, and solidarity that you gave me.

No one of us could have done it alone, and had we been divided, we would have failed. But together, with the leadership, courage, and unity of the Senate Republicans, we have succeeded beyond anyone's expectations. And for what each of you have done, you have my personal gratitude and that of a grateful nation.

And as I prepare to return to California, nothing has meant so much to me as the knowledge that Bob Dole and George Bush and Dan Quayle, each one of you, and our whole Republican team will be working together for the values we share and the future that stands before us.

We're counting on you to help secure for our children the brightest future the world has ever known, to help keep a promise that is as old as this land we love and as big as the sky. It's the American vision of creating a new nation of free people, a country that would be a light unto the nations, and a shining city upon a hill. It is that vision that brought each one of us here to Washington, and I know that you each will keep faith with that great American dream that burns within our souls and within the soul of every American.

Nancy and I will never forget you and what you have meant to us. You've been good friends. You've served America with honor. You've made me proud of our party. And if you ever find yourself driving down the Pacific Coast Highway, I hope you will come on by, because up at Rancho del Cielo, where the mountains meet the sky, you have a friend.

I've been looking forward to this meeting with you for a number of reasons, but probably the best one is my belief that most problems can be solved when people are talking to each other instead of about each other.

Now, you know a speaker usually tries to establish in his own mind some relationship between himself and his audience or, put another way, why he or she is addressing a particular group. Well, I could say it is traditional for the President to address the White House Conference on Aging, but there's in my case a better answer. We're of the same generation. And we have met to counsel together on matters of mutual interest.

You know, when we were much younger, we defined a generation in a rather narrow sense. We perceived it as almost limited to our classmates. And then, as the number of candles on the birthday cakes increased, so did the breadth of our generation. As long-time adults, we now perceive our generation, as we call it, as including all those within several years on either side of our own age. And that is as it should be, for as adults, we've worked together to achieve common goals in our work, in our communities, and in our nation.

Well now, having established the parameters of our generation, let me say a few words about us. It's right that each generation looks at the preceding one and is critical of its shortcomings. We were when it was our turn, and as a young generation will challenge our mores and customs, will question our values, as we did before them when we were young. But as the years pass, we learn not to cast aside proven values simply because they're old. At least we should learn that if civilization is to continue.

In those troubled times when no one was boasting about only living a stone's throw from the campus, I, as Governor, couldn't go on our campuses in California without causing a demonstration. And then one day the student body presidents of our nine university campuses and some of their other student officers asked to have a meeting with me. Well, I was delighted. I said yes, because I was anxious to establish some kind of communication. They arrived, some of them were barefoot, all of them were in T-shirts and jeans. And when we were all seated -- maybe I should say slouched -- [laughter] -- their spokesman opened the meeting.

Well, you know, usually in a situation of that kind you don't think of the right answer until the meeting's over and you're at home, and then it's too late. But he went on in that vein just long enough for the Lord to provide the right words. And when he finished I said, ``You're absolutely right. We didn't have those things when we were growing up. We invented them.'' And I was right, because almost everything he was talking about had come into being in our adult lifetime.

Yes, our generation has made mistakes and possibly fallen short at times. But we need apologize to no one. Only a few times in history is a single generation called upon to preside over a great period of transition, and our generation, yours and mine, has been one of those rare generations. We have gone literally, in our lifetime, from the horse and buggy to journeys to the Moon. We've known four wars and a great worldwide depression in our lifetime. We have fought harder and paid a higher price for freedom and done more to advance the dignity of man than any people who ever lived.

Having said what I have, maybe you can understand my frustration over the last couple of years -- during the campaign and now in this office I hold -- to be portrayed as somehow an enemy of my own generation. Most of the attack has been centered around one issue, social security. There's been political demagoguery and outright falsehood, and as a result, many who rely on social security for their livelihood have been needlessly and cruelly frightened. And those who did that frightening either didn't know what they were talking about or they were deliberately lying.

In October of 1980, as a candidate, I pledged that I would try to restore the integrity of social security and to do so without penalty to those dependent on that program. I have kept that pledge and intend to keep it -- both parts of it. We will not betray those entitled to social security benefits, and we will -- indeed, we must -- put social security on a sound financial base.

A recent poll showed that 59 percent of the people were willing to pay a higher tax in order to be sure of social security's continuation. Almost as many, 54 percent, have expressed mistrust and a lack of confidence that the program will be there when their time comes.

Well, let me take up that matter of increased tax. The answer to the problem isn't that simple. We already have an increase. It was passed in 1977, and I don't think very many people are aware that it calls for a series of increases -- one in this coming January and several more, automatically, over the next 5 years.

Now, I'm not pointing out these facts because I want to scare anyone. I agree with what Congressman Claude Pepper has said, that this country is big enough and able enough to provide for those who have served it and who now have come to their time of retirement. But we can't afford -- and what we were trying to correct in our original proposal -- we can't afford to support, as disabled, people who are not disabled or educate from social security funds young people who come from families of great affluence and wealth. And this we've been doing. I had hoped that our proposal would have been taken as a beginning point for bipartisan solution of the problem. I was led to believe by others that it would. Well, that didn't happen.

Social security can and will be saved. It will require the best efforts of both parties and of both the executive and legislative branches of government. The future is too important -- the future of social security for it to be used as a political football.

It's for this reason that I have withdrawn our proposal and have established a bipartisan Task Force on Social Security Reform. The Task Force will consist of 15 members -- 5 appointed by the President, 5 by the Senate Majority Leader Baker, and 5 by Speaker of the House Tip O'Neill. The mandate of the Task Force is an important one. Time and again in the past, studies of the social security system have been made that pointed out the problems -- but nothing further was done. This must not happen again.

The charge of the Task Force will be to work with the Congress and the President, not only to propose realistic, long-term reforms to put social security back on a sound financial footing but also to forge a working, bipartisan consensus so that the necessary reforms will be passed into law.

The business of the Task Force on Social Security Reform is urgent. I will shortly be announcing appointments to it, and I hope that Majority Leader Baker and Speaker O'Neill will act promptly to select the remaining members. And I pledge my fullest cooperation to make the Task Force's mission a success.

We want the elderly needy, like all needy Americans, to know that they have a government and a citizenry that cares about them and will protect them. Their basic human needs must be met with compassion as well as efficiency. This, too, is a goal that I have set for our administration.

It's fashionable just now to talk about the graying of America. And if you go by the numbers, we are indeed a people growing older in years. Today, one American in five, more than 45 million in all, is over 55. By the year 2000, there will be another 10 million of us. But the American people are not just growing older; we're also growing healthier. Our years of full, active life are increasing -- thanks to the countless historic breakthroughs our nation has made in science, medicine, technology, economic opportunity, and education in this century. And here again our generation can take pride in the contributions we made to bring that about.

Today's young people, many instances, don't even know the names of diseases that plagued mankind when we were young and that have been eliminated by discoveries made again in our adult lifetime. Many of these breakthroughs were made by senior citizens who are still with us and will be for many years to come, enjoying the well-earned fruits of their own labor as researchers, educators, inventors, businessmen, or average men and women whose work in shops, factories, and farms helped make America possible.

But make no mistake, this growing older of Americans is an asset. The so-called senior market plays a key role in consumer spending and saving. One-fifth of the population, the over 55's, account for 27 percent of all consumer spending. Internal Revenue Service figures show that almost half, 46 percent of all the reported saving account interest is earned by people over 65 although they are only 11 percent of the population. Senior savers and senior spenders are a vital and positive part of the economy and are playing a positive role in our program for economic recovery. It couldn't succeed without us.

Here, as elsewhere, the state of the aging is bound together with the state of the nation. We cannot have a healthy society without a healthy economy. Young and old alike, Americans have suffered too long from the combined burden of runaway inflation and an ever heavier tax burden. This destructive cycle has fed on itself. The same taxes and inflation that directly undermine the earning power of individual Americans also drive down productivity and economic growth nationwide.

Because of the graduated tax rate, each 10-percent increase in inflation pushes tax receipts up 17 percent. The taxpayers have that much less money to spend; Washington has that much more to squander; and the economy suffers another blow from the twin evils of inflation and stagnation. The only way to put an end to this disastrous cycle, a cycle that hits Americans on fixed incomes the hardest, is to make real cuts in spending and taxes.

And this administration has made a beginning. It's only a beginning, but the initial signals are encouraging. The inflation rate, as measured by the Consumer Price Index, has fallen from 12.4 percent in 1980 to 9.6 percent in the first 10 months of this year. And last month's figures marked the lowest rate of increase in 15 months. If we could hold to last month's increase cost, we would be down to a 4.4 percent inflation rate.

There was also improvement at the wholesale level, with prices rising at a 7\1/2\-percent annual rate, down from 11.8 in 1980. Now, this is especially important, because a decline in wholesale prices now usually means further relief for the consumer as wholesale goods reach the retail market down the line a ways.

Older Americans have also begun to benefit from our tax relief measures. The Economic Recovery Tax Act of 1981 will mean further relief from inflation and taxation, amounting to a 25-percent cut in personal income taxes over 3 years. And starting in 1985, personal tax rates and exemptions will be indexed to keep up with the cost of living so that just a cost-of-living increase won't move you into a higher tax bracket. Inflation will no longer push old and young Americans into ever-higher tax rates through bracket creep.

None of this relief from taxation and inflation would be possible if we ignored the problem of runaway government spending. This administration is serious. We have cut back the increased rate of government spending. We're convinced that the Nation's economy cannot heal itself unless the Federal Government begins to put its own house back in order.

But while cutting spending, we have safeguarded services to those poor and elderly who depend on the Government. In the field of health care and human services, Federal spending is actually up by over 15 percent in 1981 and about another 10 percent in 1982. Elderly Americans making up 11 percent of our population will receive 28 percent of the Federal budget in this present fiscal year.

Our administration has also supported reauthorization of the Older Americans Act. The act helps older Americans keep up their independence through a wide variety of home- and community-based services, such as home health care, transportation, meals, and counseling. We're also working on improvements to the program that'll make it an even more effective means of strengthening the dignity and independence of the elderly.

Ours is a generation rich in experience as well as in years. We've been tried and tested. And we've also benefited from a surge of human progress that our parents and our grandparents could never even have imagined.

Now, I happen to be an optimist. I believe attitudes toward the elderly are getting better, not worse. And the polls seem to bear this out. One recent survey revealed that 65 percent of the younger work force now rejects the notion of requiring older workers to retire. Well, this is a dramatic turnaround from just 7 years ago. Then a plurality of younger workers took the opposite view. So, as some Americans grow older, America itself seems to be growing a little bit wiser and a little more tolerant.

You know, Cicero said, ``If it weren't for elderly citizens correcting the errors of the young, the state would perish.'' In those days of the generation gap that I mentioned earlier, it was almost as if our young rebels saw the generations as horizontal, each generation separated from the other like slices from a sausage. Well, humankind is vertical. Each generation sees farther than the one before, because it's standing on the shoulders of those who have gone before.

I look forward to receiving the results of your work here in this Conference. Now, I've been dwelling on the problems of concern for the members of our generation, problems I know that you will be considering. But may I ask also -- and maybe it isn't necessary to ask -- that you give your counsel with regard also to how we of our generation, in this time of danger to our nation and to the world, can be of help to this blessed land that we've already served so faithfully and so well.

The President today designated Fred M. Zeder II to serve as Personal Representative of the President to conduct negotiations on the future political status of the Trust Territory of the Pacific Islands. In addition, the President also announced his intention to nominate Mr. Zeder for the rank of Ambassador while serving in that capacity. He would succeed Peter R. Rosenblatt.

President Reagan met for 45 minutes this afternoon with President Sese Seko Mobutu of Zaire in the Oval Office. He welcomed the opportunity to learn more about the interests and concerns of this important African country and friend of the United States. The meeting was friendly and open. Among the issues discussed were Namibia and Chad, where the President praised Zaire's contribution to a peaceful solution. They also discussed Zaire's need for the cooperation of friendly states, including the United States and our European allies, as well as international organizations in working to develop its economy and reinforce its national security.

There was a mutual understanding of the need for strengthening Zaire's economic institutions and the armed forces. The President told President Mobutu that the United States is prepared to help Zaire achieve its development and security goals while recognizing that those goals require some difficult decisions, such as those now being taken and planned by the Zairian Government, particularly in improved administration. There was agreement on the importance of the private sector as a force for economic development.

The President suggested to the Teamsters leaders today that he was considering the question of whether or not the controllers who have been fired should continue to be barred from any Federal employment for a 3-year period, as is currently the case. Before making any decision, the President wishes to confer with the Secretary of Transportation.

The President today appointed the following individuals to be members of the President's Council on Physical Fitness and Sports. The President has previously announced the appointment of George Allen as Chairman.

I think I got up here too soon. I think I'm supposed to wait until they're all ready. You said 2 minutes? I don't know whether I've got enough ad lib material to go for 2 minutes -- [laughter] -- until we get down to the important message.

Well, I can say that I can spend some time thanking all of you for being here and for doing what you're doing. I think it's of great importance, and I have been telling some audiences here and there around the country of the response that we're getting and the mail that we're getting and the spirit of the people out there and their desire to participate in something of the kind that you are bringing together here.

Looking over this distinguished group today, I'm not sure Thomas Jefferson could match this team. I know I can't. We're glad that you're here and thankful that leaders of your caliber strongly support our administration's commitment to strengthen private sector initiatives.

What we're asking you to do is to help rediscover America -- not the America bound by the Potomac River, but the America beyond the Potomac River, the America whose initiative, ingenuity, and industry made our country the envy of the world, the America whose rich tradition of generosity began with simple acts of neighbor caring for neighbor.

We're asking you to build on this heritage to encourage greater contributions of voluntary effort and personal involvement, to form a partnership between the private and public sector for the good of America. We want you to seek out models for private sector initiatives -- schools, churches, civic groups, businesses, unions, the foundations -- and give them the recognition that they deserve. Help us identify the obstacles government has placed in the way of private initiative and make recommendations to me for the removal of those obstacles and the introduction of needed incentives.

Finally, we think a wonderful legacy of this task force could be the creation of thousands of local task forces just like yours, one for every town in America, to carry on the work that you will begin today. And I've learned enough just sitting here at lunch to know that some of you on your own have already been doing just exactly that same thing, even -- with regard to the Federated Women -- internationally.

You can help revive the sense of community which has been the hallmark of America but which recently has been weakened by the growth of big government. Americans should never have to consider themselves wards of the state. They're members of their communities, and the answers to their problems can be found on the streets where they live.

Your job, as I see it, is not to try to solve these problems or to spend a lot of time writing one of those thick reports, although I know that there is going to be a report, so I won't say that I don't want any report at all. No, I'm very curious; I'd like to know. But also, I'm going to be settling for results. And that's why each one of you was enlisted -- leaders from every walk of life who have to solve these problems every day.

Your success will be measured by how much and how well you marshall the private resources of America in the service of community development. I'm told that Americans perform some $100 billion worth of labor every year for volunteer organizations across the country, and that's in addition to the $47 billion they contribute in cash to charitable and religious organizations.

The country is bursting with ideas and creativity, but a government run by central decree has no way to respond. People want to play a part in building a better America, and you can show the way. You are their colleagues, their friends, and you can talk with them and work with them just as I want to talk and work with you.

When I spoke to the National Alliance of Businessmen [Business], I mentioned several outstanding models of corporate responsibility and community spirit. But for every one I mentioned, I know there are a hundred more, just as good. Find them. Spread the word. Help 230 million Americans get organized. Help us create new leadership at the State and local level, a new Alliance for Progress here at home. Help us put America's future back in the people's hands.

I know your Chairman, Bill Verity, has excellent ideas on how these things can be done. And each of you brings expertise and experience to our enterprise as well. We look to you, we appreciate you and, most of all, we're counting on you. We're confident that this task can be done and that your task force is the group to do it.

So, again, a heartfelt thanks. And maybe you can cure the misconception that has existed since a few years ago, when an immigrant to this country who had become a very successful farmer, died and left his estate -- it was not in seven figures at all -- but left his estate to the government, the United States Government, for what this country had done for him.

It is with deep regret that I accept your resignation as Assistant to the President for Legislative Affairs. Your energy, ability, and dedication have played a key role in translating our economic recovery program into legislative reality. We could not have done it without you, and I am sure that the members and leaders of the Congress share my admiration for the excellent job you have performed over the past ten months.

We have been through some historic times together; your contribution will long be remembered. I know that you will bring the same outstanding qualities to bear on your new duties as Consul General to Bermuda. Nancy and I wish you and Priscilla all the best in this new phase of a distinguished public service career.

It has been one of the most significant and pleasurable years of my life to have served you in this capacity during a session of Congress which I believe will rank historically as one of major and longlasting significance for our country.

Under your leadership, the nation has embarked on a course leading again to full economic health, and I consider the passage of your Economic Recovery Program to be a milestone in the course you have charted for the United States.

I believe that we have one of the finest White House congressional relations staffs in the history of this office and one that will continue to produce satisfactory results during the remainder of your term of office.

He is cofounder and member, National Conference of Hispanic Law Enforcement Officers Association, and a member of the National Hispanic Corrections Association. He is also cofounder and member, Involvement of Mexican Americans in Gainful Endeavors.

I would like to extend my heartfelt thanks to the more than 4,000 delegates and observers who traveled from across the country and around the world to participate in the 1981 White House Conference on Aging.

Above all, this Conference has been a forum for the open exchange of ideas. For the past 3 days, an impressive cross section of older Americans has grappled with the many critical problems which affect the aging. Their goal has not necessarily been to reach unanimous agreement on every issue, but rather to share diverse views and arrive at recommendations for the common good.

The challenge before us is to develop policies for older Americans which are constructive, comprehensive, and compassionate. I know that all White House Conference delegates have taken this responsibility seriously. However, their work does not stop with the adjournment of the final plenary session of the 1981 Conference. They will continue their constructive analysis upon return to their communities by completing a unique system of post-Conference reports to be submitted to Secretary Schweiker within 30 days of adjournment. This period of analysis will provide delegates an opportunity for an in-depth, detailed study of the individual Conference reports prior to the submission of thoughtful commentary and specific views.

I salute all the Conference delegates and observers for their unselfish contributions and for making the 1981 Conference a productive, memorable event. I look forward to receiving the final Conference report.

The intercommunal negotiations between Greek Cypriots and Turkish Cypriots have taken a significant step. Both sides accepted presentation of a United Nations ``evaluation'' of the status of the intercommunal talks on November 18. The ``evaluation,'' although not a formal proposal, embodies ideas and concepts which may prove useful for the parties in their discussion of outstanding issues.

Following the presentation of proposals earlier this summer by the Turkish Cypriots (August 5) and the Greek Cypriots (September 9), the development of the United Nations ``evaluation'' signals continuing progress towards a negotiated settlement of the Cyprus problem. The United Nations, the Special Representative of the Secretary General, Ambassador Hugo Gobbi, and the participating parties are to be commended for their efforts. We hope that both parties will seize the opportunity offered by the United Nations ``evaluation'' to devote renewed energy to resolving their differences by peaceful negotiation in a spirit of compromise.

The President. Well, I'm happy to have a chance to say welcome, and particularly when there are at least six here from California. But all of you are just as welcome. I know you've been briefed on a number of subjects, and so almost anything that I might say would be plowing ground that's already been plowed. And yet I will do that, just to put emphasis on one, and that is what I think is the overall problem here of trying to get control of Federal spending and a realistic approach to the budget.

We're now into the 14th month that we've been without a budget. Our entire year of '81 went through with nothing but continuing resolutions and no budget. And we're now 2 months into this fiscal year, and still no budget. And I frankly don't know of a State that has ever run itself that way. Part of it is evident reluctance of some to see any curb put on Federal spending. So, we're still working on that.

Let me just say that with regard to our program, which has only just now begun to be put into effect, contrary to the impression that a lot of people seem to have had that it's been tried and found wanting and is a failure, and that was decided before it started -- we don't believe it is, and we think that some of the signs are very encouraging already.

The President. No, I think with regard to the veterans, we were talking about medical benefits for the veterans and so forth. And I do believe that this is a contract that you have to take care of those who have served their country. Social security -- what I said to them was -- and this was the basis of the plan that we submitted, but which was widely distorted in the debate that followed and I think for pure political demagoguery -- that all the way through the campaign I cited the immediate problem of social security, of its running out of funds, and the long-range actuarial imbalance which is in the trillions of dollars, if you look on down the road, for those people who are just beginning their working years.

What I pledged to do was to have a social security -- to put it on a sound fiscal basis, and yet not at the expense of those people who are presently retired; that you pull the rug out from under them and reduce their benefits. The only thing that could be called a reduction in any way in the proposal we made, of those existing benefits, was we were going to try and get social security onto the fiscal year basis with regard to the cost-of-living adjustment. That would mean that for 1 year alone, they would go 15 months instead of 12 before their cost-of-living adjustment was computed. And that would, as we figured it out, average probably a $90 reduction of increase, not a reduction of existing benefits, reduction of their increase over their lifetime. That would be the only single thing.

The other things that we had suggested in that program were not aimed at deserving and eligible recipients. They were aimed at the abuses in the program, people that are collecting disability benefits and are not disabled. A recent story of a family, a heartbreaking story, that made it look as if we had suddenly taken this family off disability benefits -- and we looked into it to find out if this was true. We found out they were taken off of their disability benefits under the previous administration, and they were taken off because for 3 years, the disabled household head had been working. And now the question is, working, moonlighting on the side -- a check is being made to see whether he was paying income tax all that time.

This is the type of thing that we think there's much more of it than anyone realizes, as was evidenced in Chicago a couple of years ago with the -- or a few years ago -- with the welfare queen who went on trial. And it was found that in addition to collecting welfare under 123 different names, she also had 55 social security cards. So, this is where we were going to try and make some of the changes.

Q. Mr. President, a regional question. What do you see as the Federal role with regard to California in terms of the Medfly, which is a terribly expensive battle, and also the vast number of refugees from Asia that have moved into, particularly, Los Angeles? What do you see as the role there to perform?

The President. Well, we've been dealing with a reform of the immigration laws on all of this, except that with regard to the refugees -- people who are fleeing persecution and who, if they were made to return to their own country, would probably face death or imprisonment -- I think that our traditions -- there's no way that we can abandon those traditions or the words that are on the base of the Statue of Liberty. And we have a particular problem, I know, with our neighbor to the South. But we think that this program is going to meet our needs and the needs of the refugees coming in, so that we won't be abandoning that. We are also looking at how we can handle these and probably a fairer distribution in our country.

I know, in 1980 -- the administration then was caught by the great exodus from Cuba in addition to the Haitian overflow and so forth. No planning had been made for that. We're also looking at available sites and facilities for a detention center for those who are apprehended and are illegal aliens, who will probably be returned.

Q. Mr. President, one of the potential detention centers that you're considering is in northern New York, where I'm from, where the climate is about as different as you can get from the Haitian climate and still be in the country. How humane is it to consider that, a site like that?

The President. Well, I know the climate problem, and we've thought about that and talked about it. One of our problems is finding a facility that would have all the factors and the capacity that we need for estimated larger numbers, and also finding one that the inhabitants of the State would be willing -- you'd be surprised how difficult it is to find some State that wants it.

We think that the one that we have settled on not only meets the needs, but also happens to be in an area that would benefit economically from having an installation of that kind there because of the abnormally high unemployment rate, economic problems.

The President. To tell you the truth, I can't answer that right now. We have not come in with the -- we have not had our meeting yet with the new presentation from OMB of suggested budget cuts for `83, so until we do, I don't know just how some of these problems have been treated.

Q. Mr. President, is there any thought being given to changing the make-up or the limits of your safety net in light of the recession? Any thought being given to changing any of the benefits that have been cut or restoring any?

This recession -- remember that when we came here, January 20th, we had a great unemployment problem, severe in several areas far more than in others. It's easy to look at, say, an 8 percent inflation rate and think of that as the nation as a whole. That isn't true. We have States, and some of you are probably from those States, where inflation is approaching the 20 percent mark. That's like the Great Depression of the thirties, due to the particular industries that have been affected -- in addition to construction, the steel industry, automobiles, and so forth.

We think that the best thing that we can do is to go forward with this plan, which we think is going to stimulate the economy. I think we're due, for several months yet, of hard times, but I think that in `82 we're going to see -- later in the year -- a change in the situation. The falling interest rates indicate that -- the inflation rates that I mentioned -- so that I think the safety net is still there for those people of real need.

Let me just say one thing about that particular problem. I was as surprised as anyone when suddenly the announcement was made that in a month we've increased the unemployed by 500,000. Now, as you know, there's no accurate way of counting the unemployed. There is an accurate way of counting the people who are in the work force. And it's difficult for me to understand this sudden surge of unemployment when, at the same time, there are 266,000 more people employed in the work force than there were on January 20th, when this administration started. I can't believe that we've suddenly added three-quarters of a million people to our population.

But let me point out one reason why there could be some fluctuations. First of all, any unemployed, other than those who are voluntarily between jobs, is too much. So, I don't want to sound callous about that. As a matter of fact, there's nothing that is harder for me to do than to think of putting somebody out of a job. I came into the work force myself in the depths of the Great Depression. I saw what took place there.

The millions of unemployed are not, all of them, heads of household, leading a family without earnings. Maybe I'm overly suspicious, but I keep remembering that when I was Governor of California, they decided to do some changing in counting the unemployed, here in Washington. I protested as loud as I could, but didn't get anyplace with it. Our unemployment rate in California at the time was 5.2 [percent], and in 24 hours, our unemployment rate went to 7.2, just based on a little change in the procedures here in Washington.

So, I've been a little worried here that sometimes we -- and I don't mean to do any less about trying to get them the work, we're going to -- but I think that our program is aimed at that. I'm aware that -- I know somebody is waiting to tell me I have to leave -- [laughter] -- but I'm also aware that when Kennedy had his across-the-board tax cuts, aimed at the same thing, to stimulate the economy, and the same economists and many of the same voices were raised, advising against it and saying that was absolutely the wrong thing to do, he persisted. And immediately thereafter the rate of savings, personal savings in the country -- the percentage went up from 2.9 percent of the earnings in the country to 8 percent. The rate of increase in employment -- not unemployment, in employment -- doubled. The percentage of the gross national product or, I mean, the gross national product increased sizeably, and the government's revenues increased at the lower rate of taxation.

Now, one of the economists who has previously, and all these past months, been opposed to our proposal, Walter Heller, a very distinguished economist, when the recession was announced a short time ago, Walter Heller said how lucky we were that our tax reduction was just going into effect and that that just turned out to be exactly the right medicine for a recession. Well, if it's the right medicine to maybe help cure the recession, why wouldn't it have been good medicine to have prevented the recession?

This morning we had a group from the construction industry in, and we have -- over in the Labor Department -- made some definite changes in regulations. Those changes are going to free up the billions and billions of dollars in pension funds for -- that they can now be invested in home mortgages. Previous to this, they have not been able to. The total pension money available for investment in this country is over a trillion dollars -- will be 3 trillion by 1984 -- and for the first time, this money will be made available for that kind of investment, which we think should go a long way toward beginning the revival of the housing industry.

You know, part of the lull in housing construction right now is the lowering of interest rates. The slump was caused by the high interest rates, but when the high interest rates start down, there's a lull while everybody says, ``Well, let's wait till they get lower.'' That's going on right now, too. Maybe we can, with this new decision, maybe we can increase the speed with which those rates come down.

The President. Oh! Listen -- [laughter] -- we just had a meeting yesterday of our national task force. That's exactly what they are set up to do -- is to not only spread the word of where volunteer efforts have been tried someplace and are working successfully, and then spread that so that other people can do it, but also to answer that question of the many people who are trying to volunteer.

I believe this is beginning to sweep the country. So, people like that, I think will find that they're being sought out by the task force. If they don't get their volunteering in beforehand, somebody will be around to see if they want to volunteer.

Mr. Duberstein is currently serving as Deputy Assistant to the President for Legislative Affairs. In this position, he has served as the President's chief deputy liaison with the United States House of Representatives.

Prior to his appointment, Mr. Duberstein had served for 4 years as vice president of the Committee for Economic Development and director of Business-Government Relations. He was responsible for directing CED's contacts with government and administering its research program. CED is a nonprofit, public policy organization comprised of 200 prominent business leaders and university presidents.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Richard W. Heldridge to be a member of the Board of Directors of the Export-Import Bank of the United States. He would succeed Margaret W. Kahliff.

I'm signing the first regular appropriations bill for 1982, the energy and water development appropriations act. This bill should be a model for a responsible approach to reducing budget deficits. It provides nearly three-fourths of the additional savings for 1982 that I requested. So, on behalf of the taxpayers, please accept my gratitude.

There are good reasons for these savings, why they were achieved, and those reasons are standing right here around me. The two Appropriations Committee chairmen, Mark Hatfield and Tom Bevill, and one of the ranking minority members, John Myers, all worked hard, well, and together. Under their leadership, along with the other ranking minority member, Senator Johnston, the Conference Committee agreed to a bill that actually provided less spending than either the House or the Senate version.

I think it's particularly important that spending for the nondefense programs in this bill is lower than in 1981. For example, water resources construction and maintenance is 5 percent below 1981, but funding for all essential needs has been maintained. The bill provides funds for a number of initiatives of the administration, and it will strengthen the atomic energy defense programs of the Department of Energy.

The American people understand that every dollar we save of unnecessary spending means not only a lower deficit but also a chance to expand the pool of capital needed by industry to modernize and keep abreast of new production methods, so we can create more jobs and more economic opportunity for the people we serve. That's our goal, and thanks to the skill and dedication of these gentlemen, this bill is a significant step in the right direction. If we keep working together, I know we can make bigger and better progress in the days ahead.

The President. I'd be alarmed if there were only half that many. And it's not a -- well, maybe ``alarm'' isn't the proper word to be used here. We've known that the economy was going to be in the doldrums for the latter part of this year; we talked about it a great deal. And while none of us had used the word ``recession'' or projected that, it is now technically a recession.

But I'd like to point out that this has been a long-time unemployment that I was talking about clear back in the campaign, and this is one of the reasons for the economic program, is to restore our productivity and our ability to compete in the world market so that these people can be put back to work. But having grown up and entered the work force in the depths of the Great Depression, I can assure you I do not take unemployment lightly. I think it's a very great tragedy for our country and for the people involved.

Today I am issuing two Executive orders, one to govern the activities of our intelligence agencies and one to reestablish the Intelligence Oversight Board, which works to ensure that our intelligence activities are lawful. These orders are designed to provide America's intelligence community with clearer, more positive guidance and to remove the aura of suspicion and mistrust that can hobble our nation's intelligence efforts.

This action is consistent with my promise in the campaign to revitalize America's intelligence system. The American people are well aware that the security of their country -- and in an age of terrorism, their personal safety as well -- is tied to the strength and efficiency of our intelligence-gathering organizations.

These orders have been carefully drafted -- in consultation with the intelligence committees of both Houses of the Congress -- to maintain the legal protection of all American citizens. They also give our intelligence professionals clear guidelines within which to do their difficult and essential job. Contrary to a distorted image that emerged during the last decade, there is no inherent conflict between the intelligence community and the rights of our citizens. Indeed, the purpose of the intelligence community is the protection of our people.

This is not to say mistakes were never made and that vigilance against abuse is unnecessary. But an approach that emphasizes suspicion and mistrust of our own intelligence efforts can undermine this Nation's ability to confront the increasing challenge of espionage and terrorism. This is particularly true in a world in which our adversaries pay no heed to the concerns for individual rights and freedoms that are so important to Americans and their government. As we move into the 1980's, we need to free ourselves from the negative attitudes of the past and look to meeting the needs of the country.

To those who view this change of direction with suspicion, let me assure you that while I occupy this office, no intelligence agency of the United States, or any other agency for that matter, will be given the authority to violate the rights and liberties guaranteed to all Americans by our Constitution and laws. The provisions of these Executive orders make this abundantly clear.

Most Americans realize that intelligence is a good and necessary profession to which high caliber men and women dedicate their lives. We respect them for their honorable and often perilous service to our nation and the cause of freedom. For all our technological advances, the gathering of information and its analysis depend finally on human judgment; and good judgment depends on the experience, integrity, and professionalism of those who serve us in the intelligence community.

Let us never forget that good intelligence saves American lives and protects our freedom. The loyalty and selflessness of our intelligence community during hard times are testimony to its commitment to the principles on which our country is based. I have faith in our intelligence professionals and expect each and every one of them to live up to the ideals and standards set by these Executive orders.

These orders charge our intelligence agencies to be vigorous, innovative, and responsible in the collection of accurate and timely information -- information essential for the conduct of our foreign policy and crucial to our national safety. The country needs this service and is willing to allocate the resources necessary to do the job right.

It is not enough, of course, simply to collect information. Thoughtful analysis is vital to sound decisionmaking. The goal of our intelligence analysts can be nothing short of the truth, even when that truth is unpleasant or unpopular. I have asked for honest, objective analysis, and I shall expect nothing less. When there is disagreement, as there often is, on the difficult questions of our time, I expect those honest differences of view to be fully expressed.

These orders stipulate that special attention be given to detecting and countering the espionage and other threats that are directed by hostile intelligence services against us at home and abroad. These hostile services respect none of the liberties and rights of privacy that these orders protect. Certainly the same can be said of international terrorists, who present another important area of concern and responsibility for our intelligence professionals.

I want to stress that the primary job of the CIA is to conduct intelligence activities overseas and to deal with certain foreign persons who come into this country. The FBI takes primary responsibility for security activities within the United States, directed against hostile foreigners and those Americans who seek to do damage to our national security.

These orders do not alter this basic division of labor; they reaffirm it. They also encourage the fullest possible cooperation among the CIA, the FBI, and other agencies of the intelligence community as they seek to deal with fundamental challenges to our national security -- challenges that respect neither national boundaries nor citizenship.

As these Executive orders are issued, I again want to express my respect and admiration for the men and women of our intelligence community: They run the risks; they bear the tensions; they serve in silence. They cannot fully be thanked in public, but I want them to know that their job is vital and that the American people, and their President, are profoundly grateful for what they do.

In addition, agencies within the Intelligence Community may disseminate information, other than information derived from signals intelligence, to each appropriate agency within the Intelligence Community for purposes of allowing the recipient agency to determine whether the information is relevant to its responsibilities and can be retained by it.

Sec. 3. The Board shall, when required by this Order, report directly to the President. The Board shall consider and take appropriate action with respect to matters identified by the Director of Central Intelligence, the Central Intelligence Agency or other agencies of the Intelligence Community. With respect to matters deemed appropriate by the President, the Board shall advise and make appropriate recommendations to the Director of Central Intelligence, the Central Intelligence Agency, and other agencies of the Intelligence Community.

Sec. 4. The heads of departments and agencies of the Intelligence Community shall, to the extent permitted by law, provide the Board with all information necessary to carry out its responsibilities. Inspectors General and General Counsel of the Intelligence Community shall, to the extent permitted by law, report to the Board concerning intelligence activities that they have reason to believe may be unlawful or contrary to Executive order or Presidential directive.

Sec. 5. Information made available to the Board shall be given all necessary security protection in accordance with applicable laws and regulations. Each member of the Board, each member of the Board's staff, and each of the Board's consultants shall execute an agreement never to reveal any classified information obtained by virtue of his or her service with the Board except to the President or to such persons as the President may designate.

The Congress has with this act authorized appropriations sufficient to assure that we continue to have the world's best and most professional intelligence service. The Congress has also provided new administrative authorities to the heads of the nation's three major intelligence agencies to assure that they can perform their missions more effectively. I hope that the spirit of cooperation between the legislative and executive branches which resulted in this act will continue as we move to rebuild our nation's intelligence capabilities.

I would also note my hope that I will soon be able to sign the Intelligence Identities Protection Act, which has passed the House and is awaiting floor action in the Senate. I strongly support enactment of this measure, preferably in the form in which it was passed by the House of Representatives; we must act now to protect our intelligence personnel, who serve our nation under what are often difficult and dangerous circumstances.

Academician Andrei Sakharov, a leading Soviet scientist and Nobel Peace Prize Laureate, and his wife have been for over a week on a hunger strike. They are protesting the repeated refusal of the Soviet authorities to grant an exit visa to Mr. Sakharov's daughter-in-law, Elizaveta Alekseeva, to join her husband, Mr. Aleksei Semionov, a student at an American university. The young couple has been separated for a long time. I am concerned for the health of Mr. and Mrs. Sakharov and strongly urge the Soviet Government to allow Mrs. Alekseeva to join her husband.

Each of these great documents was born after the bloodshed of a bitter war. We remember the great sacrifices Americans have made for 200 years, from the Revolutionary War, in which our ancestors pledged ``their lives, their fortunes, and their sacred honor,'' to the wars of this century, in which hundreds of thousands of young Americans and millions of others gave their lives on the battlefields of Europe, Asia, and Africa in the struggle for freedom. And, yet, even today, as we celebrate Bill of Rights Day and Human Rights Day, we all are only too well aware that the individual rights declared in these documents are not yet respected in many nations.

We have learned that the lesson our Founding Fathers taught is as true today as it was two centuries ago -- liberty depends not upon the state but upon the people. Liberty thrives in the free association of citizens in free institutions: families, churches, universities, trade unions, and a free press.

Mankind's best defense against tyranny and want is limited government -- a government which empowers its people, not itself, and which respects the wit and bravery, the initiative, and the generosity of the people. For, above all, human rights are rights of individuals: rights of conscience, rights of choice, rights of association, rights of emigration, rights of self-directed action, and the right to own property. The concept of a nation of free men and women linked together voluntarily is the genius of the system our Founding Fathers established.

We will continue to strive to respect these rights fully in our own country and to promote their observance abroad. We could have no greater wish for mankind than that all people come to enjoy these rights.

This year, after nearly 20 years of effort, the United Nations Human Rights Commission and the UN General Assembly have approved a declaration on the elimination of all forms of discrimination based on religion. It begins with words Americans will find familiar, ``Everyone will have the right to freedom of thought, conscience and religion.'' It declares that parents must have the right to teach their children to worship God and that all religions must have the right to teach their faith, to train their clergy, and to observe their customs and holidays.

We in America are blessed with rights secured for us by the sacrifices of our forefathers, but we yearn for the day when all mankind can share in these blessings. Never is there any excuse for the violation of the fundamental rights of man -- not at any time or in any place, not in rich countries or poor, not under any social, economic or political system.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 4th day of December, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-one, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and sixth.

Note: The exchange began at 10:45 a.m. in the Briefing Room at the White House, where the President had gone to make a statement to reporters on his meeting with the Inspectors General and members of the President's Council on Integrity and Efficiency. The exchange preceded his statement.

I've just met with the Inspectors General to receive their 6-month consolidated report on this administration's drive against fraud, waste, and mismanagement in the Federal Government. And I am happy -- and I really mean happy -- to announce that their report contains some very good news for the American taxpayer.

Last March, I signed an Executive order establishing the Council on Integrity and Efficiency. Its purpose was to form a new and more effective strike force against corruption and inefficiency in government by pooling the resources of the Inspector General, the FBI, the Department of Justice, the Office of Management and Budget, and the Office of Personnel Management. And in just 6 months, these gentlemen here and the others, their colleagues, in joint efforts authorized by our Executive order, have saved the taxpayers over $2 billion.

Now, you've heard me talk about the billions of dollars in delinquent debt that have been costing the honest taxpayers of this country $14 million a day. We're making progress now in collecting that debt, thanks to these gentlemen. Just this year in one department, we have collected $1 billion in delinquent debt. Now, I hope the Congress will act on the legislation that I have proposed that will enable us to collect $\1/2\ billion a year, which is presently beyond our reach.

The great majority of Federal employees are honest, hardworking, and dedicated to public service. But over the last 6 months, 145 Federal employees have been discharged as a result of the 16 investigations. Others may have voluntarily resigned to avoid the embarrassment of being fired.

In establishing the Council, I assured the American people that this was no cosmetic gesture but a serious, substantial step toward restoring government efficiency and thereby rebuilding public confidence in our political institutions. I promised that we'd follow every lead, root out every incompetent, and prosecute every crook that we found cheating the people of this Nation.

Well thanks to the dedication of these Inspectors General, this pledge has been and will continue to be kept. We're reducing fraud, improving management controls, eliminating errors in government programs and, by doing so, also providing a growing deterrent against future abuses.

I have just come from a meeting with this entire group and discovered that the few facts that I have in here only scratch the surface of what has actually been accomplished. Integrity and efficiency in managing government programs not only save the government money, they mean better service for those the programs are designed to serve -- the American people.

It's on behalf of the people that I extend my thanks to the Inspectors General for their valuable work and urge them to keep on being as mean as junkyard dogs when it comes to protecting the taxpayers. I again repeat my thanks and my congratulations to these men and women who have been doing this job. And as I say, I've only scratched the surface.

The President. We're here, ladies and gentlemen, with these two gentlemen and their wives, who, I think, thrilled all of us in flying the Columbia and for a ceremony. And I now turn it over to the Colonel.

Colonel Engle. Well, Mr. President, it's our honor on behalf of all the people at NASA to present you with this American flag and crew emblem that was flown aboard the space shuttle Columbia. We want to thank you again for your support of the program and for taking the time to come down and talk with us during the flight. It was an honor and a thrill to us.

I was just telling them that -- and if it's of interest to any of you -- that I learned while I was there, something that I can't quit talking about, and that is the miracle that takes place. Their approach to Edwards Air Force Base in California begins out over the Hawaiian Islands, and when the plane levels off and starts into the runway, just envision that kind of an approach. It only takes 20 minutes.

Miss Shattuck is self-employed in the private practice of law, representing both plaintiffs and defendants in labor-employment related matters and business. She is also special hearing officer, State Personnel Board, State of Colorado. She is a lecturer and trainer in the field of employment and employee relations, including teaching courses for continuing legal education in Colorado, Inc. She has been a trial attorney for the U.S. Equal Employment Opportunity Commission in Denver.

Thomas Corcoran, known as Tommy to his legion of friends, was one of those bright young men of the 1930's who helped to light America's way through the dark years of the Great Depression. He generated ideas, enthusiasm, and the confidence that something could be done about the problems that beset this country. ``Tommy the Cork'' was one of those individuals America cannot do without -- he was an indomitable doer and an irrepressible advocate.

Throughout his years, he remained a valued counselor to Presidents and statesmen. I convey my deepest sympathy to his family and to all Americans who, indeed, have lost a source of vitality and a voice of experience.

President Reagan and Cypriot President Spyros Kyprianou met in a working visit today and held discussions on recent developments on Cyprus and the intercommunal talks. Vice President Bush and Secretary Haig also attended the meeting along with Cypriot Foreign Minister Rolandis and Ambassador Jacovides. President Reagan stressed U.S. hopes for a just and lasting settlement of the Cyprus problem and emphasized his support for the United Nations-supervised intercommunal talks. The United States believes that recent developments in the negotiations, including presentation of a U.N. ``evaluation'' of the talks, suggest the potential for progress toward a mutually beneficial agreement.

We faced a choice last August: concede to the demands of a union engaged in an illegal strike -- or dismiss the controllers who violated their oath and walked off their jobs, and keep the airways operating with the resources available to us.

We made the only choice we could. While we regret the loss of an experienced work force, we have an even greater commitment to the people of America to uphold the principles on which this country is built -- principles of law, due process, and respect for the public trust.

Those principles have been honored, and our commitment to them remains firm. But at the same time there is another principle we honor in America -- the tradition that individuals deserve to be treated with compassion. In that spirit, I am today extending to the air traffic controllers discharged because of their actions in striking against the Federal Government, an opportunity to reapply for Federal employment, in departments and agencies other than the Federal Aviation Administration. I do not believe that those who forfeited their jobs as controllers should be foreclosed from other Federal employment. I am sure that many of those who were misled or badly advised regret their action and would welcome an opportunity to return to Federal service.

First, when the Office of Personnel Management receives applications for Federal employment from former FAA controllers terminated by their strike action, it will apply the same suitability standards as it applies to all other candidates for jobs with the Federal Government. This means that each application will be considered fairly and on a case-by-case basis.

Second, because returning the striking controllers to their former positions would adversely affect operational efficiency, damage morale, and perhaps impair safety, the former controllers will be eligible for employment consideration in any Federal agency except the Federal Aviation Administration.

I realize that these conditions prevent the ex-controllers from returning to their former jobs. But in considering an applicant for a position of public responsibility, we must take into account not only the ability to perform that job but the effect that his or her employment may have on others within the agency. This is particularly true where the effectiveness of the nation's air traffic control system and the safety of the airways are at stake.

The Office of Personnel Management has established the position that the former air traffic controllers who were discharged for participating in a strike against the Government initiated on August 3, 1981 shall be debarred from federal employment for a period of three years. Upon deliberation I have concluded that such individuals, despite their strike participation, should be permitted to apply for federal employment outside the scope of their former employing agency.

Therefore, pursuant to my authority to regulate federal employment, I have determined that the Office of Personnel Management should permit federal agencies to receive applications for employment from these individuals and process them according to established civil service procedures. Your office should perform suitability determinations with respect to all such applicants according to established standards and procedures under 5 CFR, Part 731.

After reviewing reports from the Secretary of Transportation and the Administrator of the Federal Aviation Administration, I have further determined that it would be detrimental to the efficiency of operations at the Federal Aviation Administration and to the safe and effective performance of our national air traffic control system to permit the discharged air traffic controllers to return to employment with that agency. Therefore, these former federal employees should not be deemed suitable for employment with the Federal Aviation Administration.

During 1981, laboratory research and medical science produced new ways to treat birth defects in the mother's womb. Actual cases made medical history, and because of its funding and support, the March of Dimes shares in these accomplishments.

The work of the March of Dimes is made possible through the generosity of millions of our citizens and the dedicated efforts of tens of thousands of volunteers. This uniquely American volunteer spirit is a hallmark of the March of Dimes, for the people of our great nation accept personal responsibility for the health of children today and in the future.

The continuing resolution just passed by the Congress represents another difficult step forward in this Nation's struggle to restore responsible economic and fiscal policy. It is a step away from the big spending that wreaked havoc in the past and toward our goal of once again living within our means.

Together with excessive taxation, overspending in Washington has led to the reduced saving and investment, high inflation, and crippling interest rates that created today's recession. Only continued commitment to the joint goals of lower taxes, reduced spending and borrowing, fewer regulations, and a stable monetary policy will pave the way for recovery in 1982 and a return to economic prosperity in the 1980's.

The President will present the awards at a White House ceremony in April. Awards will be made in seven categories: jobs, health, material resources, education, recreation and the environment, public safety, the arts and humanities.

ACTION, the national volunteer agency, serves to stimulate voluntarism and to demonstrate the effectiveness of volunteers in addressing social problems. Its major programs include the Foster Grandparent, Retired Senior Volunteer, and Senior Companion programs for the elderly and a variety of programs for youth.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Herbert E. Ellingwood to be a member of the Merit Systems Protection Board for the remainder of the term expiring March 1, 1986. The President also intends to nominate Mr. Ellingwood to serve as Chairman.

Mr. Oglesby is currently serving as Special Assistant for Legislative Affairs. In his new position, he will serve as the President's chief deputy liaison with the United States House of Representatives.

Previously he had served as minority staff associate for the House Energy and Commerce Committee, dealing principally with railroad, environmental, and commerce-related legislation. Mr. Oglesby also served as deputy and acting director of the State of Illinois Washington office and as executive assistant to Congressman Edward Madigan (R-Ill.). Prior to coming to Washington, he served in Illinois State government as an assistant to Gov. Richard B. Oglivie and as executive assistant to the speaker of the house. Mr. Oglesby also spent 3\1/2\ years in management positions with Illinois Bell Telephone Co.

By the President of the United States of America A Proclamation Since the dawn of civilization, men have dreamed of conquering the air. History is filled with tales of those who tried to emulate the flight of birds, but not until the early days of this century did that dream become a reality.

On December 17, 1903, near Kitty Hawk, North Carolina, the age of aviation began when Orville and Wilbur Wright launched man's first successful flight in a mechanically propelled aircraft. Orville Wright remained aloft in a flying machine for just 12 seconds, covering a distance of only 120 feet, but the inventiveness and daring of these two brothers changed our lives for all time.

Today, aviation is vital to the American way of life and to our economy and national defense. The air transportation network enables us to travel for business or pleasure with unequalled speed and convenience while providing for the rapid and efficient transfer of our nation's commercial goods.

The pioneering spirit exhibited by the Wright brothers and fostered by our system of free enterprise has kept America in the forefront of innovative aeronautics -- a spirit dramatically demonstrated again this year with the two successful missions of the United States Space Shuttle COLUMBIA. As it glided to perfect landings in the California desert, COLUMBIA gave us pause to reflect on another triumph in American aviation and on the creative genius of the American people.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 14th day of Dec., in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-one, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and sixth.

The President today announced his intention to nominate John R. Bolton to be an Assistant Administrator of the Agency for International Development (Program and Policy Coordination). He would succeed Alexander Shakow.

In recent years inflation has created great uncertainty about our social security system. Time and again we've been reassured the system would be financially sound for decades to come, only to find that recalculations of receipts and benefits forecast a new crisis. Current and future retirees now question the system's ability to provide them the benefits they've been led to expect. Americans look to us for leadership and for answers.

As a candidate in 1980 I pledged that I would do my utmost to restore the integrity of social security and do so without penalty to those dependent on that program. I have honored that pledge and will continue to do so. We cannot and we will not betray people entitled to social security benefits.

In September I announced that I would appoint a bipartisan task force to work with the President and the Congress to reach two specific goals: propose realistic, long-term reforms to put social security back on a sound financial footing and forge a working bipartisan consensus so that the necessary reforms will be passed into law.

Senate Majority Leader Baker, Speaker O'Neill, and I agreed we would each select five members for a new national commission on social security. Today I am pleased and honored to announce the formation of the commission and that Alan Greenspan has agreed at my request to serve as Chairman of that commission.

I'm asking the commission to present its report to the American people at the end of next year. I can think of no more important domestic problem requiring resolution than the future of our social security system.

Let me make one thing plain: With bipartisan cooperation and political courage, social security can and will be saved. For too long, too many people dependent on social security have been cruelly frightened by individuals seeking political gain through demagoguery and outright falsehood, and this must stop. The future of social security is much too important to be used as a political football.

Saving social security will require the best efforts of both parties and of both the executive and legislative branches of government. I'm confident this can be done and that in its deliberations this commission will put aside partisan considerations and seek a solution the American people will find fiscally sound and fully equitable.

Sec. 2. Functions. (a) The Commission shall review relevant analyses of the current and long-term financial condition of the Social Security trust funds; indentify problems that may threaten the long-term solvency of such funds; analyze potential solutions to such problems that will both assure the financial integrity of the Social Security System and the provision of appropriate benefits; and provide appropriate recommendations to the Secretary of Health and Human Services, the President, and the Congress.

The President today announced his intention to appoint/designate the following individuals to serve on a 15-member bipartisan National Commission on Social Security Reform. Alan Greenspan will serve as Chairman.

Last September in my economic message I announced that we would develop a plan for dismantling the Department of Energy. In the intervening months, a group led by the Secretary of Energy developed a number of proposals to carry out that commitment.

I have selected a plan that will divide the current responsibilities of the Department of Energy between the Department of the Interior and the Department of Commerce. This would fulfill my campaign promise to make government more efficient and reduce the cost of government to the taxpayers.

Under the plan I have approved, the Interior Department will take on those functions of DOE that bear on the management of natural resources, such as supervision of the national petroleum reserves and the hydroelectric dams operated by the power marketing administrations.

The Commerce Department will be responsible for ensuring that energy is given full consideration in national economic policy; for developing plans for responding to energy supply emergencies, including our relations with international energy organizations; and for the collection of statistical data on energy.

In addition, we will establish an agency to carry out the important research programs now operated by DOE. This agency will report to me through the Secretary of Commerce and will also have responsibility for operating the atomic energy defense program that develops and produces nuclear weapons for our strategic forces.

I believe that this plan will result in a strong Federal effort in basic research in energy that avoids the excessive regulation that led me to call for dismantling DOE. Under this plan, we will limit the role of the Federal Government in energy. The government will no longer try to manage every aspect of energy supply and consumption.

I have directed that a task force composed of representatives from the White House Office of Policy Development, the Office of Management and Budget, and the Departments of Energy, Commerce, and Interior get to work immediately on the detailed legislation and plans needed to carry out the decision I made yesterday.

By dismantling a bureaucracy while keeping intact its essential functions, we are moving ahead with our promise to make government serve the people -- and do it more efficiently. This is a big step, but there is more to be done, and we are pledged to do it.

Recently the U.S. Court of Appeals ruled that the government had acted lawfully in imposing market-oriented rates for parking facilities used by Federal employees. The regulation, which took effect on November 1, 1979, directed agencies to develop procedures to charge fees based on the ongoing commercial rate of the area. A legal challenge resulted in a March 1981 decision by the U.S. District Court blocking further implementation of the fee schedule and ordering the refunding of fees already collected.

The government can now resume collection of parking fees. After consulting a delegation of Members of Congress, including Marjorie Holt, Stan Parris, and Frank Wolf, I have decided, however, not to do so. To resume those fees would impose yet another financial burden upon thousands of hard-pressed Federal employees who have had only 4.8 percent increases in their pay.

Many employees have limited access to public transportation and appreciate the flexibility and security of automobiles. I feel that energy conservation goals will not be affected by this decision, since existing car pool and van pool priorities at parking facilities will remain in effect.

All the information that we have confirms that the imposition of martial law in Poland has led to the arrest and confinement, in prisons and detention camps, of thousands of Polish trade union leaders and intellectuals. Factories are being seized by security forces and workers beaten.

These acts make plain there's been a sharp reversal of the movement toward a freer society that has been underway in Poland for the past year and a half. Coercion and violation of human rights on a massive scale have taken the place of negotiation and compromise. All of this is in gross violation of the Helsinki Pact, to which Poland is a signatory.

It would be naive to think this could happen without the full knowledge and the support of the Soviet Union. We're not naive. We view the current situation in Poland in the gravest of terms, particularly the increasing use of force against an unarmed population and violations of the basic civil rights of the Polish people.

Violence invites violence and threatens to plunge Poland into chaos. We call upon all free people to join in urging the Government of Poland to reestablish conditions that will make constructive negotiations and compromise possible.

Certainly, it will be impossible for us to continue trying to help Poland solve its economic problems while martial law is imposed on the people of Poland, thousands are imprisoned, and the legal rights of free trade unions -- previously granted by the government -- are now denied. We've always been ready to do our share to assist Poland in overcoming its economic difficulties, but only if the Polish people are permitted to resolve their own problems free of internal coercion and outside intervention.

Our nation was born in resistance to arbitrary power and has been repeatedly enriched by immigrants from Poland and other great nations of Europe. So we feel a special kinship with the Polish people in their struggle against Soviet opposition to their reforms.

The Polish nation, speaking through Solidarity, has provided one of the brightest, bravest moments of modern history. The people of Poland are giving us an imperishable example of courage and devotion to the values of freedom in the face of relentless opposition. Left to themselves, the Polish people would enjoy a new birth of freedom. But there are those who oppose the idea of freedom, who are intolerant of national independence, and hostile to the European values of democracy and the rule of law.

Q. Mr. President, with the apparent, in your words, ``Soviet involvement,'' how will this affect our relations both with Poland in the future as a consequence and with the Soviet Union, including trade and arms talks?

The President. Well, Jim, you're getting into the area there that I just don't feel that I can discuss -- the area of initiatives and options that might be available as conditions develop that we may not be able to foresee. So, I just am not going to answer questions or discuss what those initiatives might be or what our reaction might be.

Q. Mr. President, there are repressions in other areas in the world. In recent days the newspapers have been filled with reports of oppressions by the Israelis in the occupied zones against the people there, even killing children, shooting and killing children, and annexing the Golan Heights.

The President. We have registered our disagreement and the fact that we do deplore this unilateral action by Israel, which has increased the difficulty of seeking peace in the Middle East under the terms of the U.N. Resolutions 242 and 338. And we continue to address them with the idea, hopefully, that this action can be ameliorated.

Q. Mr. President, following up Helen Thomas' question concerning the Israeli action on the Golan Heights. Mr. President, did you get any indications whatsoever from the Israelis that they were about to annex the Golan Heights before, indeed, they very quickly took that action and, secondly, Mr. President, I was wondering what effect you felt this unilateral annexation will have on the Camp David peace process and your hopes for peace in that part of the world?

The President. Well, I partially answered that with regard to the difficulties now with 242 and 338. We were caught by surprise. This was done without any notification to us. But apparently, other than a few hours interruption, the peace process is going forward. Egypt and Israel are continuing to work on the subject of autonomy. And we still continue to be optimistic about the Middle East, although we recognize that difficulties can arise.

Q. Mr. President, blacks perceive you as resurrecting States' rights through your block grant programs without any guidelines, and as being against affirmative action, and your wanting to prove intent in the Voting Rights Act. They see all of this as a setback to civil rights. Now, doesn't this hurt the Republican Party as well as hurting blacks? There was evidence in the Virginia election.

The President. Well, thank you very much. I have to say that I think this may be an impression that some are trying to give because they're in disagreement with many of our policies, but I can assure you that this administration is dedicated and devoted to the principle of civil rights. And in spite of the fact that I do believe in returning more to our system of federalism, recognizing that there are functions that can be better performed at the State and local level, I recognize also that one of the prime responsibilities of the Federal Government is to assure that not one single citizen in this country can be denied his or her constitutional rights without the Federal Government coming in and guaranteeing those rights.

Q. I have a followup on that. You know blacks fought very hard and long to overthrow States' rights. I'm from Virginia; we had a pretty tough time. And now, in your Voting Rights Act, you're asking to prove intent. And when the government testified before the African Affairs [Sub]committee on the investment proposal, it said that while the intent of this bill may be good, we cannot accept the effect. So, why, then? In some instances, you're accepting the effect and disregarding the intent, and then vice versa.

The President. No, we believe that the intent was a useful thing in that bill because there have been communities and areas of the country who have proven, without question, their total adherence to voting rights for all their people, and yet the difficulty of them then escaping the provisions of the law which impose a burden on them are still denied.

Effect -- to use that instead of intent -- the effect rule could lead to the type of thing in which effect could be judged if there was some disproportion in the number of public officials who were elected at any governmental level, and so forth. And we don't think that that was what the bill intended or that that would be a fair test. You could come down to where all of society had to have an actual quota system.

Q. Mr. President, there are reports today of killings in Poland and more violence. What do you think the people of Poland should do? Should they acquiesce quietly to this martial law? Should they resist it? And if they resist it, what help will the United States give them?

The President. Well again, Sam, you're getting into the area that I've said I cannot discuss, of what our initiatives might be, what our options might be. I don't think those should be discussed in advance of any need for action. We have the report, also, but we have no confirmation as yet with regard to today's violence, and we're waiting to get that confirmation.

The President. No, we're not letting them get away with it, and I thought that I indicated that in my remarks. But again, you are leading in another way into the area that I just don't feel would be proper for me to discuss.

Q. Mr. President, Jimmy Carter said that when he was in office he also was the subject of perceived death threats from Libya, but he thought it was unwise to discuss it publicly. Can you tell us your reasoning behind making the charge public? And secondly, sir, can you comment on the concern of some people that your dialog with Colonel Qadhafi has resulted largely in enhancing his stature in the world?

The President. Well, I haven't had any dialog with Mr. Qadhafi, and we did not make it public. The news, claiming leaks from unidentified sources, made it public at a time when we had held this entire matter confidential and secret for a long time, because we believed that we had a better opportunity of apprehending any terrorists or terrorist squads if it were not made public. And so we're sorry that it was. And for anyone to suggest, as has been suggested lately, that we had some reason for making this public, we don't put that shoe on. And, as a matter of fact, we made an effort at one point to call in some leaders in the media and ask for their cooperation in restraint in talk on this, and that then became the story on the news for that evening.

Q. Mr. President, can you say at this point, despite the fact that you can't comment about the investigation, whether you think it would be proper as a matter of principle for your Labor Secretary to take an administrative leave if a special prosecutor is appointed and, secondly, whether you have sought some assurances from him that these allegations are not true?

The President. The matter of appointing a special prosecutor under the present act is one that does not connote guilt or any evidence of wrongdoing. And therefore only under such circumstances as that maybe an individual would find they would not have time to perform their duties -- and that is not true in the case of Secretary Donovan -- I see no reason why they should step down while such a review is going forward. And, yes, I have had assurances that there is no ground to these charges.

The President. Well, now you are getting into the area of what is trying to be settled in the talks under 242 and 338 and the peacemaking talks regarding all of the territory that might be held. And therefore, it's not proper for me to comment on this. This is the very matter that's being negotiated.

The President. Well, you're going back a long way, and it's hard for me to remember what my position was. I know where I was during the Six Days War; I was in the Hollywood Bowl at a mass meeting in support of Israel. And at that time, there were only two political figures or officeholders there that I recall -- former Senator George Murphy, then a Senator, and myself as Governor of California.

The President. Well, because in the first place, I said what was our goal, not a promise. But when I first announced our economic plan -- and this is when those dates were used -- was in September of 1980 during the campaign. The deterioriation in the economy was so great between September and January that, taking office, we had to revise our own estimates and our own figures and plan. And I have confidence in our plan, that it is the right solution to the present problem.

But again, like so many, we were caught. While we always said that the economy would be sluggish and soft for the balance of the year and into 1982, we did not foresee a recession, and I don't think anyone else did. But we also did not foresee the interest rates remaining at the extremely high level for as long as they did. And may I point out, those interest rates did not just get high under our administration. They were up at that pitch before we got here, higher than they've ever been since the War Between the States. And in the brief time that our program has been in effect, I have to point out that there's every evidence that we are on the right track.

Now, I will be the first to tell you that I think it's highly unlikely that the budget could be now, in these new circumstances, could be balanced by 1984, which was our goal, the target that we were aiming at -- difficult, because when you start predicting figures, a change of 1 percentage point in the unemployment rate can result in $25 billion either way, depending whether it's up or down in your estimated figures for a deficit.

But the evidence that our program is succeeding is the fact that since September, the interest rates have come down some 6 or 6\1/2\ points. Inflation has come down to single digit, when it had averaged 14 or it had averaged around 14 or better at the time that we took office. And we have cut the rate of increase in the cost of government just about in half.

Now, we believe that these are signs -- the control of interest rates or bringing them down, the reducing of the percentage of gross national product that the government is taking out of the private sector -- all of these things, we think, are on the path of what will cure this recession. We can't do it instantly. You can't undo in 11 weeks what it took several decades to create.

Q. Mr. President, I wonder if I could get back to a question on the Libyan hit squad. Yesterday, Senator Baker said that the chances of an assassination attempt on you by this hit squad have been diminished. I wonder, sir, is that true and, secondly, is this hit squad still on the loose?

The President. Well, I understand that words come out from the Senator's office -- that he did not have any intelligence information that would give rise to such a statement or such an assumption. Now, maybe he was giving an opinion and believed that things are cooling down a little bit.

I think it would be very foolish of us to relax any of the security measures. And I can only tell all of you that our information on this entire matter has come from not one but several widespread sources, and we have complete confidence in it, and that the threat was real.

Q. Mr. President, I don't want to really just re-ask the same question, but I think it's something that is on the public's mind. What prospect do you see that the Soviet Union could become involved militarily in Poland, and that consequently the United States could have to have some kind of military involvement, too? Should we be relaxed about it or concerned about it?

The President. We are concerned about it, and beyond that, again, I can't say as to initiatives. And we have in no unmistakable terms, with our allies, let the Soviet Union know how the free world would view and how seriously we would take any overt interference or military interference in Poland.

Q. Mr. President, you said that you didn't see any reason for Secretary Donovan to step down if a special prosecutor is named, because the appointment of a special prosecutor doesn't necessarily mean that he's guilty.

But I'm wondering, sir, that -- it's not only Secretary Donovan who's under investigation by the Justice Department but also the CIA Director, Mr. Casey, and your national security adviser, Mr. Allen. And I'm wondering that -- regardless of whether, eventually, we find out these men engaged in any wrongdoing or not -- if you think that the fact that you're not taking action to disassociate them from your administration is going to hurt your administration or hurt your ability to lead?

The President. I believe in the fairness of the American people. And I believe that in recent years, there's been a very dangerous tendency in this country for some to jump to the conclusion that accusation meant guilt and conviction. And I think it is high time we recognized that any individual is innocent until proven guilty of any wrongdoing, and that's what we're going to do.

I think that I cheated over here. [Referring to Bill Groody, Mutual Broadcasting System] I had recognized you and someone else took the place, and I kind of nodded that you'd be next, and I forgot about that.

The President. I can only say with regard to that -- and again, we're getting dangerously close to initiatives -- we have suspended the shipments that we were going to make, because those were intended [as], and we've had quite a record of, humanitarian aid to the people of Poland. We'd like to continue that. But under the present circumstances, we cannot go forward with that if it can be used by the government as a measure to further oppress and control the people of Poland. So, we've suspended such shipments.

Q. Mr. President, there's been a report recently that that so-called Libyan assassination squad was not really under the sponsorship of Mr. Qadhafi but that they were Shiite Moslems who themselves were opposed to Mr. Qadhafi and, secondly, that the U.S. Government paid the informers or at least one of them, a quarter of a million dollars for his information. Can you confirm those reports? And are you still determined to go ahead with the evacuation of American citizens from Libya?

The President. I cannot confirm -- I know nothing of anything of the kind that you said or that they are not the terrorist groups that we were led to believe they were. As I said, I'm confident of our information. I don't know anything about anyone being paid or not.

Q. Mr. President, during the campaign and in the early months in office, you used harsh, even strident terms to criticize the Soviet Union's policies and positions on any number of issues. But last month you turned statesman in your message to the Russians about negotiating deployment of missiles. And last week you intentionally used words about the situation in Poland that wouldn't rouse the Russian Bear, so to speak. Should these alterations be interpreted as a change in tactics, or should they be interpreted as a softening in your policy towards Moscow?

The President. No. If I may remind you, in the first press conference that I held, over across the street in the Executive Office Building, I did not volunteer any information about the Soviet Union; I was asked a question. And I answered the question to the best of my ability. And I think you will find that the teachings of Marxist-Leninism confirm what I said. And at that time, what I spelled out was that they recognize as immoral only those things which would delay or interfere with the spread of socialism and that otherwise, anything that furthers socialism is moral.

Q. Mr. President, some of the supply-side economists have been saying lately that budget deficits don't matter, at least the size of the budget deficit doesn't matter. Some of your aides refer to you as the supply-side mole in the White House. I'm wondering if you agree that the size of the Federal deficit doesn't really matter to an economic recovery, and how large a deficit are you willing to swallow in the fiscal '83 budget?

The President. Again -- and I think that those economists who were quoted as saying that, what they were trying to explain was not that a deficit is all right, and not that we shouldn't continue a program to eventually to get us back, as I've said, within our means, but the important thing is whether you are following a program, consistent program, that will get us there; not whether changing conditions, such as we've had now with this recession, have delayed the day by which you can do this.

You have two lines that must converge. And they are the line of increase of government spending, the line of normal increase in government revenues; an increase that is regulated by the growth of the economy, increase in prosperity, not by increasing the rates.

And we are embarked, and the figures indicate that we are achieving this, even though we've had a cut in the tax rates. It is that cut which is going to stimulate the productivity. And I think what they're pointing out is, you can balance the budget by robbing the people, by imposing a punitive tax system on the people which maybe once will give you the benefits you want, but then you will also find you've torpedoed your economy, and you go right back into recession and lack of productivity and so forth, because of what you're doing.

The only proper way to balance the budget is through control of government spending, which we haven't had for some 30-odd years or more, and increasing prosperity and productivity for all. And that's what our program has aimed to do, and I have every confidence it is going to do it.

Q. Mr. President, back to your statement about the recession and circumstances beyond your control. I'm from Buffalo, where the unemployment rate is even higher than the national average because of steel and autos. I'd like to ask you about something under your control. The people there are most concerned now, in the cold months, about the prospect of decontrol of natural gas and estimates that it could double, triple, or even quadruple their fuel bills in the winter. I'm wondering if, in light of the recession that you might reconsider the idea of decontrolling natural gas?

The President. Well, we haven't made a decision on that as yet. But let me also point out that everybody seemed to think the same thing would happen to the price of gasoline if we decontrolled oil. We decontrolled oil and the only increase that took place, and that was temporary, was one because of a, at the same time, a current increase in OPEC oil prices, and it only amounted to a few cents.

Now, I happen to believe in accelerating the decontrol of natural gas. It is scheduled to be decontrolled a few years down the road. I think that there might be advantages in accelerating that. I also find it difficult to believe that the price would double or triple or quadruple, because the price that the retail buyer of natural gas pays, only 15 percent of that has to do with the gas itself. The rest of that bill -- I think you'll find these figures are correct -- is made up of the processing, the transportation, the delivery of the gas to the house, and that would not be affected by a change in the wellhead price of the gas.

The President. In the longrun, to the consumer, they're the same thing they were with regard to oil, that you stimulate the production of natural gas to the point that competition then -- which has always been the thing that brings prices down -- that competition enters the arena. And with a greater supply competing for customers, the price comes down.

Q. Thank you, Mr. President. Staying with natural gas, if you do accelerate the decontrol, do you plan to go with options your advisers are now discussing to tax it and possibly raise any other taxes to help balance the budget or at least to hold down spending? And there's a second part to that. Can you now promise the American people and the American businesses that they, the tax cuts they just got, will not be pulled back or somehow delayed?

The President. I sure can promise the American people that. And I think you all should know that I have met with some of the leading managers of investment firms in the United States. I have met with our Council of Economic Advisers that crosses the spectrum; Milton Friedman, George Schultz, Arthur Burns returned from Germany briefly for this, Alan Greenspan, Arthur Laffer, Paul McCracken, any number. I should stop because I know I won't name them all, and I apologize to them for that. All of them are of a single mind with me: We stick with our tax program; we go forward with the reduction in tax rates. And I have no plans for increasing taxes in any way.

Q. Mr. President, it's the season to be jolly, and I wonder if you might reconsider hiring the air controllers to get travel in this country back on line? You did let them go back to work for the Federal Government, and it seems a bit ludicrous that they can't go into their own trained field. Would you reconsider?

The President. I think that the conduct or the plan that we've had and what we have done is correct. There is a law that those who were fired under some kind of a cloud cannot seek Federal employment for 3 years. We did ask for the waiver on that. We thought that was unnecessary -- the pressure that they should not have. And that was waived.

With regard to any of them coming back, I think our first obligation is to those who stayed in the towers and who have kept the planes flying. But a number of the controllers have, under the civil service regulations, appealed their firing. And I suppose it is possible that some may win their appeals and thus would go back. So, that is the procedure and other than that, why, I can't comment.

Q. Mr. President, can you say unequivocally that if Richard Allen is cleared in the investigation by the Justice Department that he will be rehired or reappointed to his position? And are you considering changing the role of your national security adviser so that the reports he gives you on foreign policy, as well as those from the State Department, come directly to you instead of being filtered through your Big Three?

On the second, it's not just a particular department. At about this stage, when you're new here and have put together an administration and it's been a very busy one -- and I must say a most successful one with regard to what we have obtained. Virtually all of our campaign promises have been kept with regard to cutting spending, lowering tax rates, eliminating useless regulations, for the first time in a few decades putting into operation a strategic defense program that I think is adequate to our needs -- all of these things, including last night's farm bill, we have manged to do. And at the same time, I think you've come to a pause like this where you review your processes and see where -- not only just one agency or department but all of them -- where you can facilitate things, where you can perhaps loosen something that might have been a bottleneck. I still haven't found an answer to leaks. But this kind of a review is going on, yes, but not only of one agency but several.

Q. Mr. President, do you agree with William Bradford Reynolds in the Civil Rights Division of the Justice Department that the Weber decision, which allowed firms to conduct voluntary affirmative action, that that decision should be overturned? And if you do agree with him, why do you agree with him?

The President. Well, if this is something that simply allows the training and the bringing up so there are more opportunities for them, in voluntary agreement between the union and management, I can't see any fault with that. I'm for that.

The President. I thought I had answered it by saying that I don't believe that in all the figures that are being kicked around, number one, I don't believe that anyone could make a proper estimate of that, but I also don't believe that that is the goal, to simply set a figure and say you try to reach it.

I don't think that there's any way that you could say what you would be satisfied with. The goal has to be this: That you eliminate every bit of unnecessary spending that you can, with an -- unnecessary -- that you do not, in pursuit, just single-minded pursuit of reducing the deficit, eliminate functions which would find the government being irresponsible and not performing the services that it is supposed to perform for the people. And so this has to be your watchword and, in maintaining those essential services at the same time, that you seek to control the other kind of spending.

And may I point out that with no regard to the budget or budget figures, we have had a commission for 6 months tied in with the Inspectors General, and I believe it was yesterday that I tried to -- no, yesterday was social security, and I didn't see much of that, either. You had other things in your mind.

But a few days ago, I announced that these Inspectors General, in these first 6 months, have saved $2 billion. They have found 8,500 social security recipients who are still receiving grants and have been dead for an average of almost 7 years. And that has been eliminated. And we're going nationwide in the pursuit of this kind of investigation.

Now, those are the type of things that you can't, in advance, put in the budget and say, ``We'll meet this figure in the budget because we're going to do this.'' No, these are the things that you, at the end of the year, or 6 months, as they came in with their 6-month report. They also found quite a number, several hundred black lung recipients who have also been dead for several years but are continuing to receive their payments.

And I think that there is a wealth of savings out there that are to be made in this particular area. But, again, this is the danger of saying, ``Well, I'll settle for this or settle for that.'' I just don't think anyone knows.

And I'm very heartened by the fact that Alice Rivlin, the economist with the Congressional Budget Office, has said that our program is going to show results and a growth in the economy and recovery next year.

One of the more significant events to take place since the submission of the last Report to the Congress was the unanimous decision handed down by the Zimbabwe Supreme Court which held that the War Victims Act, introduced shortly after independence to replace the Victims of Terrorism Act, was constitutional. The latter Act had been introduced by the former government to encourage commercial farmers to stay in the country by providing compensation in the event they suffered property damage as a result of military action. The new law which provides for relief only in case of death or injury, but not property loss, was enacted because of government's fear of being financially overwhelmed by new claims for compensation -- loss of cattle by peasant farmers for example -- which would have had to be honored under the old Act. This landmark decision was precipitated by a suit in which the plaintiff argued that application of the War Victims Act constituted an unconstitutional acquisition by the government of property (a claim for compensation that had occurred under the old Act) without adequate compensation.

This court case, like the one in which former Cabinet Minister Edgar Tekere was acquitted, again demonstrated the government's resolve to adhere to the Lancaster House Constitution and to the due process of law. Owing to the importance of this case the government selected a renowned South African attorney to represent it in the proceedings.

Some whites will no doubt see the Court's decision as eroding the protection of their property rights. This in turn, will lead to increased speculation on the part of many that the stage has now been set for the government to deprive large land owners of their property and give it to squatters. Any such government action, however, would clearly constitute an unjustifiable extension of the precedent in this case and would directly conflict with explicit constitutional prohibitions against the acquisition and redistribution of land without adequate compensation.

On the economic side the agricultural sector continues to lead the field in terms of output and is followed by construction and retail sales. The government, however, is still faced with a difficult balance of payment situation and foreign exchange deficiencies, and there are still serious shortages of skilled and experienced manpower.

Zimbabwe's banking and financial institutions have repeatedly demonstrated the ability to adapt to changed circumstances. They have continued to do so since independence and the phenomenon is evidenced by the speed with which these institutions have taken advantage of recent opportunities to participate in international arrangements with foreign banks. Mainly because of government's strict management of its external debt and its tight-fisted spending policies, Western banking institutions have come to regard Zimbabwe as one of the more creditworthy countries in Africa. Citibank recently became the second U.S. bank to open an office in Salisbury.

After hitting record lows the Zimbabwe stock market, long considered one of the key indexes of business confidence in the country, is presently enjoying a modest recovery. This development was probably triggered by increases in fuel supplies and the prospects for considerable improvements in economic and commercial relations with South Africa, which continues to be Zimbabwe's main trading partner. The realization by the government that the country has attracted very little foreign investment since independence and the resulting efforts to create a more favorable investment climate could be strong catalysts for restoring investor confidence in the future of private enterprise in Zimbabwe. This in turn, could lead to the long-term recovery of the stock market.

Politically, it appears that post-election euphoria is beginning to wane, and with it, some of ZANU's early popularity. The government's very deliberate and pragmatic approach to land resettlement and the rising cost of living are primarily responsible for much of the criticism being directed at it. The government, believing that it is being judged too harshly, is sensitive to criticism and has shown little tolerance for its critics, Ian Smith and Bishop Abel Muzorewa in particular.

A recently introduced order requiring prior notification to the Minister of Home Affairs of the intent to hold public political gatherings has the potential for seriously restricting the opposition's ability to present dissenting views. The Minister of Home Affairs, acting on the strength of this new measure, recently refused permission for a Muzorewa-sponsored rally to be held in Bulawayo, but granted permission to ZANU - PF and ZAPU, partners in the government coalition, to hold political meetings in Bulawayo on the same day. This order was also recently cited as justification for preventing ZAPU-oriented youth from carrying out a demonstration in support of the anniversary of the Soviet revolution.

These new restrictive measures appear unwarranted unless there is evidence not yet made public that Prime Minister Mugabe's government is being more threatened than it appears to be by opposition politicians. From all outward appearances, the Prime Minister is still firmly in control and the threat of political instability continues to diminish.

Prime Minister Mugabe has continued to take steps to reassure the whites by reaffirming his commitment to reconciliation and by stressing the point that Zimbabwe's brand of socialism would not be built on the basis of destroying the present economic infrastructure, but by preserving that structure. At the same time, however, he does not hesitate to castigate those whites who, according to him, have not changed their negative racial attitudes. His decision to fire Health Minister Herbert Ushewokunze, considered one of the more provocatively radical Cabinet members, has been a significant boost to white morale.

The exercise designed to integrate the two former guerrilla armies and the former Rhodesian forces into a single army, which was organized and directed by the British, has been successfully completed. The entire operation took 18 months and involved approximately 58,000 troops. The success of this operation reflects credit on the British, Prime Minister Mugabe, Joshua Nkomo and the white leadership of the former Rhodesian forces. It has also laid to rest the problem of force amalgamation which was one of the most intractable issues in the Anglo-American and Lancaster House settlement efforts.

Prime Minister Mugabe continues to view a Namibian settlement as an urgent issue, and he has stated publicly that Zimbabwe supports recent Contact Group efforts to bring about independence. Zimbabwe's balanced position on key regional issues is important to us in seeking a Namibian settlement and pursuing other U.S. objectives in Africa.

Christmas, of course, is, I think for all of us, is a time of memories of our own childhood, of our children, grandchildren -- but anyway, it is a time of children. And so, here tonight we're surrounded by children, I'm happy to say, here in the East Room of the White House.

Maybe it's fitting that children should be here and that Christmas is a time for children, because the man whose birthday we celebrate in this season came to us the Prince of Peace, not in a chariot, but as a babe in a manger. I know there are some who celebrate this day, the Christmas Day, as the birthday of a great teacher and philosopher. To others of us, he is more than that; he is also divine. But to all of us, he taught us the way that we could have peace on Earth and good will to men, and that is if we would do unto others as we would have others do unto us.

Now, this button here and this box has been used for turning on the national Christmas tree since 1923, I believe it was, when President Coolidge first did it. It didn't always get turned on here in the White House. Sometimes it was outdoors and down where the tree is and sometimes it wasn't even in Washington. Harry Truman turned the tree on once with this same switch from Independence, Missouri. Franklin Delano Roosevelt turned it on at times from Hyde Park. But it's going to be turned on here from Washington.

I had hoped that -- in fact, I one day said that our grandchild, Cameron Michael, might be able to push the button, but he's 3,000 miles away. All these children are here, and I couldn't pick one of them out of all of this number to push the button, so I'm going to have to do it myself.

And in doing it, we all know that this Christmas is not as happy for some Americans as it could be, not as happy for some people out in other parts of the world. We've had other Christmases in our land -- the first one when we were a nation in 1976 [1776], and Washington led his men across the Delaware River in a battle that set the stage for our independence. And legend has it that the path of their march through the snow was one of blood-stained footprints. But we shall live with the hope and the promise of the man of Galilee that Christmases will be better and that we will have peace and good will among men.

The President. Well, I think that everything is being done that can be done. This is, I think, a terrible situation. And it's a most frustrating situation, because I would like to be able to stand sometime -- I'm sure that we all would -- and say to the people that do these things, they are cowardly bums. They aren't heroes, they don't have a cause that justifies what they're doing. They're cowards. They wouldn't have the guts to stand up to anyone individually in any kind of a fair contest. And I think it is -- well, I can't say any more than that.

The decisions that are made in this room mold and shape the Federal policy, and today we are here to reaffirm, or affirm again, that discrimination of any kind will not be tolerated in the Federal Government.

During the campaign I stated that while I was opposed to the ERA, I was dedicated to eliminating discrimination against women. We've made progress in fulfilling this commitment. Judy Peachee has been appointed as my special assistant to vigorously pursue this objective. With her help, in October we launched the Fifty States Project to ferret out any remaining discriminatory laws at the State level. Judy is keeping me advised on the progress that's being made there.

Admittedly, most of our attention in these first months has been focused on putting America's economic house in order, and I don't think anything could be more helpful to American women than reducing inflation and laying the foundation for solid economic progress. We've accomplished more in this area than anyone, I'm sure, would have predicted. At the same time, however, specific steps other than the Fifty States Project have been taken.

To assist the task force we're establishing today, the Attorney General is systematically reviewing laws and regulations with an eye to identifying gender-based discrimination. Also, I think, we can take a little credit for making Sandra O'Connor the first female Supreme Court Justice.

Today we meet to move forward one more step. The Task Force on Legal Equity for Women will work to ensure that current and future Federal regulations do not discriminate because of sex. For the first time, there will be a working Task Force, with a clear Presidential mandate, for this express purpose. The people who will carry out this mandate were selected because of their ranking positions in the departments and agencies. Demonstrating the seriousness of our effort, members of the Task Force hold the rank of Assistant Secretary or the equivalent, in the Cabinet departments, and the rank of Deputy Administrator in the independent agencies. Fourteen of the 21 members are women. All are in positions to effect change.

I've asked Carol Dinkins of the Justice Department to chair the Task Force. She has impressive legal experience in dealing with regulations and has chaired two regulatory review task forces in Texas. Furthermore, in her current position as an Assistant Attorney General, she has the responsibility for examining and analyzing laws and regulations. I believe she's ideally suited to manage the functions of the Task Force and will take this responsibility with the seriousness it deserves.

The President. Well, I know that that is the way many think. My objections have been not because of opposition to what it was supposed to accomplish, but to the fact that it would take out of the legislature and put in the hands of the courts this matter. And it wouldn't be just simple; it would mean people believing that the constitutional right had been violated, taking their case to court, and long litigation on many points. And it offers an opportunity for mischiefmaking, not on the part of women, but on the part of men who would seek to take advantage of it for their own benefit. And with our own experience in California, where we eliminated by statute 14 outright discriminations against women, this was where, I believe, that there was a better way.

Sec. 2. Functions. (a) The members of the Task Force shall be responsible for coordinating and facilitating in their respective agencies, under the direction of the head of their agency, the implementation of changes ordered by the President in sex-discriminatory Federal regulations, policies, and practices.

Sec. 3. Administration. (a) The head of each Executive agency shall, to the extent permitted by law, provide the Task Force with such information and advice as the Task Force may identify as being useful to fulfill its functions.

The President. I'm very proud that he's here in this office. I think we're in the presence of a very courageous man and woman who have acted on the highest of principle. And I think the people of Poland are probably very proud of them also.

This legislation is the result of many months of hard work, both in the Congress and in the administration. There are many in the House and Senate who deserve credit for their efforts, but in particular I would like to thank Senators Jesse Helms, Bob Dole, and Dee Huddleston, and Representatives Kika de la Garza, Bill Wampler, and Tom Foley for their leadership. This bill provides needed assistance to our farmers and ranchers, benefits consumers, and is responsible from a budget perspective.

The strength of our economy is our reliance on the marketplace. All Americans are gripped today by a painful recession. Our agricultural producers -- the farmers and ranchers who are our mainstay -- feel the sting of high interest rates and inflation the same as any other business man or woman. Returning to the principles of free enterprise will return us all to prosperity.

The Agriculture and Food Act of 1981 recognizes the importance of the marketplace and emphasizes the great export potential of American agriculture. This bill will help farmers expand foreign markets and enhance our already positive agricultural balance of trade. I would like to challenge America's agricultural community to take full advantage of these export incentive provisions. I believe we can increase our agricultural exports 42 percent by 1984. That would mean $64 billion in agricultural trade -- an increase of $19 billion pouring directly into our agricultural economy.

We should never forget that American farmers and ranchers are the most productive in the world. On behalf of all Americans, I thank them for the abundance we enjoy even in these difficult days. I sign this bill in the belief that it will yield benefits to both producers and consumers. Working together, sensitive to the needs of each in the marketplace, we can restore prosperity to all our people.

The Dairy Price Support program in this country has resulted in the stockpiling of millions upon millions of pounds of cheese by the Commodity Credit Corporation. At a time when American families are under increasing financial pressure, their government cannot sit by and watch millions of pounds of food turn to waste.

I am authorizing today the immediate release of 30 million pounds from the CCC inventory. The cheese will be delivered to the States that request it and will be distributed free to the needy by nonprofit organizations.

The 1981 farm bill I signed today will slow the rise in price support levels, but even under this bill, surpluses will continue to pile up. A total of more than 560 million pounds of cheese has already been consigned to warehouses, so more distributions may be necessary as we continue our drive to root out waste in government and make the best possible use of our nation's resources.

Mr. Anderson is Counselor to the Under Secretary of Health and Human Services. He was legislative assistant to Senator Jesse Helms in 1976 - 81. He is president of the American Family Institute, a nonpartisan, tax-exempt, independent research and educational organization supporting studies and publications concerning the impact of public policy upon the family and its role in a free society. Mr. Anderson is also a practicing attorney in the State of Washington and the District of Columbia.

By the President of the United States of America A Proclamation 1. The Secretary of Agriculture has advised me that he has reason to believe that certain sugars, sirups and molasses derived from sugarcane or sugar beets, classified under items 155.20 and 155.30, of the Tariff Schedules of the United States (TSUS) (19 U.S.C. 1202), are being, or are practically certain to be, imported into the United States under such conditions and in such quantities as to render or tend to render ineffective, or to materially interfere with the price support operations being conducted by the Department of Agriculture for sugarcane and sugar beets.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-third day of December, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-one, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and sixth.

C. The provisions of this Proclamation shall apply to articles entered, or withdrawn from warehouse, for consumption after 12:01 a.m. (Eastern Standard Time) on the day following the date of this Proclamation. However, the provisions of this proclamation shall not apply to articles entered, or withdrawn from warehouse, for consumption prior to January 1, 1982 which are imported to fulfill forward contracts that were entered into prior to June 1, 1981 between: (a) an exporter and an end user of such articles; or (b) an importer, broker, or operator and an end user of such articles.

I have today signed two proclamations imposing import fees and increasing duties on sugar. The proclamations were made necessary by enactment of the 1981 Agriculture and Food Act's price support program for domestic sugar.

The high price support level for domestic sugar (16.75 in FY 82) creates an opportunity for foreign producers to export sugar to this country. Under present world market conditions, foreign sugar can be delivered in the United States at a price less than the domestic support price. Unless duties are increased and import fees imposed, the Federal Government would have to take ownership of large quantities of sugar at a tremendous cost to the taxpayers of this country.

The import fee imposed by one of these proclamations results in a market stabilization price for sugar of 19.08 per pound. This price consists of the 16.75 purchase price plus 2.33 to cover adjusted average freight and related marketing costs of raw sugar.

The proclamations allow a limited exemption for sugar imports which were contracted for prior to June 1, 1981, and which will be brought into this country before January 1, 1982. This exemption was made as a matter of equity for foreign traders who had made contracts to sell us sugar well before congressional acceptance of the sugar provisions of the farm bill.

I personally regret the necessity for signing these proclamations. The sugar program enacted by Congress to protect higher cost domestic producers will result in higher costs for all American sugar consumers. I have directed that the import fees imposed by these proclamations be adjusted at least quarterly, so that they can be revised downward whenever possible, without incurring significant government purchases of sugar or encouraging forfeiture of sugar loans beginning in FY 83.

In addition, I realize that the sugar duties and fees may have adverse effects on our major foreign sugar suppliers, particularly those in the Caribbean Basin. I have thus asked appropriate agencies to review this question on a priority basis to see what we can do to mitigate the effects.

The President. Knowing that after you get asking your questions I might not feel as good as I feel now, let me, while I feel good, say that this being a kind of a year-end roundup, I have a very good feeling about the year past and, thus, a hope for the year to come.

I think we have had a most successful year and a lot of it due to the fact that we did put together a working, bipartisan coalition to cope with the problems of spending and taxes and so forth. And I think the accomplishments that have us with, domestically, an economic program now in place to deal with the crisis, makes me feel good, and I'm optimistic about that.

Also, on the world scene, I think that with all the troubles that we have, we have a relationship with our neighbors here in the Western Hemisphere and with our allies abroad that -- we've made progress toward easing the strain in some of the troublespots of the world. Poland, of course, was an emergency situation that we couldn't have planned for very far in advance, but I mean such things as Middle East peace, the Caribbean and Central America, and so forth. And all in all, I think we have made some good progress.

The President. Well, there certainly will be no change in taxes in 1982, I guarantee you. We have put a program in place that I believe will increase government's revenues simply by broadening the base of the economy, stimulating increase in productivity, offering incentives that the program does offer.

I learned a long time ago that putting your feet in concrete was dangerous, because I have among my mementoes a round cement block with a pair of shoes imbedded in it that was given me by the Capitol Press Corps in Sacramento after I had put my feet in concrete and then, one day, had to stand before them and say the sound you hear is the sound of concrete breaking around my feet. So, they gave me that, but I would like to see what happens with this program.

Of course, there is the one thing with regard to taxes, that from the very first I did always speak of, and that was we continue the review of where there are places where people are getting undeserved tax breaks, the so-called closing of loopholes. Now, in that I do not include as loopholes the legitimate deductions that -- without which the whole program would have failed a long time ago -- but actual loopholes where, as I say, there is an unjust break. This we continue to review, and I am not opposed to that. But I think that until we see this program in operation -- and then, what other circumstances can arise.

For example, we, as everyone else -- we were all caught by surprise with the recession. We knew the economy was not going to be healthy for a while, but a recession, which I think was precipitated by the over-long continuation of high interest rates, brought that on. And when you just add one percentage point to the unemployment, you add $25 billion to the deficit. And until we see what begins to happen with this program, because, by the same token, you can reduce a projected deficit by $25 billion if you lower the unemployment rate.

The President. After I see what happens. You can't -- the tax reform or reduction has only been in existence now for about 12 weeks, since October 1st, and that's only the smallest part. Next July we're slated for another 10-percent reduction, and I think you have to wait until you see the -- what this program is going to bring about -- what changes. And I am optimistic about it, myself.

The President. Well, let me say here that in no way will I -- do I look kindly upon anything that is contrary to the stimulative part of our tax program, that was designed to improve productivity. No, what I was trying to say with my story about the cement block was that with the unexpected things that can happen, I just feel that I'm in no position to comment on those ideas. My leaning would be against a tax increase, but again, I don't want another block of concrete.

Q. Mr. President, you said that you -- and Dave Gergen [Assistant to the President for Communications] told us much the same thing -- that you don't want anything that would be contrary to the stimulative part of that program?

The President. Well, let me just say that things of that kind, and excise taxes, are not as contrary, granted that all taxes are paid by the people. But I don't think that consumption taxes are in direct opposition to the tax program that we've instituted.

Q. Let me ask another part of that. You said your feet are not in concrete, and you've also said that the problem with tax increases at this time is that it would aggravate a recession. With the skepticism that you're well aware of about supply-side economics and the economic program, at what point, Mr. President, if the unemployment rate continues to go up, do you begin to rethink this, the supply-side economics, which seems to get such skepticism on the outside?

The President. Well, but you see, I never had heard the term before, you know, ``supply-side,'' but I had long been a believer in this idea of reducing the share, the percentage that government takes from the private sector. My own degree was in economics, and I remember back in those days, on those dark Depression days, that one of the things that you learned was that around the turn of the century the classical economists theorized that business ups and downs, the recurrent business cycles and so forth, that invariably the business or the economic slowdown was accompanied by government going beyond a certain point with regard to the money that it took out of the private sector -- in other words, that government can be a drag on the economy.

And if you look at what has happened in this century, the last being the Kennedy tax cuts, economists by and large opposed him on that and said, oh, this was a terrible thing. I think their figure averaged out that he would lose $83 billion in tax revenue. Well, he went ahead with that tax cut, and the government didn't lose 83, it got 54 billion extra.

Now, we look at every time that there has been a reduction or an increase in the capital gains tax, an increase in that tax, the government winds up getting less money at the higher rate. And by the reverse thing, every time that they have reduced that tax, in the very first year the government gets additional revenue at the lower rate. So, I happen to believe this.

In California, when we began giving back the surpluses to the people in the form of a one-time tax rebate, like a bonus to employees or something, gave it back, California's economy showed a reaction to that. We were -- normally we had a higher unemployment rate than the national average and a higher inflation rate. In both instances that changed, and we had lower rates.

Q. But, Mr. President, those were soaring times in the sixties, and with California. The economy was in great shape for reasons other than the government action. For the first time, this recession, you're cutting back on budget, which also has in some degree a recessionary effect. And what I'm trying to find out is, if unemployment goes to 10 percent and seems to not be abating, would you then consider the possibility of some change in direction of the economic program?

The President. I see our economic program as the best hope we've got for solving the unemployment problem. Nothing that's been done in the past has any long-range effect. If you will look at government spending its way out of, say, a recessionary cycle, the artificial stimulation of the money supplies, government spending. This was done, oh, along about, before the '68 campaign -- sometimes that stimulated spending is timed to meet an election year -- and in '70 we had a recession, and we elected a Republican administration in '68. But in '70 the repercussion was so bad, because up went inflation and up went unemployment at the same time. Then, for the '72 election, the same thing had happened, the stimulating of the economy artificially instead of working our way out. Then in '74 we had a deeper recession, where unemployment was greater, inflation was greater.

Now, the same thing has gone on. We now have, with one difference -- and I think due to the policies, even though the program is actually not gone into effect until now -- but even with the reductions, the several billions of dollars that we've managed to cut out of the budget that was already -- well, I almost said, in existence, but it wasn't, because we haven't had a budget since quite some time ago -- but we cut several billion dollars out of the '81 spending. But today -- and this, now, is one of our factors -- inflation has not accompanied the increase in unemployment. Inflation is going down.

And, incidentally, that has caused another reduction in tax revenues that we hadn't counted on. We didn't think we were going to be as successful so quickly in lowering inflation. But inflation is a tax, and when it went down faster than we'd planned, our estimates of revenues were thrown off.

But I believe that what we're aimed at is the answer to unemployment, is not a quick fix with some gerry-built programs that government programs and government spending that increases the size and the power of government. What is needed is a stimulant to the private sector, which provides the bulk of the jobs, the employment.

The President. The limits, yes. Well, I must say, it was not too much of a surprise after 8 years, Governor of California. I was aware that things don't instantly change and that the wheels of government grind slowly -- and perhaps by good intent, that government is prevented from doing things too hastily.

Q. Do you have any ideas for next year on how you can reimpose, if you will, the Reagan agenda on top of all of the intrusions from outside so that your Presidency has some stamp of your own ideas, rather than reacting to what the world is doing?

The President. It looks to me as if we will be building on what we have already done. We have a 1983 budget that must be presented in January, even before a 1982 budget is approved. And so, we've been working on that, because at the same time that we got our billions of dollars of reductions -- the biggest single reduction in the increase in government -- we've cut the rate of increase in government spending in half. It had averaged 14 percent or better the preceding 3 years. It's down to about 7\1/2\ percent now. But at the same time, we said there will be additional savings that must be made in '83, '84. So, now we'll be coming in, they won't be as easy to get, because we made a pretty good slice there the first time around. But we're going to be asking for additional cuts. We're going to go forward faster with what I talked about for so long as federalism. We're working on the program of how to transfer back to other levels of government programs and revenue sources to pay for them. We'll be going forward with that.

The President. -- -- on that. Then we've got the commission to come in with a plan to restore social security in spite of the efforts that made that a political football -- and disgracefully so -- this past year.

We still, all of us in government, have to meet the problem that is imposed by social security's fiscal situation. It is actuarily out of balance and must be corrected. And, at the same time, that does not mean, as they've charged, nor have we ever suggested taking benefits away from those people now dependent on them. We're not going to do that.

On the world scene, we'll be going forward with our Caribbean plan, which includes, of course, Central America, also. We'll be continuing in the process that started at Cancun on how to help the lesser developing nations, pursuing the peace process in the Middle East, and, of course, working to do what we can with this present unanticipated situation in Poland. And yet, that in a way is a part of the whole East-West problem, because Poland didn't bring this on itself. The Soviet Union had a very large hand in there.

But in connection with that, we'll also be pursuing the thing I talked about earlier, arms reductions with the Soviet Union -- not arms limitations that allow both sides to go on adding to their arsenals, but to see if we cannot get an actual cutback, particularly in the strategic nuclear weapons.

Q. Back to the world scene. One of the earlier things you mentioned here, pursuing a peace process in the Middle East, is the latest incident with Israel over the Golan Heights and our reaction to that part of an overall reassessment of our Middle East policy in which we intend to take a stronger line with Israel?

The President. Well, I think maybe more of that will be temperate now. There was a little harsh tone to that. But, no, we're still committed as we've always been to our relationship with Israel, to the assurance, the obligation that I think this country feels that Israel shall exist as a nation and, we hope, in peace with its neighbors.

And maybe part of the, oh, the momentary distractions that have occurred are because we believe that in striving for peace we have to make the Arab states there understand and realize that we want a just and a fair peace, and we're not just intervening as the ally of one country, even though we are allied and have been in this moral obligation to Israel which we'll continue to be. But we want them to know that we want fairness for them, also, and here's where I think we've made great progress.

Q. One of the problems, I suppose, that I gather from Prime Minister Begin, is -- and several of us have come across this on other occasions -- and that is there seems to be differences of opinion between you and your staff on some basic issues -- and I'll use Israel as an example. I think that in Prime Minister Begin there's a suspicion that there may be a difference of opinion as to the commitment to Israel between, say, you and your feelings and those of, say, your, many have used the expression, ``more pragmatic,'' let us say, advisers.

The President. No. Let me say I can assure you that is not so, and I can address myself to that appearance in just a second. But remember that some of the things -- for example, the Iraqi incident: We were bound by law. The law in delivering American weapons says for defensive purposes only, and they cannot be used in any other way. And without warning here was, apparently, an attack on a neighboring country using the weapons that we had provided. And the law was very specific. There had to be an investigation of this.

The President. Well, it didn't. [Laughter] As a matter of fact, I understand why now, too. We had never known that there was any talk with regard to the supplying of material to that nuclear reactor in the files or that any had ever taken place involving the previous administration. Now, I'm quite sure that he probably felt that once we were in we must have had access to that information. We didn't. No one had ever mentioned it. So, we were surprised to learn that.

But the thing about differences appearing, I think, is perhaps because it's the first time that there has really been in operation what I call Cabinet government. I did this in California and was so satisfied with the result that we instituted it here.

Now, what do we mean by that? There's always been a Cabinet, but usually the Cabinet heads or Secretaries in the perfunctory Cabinet meetings which would be held, it was a case of each one kind of reporting a little bit on his own situation. My idea of Cabinet government was that you recognize that there are very few problems that don't really overlap in a lot of areas, and I'm the fellow who has to make the decision. So, we meet.

We've met 29 times so far as a full Cabinet, and the issues that come up and are put out on the table -- there is debate entered into by everyone present, like a board of directors would debate something. The only difference between that and a board of directors meeting is, we don't take a vote. When I've heard enough to make a decision, I know that I have to make the decision.

But the result is, when you have that kind of meeting -- yes, you're going to have different views presented, and it finally has to come down to options that, well, this way, that way -- then I make the decision, and there's been no animus in any of this. There's been total acceptance of the final decisions. But I think that this is so unusual in Washington, this method of doing this, that this has led to the assumption on the part of some that there's somehow some disarray or friction going on. The very contrary is true.

Q. Mr. President, your own popularity has held up quite well during this first year, but polls indicate that Mrs. Reagan has aroused a higher rate of disapproval than other Presidents' wives, mainly because of a perception that she likes expensive things -- clothes and mink coats and jewelry and costly china. Does she, in fact, have expensive taste? Is that bad? What are your thoughts on this?

The President. No, and let me tell you that in regard to that, I think she's taken a lot of abuse that she did not in any way and in the slightest deserve. First of all, she is a very conservative and saving soul, and I kid her that she's even still got the middy blouses she had in gym class at school. Sometimes some of these attacks are leveled, and she's wearing a dress that's 10 or 12 years old -- and I don't know how many ladies do that. But she likes quality and good things, as I think we all do.

But she's not extravagant. She's not dedicated to that. She is very dedicated to the causes that interest her -- the Foster Grandparents Program, the drug programs. Some people have even indicated that somehow there isn't a sincerity in that. Well, there is. And it was her interest in that program, which really got started in California, that spread -- it not only spread it nationally but when we were sent on a mission to Australia once for a preceding President -- not the preceding President, but another President, while I was Governor -- before we left Australia, the Foster Grandparents Program was given birth there, thanks to her.

But all of this talk, all of these things that she has done -- we found -- and it probably could have been true if anyone else was here -- that there was a lot of long-delayed maintenance due in the house. Coupled with that was something that was best expressed, I think, by Jackie Kennedy when she was President -- Mrs. Onassis. She said at the time that this is the house that belongs to all of America. Therefore, it should be the prettiest house. And she, as you know, set out herself -- and people through the years have contributed wonderful pieces and furniture and antiques and so forth to the White House.

We found many of those were moldering away in a warehouse -- Nancy found. And learning from the staff and the people who were there the things that the White House actually possessed and weren't there, she went, and many of them had deteriorated badly. The warehouse people were delighted that she -- they said, ``We can't take care of them. They don't belong here.'' But there were people then who volunteered and helped refinish them, refurbish them.

The dishes? She didn't buy any dishes. An entire set of dishes was contributed to the White House. Now, I think Margaret Truman has expressed herself on that and said that even that far back, you couldn't set a dinner in the State Dining Room without a mixture of dishes, because there's a certain thing called breakage that takes place over the years.

The President. No, she does not attend Cabinet meetings, and she does not project herself that way. But for all of you who might be married -- we've been married almost 30 years now, and certainly we talk about things, and she has a viewpoint. But never has she tried to play a role in government. And many times I respect her woman's intuition.

But in regard to unpopularity, I just heard earlier today -- and maybe Larry can tell me if this is true -- I just heard that some poll or something has revealed that she's the most popular woman in the world.

Q. I hate to leave the subject, because it's a good one, but let me ask on behalf of some papers I have in the Midwest and Detroit, where things are really tough economically, and it looks like they're going to get tougher. This is going to be a very tough winter for a lot of people in the part of the country that you came from, and it's going to be a while, as you say, before the economic program takes hold. Are there any plans at all to help, aid some of these people in some of these areas in this coming winter, in this next, very tough 6 months or so?

The President. Well, this is a subject of much of our discussion because we get -- you know, people look at the national figures, unemployment rate such and such and so forth. We forget that unemployment is not spread evenly across the country, that what we call a recession in some areas is actually what I said it was in the campaign, a depression. You can have some areas with an 18- , 15-percent unemployment rate, and this is true. It is that spotted. We also have some other parts of the country where there isn't even a recession at the moment.

And yes, we think -- for example, we're discussing this whole program of enterprise zones, and we're looking at this from the standpoint of, could those be -- it's an experimental program -- could those be launched more in the heart of those areas where they're having problems, in those cities such as you've named, where the steel industry and the automobile industry is so much a part of their economy, and it is down so low.

The President. That's again one of those frustrations you asked about, that you can think of something good that doesn't happen all at once. But we've -- that, and I know that now and then, with regard to the defense program, where defense has got to be the first priority -- what is the best way to arm the country -- at the same time, now and then there is a situation where a decision can be made with regard to that defense program that will not reduce the quality in any way, but can be directed toward some place in the country where the economic situation could be benefited by it.

Anything, everything that we can do, we want to do in helping that. The programs in the past that have been -- well, like job training programs and so forth -- not that we're doing away with those. There's certainly a need for them. But to use those as a substitute for legitimate employment when the very fact of those programs and their cost was slowing down the reinvigoration of the economy, we're not going to do it.

The President. Whatever we can legitimately do to help in that regard. There's nothing that's going to benefit us more, and benefit them, than getting those industries back on their feet, the steel industry -- and there we've met with them. And I just met with the heads of the automobile companies on what can government do for those industries. And there have been a number of suggestions and things that we're looking at that can help them with their problems.

The steel industry, as you know, has now a program for modernization of plant equipment. This has been one of the big factors that has made us become noncompetitive with other countries that we helped rebuild in the Marshall plan and who now have more modern facilities than we do. I think our workers are the best in the world, but we've got to give them the tools to match those other workers.

Q. I want to take you back to foreign affairs. When the Soviet Union rolled into Afghanistan, President Carter said he was shocked that the Soviets would behave as they did. Prior to the crackdown in Poland, you made it quite clear to Moscow how you viewed the situation and what your wishes were for their behavior. And yet, as you stated last week at the press conference, Moscow is clearly behind what has happened in Poland. Does this demonstrate to you, to use Ann's phrase, ``the limits'' of the American Presidency to shape events in certain parts of the world?

The President. Well, let me answer that, as best I can, is that at 9 o'clock tonight I will be talking on that particular subject and about some of the actions that we have already taken and that there are other actions that we can take. This is both with regard to Poland and the Soviet Union.

The President. Well, surprised to the extent that we knew that there were plans laid for this. We knew that it was a very risky situation with the Polish Government wanting to be able to handle the situation themselves with the knowledge that if they didn't, the Soviet Union could very conceivably come in, as it's done before in Hungary and in Czechoslovakia. That we wanted least of all.

The President. Well, I'm not going to say that. I'd defend the right of the people to vote. I am going to say that maybe they should have realized that they were asking the one thing that a Communist government cannot allow.

The President. No, no. I still feel that sometime in the coming year, properly prepared for -- and I noticed that Mr. Brezhnev the other day, in answer to a question, said that there would have to be careful planning for such a meeting -- but yes, and I think a meeting is likely.

The President. Well, it was an answer to a question. Someone asked me something about whether or not I thought they were lying or telling the truth on some -- I can't remember what incident it was -- and I just pointed out what is a part of Communist dogma going all the way back to Marx, and that is that if you look at their dogma, they say that the only moral -- that morality is anything that furthers the spread of socialism and the cause of socialism and that the only immorality is anything that counters that or works against that.

Well, we should always remember from the very beginning that that is their philosophy, it's their religion. And as long as they adhere to that, we're fools if we do not negotiate, recognizing that they claim that right for themselves.

The President. Yes, I think we're in the world together, and this doesn't mean that you can't talk and try to resolve your differences. But I think you go at it with some realism. So, I have no objection to talking.

I know that it sounds kind of foolish maybe to link Hollywood, an experience there, to the world situation, and yet, the tactics seemed to be pretty much the same. But that much rewritten history of Hollywood and distorted history has hidden from many people what actually took place back there in the late forties after World War II. It was a Communist attempt to gain control of the motion picture industry, because at that time the Hollywood motion picture industry provided the film for 75 percent of the playing time in all the theaters of the world. It was the greatest propaganda device, if someone wanted to use it for that, that's ever been known.

And they used the device of the jurisdictional strike. And I found myself not a bystander; I was right in the middle of it as president of the Screen Actors Guild. We were the one union that, if they could persuade us to participate in that strike -- and you know, there's no way in a jurisdictional strike -- it isn't like someone striking for better conditions or wages. This is an argument between two, in this instance, it was two groups of unions -- all of them, by the way, aligned in the AFL - CIO at the time, some 43 unions and guilds in the picture business all told. But this was the device that was being used.

Where we were, the key is that as long as one side could keep enough people in to keep the cameras turning, they'd turn as long as there were actors in front of the cameras. So, the whole key was to try and prevent the actors from going in because then the business would be closed. And we met for 7 months, virtually daily and many times twice daily, with both factions, because being in the spot we were in, it was decided that we would invite both factions and management to sit at a table with us, and we, as the noninvolved, would ensure fairness in the discussion, but to try and find a method that would keep the business open and not throw 30,000 people out of jobs. And this was how we got into it.

This is how I know it from the inside, and I think I learned a lot there. And the funny thing is, I didn't start with a bias. As a matter of fact, I started the other way, because I'd also been in Hollywood at the time that Browne and Bioff were turned up in the opposite side as being extortionists and so forth, in labor. But I learned the hard way, at that table, in all those months, who was really to blame and what the purpose of the strike was.

No, I don't think that I talked more harshly than I do now. And at the same time, I've always recognized that ultimately there's got to be a settlement, a solution. The other way, if you don't believe that, then you're going to find yourself trapped in the back of your mind, the inevitability of a conflict some day. So, that kind of conflict is going to end the world.

So, I believe, yes, in talking, but talk with some knowledge of what the other fellow's aims are and what his tactics are and what you're going to do. As a matter of fact, I have met Brezhnev. I met him 10 years ago. And lying in the hospital last April, after March 30, I wrote a handwritten letter recalling that meeting to Mr. Brezhnev, and sent it to him, because, as I say, no, we must find a solution.

The President. I suppose maybe there were some mistakes someplace along the line. On the other hand, as I said in my opening remarks, I feel very good about the seven great victories that we had. The defense program has been put in place, interest rates coming down -- the things that we've accomplished.

But I would have to say, probably the one thing that we were induced to do was present our program for straightening out the fiscal situation with social security. And it was a leader in the majority party in the House who just told us that if we did not submit our proposal, they were going to go ahead with hearings and have a proposal of their own. Well, we had not wanted to submit it at the time, because we were working hard for those budget cuts. We didn't want any confusion that somehow social security's financial problem was a part of the budget-balancing process, because it isn't. And yet that's what was done.

With their challenge we had reason to believe then that there would be a bipartisan getting-together on this problem, with whoever submitted a proposal. And instead, it was used as a demagogic attack with distortions and outright falsehood as to what was in our program and what we were trying to do -- and not one single move made toward trying to come to a meeting of the minds on how we solve the problem. And I regret now that we didn't just brazen it out and tell them, ``Well, okay, if you want to go ahead, you go ahead, but we're not going to tie social security into this other situation.'' And now we have a commission formed, with a year to try and work it out.

The President. I wanted to say one last thing on that question that, when I was talking earlier about Nancy and I said it was maintenance, you'd be surprised how much of what went on up there was restoring of the floors, the beautiful mahogany doors which looked just like a flat, solid, dirty black instead of a beauty of the wood -- all of those things refurbished. Drapes that were tattered, with holes in them, probably from the sunlight coming in. And painting -- there had been no painting, internal painting, for 20 years or more.

The plumbing was actually so old that if something went wrong, you could no longer get parts. And there was a fellow in town who would hand-forge, at quite some expense, the parts that you needed. Also, there was a danger that one day we might find ourselves wading. [Laughter] So, a part of all of that was the plumbing.

Nancy and I are very happy to send our warmest greetings and best wishes to all those who are celebrating Christmas. We join with Americans everywhere in recognizing the sense of renewed hope and comfort this joyous season brings to our nation and the world.

The Nativity story of nearly twenty centuries ago is known by all faiths as a hymn to the brotherhood of man. For Christians, it is the fulfillment of age-old prophecies and the reaffirmation of God's great love for all of us. Through a generous Heavenly Father's gift of His Son, hope and compassion entered a world weary with fear and despair and changed it for all time.

On Christmas, we celebrate the birth of Christ with prayer, feasting, and great merriment. But, most of all, we experience it in our hearts. For, more than just a day, Christmas is a state of mind. It is found throughout the year whenever faith overcomes doubt, hope conquers despair, and love triumphs over hate. It is present when men of any creed bring love and understanding to the hearts of their fellow man.

The feeling is seen in the wondrous faces of children and in the hopeful eyes of the aged. It overflows the hearts of cheerful givers and the souls of the caring. And it is reflected in the brilliant colors, joyful sounds, and beauty of the winter season.

Our current concern regarding Poland should not cause us to forget that 2 years ago today, massive Soviet military forces invaded the sovereign country of Afghanistan and began an attempt to subjugate one of the most fiercely independent peoples of the world. Despite the presence of 90,000 Soviet combat troops, a recent increase of some 5,000, the courageous people of Afghanistan have fought back. Today they effectively deny Soviet forces control of most of Afghanistan. Efforts by the Soviets to establish a puppet government in the Soviet image, which could govern a conquered land, have failed. Soviet control extends little beyond the major cities, and even there the Afghan freedomfighters often hold sway by night and sometimes even by day. The battle for Afghan independence continues.

But the gallant efforts of the people of Afghanistan to regain their independence have come at great cost. Almost 3 million Afghan refugees, a fifth of the pre-invasion population of Afghanistan, have fled their homes and have taken refuge across the border, largely in Pakistan. Those who have remained at home have become the unfortunate victims not only of the dislocations of war but also of indiscriminate Soviet attacks on civilians. So, while we express our admiration for those who fight for the freedom we all cherish, we must also express our deep sympathy for those innocent victims of Soviet imperialism who, because of the love of freedom of their countrymen, have been forced to flee for their lives.

On three separate occasions, most recently on November 18, 1981, the United Nations General Assembly passed by overwhelming margins resolutions aimed at Soviet aggression in Afghanistan. The U.S. Government and the American people join in the broad international condemnation of the Soviet invasion and occupation of Afghanistan. Just as in Poland we see the use of intimidation and indirect use of power to subjugate a neighboring people, in Afghanistan we see direct aggression in violation of the United Nations Charter and other principles governing the conduct among nations.

While extending our admiration and sympathy to the people of Afghanistan, we also call upon the Soviet Union to avail itself of proposals set forth by the community of nations for the withdrawal of Soviet forces from Afghanistan so that an independent and nonaligned nation can be reestablished with a government responsive to the desires of the people, so that the millions of Afghans who have sought refuge in other countries can return with honor to their homes. As long as the Soviet Union occupies Afghanistan in defiance of the international community, the heroic Afghan resistance will continue, and the United States will support the cause of a free Afghanistan.

The President today announced the formation of an Emergency Mobilization Preparedness Board to improve mobilization capabilities and interagency cooperation within the Federal Government to respond to major peacetime or war-related emergencies. The Board will develop and recommend national preparedness policies.

The Board consists of the representatives of 22 key Federal agencies at the Deputy Secretary or Under Secretary level and is chaired by the Assistant to the President for National Security Affairs. A full-time Secretariat has been established to support the Board and monitor the implementation of the Board's recommendations by Federal agencies. The Secretariat is chaired by a senior official of the Federal Emergency Management Agency.

With the establishment of the Emergency Mobilization Preparedness Board, the President formalized his commitment to achieve a credible and effective capability to harness the mobilization potential of America. This potential will support the Armed Forces, while meeting the needs of the national economy and the preparedness requirements for domestic emergencies.

Mr. Sanderson has specialized in environmental law, with an emphasis on water and air quality, solid and hazardous waste management, and natural resource project development. He has written several publications on environmental law and water pollution.

The President. Well, the measures are directed at the Governments of Poland and of the Soviet Union, and the purpose is to convey to those regimes how strongly we feel about their joint efforts to extinguish liberty in Poland. And they're not meant to increase the hardship on the victims of repression, the Polish people -- quite the contrary. By our actions, we expect to put powerful doubts in the minds of the Soviet and Polish leaders about this continued repression. And in addition, we are going to continue assisting the flow of food, medicines, and other necessities to the Polish people, not to the governments.

The programs and activities for which funds are authorized and appropriated by this legislation are vital to important United States foreign policy and national security interests. They are the principal means by which the United States contributes to the security and economic development needs of a wide range of countries less favored than our own.

Foreign aid suffers from a lack of domestic constituency, in large part because the results of the programs are often not immediately visible and self-evident. Properly conceived and efficiently administered, however, security assistance programs, an essential complement to our defense effort, directly enhance the security of the United States. Development assistance also contributes to this effort by supplementing the indigenous efforts of recipients to achieve economic growth and meet the basic needs of their peoples. Progress in both of these areas will contribute to regional stability and to a more peaceful world, both of which are central U.S. policy objectives.

It has been a major objective of this administration to subject all Federal programs to continuous and rigorous scrutiny to ensure that they directly serve United States interests and that each dollar is effectively used. My administration undertook a thorough and careful review of foreign assistance when we assumed office. We have worked closely with the Congress on this legislation. It reflects the considered judgment of both branches that our national interests are inextricably tied to the security and development of our friends and allies.

Last spring I proposed several major initiatives and substantive changes to the laws governing foreign assistance programs. My proposals were intended to restore needed flexibility to enable the United States to utilize foreign assistance in a timely and effective manner and to be able to respond to changes in the international environment. I am grateful that the bills I am approving today contain many of those proposals and that Congress generally shares my view that excessive rigidities in the law hamper the effectiveness of these programs. The authorization of a Special Defense Acquisition Fund to permit advance procurement in anticipation of foreign sales, the authority to begin a security assistance program for Pakistan, and the repeal of the absolute prohibitions on security assistance to Argentina and Chile are major steps forward in this regard. I regret, however, that H.R. 4559 does not contain language necessary to permit the Special Defense Acquisition Fund to begin operations. This will severely hamper our ability to meet the military needs of allies and friends on a timely basis, degrading U.S. force capabilities.

I welcome the authorization of appropriations for two fiscal years, 1982 and 1983. I shall, of course, transmit to the Congress in the near future any additional substantive or budgetary recommendations for fiscal year 1983 that I believe are necessary to promote or sustain our foreign policy interests. I must note, however, my deep concern about the 52-percent reduction from my request in the appropriated level for grant financing of foreign military sales to 14 countries. This level is inadequate to meet minimum requirements and will have a severe impact on those countries that have legitimate defense needs, but whose economies cannot sustain financing at or near commercial rates.

Section 109 of S. 1196 permits the Congress to disapprove, by adoption of a concurrent resolution certain proposed leases of defense articles. Section 737 would permit the Congress, also by concurrent resolution, to disapprove a Presidential waiver necessary to continue certain foreign military and economic assistance following transfers of certain nuclear technology covered by sections 669 and 670 of the Foreign Assistance Act.

H.R. 4559 requires the prior written approval of the appropriations committees of both Houses before funds may be obligated or expended for the Special Requirements Fund. In addition, section 514 requires similar committee approval before funds may be transferred, pursuant to statutory authority, between appropriations accounts.

The Attorney General has advised me that these four provisions are unconstitutional in light of the express requirements of Article I, section 7 of the Constitution that legislative measures having the force and effect of law must be presented to the President for approval, and because of the potential for involving the Congress in the day-to-day implementation of the law, a responsibility allocated solely to the President under the Constitution. These provisions can be expected to inject an unnecessarily disruptive element by subjecting proposed programs to disapproval, congressional or even committee, even after they have been examined by the executive branch and found to be compatible with congressionally adopted standards and supportive of the national interests of the United States.

While I am signing S. 1196 and H.R. 4559 into law because of the overall importance to the foreign policy and national security of the United States of the programs for which funds are authorized and appropriated, I must express my deep concern about these provisions, and my action today does not imply my acceptance of their constitutional validity.

The ultimate importance to the United States of our security and development assistance programs cannot be exaggerated. The programs and activities provided for in these bills will enable the United States to continue its contribution to the achievement of a secure and stable international environment.

I am pleased to sign into law H.R. 4995, the Department of Defense Appropriation Act, 1982. This legislation is a significant step in this administration's commitment to enhancing the defense posture of the United States and of maintaining our responsibilities to the nations of the free world. This is just a beginning, and in the years ahead we will need to sustain the effort mandated by the American people and supported by the Congress so that we will succeed in strengthening the nation's defense.

In addition to containing funds for essential strategic programs of the Department of Defense, the legislation provides funds to support the military and civilian personnel of the Department of Defense. I would like to express my appreciation for the strong bipartisan support that this legislation received and wish to personally thank the dedicated members of the Committees on Appropriations of the Senate and the House who supported my budget requests and did so much to see that this legislation was enacted.

Finally, I would like to take the opportunity to commend the dedicated men and women of the Armed Forces and to express, on behalf of the American people, the gratitude of us all for the dedication and sacrifice they exhibit in the defense of our Nation.

I have signed into law H.R. 4331, a bill that substantially incorporates the social security changes which I urged in my address of September 24 to the nation -- restoration of the minimum benefit for people receiving that benefit, and interfund borrowing to tide the system over while the new National Commission on Social Security Reform develops a bipartisan plan to achieve long-lasting solutions to social security's financing problems.

There is no more important domestic issue on which we have to have a national consensus than social security, because it affects just about all of us either as current beneficiaries or current taxpayers. Continuing the minimum benefit for present beneficiaries reflects a bipartisan consensus, which I strongly support.

We all know that interfund borrowing is just a temporary solution to the financing difficulties ahead for social security, which are real and serious. The bill authorizes interfund borrowing until the end of 1982, the same time the new National Commission on Social Security Reform is scheduled to report its recommendations.

I am determined that we put social security back on a sound financial footing and restore the confidence and peace of mind of the American public in its social security system. That is the reason for the National Commission which I proposed in September and the members of which Majority Leader Baker, Speaker O'Neill, and I have just selected. I am confident that after they have reviewed all the options and agreed on a plan to assure the fiscal integrity of social security, the administration and the Congress will work together swiftly to enact legislation to restore the financial soundness of the social security system.

I commend the Members of the Congress on both sides of the aisle who steered this bill to passage. I am gratified that the bill represents the combined efforts of the coal industry, the insurance industry, and organized labor, especially the United Mine Workers, in working with the administration to achieve needed improvements in the black lung program.

A major purpose of this legislation is to restore solvency to the Black Lung Disability Trust Fund. At present, the Fund has a deficit of approximately $1.5 billion. With no change in the law, the deficit would climb to $7 billion over the next 10 years. The bill addresses the revenue side of this problem by temporarily doubling the excise taxes on coal producers, but requiring that those rates revert to their present levels when the Fund becomes fully solvent, and in no case later than the end of 1995.

The bill also addresses eligibility criteria and benefit payments for the black lung program. These changes are needed to assure that the black lung program will provide adequate workers compensation benefits to coal miners suffering from black lung disease, while reducing the potential for substantial abuses.

These two bills are linked together by the fact that they both contain similar, though not identical, provisions dealing with removal of certain structures at water resources development projects administered by the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers. Inadvertently, one of the provisions, section 8 of S. 1493, as enrolled, is broader than its sponsors intended. Because of this, the Congress passed another, somewhat narrower provision in the form of section 6 of H.R. 779. It is clear from statements on the floor of both the House and Senate that the narrower provision, section 6 of H.R. 779, was intended to govern the Corps management practices. Therefore, in order to accomplish that intent, I will sign enrolled enactment S. 1493 before I sign H.R. 779, thereby making section 6 of H.R. 779 the provision to govern Corps management practices.

Although it is impossible to single out all the people responsible for H.R. 4503, I want to take this opportunity to congratulate some of those individuals whose guidance on this bill was indispensable. Senator John H. Chafee, with support from Senator Robert T. Stafford, provided strong leadership in this environmental legislation. Also vital to this success in the House were the concerted efforts of Full Committee Chairman James J. Howard, Ranking Minority Member Don H. Clausen, Subcommittee Chairman Robert A. Roe, and Ranking Minority Member John Paul Hammerschmidt.

With the critical support of these key legislators and the unselfish efforts for reform from those involved from the private sector, we have, together, achieved a significant redirection of the construction grants program in a record period of time. The consultation and cooperation from State and local officials was especially helpful in focusing attention on key areas of concern. The efforts of Governor Scott Matheson, on behalf of the National Governors' Association, were particularly worthy of note.

In April of this year, we proposed reforms to the construction grants program. Our proposal refocused the program on those projects necessary to meet existing high priority water quality improvement needs. H.R. 4503 substantially incorporates our recommendations.

H.R. 4503 focuses Federal funds on treatment-related needs, giving the States a high degree of flexibility to address local needs. In addition, it allows for a 3-year phase-in of these major reforms. In this way there should be very little disruption in ongoing construction. States and localities will have ample time to plan rationally for their enlarged role in planning for improved water quality.

The primary objectives of this administration's construction grants reform proposal were to emphasize the need for water quality improvement, to incorporate greater cost-effectiveness, and to provide more flexibility to the States and localities. The agreement reached by the Congress achieves the administration's fundamental objectives while ensuring minimum dislocation to the program.

I am pleased to sign into law today S. 1192, the Union Station Redevelopment Act of 1981. I know that the leadership in the House and Senate and Secretary Lewis at the Department of Transportation have worked hard to develop this legislation. This legislation will help to turn the Union Station complex into a successful commercial center with access to several modes of transportation. It is especially noteworthy that the Senate and House committees were able to develop compromises so that the House could pass the Senate bill without further amendment. I am aware that previous attempts in recent years to enact such legislation were not successful.

The legislation provides that the Department of Transportation will be responsible to rehabilitate and develop the Union Station complex as a commercial center and multi-use transportation terminal. Secretary Lewis has expressed his enthusiasm for the challenge this bill presents to the Department to encourage private commercial development of the complex and make it a successful venture.

While I am signing S. 1192, it contains a legislative veto provision which the Attorney General advises is unconstitutional. Section 114(e) of the bill would purport to authorize either of two committees of Congress to pass a resolution disapproving the expenditure of any sums in excess of $29 million from certain rail programs for the rehabilitation of Union Station. However, committees of Congress cannot bind the executive branch in the execution of the law by passing a resolution that is not adopted by both Houses of Congress and presented to the President for approval or veto. Accordingly, this language of section 114(e) must be objected to on constitutional grounds. The Secretary of Transportation will not, consistent with this objection, regard himself as legally bound by any such resolution.

It gives me great pleasure to sign into law the Multinational Force and Observers Participation Resolution. The Multinational Force and Observers is an international organization established by the protocol signed by Egypt and Israel on August 3, 1981. This organization will have the important function of supervising the implementation of key security aspects of the treaty of peace between Egypt and Israel. It will thus help ensure that the timetables established in the peace treaty are met. The legislation I have signed today ensures that the United States will be in a position to participate in this organization along with other nations that are interested in contributing to the peace process in the Middle East.

The peace treaty between Egypt and Israel is an extraordinary achievement, and its continuing implementation will constitute a further major advance in the peace process. I am confident that U.S. participation in this critical step will contribute to our broader efforts to bring about a just and lasting peace in the region.

I am signing this joint resolution with the understanding that when U.S. agencies provide property, support, or services to the MFO on a reimbursable basis, they shall not seek to recover from the MFO amounts in excess of the cost to the U.S. Government of acquisition of the property, support, or services so provided, and, in accordance with section 4(c) of the joint resolution, such costs of acquisition shall not be considered to include administrative or similar surcharges.

Finally, I wish to commend the Congress for its responsible approach to this critical legislation. I am gratified that both the executive and legislative branches addressed this matter which is so vital to our nation's foreign policy in a spirit of close consultation and cooperation. This legislation demonstrates the results that can be achieved through working together in that spirit.

This bill would benefit the creditors of a single large asset bankruptcy. The debtor's estate has disputed the amount which it must pay to the Referees' Salary and Expense Fund. While I am aware that the Fund has been abolished with respect to recent cases, nothing except this debtor's dispute of the assessment distinguishes this one case from all others where the plan of arrangement was confirmed prior to September 30, 1978. I cannot support this effort to confer special relief in the guise of general legislation at a possible loss to the Treasury of $1.6 million. I believe the judicial process should be allowed to run its course.

The Soviet Union bears a heavy and direct responsibility for the repression in Poland. For many months the Soviets publicly and privately demanded such a crackdown. They brought major pressures to bear through now public letters to the Polish leadership, military maneuvers, and other forms of intimidation. They now openly endorse the suppression which has ensued.

Last week I announced that I had sent a letter to President Brezhnev urging him to permit the restoration of basic human rights in Poland as provided for in the Helsinki Final Act. I also informed him that, if the repression continued, the United States would have no choice but to take further concrete political and economic measures affecting our relationship.

The United States wants a constructive and mutually beneficial relationship with the Soviet Union. We intend to maintain a high-level dialog. But we are prepared to proceed in whatever direction the Soviet Union decides upon -- towards greater mutual restraint and cooperation, or further down a harsh and less rewarding path. We will watch events in Poland closely in coming days and weeks. Further steps may be necessary, and I will be prepared to take them. American decisions will be determined by Soviet actions.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-ninth day of December, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-one, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and sixth.

The President has granted recess appointments to the following individuals as members of the Board of Directors of the Legal Services Corporation. The President has also designated William J. Olson as Acting Chairman.

When my Administration took office 22 months ago, one of my first actions was to direct a rapid acceleration of the pace of oil acquisition for the Strategic Petroleum Reserve. As a result, the fill rate during Fiscal Year 1981 averaged over 290 thousand barrels per day. The fill rate for Fiscal Year 1982 averaged 215 thousand barrels per day. This contrasts sharply with the average fill rate of less than 77 thousand barrels per day achieved during the four years of the prior Administration. Of the 288 million barrels now in the Strategic Petroleum Reserve, 178 million barrels, or 61 percent, were added during my Administration.

This Administration has also entered into long-term purchase commitments that will give greater assurance of maintaining our fill rate objectives over the coming year while lowering the cost of building the reserve.

Another major policy action instituted at the start of this Administration -- immediate decontrol of the domestic oil market -- has also contributed greatly to our energy security by reducing oil imports and stimulating domestic production. In the 22 months of my Administration, oil imports have declined dramatically. Our dependence on imports from OPEC sources is now only 51 percent of the 1980 level.

As a result of rapidly implementing these policy actions to enhance our energy security, the oil on hand today in the Strategic Petroleum Reserve would provide 130 days of complete replacement for OPEC imports in the event of an embargo. That is nearly six times the level of protection our nation averaged in 1980.

Petroleum Reserve is clearly demonstrated by the record of accomplishment. But we are equally committed to carrying out this program in the most efficient, cost-effective manner. The fill rate at which we plan to operate during 1983 reflects a careful balance between these two objectives. To operate at the 300,000 barrel per day rate would require extensive use of temporary storage facilities, which would significantly increase the cost of the program for very limited incremental benefit.

The President. We're not discussing that now. We're discussing how the multinational force can aid the Lebanese Government in getting control of its own country and getting the Syrians, the PLO, and the Israelis out of Lebanon.

The President. Well -- [inaudible] -- not only for ourselves. The request has simply been made for the multinational force -- but to see if there are other nations that would like to join in that force.

We've had a very fine meeting on this and on a number of other subjects here, and have come to some agreements about future cooperation and all. And, yes, we look forward to working with Brazil on their economic problems as well as our own and, as I say, have a fine understanding.

The President. We haven't gotten down to much of that, except that we can say this for Brazil, that in the GATT meeting just concluded, Brazil's contributions in the discussions there in GATT were most impressive and, certainly, most pleasing to us and to our own point of view there with regard to GATT. They were most helpful -- [inaudible].

In the afternoon, President Reagan attended a private luncheon hosted by President Figueiredo at the Brazilian President's residence, Granja do Torto. Following the luncheon, President Reagan returned to the Palacio da Alvorada and, in the early evening, hosted a reception for a group of members of the Brazilian Congress.

There is an old saying in Brazil that says, ``The United States is a very big country, but Brazil is colossal.'' Flying for hours in a jet aircraft gives one a sense of just how colossal Brazil is. In fact, the only thing larger than Brazil is the heart and good will of the Brazilian people. You, Mr.

I'm told that 77 years ago the Baron of Rio Branco, that great Brazilian diplomat, in referring to the arrival of one of Secretary Shultz' predecessors, Elihu Root, is supposed to have said, ``His eyes may not be dazzled by our small material progress, but his American philosophy will surely be pleased to note the new phenomena in the Brazilian nation: activity, energy, and hope.'' Well, I can assure you that my American philosophy is still very much in tune with Brazil's phenomenal activity, energy, and hope. I must also admit that my eyes are dazzled by the progress of the Brazilian nation.

Economic and political power once concentrated in the hands of a few is being spread, as it should, among many nations. This is a result not of redistribution, but the creation of vast new wealth, generated by modern technology, creative enterprise, and hard work.

President Figueiredo, you capsulized it well at the United Nations when you said, ``The extraordinary release of productive forces on a worldwide scale in the postwar period wrought within a few decades the intricate patterns of a different world, a complex and unstable world, but also a diversified and promising one.'' Well, Mr. President, I was very much impressed by the depth of analysis and the strength of conviction of your speech at the United Nations.

President, it is true of you and me as individuals. Our countries, as friends, and we, as leaders of these great nations, will work together to overcome the challenges we face to our prosperity and freedom.

Recently, our economies have been hard hit by recession, something experienced in most of the world. In the United States, as you're doing here in Brazil, we're taking the painful steps necessary to overcome the economic crisis that threatens our people.

Self-discipline is necessary; so, too, is mutual accommodation. Borrowers must move to restrict their deficits. But it is just as important that lenders not withhold new funds from countries which adopt effective stabilization plans. Lenders and borrowers must remember that each has an enormous stake in the other's success.

Similarly, the integrity of the world trading system must be preserved, so it can serve once again as the great engine of growth. Closed markets must be carefully opened. Open markets must be shielded from protectionism. Our challenge is to make our trading and financial relationships remain a source of prosperity and strength -- not become a source of discord and disagreement.

Toward that end, we believe that economic relationships among the trading nations of the world must rest on three main pillars. First, a spirit of cooperation. Our economies are so clearly intertwined that our best hope for growth is to act in concert and not in isolation. Nothing is more destructive than unilateral decisions by individual countries to cut back trade or financial flows.

We cannot prescribe what the private sector should do. But our aim should be government and private relations that can be relied upon. Second, a spirit of fairness. In today's climate there is a powerful temptation for countries to take action at the expense of their neighbors. We've seen in the past the damage that can do. Finally, there must be a spirit of commitment -- commitment to stable economic growth shared by nations around the globe.

The debt problems facing many nations today are imposing, and we must act together to ensure that we have the tools to deal with them. The resources of the International Monetary Fund are one of the most important of these tools. To assure the adequacy of the IMF resources, the United States has proposed that in addition to an increase in the IMF quotas, there should also be a special borrowing arrangement to meet the demands that may be placed on the IMF. Where countries need assistance as they seek IMF funding, those able to do so must act to provide bridging funds.

We also need trading rules that reflect the enormous changes in world trade that have occurred since GATT was established 35 years ago. The meeting which has just ended in Geneva was a useful step along that road, but we still have a long way to go.

Many countries will need to pass through a painful period while making necessary adjustments in the years ahead, and we must work closely together during this transition. We will work with you to help the international system evolve so as to bring a brighter economic day to all our people.

At times it's too easy to be lured into the trap of seeing only the problems, pitfalls, and vulnerabilities of the journey. This is especially true in a period of economic crisis. President Figueiredo, the United States is overcoming its crisis, and I want you and all Brazilians to know that we're confident that Brazil will surmount its current difficulties.

Brazil. We're confident, because we know the character of your people. Our citizens came from the same mold. We are nations of immigrants. Our national soul was honed on the frontier, by people with the courage to leave the familiar and face the unknown. This is the heritage of your land and mine.

The people who came here wanted to better their lives and the lives of their children. The frontier of the New World didn't offer streets paved with gold. It offered opportunity and the spirit of freedom. Today, freedom-loving people around the world are tremendously encouraged by your stable transition back to democracy.

Your legislative and gubernatorial elections demonstrated the vigor and vitality of the democratic ideal in this hemisphere. We salute you, President Figueiredo, for your strong leadership in opening this new frontier -- or chapter, I should say, in your country's history, and we salute your fellow countrymen as well. From all accounts, your elections were much more than political contests; they were a celebration of freedom.

The peace we've known has been a precious asset for the Americas. Instead of allocating a great share of their resources on military spending, the developing countries of this hemisphere have invested in the future. And this has been no accident. From the Pan American Union to the Treaty of Rio de Janeiro and the Organization of American States, this hemisphere has been in the forefront of multilateral, international cooperation. No other region in the world can match our record.

Atlantic, and your country was a voice of moderation and reason. We both found to be unacceptable the first use of military force to resolve that dispute. Underlining our support of this principle, the United States recently joined with Brazil and other countries of the hemisphere in calling upon Great Britain and Argentina to negotiate their differences.

As your speech before the United Nations suggested, Brazil's concern for peace extends far beyond this hemisphere, especially in an age when the weapons of destruction threaten all mankind. Let me assure you tonight, and all of our friends in this hemisphere, the United States is absolutely determined to maintain peace and bring the nuclear arms race under control. Here again our hemisphere has an exemplary record through the nuclear-free zones defined by the 1967 treaty of Tlatelolco, we have already demonstrated the kind of progress that can be achieved in this vital area of arms control.

Brazil can take great pride that it's a country with a long border touching more nations than any other in this hemisphere, and yet you remain at peace with your neighbors. This is a gift from a former generation of Brazilians, such as the Baron of Rio Branco, who, with vision, hard work, and a spirit of fairness and compromise, resolved difficult problems. Together, we should strive to pass on that same gift to future generations in our hemisphere.

But just as threatening as conventional armies or nuclear weapons are counterfeit revolutionaries who undermine legitimate governments and destroy sources of economic progress; insurgents who are, at great expense, armed by the surrogate of a faraway power; a power that espouses a philosophy alien to the Americas, whose goal is the destabilization of our governments and our economies. This is aggression, pure and simple.

When President Dwight Eisenhower visited this city in 1960, even before it was consecrated as your capital, he stressed the commitment of the United States to the charter of the Organization of American States and the Mutual Assistance Treaty of Rio de Janeiro. Today I reaffirm that commitment and that pledge. We stand firmly with the other responsible nations of the Americas in opposing those who with violence and force of arms try to undermine economic progress and political stability.

Tonight, I want to share with you a dream I have about the Americas. Joaquim Nabuco must have had a similar dream when he called for us to be the vanguard of civilization. It's a vision of two great land masses rich in opportunity and resources, populated by people from every part of the world, every race and background, living together, trading together in peace and freedom, people who share a desire for liberty and a respect for the rights of others, a people who know that with ingenuity and enterprise no obstacle is too great, people who share a belief in those fundamental values of God, family, and justice that give meaning to our existence.

What is so remarkable is that this dream is within the grasp of this generation. We have a hemisphere composed of 600 million hardy souls. We have the resources and the know-how. Just as important, we have a wellspring of good will between us that waits to be tapped. With faith, commitment, common sense, and strength of character, we can meet the challenges to our peace and prosperity.

No one should be disheartened by the dark night of problems that surround us. There's a beautiful sunrise coming, and when it does, as Nabuco said, we can shine as an example to the rest of the world. We can and will be a hemisphere of peace, of prosperity, and of freedom.

On a personal note, Mr. President, I was deeply moved not only by the unique gesture you made today in offering the Granjo for a delightful lunch and meeting but also the warmth and hospitality that you've shown to me and my Cabinet officers.

Brazil, and it's an exciting country. And the capital is particularly intriguing. Like many of you, I can remember when Brasilia was no more than a gleam in the eye of its designer. The world has changed. Brasilia is now a major world capital. And this Embassy is one, as you've been told, of our most important missions.

Brazil is a key political and economic force in the region and an increasingly important actor on the world political stage. The relations between our two countries are now entering a period where the need for cooperation is perhaps greater than ever before. And it's to reinforce the importance the United States attaches to Brazil that I've come here to continue the discussions that President Figueiredo and I began last May when he visited us in Washington.

Ambassador Motley tells me the Embassy staff is first rate, that you are doing an outstanding job, and that you stand ready to assist in this task of strengthening our relations with Brazil. I don't think we need any proof of that beyond the help that, as George said, you've already given us in arranging this visit. From the very beginning, the cooperation that we've received from the Embassy and the Consulate-General in Sao Paulo has been exceptional. You have all put in a lot of time and hard work. And I want you to know that your efforts are truly appreciated.

Very few Americans realize what a unique and special group you are -- the handful of Americans who represent and serve our country abroad. The tasks you face are enormous. You often live in conditions of hardship and frequently in danger; and under the most extreme conditions, such as Iran, you've proved your mettle above and beyond the call of duty. Even in less difficult circumstances, you must uproot your families, frequently, begin new lives in countries where you serve, often finding it necessary to overcome the barriers of foreign language and different customs.

Secretary Shultz has told me of the superb job that our Brazilian colleagues on the Embassy staff do, year in and year out. I always get a kick out of the Washington columnists who regularly refer to our missions around as the ``striped pants set.'' I wonder where they get their material? I do not see any striped pants here. [Laughter] What I do see is a group of hard-working, dedicated individuals -- Americans and Brazilians -- who make up a team that I'm proud to be a part of.

The United States was the first country to establish an Embassy in Brasilia, symbolic of the pioneer spirit that characterizes our two peoples. And the young people here from the American School of  Brasilia are living proof of this. I think a student body with Brazilians, Americans, and other nationalities studying and playing together is a lesson for all of us. We can cooperate and resolve our disputes in a spirit of friendship.

There's another plaque here, one commemorating the 1960 visit of President Eisenhower. He was a statesman who understood and deeply appreciated the importance of building and maintaining good relations between Brazil and the United States. And on returning from his visit to Brazil, he told the American people, ``Brazil treasures as much as we do freedom, human dignity, equality and peace with justice.'' Well, on this visit and on this occasion, may I just say, I share his views, and I'm sure that all of us do. And this is a great example as these two great nations have found these bonds of friendship between us.

Today's vote in favor of the peacekeeping missile system by the House Appropriations Committee is a vote for a stronger, more secure America. I applaud the judgment of the members of the committee, and I urge the full House to show similar wisdom by approving the committee position.

This program is essential to the ability of the United States to maintain a credible deterrent on land, in the air, and on the sea. Moving forward on schedule will also greatly increase the prospects for a meaningful strategic arms reduction agreement between the United States and the Soviet Union.

The President. No. We wanted to get it out of the committee. And we're not jumping up and down and claiming a victory, because we know it's going to be a very tough battle on the floor. I assume it'll come to a vote probably next week sometime, and I just hope that the floor will follow the committee's recommendation.

The President. Well, because right is on our side. And I have to believe that if they'll think about it, they'll realize that this is absolutely essential to the process that is going forward in Geneva. It could be very destructive to our efforts at peace and disarmament if they don't do it.

Governor Marin, obrigado. Thank you very much. I've looked forward to this day. It's an honor to speak to men and women of enterprise here in Sao Paulo. This city was built by innovation and hard work in a spirit of confidence and hope.

Americans, citizens of this New World. Like you, they yearn deeply for peace, share your love for democracy and your commitment to build a future of progress and opportunity. On their behalf, to all of you, I say estamos com o Brazil e nao mudamos. We are with you, Brazil; we will not waver.

We look to Brazil with the admiration and respect that is due a great nation. One of your renowned writers, Monteiro Lobato, lived in our country in the 1920's and the 1930's. And while there he wrote a book called ``America,'' in which he said, ``The Brazilian considers his country the marvel of marvels, but with one single defect, that it is not known well abroad.'' Well, if he were writing today, he could still say Brazil is the marvel of marvels, but he would have to admit that your reputation has caught up with your achievements.

We hear it said, in a world wracked by political tensions, recession, poverty, energy shocks, debt, high interest rates, and inflation, that there is little hope for a new era of lasting growth and prosperity. I would never minimize the problems we face or the urgent need to deal effectively with them. I'll talk about them in a minute.

But, you know, I just have to say I've been around for quite a few years now -- I keep being reminded of that. I've lived through world wars and economic depression, and what's impressed me even more than those terrible crises is mankind's unending courage to bounce back, to struggle, to find new cures and novel solutions. To all those doom-criers -- and they're worldwide -- we have a message: The hope of the world lives here in the New World, where tomorrow is being built today by brave pioneers like yourselves, people who believe in each other and who will never lose their faith in the future.

On this shrinking planet, the drive for renewal, economic progress, and the leadership for world peace must increasingly come from the New World. Here we are blessed with great abundance: resources, technology, and most important, the spirit of freedom -- a spirit that harnesses our energies to pursue a greater good.

There is, in the world today, a counterfeit revolution, a revolution of territorial conquest, a revolution of coercion and thought control, where states rule behind the barrel of a gun and erect barbwire walls, not to keep enemies out, but to keep their own people in.

The real revolution lives in principles that took root here in the New World. The first principle says that mankind will not be ruled, in Thomas Jefferson's words, ``by a favored few.'' The second is a pledge to every man, woman, and child: No matter what your background, no matter how low your station in life, there must be no limit on your ability to reach for the stars, to go as far as your God-given talents will take you.

This is the soul of our revolution, the soul of democracy and freedom. It's the New World's gift to the Old. Only when people are free to worship, create, and build, only when they're given a personal stake in deciding their destiny, and benefiting from their own risks -- only then do societies become dynamic, prosperous, progressive, and free.

In terms of geography, Brazil is of the south and the United States the north. But in terms of historical ties and fundamental values, we are nations of the west and the New World. And we're among the few nations which exercise worldwide influence and responsibility.

As Americans from the north or south, whether we're leaders in government or private industry, we must work harder to break down barriers to opportunity for our people. We must marshal every possible asset for growth. We must insist on sound economic policies at home and more open trading and financial systems around the world.

The great republics of South and North America and the Caribbean have virtually unlimited potential for economic development and human fulfillment. We have a combined population of more than 600 million people. Our continents and islands boast vast reservoirs of food and raw materials. The markets of the Americas have produced high standards of living. We offer hope to oppressed and impoverished people. We're nations of immigrants. Our resources have made the New World a magnet for migration from all continents. But it has been the vision, the enterprise, the skill, and the hard work of our people that has created our wealth and well-being.

The developing countries of this hemisphere have achieved a record of soaring growth over the last generation -- growth in savings, investment, work, and resources; growth from open world markets for trade and finance; growth from private initiative, risk, and reward -- the cornerstones of both economic and political freedom.

When we in the States look at Brazil, we see the success of an economy that grew fourfold in 20 years, more than doubling per capita income; the promise of tomorrow in Brazil's youth -- with one-half your population under 21, and becoming better educated every year; a confident response to the challenge of the eighties -- diversifying your economy and exports with new markets and technologies; leadership and vision in daring projects like Itaipu, which will be the largest hydroelectric dam in the world; and a strong energy substitution drive, including the alcohol fuel program which is to power more than half your automobiles by 1985. We also see Brazil's modern pioneers exploring a frontier as challenging as the Amazon -- space.

Well, today, I'd like to propose an idea to you -- to have a Brazilian astronaut train with ours so that Brazil and the United States can one day participate in a shuttle launch together as partners in space.

Last night, I told President Figueiredo that the United States has confidence that Brazil will overcome its difficulties just as the United States will overcome its own. But we face serious problems. Your economy has been in recession, and so has ours. In the next decade, we must both provide millions of jobs for our people. By taking the necessary steps now, our countries can lead the world toward a new era of growth, but this time, growth without the albatross of runaway inflation and interest rates.

Three things are essential for full world recovery and development. We must each move to correct our domestic, economic, and financial problems. We must protect the integrity of the world's trading and financial systems. And we must work together to help the international system evolve and better assure our mutual prosperity.

The first, most important contribution that any country can make is to get its own economic and financial house in order. Many countries, including our own, did not do so. Somewhere along the way, the leaders of the United States forgot how the American growth miracle was created. We substituted government spending for investment to spur productivity, a bulging bureaucracy for private innovation and job creation, transfers of wealth for the creation of wealth by rewards for risk-taking and hard work, and government subsidies and over-regulation for discipline and competition from the magic of the marketplace.

For the United States, the way back has been hard. When my administration took over, we faced record interest rates and inflation and the highest peacetime tax burden in our history. Our recovery program is designed to help us make a long overdue transition to an investment-powered, noninflationary economy that will put the United States back on the cutting edge of growth.

We have cut the growth of Federal spending by nearly two-thirds, and soon we will have reduced personal income tax rates by 25 percent -- well more than that, total tax rates. We have cut the top rate of tax on interest and dividend income, introduced strong, new incentives for savings, encouraged capital formation by permitting more rapid depreciation of plant and equipment, and aggressively pursued deregulation of markets in energy, transportation, and finance.

Many of these reforms have been in place for barely a year. Much more remains to be done. You can't wipe away decades of sin with one year of penance. But confidence is returning to the United States. We believe recovery is in sight.

Inflation and interest rates have been brought down dramatically. Real wages are increasing for the first time in 3 years. Productivity is up sharply. Venture capital in small business -- the best source of job creation and technological innovation -- is near a record. The personal savings rate is at a 6-year high. Our equity markets have made an historic advance on record-breaking volume.

We believe the door is now opening to a lasting, broadbased economic expansion over the next several years. As the world's largest single market, a prosperous, growing United States economy will mean increased trading opportunities for our friends in the developing world. Brazil is preparing to take advantage of these opportunities. Your country has been making the difficult reforms needed to renew expansion.

And this brings me to my second point. All of us are trying to work our way free from this tenacious recession. But we can always make a bad situation worse by damaging those powerful engines of growth -- the world's trading and financial systems.

Over the last 20 years, Brazil has exported an expanding range of industrial and agricultural products, while developing its own raw material resources. Your role in the international trading system is now indispensable. Your potential is enormous.

There are some in the industrial world who view your success with apprehension. They fear being overwhelmed by your competition. They fear that one sector after another will be deindustrialized and redeployed to the developing world. Likewise, there are some in the developing world who attribute persistent poverty to industrial powers, whom they accuse of exploitation.

Well, I can't accept either argument. One need only look at the United States exports to the developing countries of this hemisphere -- which have increased sixfold in a decade, the same as imports -- to see that new competition brings new opportunities.

With so many out of work -- in my country, yours, and others -- protectionism has become an ugly specter stalking the world. One danger is protection against imports, erecting barriers to shut out the competitive goods and services of others in one's own markets. Another danger is protection of exports, using artificial supports to gain competitive advantage for one's own goods and services in the markets of others. The aim of these actions may be to protect jobs, but the practical result, as we know from historical experience, is the destruction of jobs. Protectionism induces more protectionism, and this leads only to economic contraction and, eventually, dangerous instability.

This brings me to my third point. Our crisis today is not between north and south, but between universal aspirations for growth and the longest worldwide recession in postwar history. But let us also acknowledge another fundamental fact of economic life: This recession has had a particularly painful impact on developing countries. They have suffered declining demand in world markets and falling access to financial markets. This greatly complicates our collective recovery.

So, if it's inevitable that borrowers must move to restrict their deficits, it's equally important that countries, like Brazil, that adopt effective stabilization plans be assured of continued financing.

I concur with your President that we need solidarity and understanding. Last February I spoke before the Organization of American States in Washington. I pledged that our administration would seek a new relationship with the nations of the Caribbean and Central and South America. I said that we would approach our neighbors not as someone with still another plan, but as a friend, pure and simple -- one who seeks their ideas and suggestions on how we could become better neighbors. And this is what we've done in Brasilia. We discussed our problems, compared notes, and sought solutions.

To handle the liquidity crisis, we have agreed that the International Monetary Fund resources should be increased. We have also proposed a special borrowing arrangement to make sure that the IMF will have adequate funds to carry out its function.

The leading developing nations should all enter the world trading system as full partners. Then they can share more fairly in the gains from trade and, at the same time, assure more fully the obligations of the trading system. All we ask is that we examine together the mutual trading gains that can be achieved through reciprocal action.

We must complete unfinished business -- trade in agriculture, which has resisted liberalization in the postwar years, and agreed rules on safeguards in the event of injury that provide for transparency and equity.

And we must look forward to the emerging challenges of the 1980's, such as trade in high technology products and processes -- processes, then, to devise rules will ensure we do not impede the growth potential of the technological revolution.

Holiness Pope John Paul II, I gave him the pledge of the American people to do everything possible for peace and arms reduction. For the sake of the children of the world, we're working to reduce the number and destructive potential of nuclear weapons. We're working to end the deadlock between Israel and her Arab neighbors, and we're working, as you are, to preserve the peace in this hemisphere.

We've come to know the heart of Brazil. We will say goodby knowing her heart is strong, her heart is true, her heart is good. Brazil will build. You will grow. And by your side will be the United States -- your partner in the New World, a partner for progress, a partner for peace.

Today the countries of Central America face enormous challenges: economic recession, social injustice, and the cynical efforts of outside powers to impose nondemocratic systems of government on them. But I'm confident we have the will and the ability to overcome these challenges.

The most promising formula for peace and security for the nations of Central America was proposed at the meeting of democratic nations in San Jose in early October. It offers terms for a peace that can be verified without fear of violation. It stresses the importance to peace of democratic institutions. I'm convinced, as I believe most of you are, that democracies find it easier to live in peace with each other.

In facing the economic challenges, the countries of this hemisphere have begun a cooperative effort to address the pressing needs of the Caribbean Basin. Part of the United States contribution to this effort -- $350 million in emergency economic assistance -- is already in place. I'm asking the Congress to give priority consideration to the other main features of our program -- open access to our markets for the products of the Caribbean and Central America, and incentives for American investment in the region.

I believe we all have a crucial stake in this venture. Democracy, and even our independence as free nations, are vulnerable to economic recession. By cooperating together, we can offer real hope for sustained growth to our peoples.

I have met with President Monge twice. From these meetings I know we share the conviction that it's through freedom and democracy that economic progress and social justice have their best chance to work. I look forward to visiting San Jose and to having the opportunity for further discussions with your President.

We conducted serious discussions about the international systems of trade and finance and the difficulties both our countries face in this period of slow economic growth around the world. We discussed the importance of trade and free markets to bring lasting growth. For my part, I've gained a deeper understanding of Brazil's perspectives.

President Figueiredo and I resolved to find mutually acceptable solutions to those areas where we have differences, and to remain open to possibilities for new cooperation, especially in the areas of scientific and military industry. I leave confident that Brazil, like the United States, has the skill and determination to work its way up to renewed growth and prosperity. When I arrived here I reminded President Figueiredo of the old saying, ``Nothing stops Brazil,'' and now I know it's true.

We considered the threats to peace in the hemisphere and in the world, the dangers of a nuclear arms race, the crisis in the Middle East, and prospects in southern Africa. I confirmed our intention to maintain a strong defense as the best assurance of peace for us and our friends.

I made clear to President Figueiredo our desire to continue close consultations with him. Of course, there are issues on which we have differences. But our mutual interest in cooperation is infinitely stronger. I hope that my visit has helped -- in the same way that President Figueiredo's visit did -- to improve an already warm relationship.

The unemployment reported by the Labor Department today represents a continuing tragedy. This news makes it more important than ever that we press forward in our efforts to create a solid, sustained recovery.

Inflation is down, interest rates are down, and the leading economic indicators have been up for 6 of the past 7 months. Unfortunately, unemployment has traditionally been one of the last indicators to fall, but as the recovery comes on stream, we can expect to make progress on that front, too.

In the meantime, it is imperative that the Congress and the executive branch work closely and constructively together to hold down spending and encourage greater economic growth. I am encouraged by the progress this week on my transportation initiative, and I am hopeful that we will see similar progress in the next several days on our bill creating enterprise zones.

Since 1824, when a United States Representative, Richard Anderson, became the first foreign diplomat to be formally accredited here after independence, my country has followed with admiration the development of your constitutional tradition.

Well, we all know that the democratic path is never easy. But it's a path toward which the peoples of this hemisphere are increasingly turning. Democracies are better able to reconcile their internal differences without violence. They're also neighbors in whom we can have confidence.

Mr. President, as I said in my very encouraging visit to Brazil, I did not come to visit with any preconceived plan that we wish to impose. I came here to listen and to learn, to ask how we could be of greater help in promoting peace and progress in the Americas. It has long been my dream that the more than 600 million people of the Americas could represent an enormous force for good in the world. Just think how much we could achieve if there were accord between us.

One of the great traditions of democratic nations, as you know so well, is that leaders can speak candidly to one another and accept the other's thoughts in the constructive spirit in which they're offered. You have spoken frankly. Now let me do the same.

Ours is a region in which powerful bonds unite countries and people. It is also a region in which primarily, perhaps because we expect so much from each other, powerful misunderstandings can arise. When people -- above all, these people who exercise responsibility and must make decisions -- do not know each other, the potential for misunderstanding is particularly great. That's why I'm here, coming as a friend and neighbor, asking what are our problems and differences and how can they be overcome.

Our neighbors in Central America are in turmoil. They are threatened by a devastating economic crisis and by local insurgencies supported by outside countries which do not wish to see the republics of America succeed. The question, Mr. President, is how can we help. I look forward to hearing your views this afternoon.

But don't we already have a good beginning in the conclusions democratic states of the region reached in San Jose on last October 4th? They called for all the states of Central America, on a basis of reciprocity and verification to renounce the importation of heavy offensive weapons that could be used to attack a neighbor; to cause the withdrawal of all -- and I repeat, all -- foreign military advisers; to end support for terrorists and subversion against neighbors to begin internal reconciliation, enabling dissidents to participate again in public life within established institutions; to create democratic institutions and hold open, public elections to decide who should exercise power. Of these, the last is the most significant, for we all know that democracies are far less likely than other regimes to abuse their own people and to make war on their neighbors.

What can we do to overcome the economic crisis in the Caribbean region? Well, Mr. President, our nations are partners in the Caribbean Basin Initiative, a bold attempt to address the underlying economic and social needs of our neighbors. It made a great impression in the United States when your country announced that it would join with Canada, Mexico, Venezuela, and the United States in this enterprise. It reassured us to see Colombia, long a pillar of the Andean community, extend its hand to Central America and the Caribbean. Through hard work, sound financial management, and a commitment to an open and competitive economy, Colombia is an example for others.

The United States has already increased its assistance to the Caribbean area, bringing it to nearly a billion dollars a year. But we must provide these small and promising countries an opportunity to earn their own way. That is the purpose of the one-way, free-trade proposal that I have made.

In cooperating to help others, we should be careful not to neglect cooperation to benefit our own societies. Could we not do more to mobilize resources and encourage efforts by public-private institutions, universities, institutes, voluntary agencies, and businesses to increase their cooperation for development? Many scientific, educational, and other institutions in the United States and in Colombia have had close working relationships in the past. We must strengthen and renew such ties and promote new links to accelerate the pace and quality of research and development on the most pressing problems in this hemisphere.

The recession that we suffer from is global. It affects the advanced countries. Millions are out of work in my country -- even greater numbers in Europe. But it's true that the recession has affected the developing countries most of all -- not so much Colombia, which is fortunate to continue to grow, but your neighbors.

Colombia shows how prosperity can be achieved by domestic savings and investment. But prosperity will escape us if we permit those great engines of growth, world trade and world finance, to be impaired. And here again, Mr. President, we must act to make sure that the International Monetary Fund has the funds necessary to finance needed stabilization programs.

Fund to be sure to fulfill its mission. The individual countries that can do so should provide bridging financing to countries needing time to work out effective stabilization programs. And private lenders must not withhold new funds from countries that do so, for lenders and borrowers each have a great stake in each other's success.

With unemployment in all our countries, the temptation is to use restrictions or export incentives to protect jobs. Well, experience shows that way is self-defeating and will lead only to less trade and less jobs. I am pledged to do all in my power to prevent arbitrary restrictions of trade.

Colombia has long been a powerful supporter of the inter-American system. With few exceptions, the system has kept the peace. As new nations of the Caribbean join the system and as other American countries like Colombia grow in economic weight and worldwide influence, our institutions will be infused with new life.

Our own relations with each other reflect the maturity of our partnership. We do not agree on every issue, not even on the remedies of some of the problems we share. But we've established a dialog based on mutual respect, our shared religious heritage, and our common legacy.

In the trade field we have vastly expanded to our mutual benefit the goods and services we exchange. Earlier, you had a trade surplus. Now, with the price of coffee low, we do. We both have legislation governing trade that we each are bound to respect. Within that framework, though, there is much we can do to assure mutual accommodation without imposing protectionist devices. I will work with you to find those opportunities.

Our cooperation in the area of narcotics control certainly reflects the same spirit. We recognize that the use and production of illegal drugs is a threat to the social fabric of both countries. I am determined to control and reduce drug consumption in my country. Progress that either of us make will assist the other.

Colombia and the United States worked together to establish the fundamental principles of this hemisphere. I am here today to further the spirit of cooperation begun by President Roosevelt in 1934, and continued by President Kennedy in 1961. I come convinced that our cooperation for freedom and development is more vital than ever to progress and security in the hemisphere.

President Betancur, you and I know what can be accomplished with the will to keep going until the job is done. We both come from working families, poorer than most in material things, but rich in spirit and optimism. Those values taught us when we were young -- God, family, and hard work -- and this did well by us as individuals. And they will do well by our two countries.

President Betancur, I propose a toast to you and to the people of Colombia: May the values that bind us, the friendships and dreams we share, be preserved by us, the people of the New World, as an eternal, sacred trust.

President Reagan praised the bravery of the Salvadoran people and their belief in democratic ideals as manifested in the recent elections and in the Salvadoran decision to hold Presidential elections no later than March, 1984. He expressed appreciation for efforts of the Salvadoran Government to reduce the number of deaths caused by violence, despite the opposition of anti-democratic forces. He also indicated his satisfaction with the continuation of the land reform program.

The Salvadoran leader pointed out the desire of his government for peaceful development and full observance of human rights. He noted the creation of the Commission on Human Rights and the formation of a Peace Commission charged with proposing a practical plan for the participation of all citizens and political movements in the democratic process.

President Magana suggested that as important as the efforts that each country makes internally to correct its structural economic problems is an international economic situation which encourages full development of that country's human and natural resources. In this regard, he praised the U.S.

President Reagan referred to the interest of the American people and government in cooperating with the Salvadoran Government in its internal efforts. He stressed his concern about the prosecution of those implicated in the murder of American citizens in El Salvador and asked for unstinting efforts to prosecute those responsible for the deaths of the American Churchwomen and the AFL - CIO consultants and the disappearance of other American citizens.

Both leaders also examined the situation in Central America and expressed concern for the increase of tensions in the area. They rejected the use of force in the resolution of bilateral conflicts, interference in the internal affairs of other countries and the violent imposition of alien ideologies and systems rejected by democratic societies. President Magana emphasized the need for all countries to respect the principle of self-determination as exercised by the Salvadoran people in the elections of March 28. He noted that this principle is fundamental to the peaceful coexistence of peoples. Both leaders reaffirmed their commitment to the principles of the Final Act of the October 4 San Jose conference of democratic nations -- principles which, in their opinion, represent the best hope for peace in Central America.

President Suazo has been gracious in inviting me to visit your country, and I'm anxiously looking forward to it. Early this summer, we were honored to have your President visit Washington, and I'm happy to have this early opportunity to continue our talks.

Honduras has been a leader in Central America. You've put forward concrete proposals for a comprehensive peace throughout your region. Your transition to democracy answered those who argue that freedom is a luxury that struggling countries cannot afford. And you've proved that a freely elected government has the will and determination to take the actions needed to put your economy on a sound course.

The Honduran people have won the admiration of my fellow countrymen, and the peace proposals your President presented to the Organization of American States last March are ones which we in the United States support fully. They were incorporated in the Final Act of the eight democratic countries that met in San Jose in October. They are reasonable and attainable for all parties, and I hope they will lead to peace in Central America.

Honduras has also played a prominent role in the Central American Democratic Community, which is dedicated to freedom, economic development, and the security of each nation against aggression in any form by one neighbor against another. These are goals which can be achieved, and it is with this hope that I will come to Honduras to meet with President Suazo.

We have common aspirations and values. I'm sure we will be able to strengthen the cooperation between our two nations and our people. I will bring with me the best wishes and friendship of the American people.

Washington, having visited with six neighboring heads of state. Our delegation has seen firsthand the vitality and potential of our New World neighbors. We've also heard and discussed their needs and aspirations and how they affect our own vital national interests.

United States interests require that we support our fellow Americans with a hemispheric policy which preserves and promotes democratic institutions, advances and encourages free market economies, and provides the security essential for these systems to develop and flourish. In our discussions during these last 4 days, I pledged our continued commitment to work as friends and neighbors with the other nations of this Western Hemisphere. We'll stand firmly with them to achieve the promise of economic progress and political stability that is the legacy of peace in the Americas.

Through cooperation, together we can protect ourselves from counterfeit revolutionaries who seek to destroy growth and impose totalitarianism on people who love freedom. Let us remember something very important: If our neighbors, particularly our nearest neighbors in the Caribbean Basin, are in trouble, their troubles inevitably become ours, unless we work together to solve them.

Right now their difficulties are not entirely of their own making. World prices for their traditional products -- sugar, bananas, bauxite, and coffee -- have been declining sharply for several years. At the same time, the prices for their essential imports, particularly petroleum, have remained high.

We cannot afford to ignore these difficulties. Our ties with the countries of the Caribbean Basin are very close. One-half of our trade passes through this area. Prolonged social and economic disruption would cause an exodus of desperate people seeking refuge where so many others have already found it -- in the United States. The interests of Caribbean Basin countries are our interests; their security is our security.

The difficulties in the Caribbean Basin may seem overwhelming, but just as tropical storms give way to sunshine and calmer seas, economic despair will give way to optimism if people have the prospect to build a better life in freedom. Our support for democratic institutions is already helping. U.S. assistance to help these countries defend themselves from outside-supported subversion is likewise showing signs of progress. Our Caribbean Basin Initiative, designed to provide economic opportunity by stimulating investment and trade, offers the hope of economic progress, which anchors democracy and freedom.

In September the United States Congress approved funds for emergency balance-of-payments assistance as the first step in this initiative. I also attach great importance to the 1983 fiscal year package of foreign assistance. But our goal is not a temporary boost from foreign aid. Our goal is to help our neighbors strengthen democratic institutions and free economies that stand on their own. We need long-term incentives to expand production and create new jobs. The trade and investment portions of our Caribbean Basin Initiative legislation are designed to accomplish this.

I've proposed that we offer our neighbors the opportunity to trade with us freely by eliminating trade barriers for most products for 12 years, and by providing tax incentives for U.S. investment in their economies. With our markets beckoning, the inducement to expand existing enterprises and invest in new ventures will increase. This will create growth and jobs, both for Caribbean countries and for the United States.

The impact on our own domestic industries of more goods coming from the Caribbean will be minimal, since the quantity of imports from these small countries will not be great. Moreover, our industries and our jobs will have safeguards to protect them from disruption.

Since taking office, I've held numerous discussions with Caribbean Basin leaders. They have assured me that their Caribbean Basin Initiative will provide more fuel for their private economies to be engines for lasting growth. They, too, have faith that private enterprise can flourish with the magic of the marketplace.

The leaders of the Congress have promised to give the Caribbean Basin Initiative urgent consideration during the current session. The initiative has already received substantial bipartisan support. I urge all Members of the Congress to look carefully at the benefits which the Caribbean Basin Initiative will bring to our neighbors, and to us. Final passage this year is top priority.

I'll be leaving tonight to return to Washington. I can't close without saying how impressed I've been with the leaders I've met here in the nations of South and Central America and the people. I believe we've created bonds which will serve to bring the nations and peoples of the Americas into a closer accord. These two great continents joined by the countries of Central America can be the hope of the world.

But, Mr. President, and you ladies and gentlemen, I thank you for your gracious welcome. From the schoolchildren who greeted me at the airport last night to you distinguished leaders gathered in this beautiful hall, the people of Costa Rica have extended to our party open-hearted and generous hospitality. I know you're world-famous for this, but I feel so very much at home here. I hope that ours is a special bond.

I'm especially grateful for the opportunity to renew the personal dialog with President Monge, a distinguished statesman committed to the democratic ideals I share. Americans and Costa Ricans -- we are all of the New World. Our people live the peaceful revolution of democracy, secure under the rule of law and prospering through economic freedom. But there are outsiders who would exploit our rich, new world by undermining the democratic systems that make us free.

We of this hemisphere must stand together so that we can continue to improve the quality of life for our people. We must be strong enough, our people prosperous enough, and our democracy stable enough to remain independent, at peace, and free.

Now, there are many who speak of democracy and pluralism and of their respect for the rule of law. But as a Costa Rican President of the last century, Jose Joaquin Rodriquez, said, ``I am not impressed by hearing proclamations of great principles. What I admire is the men who know how to put them into practice.'' Well, Costa Rica is a proud example of a free people practicing the principles of democracy. And you have done so in good times and in bad, when it was easier and when it required great courage.

Your commitment to freedom was evident last February when, as every 4 years, you elected a new government. In October, you led the region's democracies toward recognition of principles for a lasting, humane peace in Central America. And just last month, President Monge spoke eloquently in Washington about democracy and of the commitment of all democratic nations of the region to an Elections Institute, an advisory body to assist other countries in developing the practice of democracy and which will be a specialized branch of the Inter-American Institute of Human Rights in San Jose.

President Monge and I have met three times this year, and I've learned from him and from the record of this country the depth of Costa Rica's dedication to the founding principles of Western civilization. And I've learned of the significant progress toward democracy elsewhere in Central America.

These counterfeit revolutions also threaten the prosperity that is the legacy of peace in this beautiful land. The future challenges our imagination, but the roots of law and democracy and our inter-American system provide the answers we seek.

The only real route to peace, to lasting peace, is the well-chartered course of Costa Rica -- commitment to democracy, rejection of extremism and the force of arms, and respect for human rights and the rule of law. It also includes reliance on international law such as the Rio Treaty, essential to your national defense and fundamental to our common security. Our new bilateral extradition treaty, President Monge, is indicative of our joint commitment to the rule of law.

States will continue to support the new democratic institutions in Honduras and the developing democratic processes of El Salvador. Any nation destabilizing its neighbors by protecting guerrillas and exporting violence should forfeit close and fruitful relations with the people of the United States of America and with any people who truly love peace and freedom.

The meeting of democratic nations here in San Jose on October 4th showed us anew the way toward peace and stability. We applaud the Costa Rican Government for that initiative and for its continued leadership in this regional democratic effort. We join you willingly. Democratic states have a unique role in the moral history of the world, because our governments are accountable to the governed and are less likely to abuse their own citizens or to attack their neighbors.

The principles of the San Jose Final Act provide a reciprocal, just, and verifiable basis for peace. I call on all states in this region to join in this process of genuine, peaceful reconciliation. In that same spirit, we must also work together to solve the serious economic problems jeopardizing social and political progress.

Central America recorded impressive economic growth in the 1960's and during much of the seventies. This was particularly true in Costa Rica, where hard work and neighborly cooperation in the Central America Common Market paid major dividends. Now those gains are threatened by worldwide recessions, threatened here in Costa Rica and, indeed, throughout the hemisphere.

In order to overcome the recession, we must lay the foundations in each of our national economies for noninflationary, sustained growth. To do this we will need the kind of commitment and determination Costa Rica is showing. Self-discipline is necessary, too. So, too, is mutual accommodation. Borrowers must move to restrict their deficits, but it's just as important that lenders not withhold new funds from countries which adopt effective stabilization plans. Lenders and borrowers must remember that each has an enormous stake in the other's success.

Similarly the integrity of the world trading system must be preserved, so it can serve once again as the great engine of growth. Closed markets must be carefully opened. Open markets must be shielded from protectionism. Our challenge is to make our trading and financial relationships remain a source of prosperity and strength; not become a source of discord and disagreement.

With regard to the Caribbean area, the United States Congress already has approved the first stage of our strengthened commitment to economic recovery: a supplement to our vigorous economic assistance effort in the Caribbean Basin, bringing to nearly $1 billion the total aid for fiscal year 1982. Our request to the Congress for future aid to the region will also reflect this new, high priority. But the other elements of the program are even more crucial. Investment incentives and duty-free access for most of your products will encourage increased production and stimulate more jobs.

This Caribbean Initiative is not a charity program. We will grow and prosper together to the direct benefit of the workers and enterprises in both of our countries. As I speak here, our Congress has reconvened in Washington, and the trade and investment portions of the Initiative are high on their agenda. From the heart of Costa Rica's remarkable democracy, I appeal directly to the legislative leaders of my country to act quickly and responsibly on this most important legislation. Together, we can attack the social and economic injustices which lead to dissatisfaction and support for radical solutions. And, just as Colombia has already joined the original Nassau four, I call on other developed countries -- all of them -- to contribute to our efforts.

Earlier this year in Washington, there was an exhibit of pre-Columbian art from Costa Rica. The title of the show was, ``Between Continents -- Between Seas.'' Well, this was fitting. But Costa Rica and Central America as a whole are now caught between something else -- a struggle of ideas between the violence of false revolutionaries and the reaction of false conservatives. You will always be between continents and seas. But to live peacefully and democratically will require the continued courage and commitment of all the Americas.

I am confident that, together, we will achieve in practice the goals that we have together proclaimed: a Central America where not just some but all countries are democracies, where institutions are based on free and regular elections in an atmosphere of political reconciliation within each state; a Central America returned to the path of substantial economic and social development; a Central America at peace with itself and the world; a halt to foreign support for terrorist and subversive elements working toward the violent overthrow of other governments; an end to arms trafficking, the importation of heavy weapons, and the buildup of armaments and forces beyond that required for legitimate defense; and under fully verifiable and reciprocal conditions, the withdrawal of all -- I repeat -- all foreign military and security advisers and troops from Central America; in sum, a Central America that lives by the principle of nonintervention, where disputes are settled peacefully and where respect for human rights and the fundamental freedoms of speech, assembly, and religion are as alive and well as they are in the Republic of Costa Rica.

My government will give you and your neighbors the full support of the United States. Our commitment to the Rio Treaty and to the principle of collective security will remain a basic tenet of our policy. Together, we will work toward the economic growth and opportunity that can only be achieved by free men and women. We will promote the democracy that is the foundation of our freedom and stand together to assure the security of our peoples, their governments, and our way of life.

President Monge. In his few hours among us, President Reagan and his illustrious committee will have had the opportunity to prove the sentiments and affection of the people of Costa Rica towards the people of the United States of America and towards himself as a representative.

To the President of the Costa Ricans, it is enough to bring us here close to the heart of his people to find a road of loving communication open to the people of the United States of America and with the citizens they chose to represent them by free vote to guide their destinies. And for President Reagan, it has been enough to be faithful to the sentiments of love of liberty that characterizes his people, to the profound democratic vocation of the Costa Rican people.

In the first 7 months of my mandate, this is the third time that we meet and reaffirm the ample areas of agreement in the fulfillment of our duties towards our respective peoples. Costa Rica has been a firm democratic ally of the United States of America, in Central America, and in the Caribbean. Other support it received in the past damaged its image. The permanent position of Costa Rica in favor of democracy and against all despotism of any ideological side gives an extraordinary moral force to this small country without an army. We believe we deserve more, and more permanent support on behalf of the American democracy.

True, the relationship with our country has been respectful without the incidents and accidents that have been registered in other sister nations. This historically explains that in the collective Costa Rican conscience, the anti-American trauma will not develop. But judging by the official visit of the President of the United States of America to Costa Rica, we feel that the significance of this alliance was not founded on misjustice.

In reality we can only recall three official visits by Presidents of the United States in the 161 independent years of the life of Costa Rica: President Hoover, during the second administration of President Cleto Gonzales Viquez from 1928 to 1932; President Kennedy in 1963, during the administration of President Francisco Orlich; and now you, President Reagan, who does me the honor of this visit at the beginning of my administration, now that we confront threats to liberty and peace in Central America and the Caribbean area.

I would like to believe that with your administration, President Reagan, the moral force represented by Costa Rica has begun to be justly appreciated despite its small size, poverty, and lack of an army in this struggle of people for peace and liberty. I would like to believe that you understand the urgency of adequate cooperation to overcome the crisis and to defeat poverty.

Last month in Washington President Monge warned against the arrogance of any leader who believes that his own political formulation is perfect. And as our fellow citizens often let us know, none of us is perfect. But the basic value of the democratic societies that we represent are far more perfect than those of any other form of government. Our dedication to freedom, our respect for human rights, our adherence to the rule of law are far superior to the totalitarian rule that others would impose in the name of the false revolutions. Theirs are hollow promises and empty rhetoric.

We celebrate today our commitment to freedom and to peaceful political reconciliation. I particularly want to reaffirm to all of you the pledge that my administration has made to the economic well-being and security of the peoples of Central America and the Caribbean. We know that political principles and collective security are not served by unstable economies.

Our Caribbean Basin Initiative offers a realistic foundation on which to build increased trade between our countries -- trade that will benefit all our citizens. This evening I'm returning to Washington, where I will continue to press for quick congressional action on the important trade and investment provisions of the initiative.

President Suazo and I have just completed a very useful exchange of ideas on the full range of bilateral issues and regional problems that confront our two democracies. In this, our second meeting this year, we have continued the close consultation that we began in Washington last July. This has given our dialog continuity and enabled us to analyze these problems in greater detail.

I have expressed my administration's support and my nation's admiration for President Suazo's efforts to ensure, for the Honduran people, the benefits of a democratic government elected on the principles of the rule of law. President Suazo has made it clear to me that there will be no retreat from that noble principle.

My administration is convinced that through cooperation and solidarity, our governments can protect our democratic institutions and free-market economic systems from the counterfeit revolutionaries who seek to destroy growth and impose totalitarianism on free people.

It's a pleasure to be here, and our only regret is that it has to be such a very short visit. But, again, we're grateful to the President, the people of Honduras for giving us this opportunity to visit with them.

Our conversation today has done much to improve the climate of relations between our two governments. I know that President Rios Montt is a man of great personal integrity and commitment. His country is confronting a brutal challenge from guerrillas armed and supported by others outside Guatemala.

I have assured the President that the United States is committed to support his efforts to restore democracy and to address the root causes of this violent insurgency. I know he wants to improve the quality of life for all Guatemalans and to promote social justice. My administration will do all it can to support his progressive efforts.

South and Central America to various countries proposing plans and ideas of their own. I know they were sincere, and yet I think there was a certain insensitivity connected with what they were doing. I said from the first day and until this, our last stop on this visit, that we came here to ask, not tell. We have come here to find out and to learn what we can about the possible differences between us and the possible answers to those differences. And we know now a great deal more about the problems confronting Guatemala. And we're going home and do our best to see if we can't be helpful now in finding some answers to the problems.

Q. Is President Rios Montt's announcement about -- announcing the election laws in March of '83, setting in pattern the eventual election of a democratic government there. Is that enough to justify the resumption of military aid to Guatemala?

The President. Well, we've got a whole lot of material which he, very frankly, brought for us to study. I frankly think that they've been getting a bad deal. You know, he was elected President in 1974 and was never allowed to take office. So, when this particular coup came, the officers who conducted the coup came to him and put him into the office he'd been elected to.

But he is totally dedicated to democracy in Guatemala. And they have some very real problems that we, as I say, are going to -- they brought and they made quite a presentation and brought a lot of information and material to us. And frankly I'm inclined to believe they've been getting a bum rap.

The President. Well, the main thing was that -- we weren't particularly trying to aim a signal at them. We were trying to do what I said clear back in the campaign I wanted to do. And that is to get all these countries in the Americas, in this hemisphere, to recognize what a force for good in the world we could be if we did have an accord. And so, we will do more of this, and with others.

The President. Well, I don't know. I imagine, probably, because there was some concern about going into their airspace. I don't know; I haven't asked anyone. I looked at the map there in my own room. And it seemed to me that a fairly direct route did take us over water on the Pacific side, and then to turn in to land at Honduras. It didn't seem to me it was too much out of the way.

The President. Well, I think he could have -- it turns out that he was talking. And it wasn't the best choice of words, because the truth of the matter is, he has assured me that he has complete faith in George and everyone else with regard to loyalty to me. So, he didn't mean that in any way to be a charge of disloyalty.

The President. No, you'd be surprised how much of that kind of transportation there is now because of racing. They ship horses all around the world, from Europe over and back over to Europe and from South America -- the tracks down there, up here. So, I suppose it's just a case of finding out, you know, some time when there's a shipment going. It's a great horse.

The President. Well, no, he was always all right when you were on him. He was most dangerous when he was on the ground. And I don't know whether that's a way they train them or something, so that, you know, they'll feel more macho when they get on or not. But, no, and even now, you know, I always feed him some carrots after a ride. And you have to be more careful with him than any other, or he'll eat you off to the elbow. [Laughter] Gets the carrot and starts on fingers.

And you'd be surprised, yes, because, you know, they're all individual countries. I think one of the greatest mistakes in the world that we've made has been in thinking, lumping -- thinking ``Latin America.'' You don't talk that way about Europe. You recognize the difference between various countries. And the same thing is true here.

Q. Mr. President, what sort of message were you trying to send to Nicaragua with the -- particularly the latter part of your trip and they were the one Central American country you did not visit and you did not talk with leaders? Is there some message that you were trying to send to them with this trip?

Q. You know -- just one last question -- the New York Times said that you have heard from the new Soviet President and he is interested in these, you know, working out something, negotiations on the things you proposed on the expanded hotline, et cetera. Is that true?

Someone once said that an artist is a dreamer consenting to dream of the actual world. That description is particularly apt for the five artists that we honor tonight. George Abbott, Eugene Ormandy, Lillian Gish, Benny Goodman, and Gene Kelly are five American dreamers who have made their dreams come true for the rest of us. In the years they've devoted to their crafts and during their countless performances, they have lifted our lives from the commonplace to share the sublime.

America was lucky to lure another great talent, Eugene Ormandy, from Hungary. He was music director of the famous Philadelphia Orchestra for nearly half a century, conducting, programing, and exacting an unrivaled freshness and vitality from his talented musicians. But this great man, who we're so proud today to call American, began life far from Philadelphia.

He grew up as a child prodigy in Budapest. At 2, he could easily identify symphonies. Almost before he could stand, he was playing a specially made fiddle. And at 4, he loudly interrupted a violin recital to announce, ``You played an F sharp instead of an F.'' [Laughter] At 5, he was admitted to the Royal Academy of Music as its youngest pupil.

He later said, ``My lessons filled my days with work and with dreams. I had tasted the intoxicating wine of being a wunderkind. And my whole ambition was to be a wundermann as well.'' Well, tonight, Mr. Ormandy, your fellow Americans want you to know that in their eyes you've made it.

As a child actress during her first performance, she burst from behind some scenery at the sound of a scripted explosion and ran screaming into the footlights. The audience loved her that night as they've continued to love her throughout her career. Such successes as ``Birth of a Nation,'' ``La Boheme,'' ``The Scarlet Letter,'' and many others led her to be known early in her career as the First Lady of the Silent Screen. She went on to other great accomplishments in the talkies and on the stage.

A normally caustic critic once wrote of the Gish girl that her smile ``is a bit of trembling happiness. The tears of the Gish girl are the tears that Johann Strauss wrote in the Rosemary of his waltzes.'' Her smile is as enticing today, her talent as compelling as it was when she first sparkled on the silent silver screen.

And the talent of Benny Goodman is another example of the diversity that makes our people and our culture so rich. Benny Goodman, the son of an immigrant Chicago tailor, also took up his craft as a child. But he got his training in the local synagogue orchestra and at Hull House, the noted Chicago settlement house founded by Jane Addams.

Gene isn't dancing much anymore, but he's encouraging promising young dancers to develop their talent. And his legendary accomplishments are ours to enjoy at the turn of a reel or by closing our eyes and remembering. To have seen Gene Kelly dance makes most of us start counting our blessings.

A famous clergyman, Henry Ward Beecher, once said that ``every artist dips his brush in his own soul and paints his own nature into his pictures.'' The artists that we honor tonight have painted a panorama with their lives, a spectacular display of talent, achievement, and personal integrity that challenges all of us to be the best that we can be. They reward our spirit by allowing us from time to time to mingle our everyday world with their world of pageantry and dreams. And how lucky we are that they're Americans. They've enriched us all.

Aircraft and Northrop. In 1955 he joined the corporate structure of Chance-Vought by becoming vice president for sales and service and a member of the board of directors. Mr. Thayer was promoted to president of the reorganized corporation (now called Ling-Tempco-Vought Aerospace) in 1965, later becoming chairman of the board.

On November 22, I informed you of my MX basing decision and underlined the absolute necessity of modernizing the Triad so that we can restore the strategic balance and maintain effective deterrence. Of equal importance, we must move forward with the MX to have any hope of achieving meaningful progress at the arms negotiations in Geneva. History shows that unilateral restraints by the United States have not led to arms reductions by our adversaries.

Having sought the counsel of my predecessors, the views of Congressional leaders, and the advice of America's best technical and scientific minds, I am convinced that Peacekeeper is the right missile and that now is the right time. I, therefore, urge you to support the MX program -- as approved by the Appropriations Committee -- when the House considers my fiscal year 1983 defense budget request this week. The Appropriations Committee language permits us to continue work on the MX and to protect an initial operational capability in 1986, while providing Congress with additional time to conduct a thorough review of my basing plan. This strikes me as a reasonable approach as we work together toward the common goal of maintaining peace.

I would like to thank you on behalf of the American people for your long and dedicated service to our country in a variety of key posts, most recently as Deputy Secretary of Defense. Your dedication and efforts to reduce costs and improve management systems have been truly appreciated. I know that in the years ahead you will be able to look back with pride on your significant accomplishments.

I very much appreciate your strong support for our efforts to implement your policy of strengthening America's defenses. Your vision and your steadfastness have contributed greatly to the cause of peace.

You have an outstanding Secretary of Defense in Cap Weinberger. I hope you will continue to give him the kind of support you have provided in the past. If I can ever be of any assistance to you or your Administration, I would be delighted to do so.

President Reagan. Mr. President, Begum Zia, it's a great pleasure for Nancy and me to welcome you to Washington today. Your visit to the United States this week both symbolizes and strengthens the close ties which exist between our two countries.

We confront serious challenges that by choice and necessity will draw our peoples ever closer. It's vital that those nations committed to peace and progress work diligently together to achieve those goals.

Pakistan today stands in the front rank of the nations shouldering a great responsibility for mankind. Your courageous and compassionate role in giving shelter to millions of Afghan refugees is well known to the American people and will long be remembered. We're proud to stand with you, Mr. President, helping to provide for these tragic victims of aggression, while, at the same time, seeking a peaceful resolution of the circumstances which brought them to your country.

Similarly, Pakistan's positive response to peace efforts in the Middle East have contributed to our confidence that our two countries can work together for peace and stability. After many years of disappointment, there is growing recognition in the Middle East that a continuation of violence can only breed a worsening conflict. This cycle must be broken. We're gratified to know that we can count on Pakistan's cooperation in confronting these perplexing problems.

We believe that the program of economic and security assistance on which we embarked last year will contribute to the tranquility and progress of the entire region, and it's our hope that reinvigoration of the relationship between our two countries will enable Pakistan to maintain its courageous stand on behalf of peace and amity of nations.

The United States-Pakistani friendship, which stretches back over 30 years, has been tested by time and change. It has endured, and, because of the substantial agreement between us on the great issues of peace, development, and security, it grows stronger daily.

Underlying our ties, however, is something which is even more critical in an enduring relationship and that is the warmth and understanding that exist between the people of our countries. This friendship is based on the mutual warmth and affection which have developed between our people, something which no government can mandate and which is indeed a cherished possession.

When you leave us and leave the United States next week, Mr. President, we want you to return home secure in the knowledge that the American people support close ties with Pakistan and look forward to expanding them in the coming years. We hope the friendship and hospitality that you receive during your stay will underline our good will and the permanence of our bond.

Sir, may I thank you most sincerely for your very kind words of welcome, for the warmth with which we have been received, and the generous hospitality that has already been extended to me, my wife, and the members of my delegation since we arrived in your great country.

Mr. President, I am no stranger to the United States. I've had the honor of coming here a few times before. But each time I have felt that it was a new experience for me. Perhaps this is because of the perpetual freshness, the vibrant dynamism, and the ceaseless, forward movement which characterize this great nation of yours.

Mr. President, west and southwest Asia, from the eastern Mediterranean to Afghanistan, is today in ferment. Armed aggression, military intervention, conflicts, disregards for universally accepted principles of international conduct have all combined to present a serious challenge to the security of the countries of this region. This in turn threatens to undermine the whole structure of the international relations upon which the peace of the world ultimately rests.

Mr. President, sir, Pakistan's continued commitment to the principle of nonalignment and to the objectives of the Islamic Conference are the fundamental postulates of its foreign policy. Pakistan is endeavoring to contribute effectively to the peace and stability of a troubled and turbulent region. But we cannot ourselves long remain immune from the dangers around us, Mr. President, nor have we in fact escaped their consequences.

The responsibility for providing refuge and a safe haven for nearly 3 million fleeing the repression in Afghanistan has been shouldered by our people as a humanitarian duty in the spirit of Islamic brotherhood. Nevertheless, the burdens are there, especially for a developing country like Pakistan.

But at the same time I must emphasize that we have borne these burdens ungrudgingly, and we will continue to do so, enshallah. We are conscious of the security implications of the great developments across our border. The qualitative change brought about by these developments and their impact on the entire region have evoked a response from the United States, which, Mr.

It was as a result of our common concern that our two governments decided on a program to enhance Pakistan's potential to withstand external forces of disruption and continue to play a stabilizing role in the region.

Mr. President, sir, it's our consistent endeavor to find equitable and humane solutions to the conflicts in our region. This task can only be accomplished through negotiation and mutual accommodation within the framework of the principles and resolutions of the United Nations. It must also inevitably entail the proper regard for the individual and collective dignity of the peoples involved.

In this endeavor, we have been fortunate, Mr. President, to have your understanding. What is more, sir, I claim that we have your friendship as well -- a friendship mature enough to withstand differences of opinion and mirrored by the very candor and sincerity of our mutual exchanges. For all this, sir, we're indeed very grateful to you.

Mr. President, I have come here to deepen and strengthen this friendship. I'm looking forward to our talks later this morning. And I have no doubt that they will lead us to this goal and that our respective efforts on behalf of peace and stability in our region and in the world in general, enshallah, shall bear fruit. Indeed, Mr. President, borrowing your own words, it will be in the fitness of the things for me to conclude by saying, sir, that you and I have a rendezvous with destiny.

The Soviets have failed to mention openly that they already have the first of their next generation of ICBM's in flight testing. This testing began prior to the President's decision on the Peacekeeper. While we have openly explained the purpose and the characteristics of the Peacekeeper, the Soviets have yet to provide any information on the purpose and capabilities of their new missile.

Today's vote by the House of Representatives was a grave mistake. Unless reversed in coming days, it will seriously set back our efforts to protect the Nation's security and could handcuff our negotiators at the arms table.

United States Senate. If it succeeds there, a conference of the House and Senate can be convened and the production program can be saved. Then we can engage in a longer debate on the best way to house the missile.

Mr. President, our talks this morning underlined again the strong links between our countries. We find ourselves even more frequently in agreement on our goals and objectives. And we, for example, applaud your deep commitment to peaceful progress in the Middle East and South Asia, a resolve which bolsters our hopes and the hopes of millions.

In the last few years, in particular, your country has come to the forefront of the struggle to construct a framework for peace in your region, an undertaking which includes your strenuous efforts to bring peaceful resolution to the crisis in Afghanistan -- a resolution which will enable the millions of refugees currently seeking shelter in Pakistan to go home in peace and honor. Further, you've worked to ensure that progress continues toward improving the relationship between Pakistan and India. And in all these efforts the United States has supported your objectives and will applaud your success.

A great intellectual forefather of Pakistan, Muhammed Iqbal, once said that, ``The secret of life is in the seeking.'' Well, President Zia, today the people of the United States and Pakistan are seeking the same goals. Your commitment to peace and progress in South Asia and the Middle East has reinforced our commitment to Pakistan. We want to assure you, Mr. President, and the people of your country that we will not waver in this commitment.

Our relationship is deep and longstanding. It stretches back to Pakistan's first days of independence. It stretches forward as far as we can see. It's based on mutual interest, yes, but also on shared visions and goals in the world around us. It is based, as well, on the fact that the people of both our countries sincerely value the good relations and the affinity between us.

Our people already work together in significant ways through educational exchanges, tourism, economic cooperation, and through bonds of family and friendship. We have cooperative programs in science and technology and in agriculture, and we hope to explore with the Government of Pakistan various ways of enhancing cooperation.

As we welcome you here tonight as the representative of your country and its people, we can say with confidence that those ties will continue to grow stronger and that the good will which exists between our two countries will prove to be both true and lasting.

After hearing such an eloquent speech from -- Mr. President, from you, and having had such a sumptuous -- so well presented in such a fine company -- a meal that I will perhaps cherish for many years to come, I see very little that I can add to what you have very kindly said. But still, Mr. President, my wife and I, as well as the members of my delegation, are most grateful to you, sir, for the honor you have done us in hosting this delightful banquet for us tonight. I have been deeply touched by the sentiments of your friendship that you have expressed towards me and my country, which are most warmly reciprocated.

Mr. President, the people of Pakistan are deeply committed to molding their lives and building their institutions in keeping with the dictates of Islam. Islam ordains upon -- follows a belief in the equality and universal brotherhood of mankind. It was the dedication of your Founding Fathers, Mr. President, to similar ideals that created this great republic, the United States of America.

Herein lies the Indus Valley, which is the heartland of Pakistan. This valley has been a veritable thoroughfare throughout history. Untold millions, representing all the major races of the Eurasian mass have made their way through our mountain passes to settle in or to pass through the Indus Valley. They came in all guises. They came as conquering hordes, as defeated or wandering tribes, as mystics and missionaries, as saints and sultans, and even as tourists and traders, both ancient and modern. And 35 years ago, Mr. President, many millions of Muslims of the South Asian subcontinent came together to help build a dream called Pakistan.

And, Mr. President, unfortunately, a new and menacing turbulence has arisen in our region. More than a fifth of the entire population of Afghanistan has been compelled to seek shelter in Pakistan as a result of the armed intervention in that country by a foreign power. We are bending our effort to resolve this tragic situation through a peaceful political settlement, in accordance with the principles enunciated by the international community. The latest manifestation of this was the Resolution of Afghanistan adopted by the United Nations General Assembly, once again with the overwhelming support of the member states.

There are other turbulences in our region, Mr. President. The war between Iran and Iraq and the suffering recently visited upon the Lebanese and Palestinian people continue to cause us profound concern and anguish.

The situation calls for difficult yet courageous decisions. The most important of these is to find a just and a durable solution to the Palestinian problem, in accordance with the national rights of the Palestinian people. If I may be permitted, sir, to recall my words, it is for the first time that Arabs have put up a unified plan for the solution of the Palestine problem. To the best of my knowledge, it is for the first time that the President of the United States of America has put up a very comprehensive plan with some very positive elements in this.

Mr. President, knowing your humane qualities, knowing you as a man of God, knowing you as a man of peace, I urge you not to leave this opportunity that is coming your way. I request you to be yourself, to find the rest of you and take this bold step, because history will then remember you not only as Reagan of the United States of America but Reagan the Peacemaker, the Reagan who solved practically an insolvable problem. We in Pakistan, Mr. President, wish you to take this initiative, and we wish you all the best. And we will pray for your success.

Earlier today in our personal discussion and in the talks including our colleagues, I had an opportunity to discuss these and other issues with you. I'm deeply gratified by the manner in which you made clear your continuing and deep-felt interest in the welfare and prosperity of the people of Pakistan and your support for what we are doing for the sake of stability in our region.

In turn, Mr. President, I would like to assure you, sir, of our confidence that with your acknowledged qualities of human understanding and with the high principled tradition of your country behind you the United States will keep faith with its friends and well-wishers.

Mr. President, allow me to thank you also for what you have said, for what you have said about the continued relationship between Pakistan and the United States of America. We cherish this union of partners -- though unequal partners -- but as two sovereign states comprising of people who love each other, comprising of people who have love and regard for humanity, comprising of people who love peace. And, as you said about the United States of America, that if this country has been created, God must have ordained this to be a country of peace.

Afghanistan, peace in Vietnam, peace in Somalia, and above all, peace in Palestine. We wish you, sir, all the best in your endeavors. And you will never find Pakistanis faltering. We'll be there right behind you to give you the helping hand, if we can, at the moment that you wish us to do so.

With these words, may I request you, ladies and gentlemen, to join me in a toast to the health and happiness of President Reagan and his charming wife, Mrs. Nancy Reagan, the continued progress and prosperity of the people of the United States, the establishment of peace, stability, and justice throughout the world. To the health and happiness of all friends, ladies and gentlemen, who are present here tonight. And, finally, a continuing friendship between Pakistan and the United States of America.

I thank you all very much, but it's I who should be applauding you and your neighbors and your fellow citizens doing the same. Bill [C. William Verity, Jr., Chairman of the President's Task Force on Private Sector Initiatives],  you, your committee and the chairmen and all the Task Force members have worked very hard, and I'm personally very grateful. You've reawakened America's awareness of private answers for many of our problems. This is no small achievement. You've generated a wave of interest we can turn into a tide of enthusiasm. You've reminded us that as Thomas Jefferson said, ``We are all federalists. Our cause does not belong to any party or region or class.'' It is a bipartisan drive to help meet the needs of all our people to increase our self-reliance to make America great again.

You've brought together 44 of the most innovative and dynamic individuals from around the country. And you've accomplished much. We can all be proud of your results. Of course, I didn't realize at the time how busy you'd keep me. I probably made as many phone calls and written as many letters and held as many meetings, as Bill told you, and visited as many cities on behalf of our private sector initiative program as I have for just about everything else that we've been doing. And frankly, I think that was proper, because I think this was just about as important as anything that I could be called upon to do -- our commitment to this project, to reaffirm belief in individual effort. And the private sector potential runs very deep.

America was built on the voluntary principle by good neighbors who knew that they had to rely on each other. We don't intend for the private sector to assume government's legitimate responsibilities, but revival of this resource is very important to our country's well-being. I believe Americans are still good and giving people, and encouraging that part of our national character is essential to the American renewal that we all seek.

Shortly after my election, I asked several people on our staff to begin working with groups in the private sector, not only with big business but with small businesses, neighborhood groups, union representatives, and civic and religious leaders to make helping our neighbors and our communities an honor and a privilege once again. During the early part of the administration, we talked with many of you, with hundreds of others, about promoting self-help activities, removing barriers to local initiatives, and stimulating entrepreneurial approaches to problemsolving.

I don't have to mention all of your accomplishments, but I can't resist bragging about a few. Bill has already told you about them, but there are some others who are listening in now that I think should know.

For example, because of you, yes, more than 70 television stations across America have broadcast stories about private sector solutions to community problems. And many of their communities turned those ideas into action. This year, more than 40 governments -- 42, actually -- pledged their support for private sector initiatives. More than 550 national organizations have responded to your call for help and to help individuals and communities work together. You've involved fraternal and service organizations and religious, business, and professional groups.

Bill Verity showed me and members of the Cabinet your data bank, as he has told you -- 2,500 examples of private sector initiatives across the country and all with names and phone numbers of people who have willingly permitted themselves to be put in that job bank so that anyone in the country can call in and find out about these programs and be put directly in touch with the people that are making programs operate in their communities.

I'm looking forward to reading the committee chairmen's report and reviewing the other studies the Task Force worked so hard to put together, especially those books there on reinvesting in America, corporate responsibility, and volunteering.

You have all set the stage for the rebirth of creative approaches to meeting human needs. As we end this survey phase of our effort and enter the new period of activism, it's important to recognize the themes that have developed in your work.

Second is the need to develop a new state of mind, to look first not to what government can do to help, but to what we can do as individuals or private organizations to make our neighborhoods and communities better places to live.

Third, government has the responsibility to ensure that basic human needs of all our citizens are met and to guarantee their rights. But each of us must recognize our individual responsibility to lift our country and our people to even higher standards of living, happiness, and fulfillment.

Now we must capitalize on what you have started. I know the Task Force is recommending that we continue involving the public sector at the highest levels. I promise you, this Task Force may be going out of business, but the PSI's are here to stay in this administration.

I hope to announce shortly after the first of the year a new working group of Cabinet members and private individuals, as Bill has suggested, who will carry on your efforts. We will expand our emphasis on private sector until it reaches into every office and department in this administration.

I've already directed members of the Cabinet to put encouragement of the private sector in as one of the top things on their agenda. And today I charge each of you to keep telling the exciting story of what Americans can and are doing all over our country to help their neighbors and themselves.

It was once written that America is great because America is good, and if America ever ceases to be good, America will cease to be great. I have no fear that the character and generosity of our people will erode. But I am concerned that we don't draw from that deep well of compassion and goodness nearly enough. Together, we can bring back the recognition voluntary action, private initiative, once enjoyed. We will remind the American people of how good and how great they really are. And in so doing, we will ensure our inner strength for generations to come.

Now, I understand I have an opportunity to thank each of you personally for your work. And we're going to have our pictures taken over here in a kind of receiving line. And I'm looking forward to that. But before we do, however, I have a presentation to make to Bill Verity.

Bill, over the past 13 months, you and the Task Force members have been keeping the rubber on the road and -- well, let's just say you've really been on a roll for the PSI. Even when the critics were telling you that you were full of hot air, you didn't let the pressure get to you. So, Bill -- first of all, 13 is not an unlucky number anymore. And for all your tireless efforts, you really deserve something -- an award to gage the progress and measure the momentum of the PSI. So, I thought it would be appropriate to give this PSI gage -- [laughter] -- to measure your future accomplishments.

You will note that the gage is set at 13, representing the number of months this Task Force has existed. I know it's not going to stop there. So, thank you for everything. And there's your tire gage, gold-plated.

There is no way to thank you all enough. And I have to say this -- it is a day of mixed emotions. I feel a sadness here that the Task Force is -- you won't go too far, will you? [Laughter] I mean, you'll be within calling distance if we need you. And I'm sure we will.

But that film -- everyone has to see that to see those children volunteers, coming into the loneliness of old age, their hands on the shoulder and the back of those older people -- and how both were gaining from that.

I've just got to tell one little story. I have been sent a letter which, one of these days, I am going to see is delivered to the American people. It happens to be from one of our young sailors on a carrier out in the Pacific, and just recently, they came upon a sinking boat of Vietnamese refugees, and they brought them on shore. And this letter is from the boy to his mother and father telling about that day.

And I won't say any more about it, because, as I say, that letter -- I'm going to see that the people here -- and having been an actor with lines like that, I'm not going to give them to anybody else.

Secretary Jack Block pointed out that a weak demand for crops and large supplies have created difficult conditions for farmers. I should have been a little slower there in reading that particular statement. I made it sound like the weak demand for crops and large supplies ran together there.

However, recent developments indicate that there may be an even larger imbalance between demand and supply for the coming year so that additional steps are needed. Secretary Block and others at the U.S. Department of Agriculture have been working hard in recent weeks and have come up with a highly innovative approach that will enhance long-term prospects for a recovery in the farm community.

This morning I have authorized the Secretary to propose to the Congress on behalf of the administration a new payment-in-kind program. Under this program, participating farmers would be eligible to divert additional acreage into a soil-conserving use. They would then be paid in kind from our bulging government surpluses. In other words, they would be paid in bushels of the same surplus commodity they might otherwise have grown. These farmers would then have full discretion to feed, sell, et cetera, the commodity received as payment in kind.

As Secretary Block has pointed out, this new payment-in-kind approach has several significant advantages. Production can be reduced, thus bringing supply back into closer demand with balance. Stocks can be reduced at the same time, lessening the overhang on the market at harvest next year and enhancing the prospects for a market-led recovery in farm prices and incomes in future years. The availability of market supplies will be maintained, signaling that the United States will continue to be a reliable supplier. Government outlays on farm programs should decline, and sound conservation practices would be applied.

Now, the Secretary is due on Capitol Hill to testify in a few moments, and I am due about 4 minutes ago for a meeting with Ambassador Habib, who has returned from the Middle East for this very purpose of briefing us. So, I am going to leave, but I thought that Jack might be able to take a few moments to speak with you for a moment before he has to go up on the Hill.

The President.  I think that's been a little distorted, because the same Joint Chiefs -- well, one or two at most -- had different ideas that they thought might be better with all the confusing things.

We deplore this attack into a neighboring country, particularly the loss of life. This underlines the urgency of resolving the problem. The U.S. strongly believes there are peaceful means to resolving the problems of southern Africa, and those are far preferable to escalation of violence.

Well, I'm here, first, to congratulate all of you. And it's a true pleasure to welcome you here to pay tribute to you and the public and the private sector leaders who've displayed so much creativity, initiative, and tenacity in forging successful public-private partnerships in communities across the country.

And the idea that local government and private sectors should work in harmony in tackling serious problems is about as old as our Republic. But somewhere along the line, in recent years, the people began looking to Washington as the solution to the problems. And after decades of relying on Federal solutions, I think the people are beginning to notice that many of the problems are not only still with us, but, in some cases, they're getting worse.

When we got here, almost 2 years ago now, we promised that we would do our best to bring resources and responsibilities back to the people, to levels of government that were closer to them and more responsive to their needs. Today we're recognizing the program which activates the community forces that are most efficient at meeting local needs -- local government and private sector links of leaders who best know the locale, the personalities, and the standards in the area.

There are those, of course, who are suspicious of this approach. They honestly believe that community-centered programs can't work unless the heavy Federal hand is involved. Well, that's just another way of saying that there are folks here in Washington who have some kind of monopoly on talent and compassion. And while we recognize the Federal Government has many fine people, so does local government and the private sector. And they've been sitting on the bench too long. It's time not only to get them into the game but to recognize they're really -- maybe I should be putting that, you're really the first string.

Well, that's the kind of spirit that we want to encourage, and I think it's the kind of spirit that you represent. You've demonstrated that there is no such thing as ``it can't be done.'' That was shown in Ohio, where a county lost a traditional employment base and, instead of giving up, formed its own economic development team to stimulate new commercial and industrial activity. Another project linked two major tourist attractions by eliminating a shabby and deteriorated three-block corridor that separated them. This resulted in one of the Southwest's finest commercial districts.

Still another project in a metropolitan area used a block grant and private funds to make the rehabilitation of multifamily apartment buildings attractive to owners, thus expanding the housing available to low- and moderate-income families.

You know, I can't help but add here -- and this one isn't one that's getting recognition -- I've read all of those so far that are recognized here today. But I got a letter the other day from a man -- you don't very often hear a man say nice things about his brother-in-law. But this man wrote to tell me that in a little town in Illinois, where the principal source of employment, a factory, had closed. Rather than take it lying down, his brother-in-law, one of the employees who'd worked nowhere else as an adult but at that factory, collected some of the other employees, and they just started scrounging, and they got permission to take over an old building from an elderly lady who had inherited it in an estate. They scrounged around buying secondhand machinery and so forth, and they now have a successful metal-processing plant owned by these former employees of the factory that couldn't make it and went broke.

The human suffering which results from work-related injuries and illnesses in the Federal sector must be addressed effectively. Today, I am asking that each head of an agency or a Department review existing safety and health programs and, with the help and advice of the Department of Labor's Occupational Safety and Health Administration, take every step possible to reduce the number of occupational injuries and illnesses occurring in the Federal sector. The Federal government remains the Nation's largest single employer and has represented in its workplaces all of the hazards found in private industry. Through effective administration, the Federal workplace can serve as a model for the private sector. That is what I am asking you to accomplish.

Besides our overriding goal of providing a safer and healthier workplace for Federal employees, this effort should result in significant cost savings. Reducing these financial and human losses depends on your commitment and the commitment of your senior staff, managers, supervisors and employees. I expect you to work together -- calling upon the Department of Labor for assistance -- to develop improved occupational safety and health programs for your employees.

I am today announcing a program which will improve our efforts to reduce work-related injuries and illnesses in the Federal workforce. In this Administration, great strides have been made by the Department of Labor's Occupational Safety and Health Administration in attempting to provide a safer and healthier workplace in the private sector. We must make equal improvements in our programs for the Federal worker.

In keeping with my dedication to improve the efficiency of government, I am committed to both a reduction in injuries and illnesses and a reduction in accompanying costs. Today, I am making it the responsibility of all Federal managers, supervisors and employees to take an active part in this program to improve the record of the Federal government in the area of occupational safety and health.

Council on Occupational Safety and Health, to develop additional strategies to stimulate joint problem-solving activities throughout the government. I am also authorizing a system of Presidential awards to be presented annually to those agencies showing the greatest commitment and results in improving the safety and health conditions for their workers.

I want to thank you. Nancy and I are delighted to be with you, and this marvelous occasion set here in this beautiful hall does bring on some nostalgic memories. This was one of the first formal events that we attended in Washington after the 1980 election. And I remember how happy we were then knowing that the upcoming Senate would have a majority of Republicans. Incidentally, this is the first time that the Republicans have had back-to-back reelection of a majority in the Senate since 1928. So here we are. The Grand Old Party is 54 strong and still the Senate's majority party, and we will remain the majority party.

I would like to take this opportunity to offer our warmest best wishes to three fine men. They each did an outstanding job in the United States Senate, as Howard has told us -- Senators Schmitt and Hayakawa and Brady. Gentlemen, you'll be sorely missed. But just because you'll no longer be on the floor, don't start thinking that you can hang up your shingle and go fishing. You each have much to contribute. And I know I speak for everyone here when I say that I need you and our party needs you and America needs you. We stand ready to tap every bit of talent that you can provide.

Now, I mentioned fishing, and that should remind me of a story. But the funny thing is the story it reminds me of has much more to do with the business we're in today than it does of fishing. It seems that in a small river town there was a young man named Elmer, who was so talented at fishing that he finally aroused the suspicions of the fish and game people because he came in with such a great catch every trip out. And the game warden asked the local sheriff, who was a very close friend of this young man, Elmer, if he would find out what was going on. So, the sheriff one day just casually suggested to Elmer that he join him on the fishing trip.

The opposition has been saying terrible things about your political ideas, and yet you'll find that they're friendly and cordial, personally. It's like being confronted by a dog who's showing its teeth and snarling, and its tail is wagging at the same time. You don't know just which end to believe.

Our challenges are greater than ever before. In this country, indeed, the whole world is struggling to work to be free of the longest, deepest recession in postwar history. We've taken many of the basic steps, I think, that are necessary to put us back in the right course, steps we couldn't have taken without a majority in this House, the Senate. It's thanks in no small part to the individuals in this room. But let's not kid ourselves; much more remains to be done before we make America well again and before we can rest assured that our country's security needs have been met.

Now, first and foremost, I don't think any of us should forget that the security of America is our highest responsibility. So, just as our economy needs have been neglected during the last decade, so, too, were our defense requirements. And I wonder if you can guess what I'm going to mention right now. [Laughter] That's especially true in the area of strategic weapons.

Now, I won't take this opportunity at a social gathering like this to twist your arms -- [laughter] -- much. [Laughter] I'll just tell you, now that we can look each other in the eye, the MX system is needed. If we expect the Soviet Union to take our arms control proposal seriously, we must act seriously with the choices that we make.

The defeat of the Peacekeeper -- you know, I was awfully tempted, coming from the West, to name that after a famous old gun -- the Peacemaker. But then I thought I could just see the next picture that would be presented of me and all the cartoons with a six-shooter in my hand. So, it's the Peacekeeper.

Here at home we're facing up to serious challenges. During the last 2 years, we've reduced the record rate of interest rates, spending, inflation, and taxes that caused the recession and made it so painful. And tonight, I'm here to suggest that we all work together and tackle the remaining obstacle -- unemployment -- but resolve that our party will heed the lessons of history. We dare not try to spend, tax, and borrow our way back to prosperity, because that would push America right back into the swamp where we found ourselves in 1980.

The Republican Party must go forward, not backward. We came to Washington with a confident vision of restoring opportunity and hope to the average citizen. We have creative ideas -- enterprise zones, the CBI, the balanced budget amendment, regulatory reform, and criminal justice reform. All of them still await action. The opposition, even after 2 years of complaining and, in some cases, of obstructionism, has yet to offer anything other than what they've been doing for the last few decades and which got us into the mess we're in. The American people will remember who had a positive program and stood firm when the pressure was on.

So, as you know, I just returned from a trip to Latin America, and I found out one thing that did kind of make me serious on the way back. Over and over again there they expressed to me that they look to us for leadership in the world. And I'm convinced that our country can lead the way to lasting worldwide recovery if we remain true to our principles.

The solution for the unemployed autoworkers and the steelworkers is not a giant public works program financed by higher taxes or increased borrowing. America's challenge for the eighties is to invest more, invest wisely, to make workers and products more competitive in the world market, to unleash our pioneer spirit of innovation, and get this nation back on the cutting edge of growth. That's where Washington failed the American people in the past. Compared to other major industrialized countries our rate of net private investment has been pathetically low. We've been eating our seedcorn for more than a year, and unless we break the habit, we won't keep pace with the emerging competitive forces throughout the world.

Now, we can leave a stronger America and a more peaceful world for the children, the Americans of the 21st century. All we need is faith, the courage of our convictions, and the common sense to work together. I have confidence in America's future, because I have confidence in each of you.

Code, to approve the application of an officer of the Navy or the Marine Corps for retirement after the completion of more than 20 years of active service and to designate the month in which such retirements shall become effective.

Sec. 2. (a) The Secretary of Defense is designated to perform during a time of war or national emergency the following functions vested in the President, without the approval, ratification, or other action by the President.

Sec. 3. The authority delegated to the Secretary of Defense by this Order may be redelegated to the Deputy Secretary of Defense, any of the Assistant Secretaries of Defense, and to any of the Secretaries of the military departments who may further subdelegate such authority to subordinates who are appointed to their office by the President with the advice and consent of the Senate.

Polish freedom. And their contents, particularly at this time -- because Monday marks the first anniversary of the repression of Polish freedom by the military government there. And this repression, carried out under intense Soviet pressure and using tactics of brute force and intimidation, has sparked anger and sadness throughout the world.

No people were more saddened and more angered than those who share with the Polish people close and enduring ties of blood, tradition, and affection -- the people of the United States of America. Before the tragic crackdown by the military authorities, the American people watched with approval and growing excitement the democratic gains that were won by Solidarity. We observed with awe and admiration the courage of political [Polish] workers as they sought to reclaim the right to self-government and their nation's ancient heritage of liberty. All this they did peacefully, without shedding one drop of blood.

But despite the threats, the provocations, and the imprisonments, the spirit of independence and resistance to tyranny, a spirit that's characterized the Polish people for more than a thousand years, still burns brightly in Poland today. It is the fervent hope of the American people that that spirit will again, someday soon, enjoy full expression. It is the fervent hope of the American people that the Warsaw authorities will realize -- and sooner, rather than later -- that continued repression can only prolong the political alienation and economic stagnation that characterizes Poland today.

In introducing sanctions against Poland last December I noted that those sanctions were reversible, and this remains the case. But I cannot and will not remove the sanctions until the Polish Government shows with its actions that it intends to live up to the obligations it assumed when it signed the U.N. Universal Declaration of Human Rights and the Helsinki Final Act.

Reports reach us that further steps in this direction may be taken by the Polish Government in the coming weeks and months. I will stress today the United States is prepared to respond to genuine liberalizing actions by the Polish Government. Any such actions will be the subject of careful discussions with our allies. And I repeat, if the Polish Government introduces meaningful liberalizing measures, we will take equally significant and concrete actions of our own. However, it will require the end of martial law, the release of political prisoners, and the beginning of dialog with truly representative forces of the Polish nation, such as the church and the freely formed trade unions, to make it possible for us to lift all the sanctions.

The United States can only respond to deeds, however, and not to words. We're not interested in token or meaningless acts that do nothing to fundamentally change the situation in Poland today -- or to replace one form of repression with another.

As I've often said, the United States Government and its people are deeply concerned about the plight of the Polish people. We will continue to supply humanitarian aid to them through such voluntary and private relief agencies as the Catholic Relief Services and CARE. Furthermore, as I stated last December 23d, if the Polish Government will honor the commitments it has made to human rights, we in America will gladly do our share to help the shattered Polish economy, just as we helped the countries of Europe after both World Wars.

I am signing today these two proclamations. The first is a Bill of Rights, Human Rights Day proclamation that takes particular note of the current tragedy of Polish freedom and reminds Americans and millions of people all over the world the fate of freedom in Poland affects the fate of freedom everywhere. Through the proclamation, we remember today the Polish people, the millions of others who struggle against the brute force of despotism, and all those who seek freedom and self-rule.

Our nation was conceived in liberty, and we have always understood that the fate of our own freedom is tied to the fate of freedom in the world. The flourishing of liberty, democracy, and constitutional government is the goal of this administration as it is the greatest wish of Americans and that Americans have for all peoples of the world. We pray that we'll all come to enjoy what we consider our greatest treasure -- freedom.

Lech Walesa long ago spoke of the wheat that grows on the stones, of how freedom sometimes grows from repression, how repression only serves to strengthen the determination of those who live in the darkness of tyranny to someday be free, and the ideals and heroism exemplified by the Polish people and the members of Solidarity. The world has seen splendid affirmation of the desire for human freedom that springs from deep religious faith.

Amendments to the Constitution of the United States -- a Bill of Rights which from that moment forward helped shape a nation unique in the annals of history. The Bill of Rights became the formal and legal expression of our liberties and of the principles embodied in the Declaration of Independence.

Day, we acknowledge the necessary link between human rights and constitutional democracy. As stated in the Universal Declaration, we must staunchly pursue our conviction that freedom is not the sole prerogative of the fortunate few, but the inalienable and universal right of all human beings. Throughout history and from all parts of the globe, man's instinctive desire for freedom and true self-determination have surfaced again and again. Democracy has provided the best and most enduring expression of man's search for individual rights.

We can point to many nations in the world where there is real progress toward the development of democratic institutions. The people of some of those countries have fully demonstrated their commitment to democratic principles by participating in elections under difficult and even life-threatening circumstances. Such displays of courage can only inspire confidence in the future of democracy for all people.

But in December of 1982 our satisfaction in the progress toward human rights is darkened by our realization that one year ago, on December 13, 1981, the Polish military government took steps to extinguish the flames of liberty ignited by Solidarity. As that totalitarian regime moved to crush Solidarity, it laid siege to the dreams and aspirations of a whole people reaching out for freedom, independence, and essential human dignity. The tragedy of the iron suppression of the Polish people transcends the borders of that land and reaches into the hearts of all of us who care for the rights and well-being of people everywhere.

On these important anniversaries let us remember the great and abiding love of freedom that dwells perpetually within the heart of mankind. And let us also hope and pray that the blessings of liberty will one day be shared by all people.

In Witness Whereof, I hereunto set my hand this 10th day of December, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-two, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and seventh.

December 13 will mark one year since the Polish military authorities, under intense Soviet pressure, put an end to Poland's experiment in peaceful change. During this year, the military authorities, employing force, have intimidated and ultimately dissolved the free trade unions with which the Polish Government had signed solemn accords but a short time before. Thus, a genuine labor movement was suppressed by a government of generals who claim to represent the working class. Their victory, such as it is, can only be a seeming one. The brave people of Poland have learned during a century and a half of foreign occupation to maintain their national spirit and to resist succumbing to coercion. We are not deceived for an instant that the silence which has now descended on expressions of free opinion in Poland reflects in any way the actual state of mind of the Polish people. The censored press and media do not speak on their behalf. Solidarity may be technically outlawed but its ideals of free trade unionism and nonviolent change will never be destroyed.

This weekend offers Americans a special opportunity to honor the Polish people and to demonstrate our support for their struggle for the right to determine their destiny without interference by dictatorships, supported and incited from the outside.

States is determined to remain a credible force for peace in the world. There are several critical decisions now facing the Senate, including their votes on the B - 1 and a second carrier. But none is more critical than their vote on the production of the Peacekeeper missile.

Frankly I was disturbed by the debate in the House earlier this week because of the confusion over what the vote meant. The key vote in the House and now in the Senate is over money for production of the missile, not for the basing mode. And I believe it's absolutely essential to a strong, secure defense that we vote now on funds for that missile. Then next year, as we have more time, I'd welcome a vigorous debate on the best way to base the missile.

I agree that more time is needed before we achieve a consensus in Congress on the basing mode, but the need for the missile itself has long been apparent. Both Presidents Ford and Carter before me have vigorously argued that the country needs this new system. Later today I am meeting with our arms negotiator, Ed Rowney, and I'm sure that his message will be the same as in the past -- a vote against MX production today is a vote against arms control tomorrow.

The President. Well, in the selection of a basing mode there was long study, and there was long consideration of any number of proposals. Now, any proposal for basing faces a time in which the other side is going to create a vulnerability of this system. This one did finally come down as probably offering the best opportunity. But from the very first, and in all my conversations with the Congress and the debate up there, I said that there's a time element involved here in which, yes, if there is more debate needed and if the Congress wants to debate and discuss and see if there are possible other options that could conceivably be improvements over this, we're willing for that.

All this bill entailed is money to start production of the missile. And yet, unfairly, the opponents -- or the proponents of that amendment in the House made the entire debate not on whether we need the missile, but on the basing mode. And this was unfair, and it was lacking a little in honesty to do that. And I think that the message that came out was that they were opposed to the basing mode.

The President. Why is it wavering when you've spent months trying to find -- and gone over months -- there have been basing modes suggested before we even came here, and there was great debate over those and my own opposition to one that had been proposed. But when you've spent that much time -- and the Congress, on the other hand, has not been engaged in the debate on that -- I made it plain from the first that we were asking for money to start production of the missile and that I would welcome further discussion and debate on the basing mode. That's not as if we made -- we made a decision in answer to a demand by the Congress. They demanded that we make a recommendation of a basing mode, so we chose the best one of all those that had been proposed.

The President. Well, as I said all during the campaign and continue to say, the first responsibility of the Federal Government is the security and the freedom of the people of this country. And if it comes down to a choice, in a deficit period of this kind of -- deficit or national defense, national security, I have to come down on the side of national security, and the Congress should also.

And the drumbeat, constant drumbeat, with which I'm sure many of you are familiar, about supposedly excessive defense spending at this time ignore the fact that the percentage of the budget that is devoted to defense -- even in this attempt to rectify the errors of years past -- is a smaller percentage than has been customary in times past for defense spending. It normally has been about a half of the budget. It is down to about a fourth of the budget.

Q. Mr. President, assuming the Senate does go with the production funds, do you have any reason to believe the House conferees will reverse their own body's action in the conference? Will they go along with it in a conference report?

The President. Well, it was the best system in that there is scientific evidence -- and from pretty reputable people -- given that it presented an obstacle to an enemy attempting to zero in with nuclear weapons to destroy our missiles, that what was called fratricide -- that they would have to come in at such proximity that the first explosion would render the incoming ones harmless, and, thus, where you might lose one or two missiles, you would have the others then to reply. And there's a great deal of confidence and a great many scientists -- that this is true.

ABM treaty -- and that has been a dishonest statement that it violates that treaty. It also lends itself to further deception, the possibility of additional silos and leaving some question to an enemy as to which ones had missiles in them.

The President. I'm saying in answer to the demand of the Congress that we come forth with a basing mode, we came up with the best one in all the discussion and all the alternatives that have been presented and met their deadline for presenting such a system. At the same time, I said in submitting this that the Congress has not had time to debate that particular basing mode. And there is time available and that they can go forward with the missile. At the same time, we're perfectly willing to sit down with them and debate and discuss and see if there are other alternatives.

Q. If this, you know, dense pack set-up is so good in your estimation, why did the Joint Chiefs vote 3 to 2 against it, and why did you move against their decision on this? I mean, these are supposedly the military experts of the country.

The President. Because, except for one, the others favored the one thing that we had first proposed to Congress and that Congress refused to accept, which was placing the missiles as they came off the assembly line in Minuteman silos. And Congress refused that absolutely.

Well, it wasn't a bad idea, as is evidenced by the fact that two of the three Chiefs of Staff -- that was the thing that they advocated. But they did all agree that, since we couldn't use that system, that they would support whatever decision I made.

Q. But, Mr. President, Congress overwhelming rejection of a missile that you're saying is so essential, does it concern you now that you have perhaps lost your ability to have your way with Congress -- to work your will with Congress?

I would like to call to your attention that from the very first, I have never gotten all that I asked for. I didn't get the tax program that I asked for. And I think that had I gotten it, we might find less of a recession today. I never got all the cuts that I asked for in spending, but I accepted what I could get and said we'll come back again and try again for more the next time around.

Q. Mr. President, sir, you mentioned earlier that the MX vote was good news in the Kremlin. Do you accept the House Intelligence Committee report that proponents of the nuclear freeze are not being manipulated by Soviet agents?

The President. There have been several rather well-documented articles that have appeared in print with regard to, let us say then, participation in the peace move by the Soviets. We know that the originator -- the originating organization of that was the World Peace Council, which is a Soviet organization supported by and maintained by them.

I can tell you that I have made inquiry on some of the articles that have appeared and asked for an analysis of whether they were factual or not, and the reports that I have received back, though, is that with here and there, an exception for journalistic exaggeration, they did check out.

I say again that the millions of people who are supportive of that movement, I'm sure, are sincere and well-intentioned and from that standpoint that we share the same goals. I think that a freeze would be just fine if we can get down first to equality between the two countries. But in this country today, we have less megatonnage, less force in our ballistic missile system, land-based system, than we had 20 years ago. And the Soviets, in the meantime, are now producing their fifth generation of missiles. They have improved in accuracy. They have improved in MIRV'ing.

They've improved in the megatonnage. And all I'm saying is that one must look to see whether, well-intentioned though it may be, this movement might be carrying water that they're not aware of for another purpose.

The President. No, let me be perfectly honest with it. I have no doubt this is -- we're faced with a tough fight, and we're going to wage that fight. But, no, I couldn't sit here and say, well, you know, this is going to be a breeze.

And, again, I think the difficulty is making them consider the need for the missile and recognize that they can voice their considerations in debate with regard to the basing mode. But every argument that I've heard against it has to do with the basing mode.

A few weeks ago, I talked with you about our quest for peace -- for a secure world in which our children and our children's children can grow up without fear, enjoying the blessings of peace and freedom. As President, my first duty is to do everything in my power to achieve these goals.

Two of the keys to preserving the peace are deterrence and arms reduction. One of these keys has worked perfectly for 37 years. Since the end of World War II, we've prevented the outbreak of a new global war by a national policy of deterrence. To do that meant maintaining our defense forces so that any enemy knew in advance that an attack on us or our allies would bring disaster, not victory, to the attacker. Now, when a potential enemy knows that by starting a war he'll lose more that he hopes to gain, he just won't start a war in the first place. That's what deterrence is all about.

A key feature of this policy has been to maintain strong strategic forces. Our triad, as it's called -- our three-legged plan of land-based missiles, sea-based missiles, and manned bombers -- makes clear to any aggressor that if he attacks us, we will still have the strength to strike back, the ability to retaliate. That's because no potential attacker has the strength to knock out all three legs of our defense triad at the same time.

If we only had two parts to this force, then preserving the peace would be more difficult. Potential attackers might even come to believe they could launch and win a nuclear war. We must never let this happen. That's why last year I ordered all three legs of our strategic forces to be modernized.

There's no question about the need for modernizing them. Today all three are made up mainly of weapons we developed more than 10 years ago -- more than 20 years ago in the case of our bombers. Sooner or later older systems become ineffective and vulnerable. Our most pressing problem today is that the Soviet Union, because of its massive buildup of nuclear weapons, could destroy virtually all of our land-based missiles in a single nuclear attack. If we do nothing to correct that situation, we will have weakened the chances for peace. This is why we need the new MX Peacekeeper missile -- to help restore our strategic deterrent and literally to keep the peace.

The Peacekeeper is a modern missile, and it is survivable. I agree with my scientific and military advisers that the closely spaced basing plan  we proposed will work. Congress had ordered us to submit a basing proposal for the MX by December 1st, which we did. However, we're prepared to review this matter with the Congress in the new year.

Because we're negotiating with the Soviet Union at Geneva to reduce substantially nuclear arsenals on both sides -- the other key to protecting the peace in the nuclear age. These are tough negotiations, but our team is hanging in there. However, if we just cancel the Peacekeeper, the MX -- if we say we won't deploy it -- we remove a major incentive for the Soviets to stay at the table and agree to reductions.

Look at it from their perspective. If we're willing to cancel a weapon system without getting something in return, why should they offer to eliminate or reduce weapons that give them an advantage over us?

In 1977 my predecessor sent his Secretary of State to Moscow with a proposal that the Soviets reduce the number of their heavy SS-18 missiles. At the time, we had nothing comparable to the SS-18 and no new missiles to deploy. The result was what you'd expect. The Soviets refused to even consider the proposal. I can't believe the American people want to make that mistake a second time. The stakes are just too high.

Without the Peacekeeper, we weaken our ability to deter war, and we may lose a valuable opportunity to achieve a treaty to reduce nuclear weapons on both sides. With it, we make progress on both paths to peace. On both counts, there's no doubt that we need it.

In the weeks ahead, we'll continue to bring the facts to you, the American people, and your representatives on this vital issue. We've already done it in hearings before the Senate. I only wish the House had given us the opportunity to do the same before it voted last Tuesday to cut funds for the Peacekeeper missile. It's hard to make a good decision before you've heard the facts. And in my opinion, the House of Representatives voted without really considering the facts.

As we present our case for the Peacekeeper missile to you, I hope you'll keep in mind that by continuing to maintain our ability to deter attack, we make it less likely that the horror of nuclear war will ever occur. And by keeping our defenses credible, we offer the Soviet Union a realistic incentive to reduce tensions and to agree to significant and verifiable arms reductions.

These are vital objectives. But I can't achieve them without the support of the American people and the United States Congress. To protect the peace, we must provide the funds necessary to offset the enormous Soviet military buildup and restore a military balance, particularly in nuclear weapons. And to achieve the arms reductions we want, we must give the Soviets the incentive to negotiate. We must go to the bargaining table in a position of strength, not weakness.

Governor Volpe, Secretaries who are here, if you suddenly see some of those who are among you breaking and running for the Hill, I understand that a vote is coming up. So, I'll say my few words as fast as I can.

For too many years, people have approached the problem of drunken driving as an unavoidable disaster like hurricanes or floods. Well, we've learned that's not the case. We've learned we're not helpless. Action can be taken when the people are concerned enough, and the people are not only concerned now, they're mad. They want the slaughter on the highways to stop. They want those who threaten their public safety to be held accountable for their actions.

An additional 700,000 each year are injured in crashes involving alcohol. Our loved ones are not being killed in drunk driving ``accidents'' -- and I put the word ``accidents'' in quotation marks -- they're dying because some of the Nation's motorists have chosen to turn their vehicles into weapons.

John Volpe, as Chairman of the Commission, has given us some encouraging information as a part of this interim report, which I look forward to reading. Apparently, a potential drunk driver who knows he stands a good chance of being caught and prosecuted is less likely to drive at all. And for this deterrent to be efficient, however, State and local law enforcement officials must make it clear that they mean business and that the drunk or drug-influenced driver will be the prime target for apprehension and conviction.

And clearly there's no single solution to the drunk driving problem. The Commission has noted several approaches, I know, including a New York State program that is self-supporting, as John was talking about. It pays for its expenses through fines levied on drunken drivers. We're going to give careful consideration to all of the Commission's findings and ideas, and we're going to look hard at what the Federal Government can do to help State and local governments combat drunk driving.

In Maine the highway death rate has dropped to an alltime low, and alcohol-related highway crashes have been reduced 42 percent since stronger laws went into effect. In Maryland the highway death rate is at a 19-year low due to strict enforcement and laws against drunk driving.

I also want to express my gratitude for the leadership and the energy many Members of Congress and the others have shown on this issue. And I've asked them to join me here this afternoon. If I knew which way they were going to vote, I'd know whether to talk faster or slower.

So, together, with conscience and commitment, we can reduce the menace of these drivers and protect the lives of our fellow citizens. And now I have one more thing to do, and that is to sign the proclamation.

Nothing is more devastating to a parent than the call from a police officer that a son or daughter has been injured or killed in an auto accident. Nothing is more tragic than to learn that a drunken or drugged driver was at fault.

Each year, more than 25,000 of our citizens, a large number of them young people, are killed as a result of alcohol- or drug-related highway accidents. Seventy times a day -- every 23 minutes -- a life is taken somewhere on our streets and highways because driving skills and judgment were impaired by alcohol or drugs. Too often, a repeat offender is involved and, too often, society has looked the other way.

Today, thanks to a growing public outcry and the efforts of concerned citizens and safety leaders, the problem of drunken and drugged drivers is gaining national attention. State legislatures are enacting tougher laws and courts are imposing stiffer penalties. The Presidential Commission I appointed last April is reinforcing these efforts and encouraging greater preventive and corrective programs. Congress recently passed legislation setting Federal standards and providing incentive funds to assist in the crusade against the human and economic waste which results from drunken driving.

The holiday season, traditionally a high fatality period, affords us the opportunity to join even more emphatically in a concerted national commitment to reduce the threat of drunken and drugged drivers on our highways.

Collisions involving drunken drivers are the nation's single greatest killer of young people. This holiday season we can give our children a great gift by doing everything we can to keep the drinking driver and the drug-user off our roads. Let us all observe safety and celebrate safely, and let us remember that the safety belt in our car can be our best defense against drunken and drugged drivers.

December 12, 1982, as National Drunk and Drugged Driving Awareness Week. I call upon each of you to observe this week with appropriate activities in your homes, offices, schools, and communities. I ask all Americans to join in a national campaign to eliminate drunken and drugged driving and to prevent tragedy from intruding on our joyful holiday season.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 13th day of Dec., in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-two, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and seventh.

Well, this morning I met with a group of leading Republican and Democratic Senators to discuss the future of the MX Peacekeeper missile. And I'm pleased to report that we've reached a bipartisan agreement that we hope will preserve funding for the missile and enable us to continue the restoration of America's defense capabilities.

In recent days, it's become apparent that many Members of Congress agree with my assessment that production of the Peacekeeper is in the national security interests of the United States. At the same time, however, they want to take a closer look at the question of how to base the missile.

In closing, let me reaffirm my very strong view that the United States needs to move forward with an effective land-based missile, one that will not only enhance the prospects for a secure America but will also strengthen the hand of our negotiators at the arms conference and the arms control talks in Geneva.

The President. No. And let me straighten something out on that whole thing. First of all, our first proposal was -- with the MX -- that, because they don't all come out of the oven at the same time -- there's a progression as they're made -- that the first certain number that came off the line simply be placed in Minuteman missiles [silos] while we continued to work on a basing mode, because there was great disagreement about the original concept of the previous administration of the racetrack idea and 4,000 shelters for 200 missiles. We're building -- we're only asking for 100.

Congress decided against the idea of placing any of them in Minuteman missiles [silos]. And so we continued and the Defense Department continued with a study of various methods of basing them. And finally the one that -- as I've said before and used the expression -- that came up with the least warts was the dense pack system. And Congress had also asked that by December we come up with a recommendation. So, we came with that recommendation.

And if there had been no opportunity, we simply presented the plan, no opportunity to debate or discuss with the Congress on this decision, and so we said, ``We're perfectly willing to sit here, if you'll let us start making the missiles, and discuss with you, negotiate, and see if there's any improvement or better plan.'' And that's always been our position.

Senator Tower. The compromise is simply this: that the funding for production of the MX missile would be retained in the bill, but would be fenced. And the bringing down of the fence would be contingent on two things. The President is required to resubmit a certification of his selection of basing modes, along with information on alternative basing modes. Then the Congress would act under expedited procedure, within 45 days of the submission of the certification, to approve the basing mode recommended by the President or any alternative they might select. But it would require affirmative approval of both Houses of Congress, under expedited procedure so it could not be filibustered.

The President. Yes, it can, because participating in our meetings has been General Rowney -- is home. They're taking an interlude here in the arms negotiation talks. And he has spoken of the impact that this has had and the seriousness of the negotiations, that the Soviet Union is willing and is negotiating.

And the thing is, this is not in the sense of a bargaining chip that somebody can say, ``Well, you're building it just to tear it down.'' No. We need a modernization. Even if we get the reduction of arms which we're seeking and which there has been some indication that the Soviets are seriously considering, this would not be the missile that would be taken out of circulation.

We need to modernize to catch up with the five generations of missiles that they have been developing while we have stayed static and have not improved in the last 15 years in any of our missiles. We do not match them in accuracy. We do not match them in megatonnage. This is a missile that is comparable to their big missiles, their SS - 18's.

The President. Well, I think the very fact that they made a proposal to reduce in numbers reveals that they, too, are concerned. And they became concerned when NATO asked and we agreed to provide comparable intermediate-range missiles, of which there are none now in Europe, as a deterrent to their use of the SS - 20's. And, so, the very fact that they have volunteered, it isn't adequate. And it would still leave us at a considerable disadvantage.

Q. Is the passage of this funding proposal, Mr. President, expected in the House and the Senate in this lameduck session? I know the Senate, but what about the House and the conference committee? Do you expect to get the whole thing through this time? Is that what the agreement looks at?

The President. You're getting into procedural matters now, having to do with the fact that a bill has passed the House and now before the Senate and there is the need for a continuing resolution and all. And I think that I'm going to walk away and let them handle those questions.

Social Security Commission doesn't come up with firm recommendations on Friday? And how do you feel about the suggestion made by Senator Dole and others that the White House is just plain scared to touch this issue?

The President. We're not scared to touch the issue. The idea of appointing a commission was supposed to be that the commission would include experts, experts in the field of actuarial statistics and insurance and pension plans, and that since our previous experience had been that all we could succeed in doing was making it a political football and terrorizing the senior citizens -- and I don't think that we participated in making it a football or that, but that seemed to be what was happening -- that we decided on this bilateral -- or bipartisan commission for them to study what was needed to meet the immediate short-fall and to meet the long-range short-fall.

And I'd like to remind you all that for 30 years almost, long before I was ever in public office, I have been making public addresses on the actuarial imbalance of social security, which by 1964 had reached some $300 billion. And yet a year ago when we tried to make a proposal about this, it was denied by the leadership of the other party in the House -- it was denied that there was any such emergency confronting us. And now we've already borrowed a billion dollars to keep the program going.

We need a solution, but we appointed a commission. It doesn't seem to me that this is the place for us to be interfering. We're waiting for the commission to come back and tell us, could they agree on a plan; if so, what; or do they have alternatives? Then we will consider those.

Bonn. And this, however, has been our first opportunity to talk at length, and we've had a lot to discuss. Our exchange is exceptionally useful and harmonious. After these discussions it's now even more clear why our two countries have been such hard-and-fast allies for so many years.

The relationship between Portugal and the United States is one of common values, mutual respect, and broad cooperation. In our meeting and the working lunch which followed, we covered a broad range of international topics and found substantial agreement.

Among other subjects, we discussed our defense cooperation, which goes back many years. We're now in the process of negotiating a new security cooperation agreement to broaden and strengthen our collaboration on our common defense objectives.

Portugal and the United States share a common responsibility for the defense of the West. And our security relationship is important to both countries, as well as to the NATO alliance. The Prime Minister has explained to me the various military modernization needs of his country, and I have reaffirmed the U.S. commitment to help Portugal to meet these goals.

We also discussed the economic assistance which the U.S. has provided to Portugal over the years. This continuing assistance is an important expression of our desire to befriend and help the Portuguese people. We agreed that the current negotiations on the security cooperation agreement should lead to an early and mutually satisfactory conclusion.

Mozambique. The Prime Minister and his government have been most generous in sharing with us some valuable insights drawn from their extensive experience in the area. We shall continue to consult our Portuguese friends in the future.

Minister my personal admiration and that of all Americans for the continued progress of democracy in Portugal. The Portuguese experience has shown how, given a chance, people will choose freedom. That the progress worked so well in Portugal is a tribute to the Portuguese people with their love of freedom, their high ideals, and high civic and political responsibility.

I'm thankful to President Reagan for the invitation he addressed to me to come to Washington, providing a timely opportunity to discuss bilateral relations between Portugal and the United States and to exchange views on international items and matters of mutual interest.

First, I would like to fully endorse the President's assessment of our relationship and of the principles on which it is based. It is not by sheer coincidence that a sound friendship between Portugal and the United States has existed for 200 years. And it is still showing a dynamic vitality, as we all know and as this visit demonstrates. We in Portugal look forward to working in close cooperation with the United States and for that effort we count very much on the strong Portuguese American community living and working here in the United States.

Our interests and concern about the evolution of the situation in southern Africa has led us to express our viewpoint that peace and stability in that area can be achieved only through balanced economic development and respect for the security of all countries concerned. I was also very interested in hearing the President's assessment of his recent trip to South America and in exchanging views on this region, which is also of particular interest for Portugal.

I had the opportunity to fully brief the President on the recent political evolution of the situation in Portugal, on our economic situation, also, and on the development of our negotiations to join the European Economic Community. In the present political stability of my country, opens new perspectives for more cooperation and more constructive cooperation with the United States and with the free world.

We also discussed in detail our security cooperation regarding which we have been engaged in extensive negotiations. These talks have now reached an important stage as we have just begun to renegotiate the Azores agreement. Portugal is a reliable partner which wants to fully assume its responsibilities in security terms, expects within this context a clear understanding from its American alliance.

The President. Thank you very much. We're delighted to welcome all of you to the White House, and it's especially nice to have you with us here at Christmastime. I'm sorry that Nancy isn't here, but as you look around, you'll see that she's here with us in spirit. She's been in charge of that department.

Many outstanding leaders from different areas of the communications industry are with us here today. And as you know, our administration has asked the private sector to carry the ball for the United States in world communications for the year 1983. We're very grateful for your leadership and initiative.

I know that Bill Ellinghaus [Chairman of A.T. & T.] has put together a national council, with representatives from industry, labor, academia, the media, and professional and trade associations, to implement the goals for the United States. The aim of World Communications Year is to stimulate economic and social progress around the world through accelerated expansion of communications and information services, and I think that this represents a tremendous opportunity for U.S. world leadership.

And let's face it, we are the pathbreakers in the most communications-intensive era in history. The world is in a communications revolution, and that revolution is being made right here at home. I think this process grows out of our -- or progress, I should say, grows out of our 200-year-old tradition of freedom -- freedom like that embodied in our first amendment, which gives every citizen the right to express his or her ideas and to act on them politically. We trust the people. Our Revolution was born to liberate the individual and to create economic and social opportunity. It lives in one simple principle: Government must rest on the consent of the governed. This is still the most inspiring and successful and truly progressive political idea in the world today. It always has and always will make tyrants tremble.

As long as information, though, can flow freely, America can grow and thrive, and democracy itself will be stronger than before. This principle that Jefferson championed is reflected in Article 19 of the 1948 Universal Declaration of Human Rights: Everyone has the right to freedom of opinion and expression. This right includes freedom to hold opinions without interference and to seek, receive, and impart information and ideas through any media and regardless of frontiers.

As we describe the world in which we live today and the world we're building for tomorrow, we see two trends growing side by side -- a universal quest for more and better information, and new opportunities and technologies sprouting up to meet this quest almost faster than we can imagine.

We Americans have an unprecedented opportunity. We can embark on a noble journey to reach our dreams and to serve mankind, and we can do it through communications, creating new growth, jobs, and hope for our people and for the rest of the world. This is our challenge for the eighties.

Looking ahead to another private sector initiatives effort, in 1984 the Olympics in Los Angeles will be carried via satellite transmission to some 2 billion people around the globe. There is an international satellite under construction here in the United States that will hopefully be launched by 1986. It will be able to transmit the equivalent of the Encyclopedia Britannica every 3 seconds.

We've opened the door, but we've only taken our first small steps into the new age of communications. With faith and confidence in each other, with a commitment to invest more and to invest more wisely in our future, we can create a new era of knowledge and opportunity.

The United States must rededicate itself to development of technology through our private enterprise system. We're one of the few nations of the world in which telecommunications is still controlled by private enterprise. And we shall lead the way. We must continue to share the benefits of this technology with the rest of mankind in keeping with the spirit of Article 19 of the Universal Declaration of Human Rights.

So, I thank you very much for your strong personal efforts to help us build our future -- a better future of progress, excitement, and hope. And now, I'm pleased to sign this proclamation for World Communications Year 1983.

Communications in 1983, I want you to know that I'm deeply honored by your support and appreciative of your action today in issuing this proclamation. And on behalf of all the members of the Council that are here, we thank you for launching what we believe will be a very exciting and significant effort in the year to come.

Mr. Houghton. Mr. President, I have two Christmas tree ornaments here -- one for you and one for the Vice President. And you may ask why I take your time to give you a Christmas tree ornament? -- [laughter] -- and the reason being is that it symbolizes a very important part of land-based communications, and that's part of the industry that I'm with. And it has the glass fiber as the core of it, and the glass fiber is able to do things which nothing has been able to do before.

If you look out this window, sir, and you wanted to transmit light through the glass, you could only go 3 feet without dissipating 90 percent of it. The ornament represents fiber which will produce a light source which will go 20 miles. And in terms of productivity, you might be interested in knowing that if you take a pair of twisted metal wires, which provide the light and the various energy sources around here, one strand of this glass wire has a 10,000-to-1 productivity increase.

And this is not bad -- [laughter] -- and it's done by private enterprise, and it's done right here in the United States. So, on behalf of Mr. Ellinghaus, who represents probably the greatest laboratory in our history, my fellow associates in the Council, and my fellow glassblowers in Corning, I give these to you, sir.

Development of Communications Infrastructures. Its purpose is to stimulate accelerated worldwide development of communications infrastructures and to provide an opportunity for all countries to undertake an in-depth review and analysis of their policies on communications development.

Communications systems have taken on an increasingly vital role in every facet of economic, political, and social progress. While there have been remarkable advances in both this technology and its applications -- ranging from health care, education, and banking transactions to weather observations and earth resource location -- many nations have not been able to benefit appreciably from these capabilities.

Telecommunication Union, we have an opportunity to promote the well-being of people around the globe. I encourage the United States communications industry -- with its position of world leadership in this technology -- to actively and voluntarily support this effort to stimulate the development of communications infrastructures in all nations.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 16th day of Dec., in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-two, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and seventh.

A missile subceiling, as mentioned in recent press accounts, would at most require the reduction of some of these highly mobile systems in or ``intended for use in'' Europe, while requiring us to cancel entirely our deployments of Pershing II and ground-launched cruise missiles planned to begin in December 1983. This would leave the Soviets with a substantial monopoly over the West in long-range, land-based INF systems, would not constrain the overall levels of Soviet systems, would draw into the bilateral negotiations the nuclear forces of other countries, and is patently inadequate as a solution to the INF issue, since it would not eliminate the political and military threat to the alliance posed by Soviet longer range INF missiles.

Soviets have elaborated our positions in both formal and informal contacts. We will continue to study the Soviet position, and it will be among the things we will be discussing when the next round begins on January 27.

We have kept our allies fully informed about negotiations as they have occurred. We and they have reaffirmed in three recent NATO meetings at the Foreign Minister or Defense Minister level that the zero-zero solution remains the best arms control result, since it would eliminate the systems of greatest concern to both sides. The President and his administration are fully convinced of the reasonableness of this carefully developed proposal. Nothing could be fairer to all concerned.

In this holiday season, we celebrate the birthday of one who, for almost 2,000 years, has been a greater influence on humankind than all the rulers, all the scholars, all the armies and all the navies that ever marched or sailed, all put together. He brought to the world the simple message of peace on Earth, good will to all mankind.

Some celebrate the day as marking the birth of a great and good man, a wise teacher and prophet, and they do so sincerely. But for many of us it's also a holy day, the birthday of the Prince of Peace, a day when ``God so loved the world'' that He sent us His only begotten son to assure forgiveness of our sins.

The Yuletide season is characterized in our country by the giving of gifts, a spirit of charity, and, yes, good will, more so than at any other time of the year. Already traditional programs are underway, drives to collect food and clothing for those who are in need. The U.S. Marine Reserves have a toy collection drive to make sure that old St. Nicholas -- Santa Claus -- has enough to go around. And this is matched in countless American communities by firemen, policemen, churches, religious groups, and service clubs.

Let me give you one specially moving example of what the Christmas spirit can do. I told this the other night. In Bridgeport, Connecticut, the Police Athletic League for years has maintained a kind of Christmas Center. It consists of a ranch-type house, a manger, and all the other things associated with Christmas. And during the holiday season it's manned by a Santa Claus, elves, and helpers. Thousands of children visit it every year, and thousands of toys are given out to them.

This year, on Tuesday, December 7th, it was destroyed by fire set by a suspected arsonist. The mayor of Bridgeport called an emergency meeting. He asked for constructionists, carpenters, electricians, all the skills that are needed to help rebuild such a place. The answer to his call was instantaneous. More than 250 volunteers worked in shifts around the clock.

On Sunday, December 12th, 5 days later, at about 1:30 p.m. I phoned the mayor. He was officiating at the reopening of that Christmas Center to the cheers of hundreds and hundreds of the citizens of Bridgeport. It had been rebuilt in only the 4 days between the fire and the opening ceremony.

A recent initiative of Postmaster General William Bolger's will make it easier for all of us to do our part. He has instructed post offices across the country to display lists of the Christmas food, clothing, and toy drives in their local areas, a guide to holiday giving open to all Americans.

This holiday season, as we work our way out of a recession, too many still find themselves without jobs, forced to cut back on things that they once thought of as their normal pattern of living. They aren't statistics; they're people. They're our neighbors, friends, and, yes, family, and they make up that group that right now we call the unemployed. Their number's greater than it has been for some time past. Still, for every unemployed individual there are 9 of us who do have jobs, and with that ratio of 1 out of 10 in mind, I'd like to make a suggestion. How about those of us who are employed making sure that those who aren't will nevertheless have a merry Christmas.

The people we're talking about may be members of your church, brothers and sisters in your local union, or that family across the street or down the block in your neighborhood. Surely between the nine of us, we can find a way to make Christmas merry for that one who temporarily can use our help. But remember, time is growing short, and Christmas is almost here, which brings us back to lighting the National Christmas Tree.

Christmas season I think most Americans do feel a greater sense of family, friendship, giving, and joy. And there's a special joy in our children at this time of year. I've heard from many of them recently. I wish Nancy and I could personally thank all you children who've written in, but I want you to know how good your cards, letters, and artwork make us feel.

Now, while Christmas is a time for children, it's also a time to think of those who are less fortunate than we are, and let us also remember the constant vigil of the families of our missing in action. As we light this Christmas tree, may it light hope in the hearts of those who are lonely and needy.

Well, let us share our bounty this Christmas season. Let us offer not only our hearts and prayers but a generous hand to those who need our help. And as we light this tree, let us brighten the lives of those here at home and around the world whose Christmas may not be as glowing and as cheerful as ours.

Welcome to the White House, and thank you for being with us to recognize the vital role that minority business plays in this country. Our nation's 600,000 minority enterprises represent nearly 5 percent of the nonagricultural business. They also represent, I think, social mobility and economic advancement to millions of Americans.

Today, in signing this statement, we reaffirm our commitment to a healthy economy in general and to a vibrant and expanding minority business opportunity in particular. We believe that in the last 23 months, we've taken the steps that will bring the economic recovery our people want so badly.

In some cases, our program gives minority business an even greater boost than perhaps is seen at first glance. Our tax rate reductions, for example, should have a major impact on minority business. Since the large proportion of minority businesses are proprietorships and partnerships, they report their income as individuals and thus receive the full benefits of the across-the-board tax rate cuts.

And these same enterprises will continue to be helped, because the tax rates will be increased -- or, I mean, will be indexed, not increased. I don't know how that word slipped in -- [laughter] -- that was a Freudian slip -- [laughter] -- be indexed after 1984. And you know what that means, that no longer will the government be making a profit on inflation. Here again, all small businessmen are being helped with a minority enterprise and full participation.

Now, early in this century, Teddy Roosevelt said that it ought to be evident to everyone that business has to prosper before anybody can get any benefit from it. Well, just as the incredible productivity and efficiency of American business catapulted the standard of living of our people as a whole, we believe a thriving minority business community will be instrumental in bettering the lives of those formerly excluded from the prosperity enjoyed by most Americans. In signing this statement, we renew our pledge that as recovery takes hold, we're not leaving anybody behind.

Council. I know that some of you were there. And I said at that time that the administration would soon announce a program focusing on minority business development, including a commitment to increase the level of general procurement from minority-owned enterprises -- the general procurement by the Federal Government. And although it's taken longer than expected, today we're making good on that promise. Among the other items detailed in today's statement is a 10-percent increase of the minority business procurement objectives in 1983 over those of 1982.

Increasing the procurement levels can be accomplished on our own, but we can't forget that enterprise zone legislation -- something that promises to do much to encourage growth in the inner cities -- is still tied up on the Hill. I know that Secretary Pierce [Samuel R. Pierce, Jr., Secretary of Housing and Urban Development] has spoken to you about that and went into detail on this important piece of legislation. But I want to add my feelings that it's about time that we get some action on this job-building legislation for the disadvantaged, and we'll continue to press for action on this vital legislation.

A great many of the so-called job projects that have been floated around up on the Hill are nothing more than pork-barrel items under the new name and taking advantage of unemployment in order to try and get pork-barrel projects for various, particular segments of the country. And we think that the enterprise zones is a real jobs program in addition to furthering, to a large extent, minority businesses in the inner cities. If there's one lesson that we should have learned over the last two decades, it is that focusing totally on government as a vehicle for social improvement is the least effective method of improving the lives of our people.

We're firmly committed to assuring our fellow citizens in the minority communities an equal opportunity to enjoy the profits of our competitive enterprise system. And given the proper incentives and a general environment for economic progress, American minority businesses can thrive and serve as a mighty engine for social progress.

This Administration is committed to the goal of greater opportunity for economic progress and independence for all Americans. We began movement toward this goal last year with enactment of major elements of our Economic Recovery Program. By reducing inflation and stimulating economic growth, this program will promote the kind of economic environment essential to the formation and development of business enterprise. In addition, our economic program will result in increased private savings through incentives provided by tax rate reductions and will slow the growth of government spending. Both actions will expand the pool of financial resources from which businesses can obtain capital for development.

But these steps are only a beginning. We must maintain the momentum by keeping the tax rate cuts in place and by retaining the tax indexing scheduled to begin in 1985. This indexing will prevent inflation from forcing individuals, including investors, workers and small business owners, into higher and higher tax brackets.

Our Administration, however, has not stopped there. Today, I am announcing additional steps to promote an economic environment in which minority entrepreneurs can better marshal their talents and skills to achieve better lives for themselves and, in so doing, contribute to a stronger economic base for America.

During the same period, this Administration will assist in the expansion of at least 60,000 minority businesses or 10 percent of the approximately 600,000 minority businesses that already operate in America today. We will place particular emphasis on labor intensive businesses and those in industries with high growth potential.

The Federal government will procure an estimated $15 billion in goods and services from minority businesses during the three-year period comprising Fiscal Years 1983, 1984, and 1985, based upon our current overall procurement plans. Actual procurement objectives will be set on an annual basis and will be based upon this Administration's objective of increasing the share of total procurement supplied by minority businesses. This does not include minority business procurement by recipients of Federal grants and cooperative agreements, which could amount to an additional $6 to $7 billion during this three-year period.

We will make available approximately $1.5 billion in credit assistance and $300 million in management and technical assistance to promote minority business development during this same three-year period.

To expand minority enterprise participation in Federal government subcontracts, I am directing department and agency heads to develop and implement incentive techniques that will encourage greater minority business subcontracting by Federal prime contractors.

To continue full minority business participation in procurement resulting from government grants and cooperative agreements, I am directing the major Federal grant-making agencies to encourage their grantees to achieve a reasonable minority business participation in contracts let from their grants and agreements. This will be done in a manner consistent with the Administration's commitment to the principles of federalism.

In order to spur private sector involvement in minority business development, I will ask the business leaders of this country to work with me to encourage private firms to expand their business transactions with minority enterprises.

I am asking the Vice President's Task Force on Regulatory Reform to explore opportunities for reducing regulatory and other barriers to small and minority business expansion, and for promoting meaningful entry into the international trade arena.

In order to ensure the success of these Federal Initiatives, I will be issuing a new Executive Order on Minority Business Development which reaffirms the Federal commitment. It will prescribe specific policies and actions to be taken in these programs and direct the Interagency Council for Minority Business Enterprise to establish uniform guidelines for all Federal minority business efforts. It will also direct the Cabinet Council on Commerce and Trade to submit an annual plan specifying minority-enterprise-development objectives for each agency.

I am directing Federal contracting agencies to increase minority business procurement objectives for 1983 by at least 10 percent over actual procurement in 1982. In addition, we are taking measures designed to expand the number of minority firms participating in Federal procurement programs.

Together, our policies and programs for minority business development should set the stage for the expanded development of minority business. But most important are the steps to be taken by minority entrepreneurs themselves and other private concerns. Recognizing that the realization of the American Dream is ultimately achieved in the private marketplace, we can, through a greater commitment to public and private cooperation, help minority Americans to achieve fuller participation in the market economy.

Mr. La Guardia's many accomplishments, and the honesty and fairness which characterized his work, continue to serve as a benchmark against which other careers in public service are judged, and as an inspiration to all Americans, particularly those who share his Italian heritage.

I applaud the Members of the House of Representatives for their overwhelming vote today in support of the Caribbean Basin Initiative. This is a positive, self-help, free enterprise method through which we and our neighbors can assist each other. From our own experience, we know it will work, and I'm pleased the Members of the House share this confidence.

This program is designed to stimulate growth through trade and tax provisions that will encourage investment, reward hard work, and create jobs. This initiative will go a long way toward strengthening the economies of our neighbors while preserving our own vital interests.

Once again, I congratulate the House Members for their important vote and urge the Members of the Senate to approve the bill before this session of the Congress ends. Positive action now on this bipartisan initiative will bring new opportunity to our hemisphere, reinforce stability among the democracies of the New World, and demonstrate for all that prosperity, peace, freedom, and democracy go hand in hand.

The action taken early this morning by the Senate with regard to the MX missile program is both welcome and wise. It expresses solid understanding and support for the need to modernize the land-based leg of the triad. As the Senate recognizes, it is only through this triad approach that we can hope to preserve an effective deterrent and go forward with negotiations toward real arms reductions.

Beyond that, the Senate was also expressing some rather serious concerns which I take very much to heart. Foremost among these was uncertainty with respect to the approach for basing the missile. This concern is reasonable, since the survivability of this system must be assured and an effective basing plan plays the central role. This extremely complex problem deserves very careful and deliberate consideration, and I am pleased that this will be allowed to take place early in the new Congress.

Member of Congress and, indeed, as many as possible of the American people gain a full appreciation of alternative solutions to this problem. Toward that end I pledge to the Congress and to all Americans the most exhaustive, renewed analysis possible of every apparent option. To assist in this effort, I am today announcing my intention to appoint a bipartisan commission, comprised of senior officials from previous administrations as well as technical experts. I will ask the members to work with the Department of Defense and join together in a bipartisan effort to forge a consensus as to the plan which will best assure the national security interests of our country in the years ahead.

The contributions of this panel of distinguished Americans will be extremely important. In addition, I pledge to the Congress the fullest possible coordination of the work of this commission with Senators and Members. It is essential that if we are to reach our common goals within the time required by last night's vote, the Congress play a central role in shaping this, the most important strategic modernization decision of the postwar period. Again, I would like to express my appreciation for the responsible position taken by the Senate and ask that this wisdom be reflected in the House, as together we join in this important undertaking.

For many of us, this holiday season is the most special time of the year -- a time when faith, joy, and love lift our spirits and bring new meaning to our lives. It's a time when we can look into the heart of America and know that her heart is good. And this year, especially this year, it's a time when we can look to our future with new hope -- 1983 will be a better year.

For too many of us, economic recovery is still a faceless stranger in some cold, distant future, not a warm friend who's come to grace our family hearth. But despite our frustrations, let's not lose sight of the essential: America is on the mend. To move forward again we had to get rid of what was holding us back -- runaway spending, double-digit inflation, record interest rates, a tax burden soaring out of sight, and an alarming erosion of our national defense, which jeopardized our security and undermined our leadership abroad. Progress is always slower than we'd like, but there's no doubt we're making headway on each of these deep-rooted problems.

Looking to the future, I see an America that will help to lead the world out of its longest, deepest recession in postwar history; 1983 will witness a higher level of economic activity and lower unemployment. This view is held not only by my economic advisers but by the vast majority of private forecasters across the country, and the forecasts are being borne out by the facts and figures. Momentum for recovery is not weakening but building. Sharp declines in inflation, interest rates, and the first reductions in personal income tax rates have given consumers more money to spend, more incentives to save, and more confidence to do both. Workers' real hourly earnings have registered their first year-to-year improvement since 1978.

One of the most encouraging signs we're seeing is the strong recovery in a bedrock American industry -- housing. More homes built will mean new demand for big-ticket items like appliances, whose sales have been lagging. Auto and retail sales are also picking up, and business startups are near a record. All this will stimulate demand for labor, and that means jobs. I think it's encouraging that the help wanted advertising index in October -- the most recent month available --  rose 4.1 percent after falling for the previous 10 months. Equally encouraging, initial claims for unemployment insurance have begun to trend lower.

Now, let me say a word about another long-ignored problem we've begun to correct -- the decline of our nation's defenses. The day I took office, almost 2 years ago, our Armed Forces were in a dismal state of readiness. Shortages of skilled manpower, faulty equipment, lack of spare parts, insufficient fuel and ammunition for proper training -- all had left the United States exposed and vulnerable.

One of my first priorities was to restore the readiness of our Armed Forces. We've begun to pay our soldiers a decent wage for the risks they take, and that incentive is bearing fruit. Reenlistment is up significantly, and the educational caliber of enlistees is improving, too.

But we're not just giving our men and women in uniform the better pay they deserve, we're also providing them the training and equipment they weren't getting before. We have increased pilot flying time, extended basic training, and restocked spare parts inventories.

By providing adequate compensation for our soldiers, by giving them the tools they need to do their jobs, we're restoring dignity, honor, and pride to the uniform of the United States of America. And, by strengthening the credibility of our Armed Forces, we increase the probability of reaching a satisfactory arms control agreement with the Soviet Union.

Two years ago, there was growing doubt about America's determination to protect its vital interests and fulfill its obligations as a trustee of freedom, democracy, and peace. Well, I don't think anyone harbors such illusions anymore. With our friends in the Americas, Europe, Africa, and Asia, we're working in a spirit of partnership to stimulate economic progress and to build a more peaceful world.

The United States will redouble its efforts to restore sovereignty to Lebanon and to renew negotiations for an end to turnoil and bloodshed in the Middle East. And we'll strive to strengthen world peace through intensive negotiations with the Soviet Union. I want the Russian people to know the United States is committed to negotiate significant reductions in existing levels of weapons and to foster a more stable relationship between our two nations.

Our country may face enormous challenges, but the great advantage of our democracy is that we do not act from fear or simply respond to threats. We Americans have never been pessimists. We conquer fear with faith, and we overwhelm threats and hardship with courage, work, opportunity, and freedom.

Isn't that the bottom line that you're going to be able to accept? In light of the trouble you've had with this lameduck session, are you going to take Senator Hatfield's suggestion and take the $2 billion and run, or are you going to stand and fight?

The President. Well, obviously, I have to wait and see what comes down to me and what's in front of me before I actually say veto or the other way. But I have to tell you this: I cannot sign that bill, I will have to veto, if it contains these various amounts that have been suggested because, in truth, these aren't job-creating bills.

The 5.4 [billion dollars], for example, that was introduced in the House -- I think that a great many Congressmen -- in fact some of them openly admitted -- were calling it a free vote in which they could apparently vote for a job bill, knowing that I would veto it and that they wouldn't have to live with it.

Actually, that 5.4 [billion dollars] is not a job-creating bill. It is a ``pork barrel'' and filled with all sorts of projects, many of which wouldn't create employment at all, and many of which wouldn't create employment -- well, one in particular, wouldn't even be effective until 1985. That's not going to help the unemployed today. But also, many of those would -- whatever work they would create would be at a tremendous cost.

The military bill -- the Pentagon asked for less than half of the amount that they've added in this bill in the House for military residence construction. So, there's half of that that wouldn't even be spent.

The President. Well, the thing is if it contains the things that are originally there; if, on the other hand, they come down with some addition to this that is in another area that you look at and say, ``Well, there is a value to this, and while I would prefer that we not increase the budgeting,'' I would have to look and see, does the value offset the risk of adding this to the deficit?

Q. Mr. President, the continuing resolution will probably also contain the MX proposal, and you've just appointed a commission to look into the basing options for MX. I was wondering, given the complexity of that task, is it realistic to expect them to report by March 1st, or could that date somehow be slipped?

MX. We don't even have an assembly line for building missiles. That was done away with -- the previous administration. And we asked for the right to put them -- the first ones off the line -- into Minuteman silos, while we continued to study a basing plan. The Congress denied us the right to do this, the ability to do it, and so we continued study. And the dense pack basing mode -- and it may still turn out to be the one that has the least warts -- there's something wrong with every system. But I was required to come up by December 1st, having selected a basing mode, and this was the best one that we had on hand.

So, there was no opportunity to consult with them or for them to have access to all the study and the research that had gone on. We hope, now, in these few months, that we can present everything. And if some of our scientists come up with a new and improved mode, why we'll take a good look at that one.

The President. Well, it would depend on whether there was other agreement with the commission, too. And by that, I mean the expertise of our own military people who are going to have to use these weapons if they're ever used.

And let me add here, lest there's misunderstanding of that line, the real purpose of those missiles is to never be used. We're trying to create a deterrent that will prevent there ever being a need for them or a war.

Q. Mr. President, I'd like to follow up on Bill Groody's question here. You have spoken about a window of vulnerability, and you've said that the United States, in terms of defenses, is inferior to the Soviet Union in many areas. My question is, looking at U.S. defenses overall, would you trade American forces for Soviet forces?

But I still have to say that to continue as we had been in the previous decade and the last several years, leaving those fine young men and women with tools incapable of doing the job, endangering their lives by lack of training because we were denied the fuel through budgetary restrictions to fly airplanes as often as they should -- on any given day, when we came into office here, only half the airplanes in our Air Force could be flown because of lack of spare parts. Only half the ships could leave harbor, for lack not only of spare parts but of a complete crew.

So, what we're trying to do is make sure -- and we have made remarkable progress. There is an esprit de corps in our military today and a pride in the uniform that I think would bring a glow to every American's heart if they were as aware of it as I, of necessity, am.

And so the answer would be no, in that one way. But if you asked me is there still a window of vulnerability, do they have a superiority in firepower and so forth, the answer is an unqualified yes. You can't help but look at the NATO line with more than 300 triple warhead missiles, intermediate-range, aimed at the targets of all of Europe, the Middle East, and northern Africa, and we have none in that theater -- is a valid comparison.

The President. And they have submarines and submarine missiles. And a part of the threat is not only what's on hand, it is that at the moment their rate of increase in their weapons compared to ours. In the last 15 years, I think, they added some 60 submarines, nuclear submarines, while we were adding none.

Q. Mr. President, what if this commission that you're going to appoint comes back to you and says, ``The MX may not be such a good idea after all. Let's have a modification of the Trident or some other variation on the missile.'' Would you be willing to accept that kind of recommendation?

The President. Well, we'd certainly look at it. It would be difficult for me to think that we could, knowing the length of time that it takes to get something researched, tested fully, and then into operation. Even with this MX and with all of the work that's been done so far, that system won't begin to be installed until 1986, won't be operational.

The President. Yes. Let me just say, though, lest you think I have a closed mind, if a miracle happened and someone came along with something that could be implemented better and sooner, obviously, we'd choose that.

Q. Mr. President, I'd like to move to a different area. In Boston, during the period of budget cutting, the First U.S. Circuit Court of Appeals ruled that white police officers and firefighters be laid off rather than blacks and Hispanics with less seniority. This was done to preserve -- or to maintain minority percentages. Why did your administration ask the Supreme Court to strike down the lower court's order?

The President. We did it because, number one, in the law itself, it says that hiring or firing cannot be on a basis of race; and secondly, that the Federal courts have no authority to come in with regard to overthrowing seniority.

There is a third reason. I'm old enough to remember when quota systems and so forth were used not to end discrimination but actually to legitimize it. And the precedent that would be set if this policy, which is embodied in the law and all, of seniority in layoffs, is used in this instance admittedly to try to keep a better balance, which we're all in favor of in public employment in that area, but if that precedent is set, that seniority is meaningless and that purpose, someday you could find an administration that wants to turn it around and use it to go back to what we hopefully have gotten rid of in this country, a discrimination against minorities.

Q. Well, there could be or there could have been other options. Let's say, for example, some sort of proportional layoff system, which I understand the U.S. Civil Rights Commission had recommended. But why shouldn't affirmative action supporters view this voluntary entry -- your administration's voluntary entry into the case -- as an attack on affirmative action?

The President. Well, maybe some of them will, because an image has been created of me, I know, that I do not support these antidiscrimination measures. The record, on the other hand, proves the reverse.

As the Governor of California, I appointed more minority members to executive and policymaking positions in the State government than all the previous Governors in the history of California put together.

Here, we have already -- and we haven't been here 2 years yet -- we have 130 members of the black community in top executive positions, beginning with Sam Pierce, a very capable member of our Cabinet -- assistant Cabinet members, and this includes -- and then added to that, we're doing the same thing with regard to women, and we're doing the same thing with regard to Hispanics.

The most recent Hispanic employee is one I'm very proud of, Everett Alvarez, who has the record of having been held in captivity the longest as a POW in Vietnam, and he is the Deputy Administrator of the Veterans Administration.

So, I think our record -- and incidentally, just yesterday I signed a paper with a group of minority small business people that is going to increase the amount of procurement that the Federal Government buys from minority-owned businesses.

Q. Mr. President, I'd like to turn from affairs of state to a matter of pure politics. Some of your fellow Republicans would dearly love to run for your job 2 years hence, should you decide to give it up. And the more time they have to get organized, the better off they're likely to be.

The President. Well, I assume that such a decision will have to be made sometime next year. But I think it is too early now and, as I've said, as to whether I've made a decision or not, I've always said I think the people kind of have a way of letting you know which way that decision should go.

Or the other way, you're going to open yourself to the opposition charges that everything you do is political, based at the next election. And I have over and over again told my staff and told our Cabinet that I don't want to hear the political ramifications of any issue that comes before us. I want to decide it on the basis of what's right or wrong for the people.

The President. Well, I know that this was quite a traumatic experience for her. I also know that -- you know, the Government with the First Lady gets an employee free; they have her just about as busy as they have me. But no, she's made no decision either. She and I are together on this.

But I have to tell you frankly, I have enjoyed the opportunity of dealing with the problems that are before us. I think we've made great progress in a definite turn in government and turning away from some of the things that have brought on the very economic crisis we're suffering from. And it has its drawbacks, of course. You kind of live like a bird in a gilded cage. And I sometimes look out the window at Pennsylvania Avenue and wonder what it would be like to be able to just walk down the street to the corner drugstore and look at the magazines. I can't do that anymore.

Q. Mr. President, I'd like to pick up, actually, on what you just said about being a bird in a gilded cage. How does a President know, how do you know what is going through people's minds and what is happening, especially vis-a-vis all this -- the very high levels of unemployment we have now? You can't walk down to the corner drugstore to buy a magazine; how can you know what it's like to be unemployed?

But you aren't that separated from the world -- first of all, the people that are all around you, the people that are a part of your daily activity right here in government, including those very security forces. But when I go to the ranch, some time out there I'm right back with the neighbors and the people that work there. And it's as if this had never happened. But, of course, you do. And as to an understanding of unemployment, that's another advantage of my age. I was seeking my first job in the very depths of the Great Depression in 1932. I have seen all the tragedy that that brought, including in my own family -- my father.

And I don't know any other way to describe this other than that you do go out. Like in campaigning, when you go out, regardless of the security, you are there, again, with the people, not only on the street but in the meetings. And you just aren't separated from them.

Q. Let us carry on with the unemployment thing, if I may. On a political level, on a philosophical level, what is the need for government to appear to be doing something? And by this, I'm talking about jobs bills or some sort of lead initiative effort to get people back to work. Economically, of course, your position is well stated. But philosophically and psychologically for the Nation, a sense of going someplace, doing something -- activity.

The President. Yes. And you used the word ``psychology.'' There is a great psychology that is a part of a recession -- both for good or bad. And I have to tell you that right now, I think the media has overemphasized the bad for whatever reason, but generally in a sense that, psychologically, has not been of help.

The sense of doing something -- this has been what was wrong in the several recessions that have taken place since World War II and the artificial quick fixes of government rushing in with supposed job programs and so forth. And every time, it has been a temporary quick fix. And every time there has been, seemingly, an improvement, except that inflation goes up. And each time, at the end of the so-called recession, unemployment remains higher than it was before the previous recession, until we finally reached the point that we are now -- the worst of all the recessions.

But the things that the Government has done -- we know that it was the high interest rates over a long period of time, and it began back in 1980 -- reached 21\1/2\ percent in the prime. Those high interest rates that started shutting down the automobile plants because people could no longer afford to buy cars and pay the interest on the installments -- this then spread to steel and glass and rubber and all the associated industry. At the same time, another base industry that usually is the first one to mark recovery -- housing -- no one could afford a mortgage at the rates that were being charged.

But we have now brought -- first of all, inflation is a basic cause of those high interest rates. We brought inflation down from 12.4 percent to less than 5 percent, now. And following it down, in the last several months, particularly, has come interest rates -- down to less than half or about half of what they were. And I think they're going to continue to go lower. And both of these have now resulted in the housing industry being today about 27 percent better than it was a year ago -- the housing starts. Sale of new houses is up 45 percent in the last 6 months, and permits for housing are higher than either one of those two figures.

Now, this is going to have to be seen out there. The trouble is, things like that aren't being as visible. Now, we have done some other things. We have asked for and obtained passage of a bill, a training bill. And this training bill is a little different than some we've had in the past. It's going to be implemented at the community level, in keeping with industrial leaders and local political leaders at the community level, to create or to train for the jobs that are going begging in those communities.

Every Sunday in the metropolitan areas, pick up the Sunday paper and look at the number of help wanted ads. Here are employers begging for employees, taking ads out for them at a time of the highest unemployment that we've known since the war. And the reason those employees aren't available is lack of skills and training for those particular jobs.

Q. Mr. President, if I could return to events on Capitol Hill for just a few moments. It looks like the Senate will take up the 5-cent-a-gallon gasoline user tax to fund highway construction -- probably tomorrow. And I was wondering, once debate gets under way, do you plan to get actively involved to break the filibuster and get that through?

The President. Well, I've been trying to help already, and I would try to help some more because I think it is ridiculous for a minority to stand in the way of this bill which has a great emergency context to it and only, in addition, as a sideline benefit, would create as many jobs as the Democrats claim their $5.4 billion pork barrel would create.

The emergency situation is the number of bridges in this country that are so risky today that schoolbuses stop and make the children walk across the bridge before they take the bus across; highways that are so deteriorated that many of our business firms are adding to the cost of the things you buy, because they have to reroute -- at costs of millions of dollars a year -- their trucks, to avoid stretches of highway and bad bridges and so forth that would cause them problems.

The President. Well, I don't think I should express a personal belief on this now. I do think that since an investigation is going forward on this, I think it's a little delicate for a head of state to give an opinion one way or the other.

The President. Well, I'm going to wait to see what they come in with. Those people who have suggested that I should interfere now and put some pressure on the Commission are ignoring the fact that it was after the issue of social security had been made a political football -- and not by us, by the leadership in the House -- and became such a political football in the last election that I then said the only answer to this is -- since they seemed reluctant to deal with the emergency situation in social security -- is a bipartisan commission. So the Speaker of the House has appointed members, the Minority Leader of the Senate has appointed members, I have appointed members with the hope that they can come in with a recommendation that recognizes a bipartisan viewpoint, so that we can approach the answer to this in a bipartisan manner and not, again, as a political contest.

For me to stick my nose in and try to tell them what to do -- we've had reports from them. We know what they're discussing. And we know that there are some varying views in there. But even if they will come back with, let's say, alternatives, a couple of alternatives, so that at least you can then sit down and say, ``All right, let's find a meeting ground between these two alternatives,'' but to keep it out of politics.

And again, at the same time, let me take advantage of you and say to the senior citizens listening in, no one is trying to take their benefits away from them or cut them back. That was one of the ``musts'' that I gave to my appointees. I said the people presently dependent on social security must know they're going to continue to get their checks.

Q. Mr. President, you have King Hussein of Jordan coming in here next week. He's been described as the linchpin in your Middle East peace initiative, because of your proposal for the Palestinian entity. What do you think are the prospects of bringing him on board the Camp David process at this point?

The President. King Hussein is not only a very intelligent and responsible leader, but I think that he is very sensitive to all of the problems that are involved and very sincerely desirous of peace in the Middle East and a resolution of this problem. And I think that he will be cooperative. And I think we can count on him for that. But the main thing right now that we have Ambassadors Habib and Draper working on in the Middle East is to get what now constitute armies of occupation -- the PLO, the Syrians, and the Israelis -- out of Lebanon, and let the Gemayel government have the sovereignty of their own country.

I call them armies of occupation, because there was a time in which Lebanon, with all of its troubles and its divisions, did have to welcome them in in an effort to create order. But now that government has had enough confidence to ask them to leave. For them to continue to stay against the will of Lebanon makes them, technically, armies of occupation. And we're working on that.

Habib will be reporting to me Monday. But when I sent him on this most recent trip over there, I told him that no longer are we talking about a peace plan. We're now talking about action, a plan for action. Let's get it done, and let's get the forces withdrawn so that we can proceed with the other steps.

Exchange and that you serve as my personal representative in this effort. Periodically, I will recommend the names of persons for you to appoint as members of the Council. These members will assist you to stimulate greater private sector involvement in the Youth Exchange Initiative.

The members of the Council will be expected to offer advice to both of us on the various aspects of successfully launching and implementing the program. In addition to this mandate, the members will help you to encourage private participation in the program through the variety of means available to your agency. For example, I expect them to promote the program through personal contacts and by conducting a publicity campaign. Also, their assistance with fund raising for the Initiative is critical.

Because of the importance I place on this program, I request that you exercise your authority to ensure that the members of the Council can adequately assist us in this important endeavor. With USIA providing staff support for the Council, and with the Council members expanding your Agency's capabilities to reach the private sector, I look forward to the beginning of an exciting and successful program.

The President. One of the nicest customs in the Middle East is the traditional greeting, ``Peace be upon you.'' King Hussein's visit with us comes at a time of the year when thoughts of peace are very much in our minds. And in our meeting today, His Majesty and I have had a chance to reaffirm personally the continuing friendship between our two countries and to share with each other our hopes and dreams about our common goal of a just and lasting peace in the Middle East.

And I told the King of my personal commitment to see peace in the Middle East become a true and lasting reality, and of my equally deep commitment to the proposals that we made September 1st to Israel, to the Palestinians, and to the Arab States.

I also expressed America's gratitude to the King for his own important actions in support of our initiative over these past few months. His Majesty eloquently described his vision of peace and reviewed for us what he's been doing to help give peace a chance to take root -- particularly his efforts to encourage the Palestinians to join him in efforts to take bold steps toward peace.

Together, we've also shared our thoughts on what remains and must be done by each and all of us to give life to this common goal. We share a sense of urgency to succeed at this commitment. Our discussions today have lead to further meetings between our staffs over the next 2 days, and I look forward to meeting with the King again before he leaves Washington.

The King. I thank you, sir, for the warmth of your welcome, for the privilege and pleasure I and my colleagues have had of meeting with you, sir, and with our friends, and for the opportunity to discuss many problems of mutual concern and interest and many challenges that lie before us.

We look forward, sir, to continuing our discussions in the coming days, and this is an opportunity for me to reaffirm a long-life commitment for the establishment of a just and durable peace in the Middle East. May we hope and pray that we will succeed in making a contribution for a better future for generations to come in our part of the world and for the cause of world peace.

We'll continue to do our utmost, and we value very much, indeed, the atmosphere of friendship, honesty, and candor that has characterized our relations and particularly, sir, the friendship that exists between us. I thank you very, very much indeed, sir, for your many kindnesses and for the privilege and pleasure of being with you and with our friends.

Earlier, the President and the King met privately in the Oval Office. Senior members of their delegations joined them for further discussions, and then they met, together with their delegations, in the Cabinet Room. The President and the King and their delegations then attended a working luncheon in the State Dining Room.

I am pleased to transmit a Statement of Policy, an appraisal of this Nation's soil and water resources, and the Secretary of Agriculture's program for departmental conservation activities as required by the Soil and Water Resources Conservation Act of 1977.

The Secretary of Agriculture's program provides important guidance for the near and longer term management of the Nation's soil and water resources. The wise use of these resources will assure continued availability of food and fiber to meet domestic and world needs. My Statement of Policy provides further guidelines for implementation of the recommended program.

The Secretary's program is based upon findings developed from extensive surveys and evaluations of the current state of this Nation's soil and water resources. It is designed to correct identified problems through targeting Federal assistance to priority problem areas. It also calls for a greater role for State and local governments for the conduct of programs to assist private landowners in solving resource problems to protect the long-term productivity of this Nation's soil and water resources. The documents which are being transmitted to the Congress today will be helpful in your consideration of soil and water conservation policies, programs, and budgets.

These studies show the condition of the soil and water on two-thirds of America's land -- the rural non-federal land of the United States. This land totals 1.5 billion acres, and most of it is privately owned. It includes the farms, ranches, and private forests where almost all of our food and natural fibers and much of our pulp and timber are produced.

American people. The soil and water on these lands are basic to the production of food and fiber for domestic and world needs. Maintaining the productivity of these resources is essential to American agriculture and to the health of the Nation's economy.

American agriculture has achieved the greatest record of production in the world. A free market economy, mechanization, research, adequate capital inputs, fertile soil and water management have contributed to that record. These factors and others have generated an agricultural system that not only provides a varied and inexpensive supply of food for U.S. consumers but also feeds a significant part of the world's population.

Despite this unsurpassed record, however, the Appraisal reveals that inadequate resource management in some areas is damaging our soil and lowering the quality and quantity of our water resources. Soil erosion, for example, was reduced by soil conservation practices in the decades following the Dust Bowl of the 1930's. Now, soil erosion appears to be increasing again as we have made more rural land into cropland, particularly for corn, soybeans, and other row crops to meet the growing export demand. While about one-third of America's cropland is currently experiencing soil erosion from wind and water at rates which threaten the long-term productivity of the land, about 54 percent of all sheet and rill erosion and 89 percent of the excessive erosion of this type occurs on about 10 percent of the Nation's cropland (41 million acres). The condition of our grazing land has been improving steadily since the 1930's, but more than half is still in fair to poor condition. Responding to their own incentives, private landowners in many cases have introduced practices and improvements to control erosion.

Agriculture is by far the Nation's biggest user of water, and water is being use -- and wasted -- in greater amounts that ever. In some parts of the West and Great Plains, groundwater is being used to irrigate crops faster than it is being replenished. Damages from upstream flooding are expected to increase in the years immediatedly ahead, largely because people continue to build on land subject to flooding.

Programs to deal with soil and water resource problems were begun by the Federal Government about 50 years ago. Research programs to focus on soil erosion began in the late 1920's, and soil conservation programs were begun in the Dust Bowl years of the 1930's. Since then many Federal, State, and local government agencies have carried out programs to protect, conserve, and improve soil and water resources, usually in cooperation with individual landowners.

Some 27 conservation programs, involving conservation research and education, technical assistance, cost-sharing and loans are administered by 8 agencies of the Department of Agriculture. Some of these programs, while popular with farmers and ranchers, do not clearly address the Nation's most critical soil and water resource problems. Further, after nearly half a century of Federal conservation assistance programs a substantial number of farmers have not applied needed conservation measures. Too much soil continues to erode at rates that threaten productivity and impair water quality. Too much water is not efficiently managed, resulting in a threat of water shortages. Too much land is subject to excessive flood damages.

The Appraisal examines the impact on available cropland through 2030 of several alternative projections of domestic and foreign demand for agricultural production, and alternative rates of growth in agricultural productivity. Under a number of projections of increased demand and growth in productivity, the existing farmland base can provide the necessary production by the year 2030 without significant real price increases or adverse impacts to the land. Under some of the more ``extreme'' projections with high projected demand and low growth in productivity out to 2030, additional cropland would be required. Futhermore, there could be sigificant increases in the cost of agricultural production as well as increases in cropland erosion.

The proposed program is not predicated on either the most optimistic or pessimistic assumption about the future. Instead it is designed to accommodate a wide range of uncertainty in future agricultural production possibilities.

The Appraisal recognizes that soil and water conservation management is needed to counteract adverse impacts on this Nation's soil and water resource base, especially if a ``high'' demand for agricultural products is projected over the next 50 years.

The Appraisal makes it clear that some changes in Federal soil and water conservation programs will be necessary to provide protection for the Nation's soil and water resources on non-federal land. Simply increasing Federal contributions to soil and water conservation is not the answer to our resource problems. Stewardship of the land is primarily the responsibility of the individual landowner. The marketplace generally determines what resources the individual will devote to the management of his land and water. The role of the Federal Government in promoting soil and water conservation is therefore subject to limitations imposed by economic conditions and the individual landowner's willingness to cooperate. The most important contribution that this Administration can make to the conservation effort is to redirect current conservation programs and develop fresh approaches to solving the resource problems that continue to threaten the long-term productivity of our soil, water, and related resources. The program effects this redirection and provides for these fresh approaches. It will be the new benchmark for budget proposals and planning of all conservation programs in the Department of Agriculture.

Department of Agriculture conservation programs, the Department measured public reaction to them in 1980 and 1981. Nearly 83,000 people commented on the latest draft, including Members of Congress and the Governors of 37 States, Puerto Rico, and Guam. More than half the respondents were farmers or ranchers. Comments received have been studied carefully and considered in preparing the final program document.

It is my intention that the Department of Agriculture manage its soil and water conservation programs as efficiently as possible. This includes eliminating overlap among programs and reducing instances in which one program conflicts with the aims of another.

I anticipate that my future budget proposals will fall within the bounds of the recommended program. Funding for conservation programs, however, will necessarily be considered in each year's economic and fiscal context. The demands placed on our financial resources by other national goals and interests must also be weighed. Consideration of those competing demands each year could make it necessary for this Administration to propose a conservation program budget less than the proposed lower bound. I anticipate that State and local governments, as they assume more significant roles in conservation program design and management, will contribute a larger share of needed funds for conservation.

I believe the process introduced by the Soil and Water Resources Conservation Act of 1977 is useful. The Appraisal and Program have been major steps in developing a sound planning process for the Department of Agriculture's soil and water conservation program. They provide a long-needed picture of the status of soil and water resources and the projected demands on those resources, and a realistic strategy for the Federal Government to follow in helping to manage, conserve, and improve those resources to meet national needs and goals. It is my belief that this strategy will result in a significant improvement in the effectiveness of USDA conservation programs.

This act repeals or modifies requirements for the submission of 67 reports to the Congress that are no longer useful, duplicate other requirements for providing information, or involve costs and time to executive agencies that outweigh any benefits or utility to Congress. This is a useful and constructive step in reducing unnecessary paperwork and in improving executive branch operations.

The principal reason for the Congress to return to Washington for this final session was to complete action on the 1983 budget in a responsible fashion. Enactment of this resolution justifies that effort. I commend the Congress for its endeavors and hard work, especially Senate Majority Leader Howard Baker and House Speaker Tip O'Neill, as well as Appropriations Committee chairmen Mark Hatfield and Jamie Whitten, for completing a challenging task under difficult circumstances.

In order to get America back to work, we need economic growth that only fiscal stability and lower interest rates can provide. To achieve this goal, we must keep a tight leash on Federal spending. By passing a budget consistent with the earlier budget resolutions it committed to follow, the Congress has taken an important step in the right direction.

Unfortunately, this resolution also contains a number of provisions about which I have serious reservations. For example, the bill fails to provide specific funds for production of the Peacekeeper missile. While I am disappointed in the congressional action on this vital strategic forces program, the language of the conference report does enable us to keep to our schedule for initial deployment in 1986 once the Congress approves a permanent basing decision. Between now and this spring, I will work closely with Members of Congress to address their concerns and to assure the fullest possible examination of alternative courses of action. Let there be no doubt that the United States remains strongly committed to the pursuit of both effective deterrence and meaningful arms control.

Pershing II missile. We are developing this missile along with the ground-launched cruise missile in order to meet an Allied request for land-based systems in Europe that would help maintain deterrence. We intend to meet the scheduled deployment of these missiles in December 1983. We remain steadfast in our determination to meet these alliance commitments.

The allocation of the funds contained in the continuing resolution for foreign assistance is also a concern. First, it cuts total budget authority for foreign aid, excluding the Export-Import Bank, by $571 million. Second, within that total it distributes limited resources unwisely and inequitably. As a consequence of these changes in this resolution, $800 million in foreign assistance requested for many deserving countries has been denied in order to further increase aid to a nation already receiving 28 percent of our total foreign aid in addition to a $300 million credit increase I proposed this fiscal year.

A third provision of concern is the way in which the resolution would mandate continued funding of existing grantees of the Legal Services Corporation until the Senate has confirmed a new Legal Services Corporation Board. Questions have been raised as to whether this provision is in conflict with my constitutional authority to make recess appointments. I have asked the Attorney General to advise me on this matter.

After taking all factors into account, I think that this effort has been worthwhile. Together, the administration and the Congress have agreed on a continuing resolution that will complete the 1983 budget process with reasonable funding. I thus take pleasure in signing H.J. Resolution 631 and ask all Federal employees to provide the most effective and efficient services available for the taxpayers' hard-earned money.

You know, it's frequently said that young people need heroes to look up to and emulate. But in this ceremony today, it's we older people who are doing the admiring and finding inspiration in lives younger than our own. And this is especially fulfilling, because is serves to remind us of the caliber of people who'll be leading our country in a few years. It also illustrates how strongly rooted the tradition of service and heroism is in America's young people.

What he meant, of course, is that service and bravery can be honored only in a society that puts a premium on those qualities. When we honor those who in service and bravery stand out amongst us, we're reaffirming our own most deeply cherished beliefs and traditions.

John Terry is awarded the 1980 Young American Medal for Service. John is honored for having taken personal responsibility for the appearance of his street in Philadelphia -- not just in front of his house, the whole block. For several years now, he has been regularly sweeping up, cleaning up the entire block. And he doesn't do this because someone told him to. He doesn't get any money or merit badges, or even much in the way of formal thanks for it.

John, you looked around you in your hometown. You saw things that needed improving. And instead of writing to Washington or city hall, you went out and got the job done yourself. And John, I might say it's really good to see you again. You see, usually, ladies and gentlemen, I never meet any of the Young American Medal recipients until they come here to receive their medals.

His record includes the establishment of a Red Cross communications system and a disaster response team that has rendered assistance at the scene of many fires and other tragic and unfortunate events.

Americans their reputation for compassion and humanitarianism. Your work carries on this tradition, and has already helped hundreds and, perhaps, thousands of people. And, Jeff, I want you to know how proud all of us are of you. Jeff, congratulations.

Robert Noble is awarded the 1980 Young American Medal for Bravery. One evening, shortly after he graduated from high school, Bob Noble of Fredonia, New York, was at a party when he and his friends heard a tremendous collision on the highway nearby. And when they got to the wreck, they found the car in flames. Bob climbed into the burning automobile several times. He removed two persons who, as it turned out, died of their injuries -- well, one was dead already, as he discovered, and the other died in his arms. But he also saved a woman  who otherwise would have surely died in the fire.

One thing that should be mentioned about Bob is that he had to overcome urgings of friends who warned him not to get involved in that rescue. It wasn't just that they were warning him of the danger. They were, in effect, arguing that it just wasn't smart to get mixed up in something like that. But he wouldn't buy that argument. He didn't really even listen. He went to that car. He chose to risk his life repeatedly to help people he didn't even know. It was a grisly, harrowing experience, but a life was saved.

Well, I guess we're wrong. The grown men and women who know this young man, especially the rescue workers who came to take over after he'd been singlehandedly preserving that young woman's life for hours in the rain and darkness, will tell you they don't come any better. And, Mike, as a fellow Westerner, I'm especially proud to shake your hand.

Jeff, an 18-year-old volunteer fireman, died while attempting to save three rescue workers who had been overcome by lethal fumes in an underground tank. It was for that sacrifice that he was chosen to receive the medal. This is a reminder, a sad one, that we honor members because they take great risks and sometimes they pay the ultimate price.

Jeffrey Jones' life nearly took Mark's life. Mark, 18 and a volunteer fireman, was also overcome by the poisonous gas, but he regained consciousness briefly and was able to grab a rescue line. It all started when an 8-year-old boy fell down a narrow pipe into an underground tank. Two paramedics and Mark and, finally, Jeff went down that pipe. The little boy's life was saved -- barely -- and Mark here had a very narrow escape. But when it was over, three men were gone.

We can only wonder at the bravery that sent Jeff and Mark into that tank. They knew that two paramedics had already passed out, but they felt they had to try. And that, of course, is what makes a hero. He has to try. He may measure odds and weigh the chances, but his heart seems to take over and make the decision for him.

I want to report to you today on the status of our Caribbean Basin Initiative. This initiative is part of America's contribution to a collective partnership for peace, prosperity, and democracy in the Caribbean and Central America. And as you know, I recently traveled to South and Central America. The reception I received convinced me even more of the vital importance to all of us of the well-being, the independence, and the security of the nations of the Caribbean Basin and, indeed, the entire hemisphere.

My conversations with the Presidents of five Caribbean Basin countries were particularly inspirational and helpful. We face common economic problems of deficits, slow growth, idle capacity, and high debts, and common threats of insurgencies supported by Cuba and other Soviet satellites.

I was impressed most, though, by the bright prospects for the future. Great advances were made over the previous two decades in economic growth, in developing and diversifying industrial and agricultural production, improving health services and education. I'm convinced that the hemisphere will continue this trend of strong growth and improvement.

Prosperity strengthens democracy. Throughout the hemisphere, democracy is on the move. Nearly all the governments in the Caribbean Basin are now democracies. Freedom and respect for human rights gives the fullest expression to the meaning of life, and democracy also advances peace.

I found in my talks just recently on this trip to South America how few of us have stopped to think that this hemisphere and these two great continents, linked as they are by Central America, have probably known a longer period of peace than almost any other area of the world, and maybe it's because no matter which country we come from, our forebears all came here from someplace else looking for the same thing -- opportunity and freedom. And as we grow closer to each other, more neighborly, we can become a force for good in the world more than anyone could dream at this time.

I sought to explain our policies, and I found support for them: to strengthen the practice of democracy and the respect for human rights; to continue support for the San Jose peace process to reduce tensions and conflict in Central America; to provide limited assistance to help small countries struggling for democracy to defend themselves against foreign-supported insurgents or terrorists determined to impose their own totalitarian ideas; to support the integrity of an open and free trading system which is vital to the prosperity of all the peoples of this hemisphere; to help countries trying to work through financial crises and who are adopting adjustment programs in hard times just as we're doing.

I'm pleased that we now have substantial agreement on the important elements of a replenishment of the Inter-American Development Bank. This includes an overall lending program of $13 billion, an acceptable level of concessionary financing, and a new intermediate financial facility. And of course the Caribbean Basin Initiative is a central and critical feature of this policy. Its importance was underscored by everyone I met.

I promised that my administration would do its best to gain passage of the free trade and investment proposals in the initiative in this session of Congress. Now this is not a ``made-in-the-U.S.A.'' product. We in the Americas have all contributed our ideas, our resources, and our strong efforts to create this bold appproach to development, a positive program rooted in self-help and a private initiative through which we and our neighbors can assist each other.

Now, let me report on where that effort stands and what lies ahead. The aid portion of the program is an accomplished fact. The other part, having to do with trade and investment, is still in the legislative process, I'm sorry to say. Because of procedural maneuvering by a small minority of opponents, it has been difficult to bring that part of the CBI legislation to a floor vote in the Senate, where a clear majority would have supported passage.

But what I want you to know is that the Caribbean Basin Initiative will not die. The tremendous efforts that the leaders of your countries have put into this bill will not be in vain. It was your leaders who were most responsible for capturing the attention of one of this country's most able legislators, Dan Rostenkowski. He turned his skills toward passage of the CBI in this short, lameduck session and was able to produce an overwhelming vote of 260 to 142 in the House of Representatives. Working together, I'm sure that we can count on his leadership again when the session resumes next -- or the new Congress comes in next year.

I know we can also count on the strong and able support of Senator Dole. I'm personally determined to see the CBI through. This initiative is close to my heart. It is my highest priority. It proposes the right measures to help our neighbors through this difficult period. More important, it can help open the door on to the kind of future our neighbors have a right to expect.

The CBI will be among the very first pieces of legislation that I submit to the 98th Congress next year. The time is short, the needs are great, but we'll win this fight, because there's no acceptable alternative. Together we're a tremendous force for good. We'll show the world that we conquer fear with faith, that we overcome poverty through growth, and that we counter violence with opportunity and freedom.

And, so saying, that's all that I have to say, except a thank you to all of you who have helped so hard in trying to get this passed through the legislature in this session. I thank you for your efforts in the past. I wish I could say that's all that we have to now do. But I'll just consider that you're going to be just as active and working just as hard in the near future when the holidays are over and the Congress is back in session.

The President. All right. Well, we just had some excellent news from Capitol Hill. The Senate has voted to end the filibuster and has taken final, favorable action on the highway improvement revenue legislation. And before the stampede to the airport starts, I'd like to take a moment to congratulate the Members of the 97th Congress for their accomplishments while in this postelection session. They've dealt with some very difficult issues and put in some very long hours, when they, like so many other Americans, have been anxious to return home for the holidays.

It's a credit to leaders of both parties and to the hard work of many Congressmen and Senators on both sides of the aisle that this legislation was passed during this session. I applaud the Congress for their bipartisan support to ensure that our roads and transit systems are safe, efficient, and in good repair.

In addition, this bill will provide up to 6 additional weeks of benefits to unemployed workers who have used up all their weeks of unemployment insurance. These additional weeks of benefits will put more than a half billion dollars in the hands of long-term unemployed workers between now and March 31st, 1983.

The Congress also adopted full-year funding for the Government, the first time it has done so in 3 years. While still only in the form of a continuing resolution, this action will allow us to get right to work on the 1984 budget in January. By starting on time next year, we'll have a chance to finish on time and end this era of government by continuing resolution. This alone more than justified the Congress returning after Thanksgiving.

Members also resisted pressure from many special interests to pad the budget with unwarranted pork-barrel projects. Unfortunately they failed to fully fund production of the Peacekeeper missile, and only one House overwhelmingly approved the Caribbean Basin Initiative. However, as I've said, initial missile deployment will be possible during debate of a permanent basing system, and the CBI will be high on our legislative agenda for next year.

Q. Mr. President, it's been a turbulent year around the world -- three major wars, one of them still being fought. Do you feel, when you look back, that you were able to set your own agenda this year, that you devoted much more time and energy reacting to foreign crises? And what do you consider your greatest accomplishments?

The President. Well, I haven't thought about it much in that line, except that we can say that in this year, and even in the preceding year, the Soviet Union has not advanced further in its expansionism than it had 2 years ago. It has not gone into additional countries. I think we have made great progress with regard to our relationship with our allies in Europe and Japan, and more recently -- although we began earlier -- with our neighbors here in the Western Hemisphere. And I think that the initiative that we've taken in the Middle East is probably the greatest accomplishment, and I have great hopes for that. If we can bring peace to that very troubled area, I think we will have made a very great accomplishment.

They've frustrated you and the rest of the country for several days on this gasoline tax and, in particular, also brought down any chance of the Caribbean Basin Initiative. Aren't you frustrated and angry with the conservatives? And what does it mean for the future leadership in the coming Congress?

The President. Well, I've been dealing with legislators for 10 years, and so I'm not too surprised by things that happen. With regard to making any specific comment on this, they have their own rules. They abide by them. And I respect the separation of powers.

Q. Well, can't you just say how you feel about the tactics that were employed? Senator Simpson of your party spoke out; there have been other Republicans who've spoken out. Doesn't it say something that's not very positive about the conservatives in your party?

The President. I would rather add, generally -- if I had a criticism to make, it would be on the whole subject of the budgeting process in the Federal Government. And believe me, it is in need of reform.

You'll realize that this, as I say, is the first time in 3 years -- and we're already 3 months into the fiscal year -- this is the first time in those 3 years that we have had a spending bill that is in conformity with the budget resolution and that has been passed clear to the end of the year. And I am one that's old-fashioned enough to believe that the day the fiscal year begins, the budget of the Government should be in place, approved, and signed by the President.

Q. Mr. President, there are reports now that the deficit could go as high as $190 billion, that you have a report from your own economists predicting that this is possible. Is this true? And what can you tell the American people about the budget that keeps growing and growing -- you just can't seem to get control of it?

The President. I have spoken to the fact that the budget has a number of areas that are uncontrollable, principally in the entitlements, where the legislation that originally created the programs automatically provided for increases in them -- and without any further legislation. And we're looking at that as we go forward with the '84 budgeting process.

Also, there is the item of interest on the national debt, which is -- there's no way that anyone can say we won't pay that; you have to pay what's due. And when you stop to think how small the deficits would be if it weren't for those long years of deficit spending that have resulted in more than a hundred billion dollars -- the interest on the debt is higher than the entire Government budget was not too many years ago. And this is what I mean about the entire budgeting process.

But I think we have made great progress in reducing the rate of increase in spending. We're bringing that rate down, hopefully to the point that it will match the rate of increase that comes with natural growth in revenues. But right now you have an added factor: The greatest single factor is the recession. You have millions of people who are not paying taxes who normally do, and, at the same time, many of those people are now receiving benefits from government. And this has added to the cost and reduced the expected revenue.

But on this budget -- particular thing -- no, we have not done that, and I am slated in January to come forth with an estimate of what the deficit will be. And it has to be based on projections. And I know that the projections we ourselves have made, based on the soundest of economic advice, a number of times in these last 2 years have been proven to be incorrect, because they have not been able to predict unexpected happenings, such as this unemployment that I've just been talking about. And I would think that it would make us all cautious about the idea that, even though the law forces us to project several years ahead what's going to happen, the truth of the matter is no one can intelligently project.

The President. No. I don't believe that. And I think we are making progress. I don't think that just having announced the idea September 1st indicates that this is long overdue when you stop to think how many years this trouble has been going on there.

Now, I think we're making progress in the first step, which has to be the total removal of the forces from Lebanon. And King Hussein and myself, our people and his who are here with him -- we have made great progress in this. And I think his courage in being willing to join in this process is -- and participate as he has already -- is to be commended.

The President. I am convinced that this coming year, 1983, is going to see a definite upturn. I wish that I could promise that unemployment would instantly respond, but we know from seven previous experiences since World War II that it doesn't. It's the slowest thing in recovering.

But I would like to say to all the American people the evidence of the last few days of the neighborly spirit in America certainly must have been personally gratifying to every one of us all across this country -- the efforts that have been made to help those neighbors of ours.

The other thing that I would like to suggest to the whole business community -- I know that there are some businesses that, themselves, are faced with troubles and can't do this, but if a lot of businesses would take a look and see if they could hire just one person, it'd be interesting to see how much we could reduce those unemployment rolls. And there must be some that can't, I know, because of their own troubles. But there must be others that could probably do even more than one -- but if everyone would just simply look at it from the standpoint there are more businesses in the United States than there are unemployed.

The problem of unemployment has been plaguing us for a number of years. It's been a kind of a yo-yo, up and down, and yet each time that it goes up, it never has come back down to where it was before the economic crisis or upset. And this time we're trying to get an economic recovery that will see a sound recovery and a lasting recovery, not just a temporary -- as I've called it -- quick fix.

Q. Mr. President, I have heard you say on several occasions that there were Christmastimes when you were growing up when it was very tough sledding around holiday time, and that your father lost a job. And I wonder what you think the reaction of your father and mother might have been if the Congress of that period had passed a $5 billion bill that would have gotten him back to work right away, when you were a little fellow?

The President. Well, I've always thought that my father, God rest his soul, had the common sense that he would know that temporary fixes wouldn't work. As a matter of fact, when he finally did get a job it happened to be for the government, in which he and the county supervisor of poor shared a secretary, and were in charge of the help -- and they called it relief in those days -- for the people in our community.

And I sat there myself in his office and heard men coming in and say, ``When is it going to be my turn; when do you get to my name again? It's been a long time since I've had some work.'' And guess what? The Federal Government then intervened and figured it out that they couldn't take that work, because if they took that work, they were denied relief and then had to go through the entire formal process of applying for relief again. And that took longer than the amount of work that they'd had. So, they were forced onto permanent relief. They couldn't work.

Much work remains to be done, and the road ahead is tough. But it's the right road, and I remain optimistic that direct negotiations for a just resolution of the Palestinian problem in the context of a real and enduring peace is within our reach.

The King. Mr. President, I thank you once again, sir, for the privilege and pleasure I've had, together with my party from Jordan, of meeting you, sir, and being with our friends at this very important, historical point in time in terms of our common hopes, in terms of the future of the area I come from, and the future of generations to come.

I can also seek to advise our friends that Jordan has been committed for the cause of establishing a just and durable peace. This has been our record since '67. This was re-emphasized by the first summit, representing the view and the consensus of the entire Arab world. And I hope that I've been able on this visit to assure you, sir, and our friends, of our determination to do all in our power for the establishment of a just and durable peace in the Middle East.

We will go back to our area. We will be in close contact over the coming period with our brethren there. There is much that we will take back with us, and we hope to be in touch again. I hope to have the privilege and pleasure of being with you, sir, before too long.

Rest assured of our commitment to the cause of future generations, their rights to live in peace and security in our entire area. I hope that we can contribute our share for a better, safer, more stable life for generations to come in the Middle East.

Reagan and I, on behalf of the people of the United States, extend our sincere and heartfelt condolences. Our prayers go out to all of those who have suffered so greatly, and especially to those injured, for whom we wish a speedy recovery.

The U.S. Embassy in Caracas has been in continuous contact with Venezuelan authorities since the beginning of the tragedy to find ways in which the United States might be of assistance. For example, within a short time after the first explosions, a team of U.S. Coast Guard specialists in petroleum spills was dispatched to the scene of the fire. The U.S. Government stands ready and willing to help further.

Merry Christmas from the White House. Nancy and I wish we could personally thank the thousands of you who've sent us holiday cards, greetings, and messages. Each one is moving and tells a story of its own -- a story of love, hope, prayer, and patriotism. And each one has helped to brighten our Christmas.

South China Sea last October. To me, it sums up so much of what is best about the Christmas spirit, the American character, and what this beloved land of ours stands for -- not only to ourselves but to millions of less fortunate people around the globe.

America sailor! Hello Freedom man!' It's hard to see a boat full of people like that and not get a lump somewhere between chin and bellybutton. And it really makes one proud and glad to be an American. People were waving and shouting and choking down lumps and trying not to let other brave men see their wet eyes. A lieutenant next to me said, `Yeah, I guess it's payday in more ways than one.' (We got paid today.) And I guess no one could say it better than that.

Well, I think that letter just about says it all. In spite of everything, we Americans are still uniquely blessed, not only with the rich bounty of our land but by a bounty of the spirit -- a kind of year-round Christmas spirit that still makes our country a beacon of hope in a troubled world and that makes this Christmas and every Christmas even more special for all of us who number among our gifts the birthright of being an American.

At this holiday season when most Americans are warmed and comforted by their family relationships and the blessings of this country, it is hard for us to realize that far away in a remote and mountainous land a valiant people is putting up a fight for freedom that affects us all. No matter how far removed from our daily lives, Afghanistan is a struggle we must not forget.

Three years ago on December 27, 1979, the Soviet Union invaded Afghanistan and installed a new Communist leader to head the Marxist regime that had taken power in 1978. For the first time since the immediate aftermath of World War II, the Soviets used a large-scale military force outside their borders and Eastern Europe to try to impose their will. If this aggression should succeed, it will have dangerous impact on the safety of free men everywhere.

Three years after the invasion, the Soviet occupation of Afghanistan is not a success. Even with the augmentation of their forces to close to 105,000 men this year, the Soviets, with the puppet Karmal regime, have not been able to control the countryside or secure many cities. They have failed to rebuild the Communist-controlled Afghan Army and to create an effective government.

This is due to the spirit and will of the majority of the Afghan people and to the mujahedin, the freedom-fighters, who continue to resist the Soviet invaders. In the face of repeated offensive campaigns during the spring and summer of 1982, the mujahedin were able to drop back and then regain their positions once the Soviet forces had withdrawn. Their forces and their will remain intact.

We must recognize that the human costs of this struggle are immense. With the more intense fighting of 1982, casualties on both sides rose, and the civilian population suffered more than ever before. Crops and fields were destroyed by the Soviets, trying to deny to the mujahedin the support of the local population. Homes, and even entire villages, were leveled. We have convincing proof chemical weapons have been used by the Soviets against the Afghans. The refugee population has continued to grow, both in Pakistan and in Afghanistan, as peasants flee the destruction of war. It is a sad but inspiring story.

The United States does not intend to forget these brave people and their struggle. We have said repeatedly that we support a negotiated settlement for Afghanistan predicated on the complete withdrawal of Soviet troops. We joined the vast majority of the world community at the United Nations again in November in support of a resolution calling for a settlement along these lines.

We in the United States sincerely hope that the new leadership of the Soviet Union will take advantage of the opportunities the new year will no doubt offer to achieve a solution for Afghanistan. The American people do not want to see the suffering and deprivation of the Afghan people continue, but we will not grow weary or abandon them and their cause of freedom.

When I came to Washington two years ago, it was with the intention of forming a Cabinet whose members could advise me on a wide range of issues. With that in mind, I have turned to you on many occasions for advice. In every case, your counsel has been thoughtful and showed a high regard for the public interest. I will miss your wise advice, but I intend to take seriously your offer to serve as a volunteer at my request. You can expect to continue receiving my calls in the future.

During the air controllers' strike, you acted with both prudence and firmness. You initiated development of a new national airspace system and you carried out the actions necessary to end Federal subsidies for Conrail, beginning the process of returning the railroad to the private sector.

More recently, your determination to focus public attention on the need to repair and maintain our nation's interstate highway and mass transportation systems resulted in the passage of the Surface Transportation Assistance Act by the Congress. The passage of this Act is a fitting capstone to your long record of achievement as Secretary.

I know that in the years ahead I will continue to call upon you, but for now, Nancy and I send you and Marilyn our warmest affection and our wishes for every happiness as you return to the private sector.

After much thought and careful consideration, I have come to the conclusion that it is an appropriate time for me to return to the private sector. I would like to do so, with your permission, on February 1st.

We have, however, accomplished many of the objectives we discussed at the time you first asked me to join the Cabinet. We have brought Conrail to the point where it can be returned to the private sector. A national airspace program has been defined and is underway. Both of these initiatives are close to completion and can be ably consummated by another Secretary.

I am extremely grateful for your support and for your confidence in me in all of our programs and especially during the difficult days of the air traffic controllers strike. As I told many people, even the most difficult problems can be handled when you have the solid backing of the President.

I will be pleased and honored to assist you in any way I can as a volunteer if you wish me to do so. I believe the country would benefit greatly from four more years of your leadership and would like to be involved in the campaign should you choose to run.

I remember at the time I was in love with my leading lady. She is Nancy, my wife, and I'm still in love with her, but I have to confess that today I find myself developing a great respect for the leading lady in these ceremonies. She's gray, she's had her face lifted, but she's still in the prime of life, a gallant lady: the New Jersey.

Putting this great ship back to work protecting our country represents a major step toward fulfilling our pledge to rebuild America's military capabilities. It marks the resurgence of our nation's strength. It's a strength we can afford. We cannot afford to lose it.

Since the founding of our Armed Forces during the Revolutionary War, our country has always done without large standing armies and navies. Our great success story -- unique in history -- has been based on peaceful achievements in every sphere of human experience. In our two centuries of continuous democracy, we've been the envy of the world in technology, commerce, agriculture, and economic potential.

Our status as a free society and world power is not based on brute strength. When we've taken up arms, it has been for the defense of freedom for ourselves and for other peaceful nations who needed our help. But now, faced with the development of weapons with immense destructive power, we've no choice but to maintain ready defense forces that are second to none. Yes, the cost is high, but the price of neglect would be infinitely higher.

Another great power in the world sees its military forces in a different light. The Soviet Union has achieved sheer power status only by -- or I should say superpower status only by virtue of its military might. It has done so by sacrificing and ignoring achievement in virtually any and every other field.

In contrast, America's strength is the bedrock of the Free World's security, for the freedom we guard is not just our own. But over the past years we began to drift dangerously away from what was so clearly our responsibility. From 1970 to 1979, our defense spending, in constant dollars, decreased by 22 percent. The Navy, so vital to protecting our interests in faraway troublespots, shrank -- as you've been told by the Secretary -- from more than a thousand ships to 453.

Potential adversaries saw this unilateral disarmament, which was matched in all the other services, as a sign of weakness and a lack of will necessary to protect our way of life. While we talked of detente, the lessening of tensions in the world, the Soviet Union embarked on a massive program of militarization. Since around 1965, they have increased their military spending, nearly doubling it over the past 15 years.

In a free society such as ours, where differing viewpoints are permitted, there will be people who oppose defense spending of any kind at any level. There are others who believe in defense, but who mistakenly feel that the Department of Defense is inherently wasteful and unconcerned about cost cutting. Well, they're dead wrong.

Waste in government spending of any kind is an ever-present threat. But I can assure our fellow citizens there is no room for waste in our national defense. A dollar wasted is a dollar lost in the crucial effort to build a safer future for our people. Secretary Weinberger and the members of this administration are committed to spending what is necessary for defense to secure the peace and not a penny more. As the recommissioning of this ship demonstrates, we are rearming with prudence, using existing assets to the fullest.

In spite of all the sound and fury that we hear and read, defense spending as a percentage of gross national product is well below what it was in the Eisenhower and Kennedy years. The simple fact is that, by reforming defense procurement, by stressing efficiencies and economies in weapons system production, we have been able to structure and fund a defense program our nation can afford. It meets the threat, and it provides wages and benefits that are more akin to what our men and women in uniform deserve.

Already, we're realizing tremendous dividends from our defense program. The readiness of our forces is dramatically improved. As you've just been told, we're more than meeting our recruitment goals. And we've had congressional support for such key initiatives as the purchase of two aircraft carriers, the B - 1 bomber, and the C - 5 transport plane.

As a nation, we're committed to take every step to substantially reduce the possibility of nuclear war, while providing an unshakable deterrent to such a war for ourselves and our allies. To this end, we're closing the window of vulnerability by instituting a comprehensive strategic force modernization program.

We can't shut our eyes to the fact that, as the Soviet military power increased, so did their willingness to embark on military adventures. The scars are plainly evident in a number of Third World countries. We're also aware that, though the Soviet Union is historically a land power -- virtually self-sufficient in mineral and energy resources and land-linked to Europe and the vast stretches of Asia -- it has created a powerful, blue-ocean navy that cannot be justified by any legitimate defense need. It is a navy built for offensive action, to cut the Free World's supply lines and render impossible the support, by sea, of Free World allies.

By contrast, the United States is a naval power by necessity, critically dependent on the transoceanic import of vital strategic materials. Over 90 percent of our commerce between the continents moves in ships. Freedom to use the seas is our nation's lifeblood. For that reason, our Navy is designed to keep the sealanes open worldwide, a far greater task than closing those sealanes at strategic choke-points.

Maritime superiority for us is a necessity. We must be able in time of emergency to venture in harm's way, controlling air, surface, and subsurface areas to assure access to all the oceans of the world. Failure to do so will leave the credibility of our conventional defense forces in doubt.

The New Jersey and her sister ships can outgun and outclass any rival platform. This 58,000-ton ship, whose armor alone weighs more than our largest cruiser, is being recommissioned at no more than the cost of a new 4,000-ton frigate. The ``Big J'' is being reactivated with the latest in missile electronic warfare and communications technology. She's more than the best means of quickly adding real firepower to our Navy; she's a shining example of how this administration will rebuild America's Armed Forces on budget and on schedule and with the maximum cost-effective application of high technology to existing assets.

The New Jersey's mission is to conduct prompt and sustained operations worldwide, in support of our national interests. In some cases, deployment of the New Jersey will free up our overstressed aircraft carriers for other uses. While the aircraft carrier remains the foundation of American naval power, the battleship will today be the sovereign of the seas. In support of amphibious operations, the New Jersey's 16-inch guns can deliver shells as heavy as an automobile with pinpoint accuracy. And with a speed of 35 knots, the New Jersey will be among the fastest ships afloat.

History tells us that a delegate to the Continental Congress called the creation of our Navy ``the maddest idea in the world.'' Well, we've been questioned for bringing back this battleship. Yet, I would challenge anyone who's been aboard or even seen the New Jersey to argue its value. It seems odd and a little ironic to me that some of the same critics who accuse us of chasing technology and gold-plating our weapons systems have led the charge against the superbly cost-effective and maintainable New Jersey. I doubt if there's a better example of the cost-consciousness of this administration than the magnificent ship that we're recommissioning today.

However, even with maximum efficiency and an eye toward making every dollar count, we must not fool ourselves. Providing an adequate defense is not cheap. The price of peace is always high, but considering the alternative, it's worth it.

You're a great team, and you did an outstanding job in putting her back into fighting trim. You represent a new spirit, a new sense of responsibility that we must have in all our shipyards and defense-related industries if public support for our vital task is to be maintained.

This ship, as the Secretary told us, was brought in on time and on budget. And from all reports, the craftsmanship and professionalism of those involved in the project were superior, and I'm pleased to have the opportunity to extend the thanks of a grateful nation.

The New Jersey, like any ship in our fleet, will depend on the ability, dedication, and, yes, patriotism of you here who are her crew. You're the elite. Six thousand applied for 1,500 crew spaces on the New Jersey. I have no doubt, too, that from among your ranks will come the Spruances and the Halseys and the Thompsons of tomorrow.

A few moments ago I quoted Teddy Roosevelt. Most people remember him as a man of strength and vitality, and, yes, some have an image of a warlike man always spoiling for a fight. Well, let us remember, he won the Nobel Peace Prize, an honor bestowed upon him for his courageous and energetic efforts to end the Russo-Japanese war. He knew the relationship between peace and strength. And he knew the importance of a strong navy.

Well, the call has been sounded. America needs the battleship once again to provide firepower for the defense of freedom and, above all, to maintain the peace. She will truly fulfill her mission if her firepower never has to be used.

Nothing is more important to the welfare and progress of the United States than the assurance that all its people are afforded equality of opportunities. Our Nation's commitment to open new doors of opportunity for people in all walks of life has guided the growth of our Nation and stands as a measure of its greatness.

The realization of our high hopes for a better America can be gauged by our ability to bring the handicapped of our Nation into the mainstream of society. The recent initiation in March 1980 of closed-captioned television, which opened this important communications medium to millions of deaf and hearing-impaired Americans, is a significant achievement toward this end. The development of closed-captioned television marks the culmination of many years of cooperative effort by government, private industry and non-profit groups. It is breaking down historic communications barriers and opening new social, educational and vocational opportunities for the hearing-impaired.

My administration has fought hard to uphold fiscal responsibility in the United Nations system and, in this case, consistently opposed this financing scheme. It is not a proper expense of the United Nations within the meaning of its own Charter, as the Law of the Sea Preparatory Commission is legally independent of and distinct from the U.N. It is not a U.N. subsidiary organ and not answerable to that body. Membership in the U.N. does not obligate a member to finance or otherwise support this Law of the Sea organization.

Moreover, these funds are destined to finance the very aspects of the Law of the Sea treaty that are unacceptable to the United States and that have resulted in our decision, as I announced on July 9, 1982, not to sign that treaty. The Preparatory Commission is called upon to develop rules and regulations for the seabed mining regime under the treaty. It has no authority to change the damaging provisions and precedents in that part of the treaty. For that reason, the United States is not participating in the Commission.

My administration has conducted a review of the financing scheme for this Commission. That review has confirmed that it is an improper assessment under the U.N. Charter that is not legally binding upon members. It is also adverse to the interests of the United States. While the United States normally pays 25 percent of the regular U.N. budget, the United States is opposed to improper assessments and is determined to resist such abuses of the U.N. budget.

President under the Federal Advisory Committee Act which are applicable to the committees listed in Sections 1 and 2 of this Order, except that of reporting annually to the Congress, shall be performed by the head of the department or agency designated after each committee, in accordance with guidelines and procedures established by the Administrator of General Services.

Saint Lucia, Saint Vincent and the Grenadines, and the Government of Trinidad and Tobago) as the beneficiaries of the rights and privileges accorded under the Caribbean Basin Economic Recovery Act. The governments of these countries have, on behalf of all the citizens living under their jurisdiction, demonstrated to the United States Government a determination to accelerate economic progress in this hemisphere and to see the rewards of that progress bring a better life for all in this hemisphere.

These eleven countries will begin enjoying the benefits of the act on January 1, 1984. After that date these governments will have unencumbered duty-free access to the U.S. market on terms that recognize our important goal of increasing commercial exchange between our countries and within the hemisphere generally. The United States is also now prepared to extend to these nations special tax advantages which can benefit tourism and other sectors of their economy.

Gemayel, to Washington. President Gemayel symbolizes Lebanon's hopes for unity, peace, and stability -- goals for which all of us are working so hard and for which many Americans and many more Lebanese have sacrificed their lives.

We admire President Gemayel's personal courage. We applaud his determination to free his country of all foreign forces and to reunite the Lebanese people. Lebanon once shined like a jewel in the sun, and America will do what it can to support Lebanon's efforts to restore her tranquility and independence.

To this end, we stand by the May 17th agreement as the best and most viable basis for the withdrawal of Israeli forces from Lebanon. And once again, I appeal to the other external forces to leave Lebanon.

I was particularly impressed by the initiative that President Gemayel took in calling for national dialog. Today he and I have discussed his programs for national unity. And, Mr. President, your efforts to broaden the base of your government, bringing in Lebanon's many communities, will do much to rebuild a stable and prosperous Lebanon. It will do much to restore confidence in the future. It will do much to stop the loss of so many innocent lives.

President Gemayel has already achieved a measure of success through the effective leadership that he demonstrated during the first round of reconciliation talks in Geneva. Yet, there is still a long way to go, and Lebanon can count on our help.

President, that the American people can be proud of the job that our marines are doing. Their presence is making it possible for reason to triumph over the forces of violence, hatred, and intimidation.

My special representative for the Middle East, Don Rumsfeld, returned recently from his first round of meetings in the region. He'll be returning to the area soon and will be working directly with President Gemayel to arrange foreign troop withdrawals and to pursue Lebanese national reconciliation.

This is my third visit to Washington and probably the most important because of the intensity of the crisis in Lebanon and the region. Yet, I'm confident that actions, properly conceived and executed at this time, can result in dramatic movement toward stability, security, and peace.

Today we explored, as partners, the best ways and means not to merely implement agreement but going beyond the letter of the law to set up the most appropriate mechanism and conditions for the achievement of our common interests and policy objectives. We found ourselves in full agreement on the necessity of withdrawal of all external forces from Lebanon and the full restoration of the Lebanese sovereignty and exclusive authority over all of Lebanon's territory within its internationally recognized borders. This, and this alone, will put an end to the continuing tragedy which is now engulfing not only Lebanese but Americans in Lebanon as well. Hence, it is imperative for us all to break the cycle of violence which has been preventing the people of Lebanon for the past decade from exercising their divine and natural right of self-determination and the shaping of a free, modern society in full social and economic partnership.

I found in Washington full comprehension of the fact that leading Lebanon out of the present impasse is not only a question of justice and right but also a matter of common interest both for its neighbors and the U.S.

President Reagan's commitment, and the support of the American people. I look forward, with hope, that actions taken as a result of our discussions, fortified by the courage and vision of the American and Lebanese people, will result in peace in Lebanon and the entire region.

The Office of Federal Procurement Policy -- part of the Office of Management and Budget -- is responsible for providing overall governmentwide leadership and direction of Federal procurement policy. It is also responsible for overseeing the Federal procurement reforms that I initiated through issuance of Executive Order No. 12352 in March 1982, which are an essential element of this administration's ongoing Reform 88 program.

A major problem faced by our Nation's elderly and homebound is isolation. For many, friends and spouses have died, and families have moved away. When no one is left to check in on these individuals on a regular basis, illness or injury may go undetected until more serious consequences -- even death -- may result.

The United States Postal Service and the National Association of Letter Carriers are doing something to alleviate this problem. In growing numbers of towns and cities all across America, they are involved in a program called ``Carrier Alert'' in which mail carriers monitor the mailboxes of participating residents for unusual accumulations of mail which may signal distress. When such an accumulation occurs, the Postal Service notifies a local sponsoring social service agency which investigates and provides any necessary assistance.

Participation in the program is entirely voluntary and costs nothing to postal customers. Since the inception of the ``Carrier Alert'' program in 1982, numerous press accounts around the country have documented instances in which the program has saved the lives or eased the sufferings of elderly or disabled people who would have been left to languish alone in their pain but for a carrier's concern.

Mr. Lyles is president and chief executive officer of A. C. Lyles Films in Hollywood, Calif. He was affiliated with Paramount Pictures for 44 years, serving 30 years as a producer-writer-partner in numerous theatrical features and television shows. He is currently an independent producer and packager of motion pictures and network television programs.

The President. Well, hello again. And it's good to see all of you here. And before I start taking the questions, could I just give you a little news? If you've been too busy here to hear it, this morning they released the unemployment figures for the Nation for the month of November. And it's down to 8.2 percent -- 370,000 more people went to work last month. And the significance of that figure to us, though, is about how fast that makes the recovery, because 8.2 percent was what we had predicted would be true at the end of 1985. So, we're a little ahead of schedule on the recovery.

The President. Well, thank you, first of all, very much. I think possibly not only he but a number of others got the message all right, that the United States -- we're not warlike, we want peace; but we know that we can't buy peace at any price. And when our national security is concerned the world better know that we're going to do whatever is necessary for the safety and protection of our freedoms and the people of this country.

So, we don't plan any confrontations. That'll be up to them. And under the same circumstances and with the same request made by our neighbors that was made by six of the countries down there, I think we would probably react in the same way.

Q. Mr. President, my question to you today concerns us -- the Nation's youth. As far as I know, we, the youth, have no form of representation in the Government. What has been done to ensure that we have the representation that we should have?

The President. Well, I wouldn't say that you don't have representation in government. You know, we have a number of programs, and this, while it is not exactly connected with the Government, it certainly gives you access to government. But we try to represent all of the people in the country.

Texas. How do you react to the fairness issue being raised, suggesting that your budget cuts in social services have hurt the poor and those less able to afford, you know, the aid like welfare and day care and like that?

The President. Well, this whole charge of fairness, I think, is political demagoguery and is done for political purposes. Having been a Governor for 8 years and thus participated in administering many of the Federal programs, I was aware of what a high percentage of the money for those programs went to the bureaucracy, was spent in administrative overhead.

I give you an example of a program that was supposed to -- Federal program supposed to put 17 unemployed people in one of our counties in California into some jobs helping out in the maintenance of parks. Now it sounds pretty logical, except that half of the budget was going to go to 11 administrators -- to make sure that the 17 got to work on time, I guess. But it seemed to me it was out of balance.

What we've been doing is redirecting the aid actually to the truly needy. You would be surprised at how -- under the management of those programs -- how the ceiling had gone up on earnings to where people who really were self-sustaining were getting government grants and government aid at the expense of their neighbors. And those neighbors weren't making as much money as they were.

We have redirected this. And this is also true in the previous question of aid to the students. We found that people who should normally be expected to be able to send their children to college were getting this help, financial help.

So, we have redirected more of these programs to the people who truly need it. And we're actually -- this government is providing 95 million meals a day. We are subsidizing housing for more than 10 million families in the country today. There has been no real cutback or decline in aid to the people who through no fault of their own must depend on the rest of us for help. We've just tried to make government a little bit more efficient.

For example, I had a message the other day from a man in a small town down in Mississippi. And he was writing to me about food stamps in his area, because there's a 31-percent unemployment rate in that particular town. And he was telling of some of the things, of people getting $2,400 a month and receiving food stamps. Well, for them to do that means that someone else who really has need for them is being cheated and is not being able to get the help that they should have.

The President. What is the necessary quality? Well, I'll tell you, I would put it this way. I don't think that any public office should be viewed by someone as just a good job that they might like to have for their own personal career. I think you really have to believe in something and think that you can bring about an improvement by serving in public office in order to bring about this reform or to do this good that you think the government should be doing.

Now, I don't know whether that answers your question about me, but I do know that for about 25 years, before I ever dreamed that I would seek public office -- never wanted to, was very happy in my previous line of work -- but some way, back from being a sports announcer, I guess, I got on the mashed-potato circuit, as I call it. [Laughter] And since I didn't sing or dance, I usually wound up being an after dinner speaker at somebody's banquet. And I always did my own speeches. And I, over the years, was talking more and more about the things that I saw wrong in government that should be corrected. And, then, when through a set of circumstances some people prevailed upon me to run for Governor, I think what finally -- and it came about through those speeches -- why I saw it as an opportunity to, instead of just talking about these problems, to do something about them. And that's it.

Texas. With Soviet Premier Andropov sick, and with the recent death of Brezhnev a couple years ago, do you see any real, foreseeable problems for the United States in dealing with another Soviet premier should he die?

The President. Well, it's true that there's difficulty, and there has been in this period and before his illness. When a new man is just taking over and getting his government organized, there's a period in there in which he's not ready to get out and start talking with someone else about international affairs. So, there would be that period again, if there is a change of leadership.

I will say this, on the other hand, though, that we are in communication at a number of levels with people in the Soviet Union. We're not just incommunicado. We have people that have channels and through the State Department and all, that we're in contact. I have even communicated with personal, handwritten letters, myself.

And we feel that the two superpowers, in the position we're in in the world today, with all the tensions and with all the possibility for a tragic error, that we can't discontinue our conversation and our meetings with them. But because you don't see an awful lot about this in the public media, it is going on.

I happen to be a believer in what I've called quiet diplomacy. For example, if you make a demand on the other government and you say, ``You've got to do this; we don't like what you're doing,'' and it's on the front page of the papers and on the TV news, in the world of politics you've put that person in a position where he can hardly give in, because then in the eyes of their own people they would be accepting orders from another government. So on many of the touchiest points, you deal quietly in the background with an individual there. And you say, ``Look, we're not going to go out making speeches about this, but this is a problem. And it's a problem that affects our relations with each other. And if you were doing, could see your way to doing this -- whatever that particular thing is -- believe me, our relations would be much better.'' And we've been doing this. And I have to tell you, it works.

Miami, Florida. My question is, does your administration plan to develop some kind of concrete immigration policy to help alleviate the problems caused by the thousands of refugees coming to the shores in South Florida and also in other States, year after year?

The President. Well, yes, there is a policy in this country. First of all, the policy on immigration is that, as you know, there are quotas. We know we can't take everyone. So people are on waiting lists from various countries, depending on how much of their quota has been used for direct immigration.

As for refugees, that's a different problem. Our country historically has always offered itself as a shelter for those who are persecuted and those who have fled persecution and are refugees, such as the boat people from Vietnam. Now we do have an overall figure on that.

We have legislation, however, in the Congress right now, that we've been trying to get passed -- and we've had trouble getting it passed -- having to do with this entire problem and with immigration and trying to close our borders, or control our borders, I should say, against those who are neither immigrants or refugees and who just come into the country and suddenly disappear into the whole population. But we have to a certain extent lost control of our borders.

The President. Well, we're not supporting leftwing or rightwing governments who violate human rights. The situation in El Salvador, and this was the reason for the veto, the situation is that for 400 years El Salvador has been dominated by dictators of one kind or another. It's from a heritage that goes back to the very beginning of their country.

And the result was they had an election more than a year ago. And they elected a democratic form of government. Eighty-three percent of their people went to the polls to vote. The leftist guerrillas that are fighting the Government had a slogan at the time of that election. They said to the people, ``Vote today and die tonight,'' meaning they would kill the people if they went to vote. And the people defied them. I've told repeatedly of a story of one woman that some of our Congressmen, who were there as observers, saw in the line waiting to vote who had been wounded by the guerrillas, shot with a rifle. And she refused to leave the line for medical attention until she could vote. Now that's the government of El Salvador.

Now, yes, there are holdovers. There are people left who aren't part of those leftist guerrillas, but who want the form of dictatorship and the totalitarianism -- the privileged class concept that they had before this democratic government. And they are the so-called murder squads and doing the things they're doing to violate human rights.

The democratic government, beset by thousands of guerrillas on the left, would have a lot better chance of apprehending these death squads and handling the extreme rightists if they were not beset by the guerrillas. And the Congress, by holding down the help that we can give to this El Salvador government, is simply leaving them in a position of -- well, they can keep on fighting, but they don't have the means to actually win yet. They're just dragging on. And at the same time, they can't handle these two things at once.

But the other thing we noticed was that if we have this thing of having to certify every few months to the Congress in order to get this aid, there are people, both on the left and right, who know that if they step up the violation of human rights -- the murders and so forth, so that we can't certify, they -- from whichever side -- are helping to win their battle against the democratic government.

We're doing everything we can, not only to help that Government deal with these rightwing squads, but I'm going to voice a suspicion now that I've never said aloud before. I wonder if all of this is rightwing, or if those guerrilla forces have not realized that by infiltrating into the city of San Salvador and places like that, that they can get away with these violent acts, helping to try and bring down the Government, and the rightwing will be blamed for it.

States. The truth of the matter is, dating back to some days when the big colossus of the North, the United States, did lean on and practice what was called gunboat diplomacy -- our own friends and neighbors down there don't want us to send that kind of military help. They don't want our troops down there, and we respect them for that. President Magana of El Salvador has said, ``Yes, we need some help; we need weapons, ammunition; we need training.'' And we're providing that for them. But he said, ``We will provide the manpower. We don't want yours.'' So, yours was a kind of a hypothetical question and mine is a hypothetical answer. It would have to be something that we saw as actually a threat to our security and our safety, and then we would be defending ourselves, not someone else.

China -- still professes to be Communist, although it has undergone many reforms and liberalizations of that kind of rule. But here are around a billion people in the world -- capable, energetic people. And it didn't seem right, as he felt at that time, that we should shut the doors, not communicate at all.

He opened the doors, and the two Presidents between him and me have continued that. We have bettered the relations, I think, vastly. We've opened up trade both ways between the two countries. Their head man is coming to our country to visit in January, I believe, and we accepted his invitation to go there.

But I think it comes down to this: that you only get in trouble when people are talking about each other instead of to each other. And so we get better understanding each time that we have these meetings. Our Secretary of State, our Secretary of Defense have both made visits there. The Vice President has visited. And they exchange and visit here. And we deal with trade problems, we deal with further opening of -- such as cultural relations of people back and forth to become more familiar with each other. And I think it is a worthwhile thing to do.

But in saying that, let me add one thing. We have a very delicate problem with them, and that is the situation with Taiwan, because both governments claim to be the government of China. That is their problem. But we have made it plain, it is a problem that must be settled peacefully between them. And we have made it plain, also, that in continuing and trying to build this friendship, relationship with the People's Republic of China on the mainland, we in no way retreat from our alliance with and our friendship with the Chinese on Taiwan. They have been allies of ours going all the way back to World War II. We are friends, and repeatedly we have said to the government of mainland China that they should appreciate the fact that we're not going to throw aside one friend in order to make another. And then they ought to feel more comfortable that we can be friends with them, too.

The President. Well, we're aware of those planes that are in those areas. And I'd call to your attention that we have carrier squadrons that are on duty in the Caribbean and over on the Pacific side, off that side of Central America. And we think that we have sufficient force and sufficient warning for our own bases that we can handle that.

When the Cuban missile crisis came along, the situation was far different. And I don't mean to take anything away from President Kennedy. But at that time the United States had about an 8 to 1 nuclear superiority over the Soviet Union. So when we stood up and looked them in the eye, they blinked.

This is a very special time of year for us, a time for family reunions and for celebrating together the blessings of God and the promises He has given us. From Thanksgiving to Hanukkah, which our Jewish community is now celebrating, to Christmas in 3 weeks' time, this is a season of hope and of love.

Poles expressing their belief that the family remains the foundation of freedom. And, of course, they're right. It's in the family where we learn to think for ourselves, care for others, and acquire the values of self-reliance, integrity, responsibility, and compassion.

Families stand at the center of society, so building our future must begin by preserving family values. Tragically, too many in Washington have been asking us to swallow a whopper: namely, that bigger government is the greatest force for fairness and progress. But this so-called solution has given most of us a bad case of financial indigestion. How can families survive when big government's powers to tax, inflate, and regulate absorb their wealth, usurp their rights, and crush their spirit? Was there compassion for a working family in 21\1/2\-percent interest rates, 12\1/2\-percent inflation, and taxes soaring out of sight? Consider the cost of childrearing. It now takes $85,000 to raise a child to age 18, and family incomes haven't kept up. During the 1970's real wages actually declined over 2 percent. Consider taxes. In 1948 the tax on the average two-child family was just $9. Today it is $2,900.

As economic and social pressures have increased, the bonds that bind families together have come under strain. For example, three times as many families are headed by single parents today as in 1960. Many single parents make heroic sacrifices and deserve all our support. But there is no question that many well-intentioned Great Society-type programs contributed to family breakups, welfare dependency, and a large increase in births out of wedlock. In the 1970's the number of single mothers rose from 8 to 13 percent among whites and from 31 to a tragic 47 percent among blacks. Too often their children grow up poor, malnourished, and lacking in motivation. It's a path to social and health problems, low school performance, unemployment, and delinquency.

At the same time, new policies are helping our neediest families move from dependence to independence. Our new job training law will train over a million needy and unemployed Americans each year for productive jobs. I should add that our enterprise zones proposal would stimulate new businesses, bringing jobs and hope to some of the most destitute areas of the country. The Senate has adopted this proposal. But after 2 years of delay, the House Democratic leadership only recently agreed to hold its first hearing on the legislation. This is a jobs bill America needs. And come January, we expect action.

We're moving forward on many other fronts. We've made prevention of drug abuse among youth a top priority. We'll soon announce a national missing children's center to help find and rescue children who've been abducted and exploited. We're working with States and local communities to increase the adoption of special-needs children. More children with permanent homes mean fewer children with permanent problems.

We're also stiffening the enforcement of child support from absent parents. And we're trying hard to improve education through more discipline, a return to the basics, and through reforms like tuition tax credits to help hard-working parents.

Clement Zablocki served his constituency and his country with dedication and integrity. He was a strong and effective advocate for the causes in which he so deeply believed. But above all else, he was an American of great patriotism who could always be counted upon to put country ahead of politics. I will miss his wise counsel. We send our deepest sympathy to his family.

For some time now, we have been flying regular and routine reconnaissance flights with unarmed planes in Lebanon as a part of the protection and defense of our forces there. We notified the Syrians of this some time ago, assuring them that the planes were unarmed, that this was purely for reconnaissance. There have been some instances of firing at those planes now and then from unknown sources. But early yesterday, two such reconnaissance missions were fired upon by literally hundreds of antiaircraft and a combination of surface-to-air missiles, which were coordinated from several sites by the Syrians. Early today, we responded to this unprovoked attack by striking back at those sites from whence had come the attack.

Beirut until all the foreign forces can be withdrawn and until the Government of Lebanon can take over the authority of its own territory. But we are going to defend our forces there. And this was the reason -- or the purpose of the mission earlier today.

The President. Yes. We've had this report that two of the pilots, or the crew of one plane -- two planes were shot down of ours. The pilot, as you know, was rescued that landed outside of that area. Two inside. I don't have any further word except that we are attempting to negotiate their release.

The President. Do we fear a military confrontation with Syria? Well, I think that's the wrong word. I think the question is wrong. We don't want such a thing; we don't desire it. But -- and I think this'll answer your question over here at the same time about if it happens again, will we fire back -- we haven't fired at anyone unless it has been to return fire against attacks made upon our forces.

Gemayel and Prime Minister Shamir both being here and the fact that they have responded with fire to some areas led people to suppose that. No, we knew nothing of their operations, and there was no contact with them regarding ours. And the Prime Minister has responded to that question and said that they were only aware of it after it happened.

The President. Well, that's -- your guess is as good as mine. We don't know. The conflicting stories that are coming out of there, the attempt now to portray him as being active and on the scene -- we really have no assurance one way or the other.

The President. Well, I hope that it doesn't make it any more difficult. I hope that the reaction would be the other way. But we're going to continue with the mission that we embarked upon some time ago, and that is to bring peace to that area.

We've just seen the beautiful symbolic lighting of the Hanukkah menorah. At sundown you and your families will light your own menorahs. As we heard, when God kept the oil in the eternal flame burning for 8 days, he gave us the miracle of Hanukkah, a holiday of hope and rededication for every Jewish family.

We're reminded of Jewish unity and diversity by the eight separate branches of the menorah coming together as one. And as the menorah's light grows stronger, with one candle being lit each day, we can feel the flame of freedom burning in your hearts. And that flame should inspire people everywhere.

Hanukkah is symbolic of the Jewish struggle to resist submission to tyranny and to sustain its spiritual heritage. No people have fought longer, struggled harder, or sacrificed more to survive, to grow, and to live in freedom than the people of Israel.

We're also making sure that Israel is not hurt in the United Nations. Ambassador Kirkpatrick is our watchdog on this, and let me assure you, one thing about Jeane, she is a very determined woman. But just so no one gets any ideas, let me be blunt: If Israel is ever forced to leave the U.N., the United States and Israel will leave together.

Soviet Union. And how good it is to know that, at this very moment, Jews who have fled oppression are here with us taking their first steps toward becoming American citizens. On behalf of more than 230 million Americans, may I say to you, welcome to your new family.

We know that the emigration of Jews from the Soviet Union is practically stopped. They're constantly ridiculed, harassed, beaten, and arrested by Soviet authorities. It's no exaggeration to say their entire Jewish population feels it is under siege. Today, Soviet Jews are fighting for their future and their freedom, as the Maccabees once did. But their fight is a peaceful one. Some are struggling to emigrate from the Soviet Union. Many others are trying to assert their rights to practice their religion and preserve their heritage. In their struggle, we must not forsake them. We will not remain silent.

We will not remain silent when Avi Goldstein, a 10-year-old boy being harassed by the KGB, asked visiting Samantha Smith to convey his family's appeal for emigration. We will not remain silent when Lev Furman, one of Moscow's leading Hebrew teachers, has been persecuted, seen his house vandalized, and been robbed of his teaching materials.

To every religious dissident trapped in this cold, cruel existence, we Americans send our love and support. We appeal to people everywhere to open their hearts and to raise their voices in support of our brothers and sisters. Together, let us pray that the warm lights of Hanukkah will spread the spirit of freedom and reach, comfort, and sustain every person who is suffering tonight.

President Kennedy once said that he looked forward to an America ``not afraid of grace and beauty, an America respected throughout the world not only for its strength but for its civilization as well.'' Well, today we join the John F. Kennedy Center for the Performing Arts in honoring five Americans who have taught us a great deal about grace and beauty, five who've helped build a distinctive American civilization.

Even as a little girl, Katherine Dunham loved to dance. When only 8, she created a neighborhood controversy by staging a cabaret to raise money for her church. [Laughter] At the University of Chicago, she founded her own dance troupe and discovered anthropology, a discipline that enabled her to study the dance of many cultures.

In the decades since, Miss Dunham has become a noted anthropologist, an author, a great choreographer, and a role model for an entire generation of dancers. Her studies have taken her to Brazil, the Caribbean, and Africa. I understand that in one Caribbean city her startled host began to worry when she disappeared into the bush to study voodoo. But they calmed down when she gave them a concert and danced to the music of Debussy.

He's composed symphonies; operas; motion picture scores; church music; over a hundred musical portraits; incidental music for theatrical productions; concertos; piano sonatas; songs with English, French, Spanish, and Latin texts; and much more. His music reflects his love of European culture, but again and again it's unmistakably American.

Elia Kazan left Turkey for America with his family when he was 4. He went to Williams College, majored in English, and said his only ambition was ``to stay out of my father's business.'' Well, Elia, you succeeded. In your senior year you turned to drama, and in the more than half century since, you've made millions of us mighty grateful that you did.

Francis Albert Sinatra was born in Hoboken, New Jersey, and started to like music when his uncle gave him a ukulele. And one day in 1936, he went to a Jersey City vaudeville house to see Bing Crosby. After the show, Frank suddenly announced that he was becoming a singer.

Now, James Stewart grew up in a town called Indiana, Pennsylvania. At Princeton he acted in musicals and, after graduation, got a part in a summer production of ``Good-bye Again'' in Falmouth, Massachusetts. He played the chauffeur, spent 3 minutes on stage, and spoke exactly two lines. But he packed those lines with so much humor that he was noticed by visiting New York critics.

Corps, he spent a year instructing cadets and then went to Europe, where he flew 25 missions over enemy territory. And if he looks like a patriot on the screen, that's because he is: Brigadier General Jimmy Stewart of the Air Force Reserve.

But, Jimmy, you once said, ``The great thing about the movies is you're giving people little, tiny pieces of time that they never forget.'' Well, no one has given our nation more of those cherished moments than you have, my friend.

Henry James, the American novelist, once wrote, ``Art is the shadow of humanity.'' These five people have spent their lives casting those magnificent and powerful shadows. In dance, drama, and music, they've taught us what it means to be human. And by drawing on and adding to the openness, verve, and color of life in our country, they've taught us what it means to be American.

Seriously though, this space shuttle mission represents the enormous potential available to mankind. The Spacelab, in which the experiments are being carried out, was designed and built by the European Space Agency. The Federal Republic of Germany and other European contributors can be especially proud of this achievement.

It is fitting that on this the German-American tricentennial a German astronaut is part of the shuttle team. The shuttle is demonstrating that technology can be used to bring people together in a new spirit of enterprise and cooperation to better their lives, ensure the peace of mankind.

The Chancellor. Thank you very much, Mr. President. It is a terrific experience for us to be able to talk together this way and to talk to the crew as well. Above all, I would like to send my best wishes to my countryman. Dear Herr Merbold, I would like to take this opportunity to assure you and your colleagues, your team members, that I and all countrymen in Germany have, with great excitement and pride, been following your flight for days now.

We are proud, indeed, that your participation in this highly successful experiment is, at this time, demonstrating in such an impressive way the close ties between Europe and the United States and that it shows, once again, that we Europeans are in fact able to hold our own in terms of technology of the future. This U.S.-European shuttle mission is, indeed, a convincing proof of the closeness between Europe and the United States.

President Reagan has already pointed out that it is an exceedingly happy circumstance of which, of course, we are very much aware that it is possible at this time to have a German scientist, a European astronaut as a member of the crew at this particular time -- at the time of the tricentennial celebrations of German-American relations, remembering the time when the first Germans came to the United States.

I am especially happy that our countryman Ulf Merbold is aboard the shuttle at this time. We hope that this joint enterprise will indeed lead to further successful cooperation between the United States and the Europeans in the area of space research, and I would like to tell you, Mr. Merbold, and you crewmembers that I hope you will have a healthy and happy return to your families.

Commander Young. Mr. President and Mr. Chancellor, we're delighted that you could visit with us today in the space shuttle Columbia and visit with us in the Spacelab. We're standing -- or rather, floating in the Spacelab right now, and I'd be very pleased to introduce my fine crew. They performed in a totally outstanding manner throughout this mission, and I expect big things, scientifically and technically, to come from the results.

Dr. Lichtenberg. We'd like to take a little bit of time to tell you a little bit about the science that we've been doing here on board Spacelab. I'll give you a brief tour from this end of the Spacelab module.

We've been doing several experiments in many different disciplines. Some of those use equipment that is mounted in a pallet outside the back of the Spacelab, and we control these through control panels here in the Spacelab. Other experiments are done inside the module, using equipment here.

And on my right, we have a rack of dedicated life-sciences experiments in which we do experiments in plant growth and a variety of experiments in the adaptation of the human being to weightlessness. We are particularly interested in looking at the vestibular system, the inner ear, and how a person adapts to the weightless environment of space life.

The first one is an experiment to investigate the Earth's magnetic field lines and what happens when we inject a beam of electrons into the Earth's atmosphere to create artificial northern lights, or aurora borealis. There's another experiment, called the very wide field camera, which comes from a French aerospace laboratory, to take ultraviolet pictures of the stars. Both of these experiments have performed extremely well, and we have been able to deploy them into space repeatedly to take measurements.

Dr. Merbold. Good morning, Mr. President. Gruss Gott, Herr Bundeskanzler. I might quickly move over to one of the facilities here which we have on board to process all sorts of materials, particularly crystals, new alloys, and I think that is particularly important for application.

We might be able to create new semiconductors for the electronic industry. We have one experiment here to create new materials for turbine blades, such that airplane engines could run at higher temperatures, which would save a lot of fuel. And so, we are trying to do a lot of things to make life in the future easier and better.

The President. Well, I'd like to take this opportunity to congratulate the entire crew. You're doing a fantastic job, and we're proud of you. Your energy, creativity, and your courage are an inspiration to us all.

It's hard to believe, when looking at the highly sophisticated project we've just witnessed, that it was just over 25 years ago that the United States launched its first satellite, a 31-pound, cylinder-shaped projectile named Explorer I. Shortly after that, NASA, the National Aeronautics and Space Administration, was created to make sure mankind got every benefit possible from the exploration of space.

Our investment in space has been an exceptional bargain. Byproducts now touch our lives in so many ways. This hookup, as well as the calls every day of millions of people around the world, are made via communications satellites. Weather and navigation satellites guide us and help us protect our lives and property. The high-tech spinoffs of our space effort are too numerous to list.

This mission is also a shining example of international cooperation at its best. The Spacelab we've just toured was a gift to the United States from our European friends. Building on that good will, this is the first time a citizen from another country has joined one of our space missions as a member of the crew. It is an exciting first. It must be particularly exciting for our German friends.

Chancellor Kohl, I just want to tell you that it's such an honor for us to be together in demonstrating to the world that when people are free and work together, there's nothing that can't be accomplished. Together the free people of the world with the use of technology are building a world of prosperity and peace never imaginable a few decades ago.

The Chancellor. Mr. President, I would like to thank you very much for your kind words. I thank you primarily for the fact that you have done us the honor to select our countryman to participate in this team. That was a great honor for the Germans and the Europeans, as well.

I would like to congratulate the entire crew on their mission and on the excellent scientific results which they have been able to achieve. This is, in fact, an effort which furthers peace. It has been made possible by the cooperation between Europe and the United States. And we do hope that our future will be similar, that it will be characterized by cooperation between the two sides of the Atlantic.

Herr Merbold, to you and your crewmembers, our best wishes for a happy return. I would like to also tell you that we hope that your scientific results will be impressive. And I hope, for the sake of all of us, that what you will bring back from this mission will indeed contribute to further development of science and technology in the interest and the service of peace and mankind.

And finally -- and I think that's probably the most important -- I'd like to express my best wishes for all your families. And I hope that Frau Merbold and her children and the wives and children of your team are -- our best wishes are with them as well.

We've certainly enjoyed talking to you about what we're going to do in space. And we think it'll be of great benefit and great significance. And we're delighted that you and the Chancellor have shown so much interest in the space program.

But we're awfully glad to have you here today. You are, as the Attorney General said, among the highest officials this administration has, as they say in Washington, ``in the field.'' Now, what that means is that you're out in the real world. You're on the frontlines. You're one of our closest, most direct contacts with the people. And perhaps more than just about anyone in government, what you do each day affects the lives and fortunes of thousands, sometimes millions of your fellow Americans. And what an impact you're having. I know the Attorney General's very proud of your work, and when I heard about your conference, I wanted to take a few minutes to express our pride and gratitude for the job that you're doing.

I know many of you made considerable sacrifices in accepting the U.S. attorney appointment. I also know the monetary rewards you derive from it are not large. That's why we appreciate the enormous contribution you've been making for the past couple of years and the accomplishments your hard work has made possible.

What a relief to be able to say, thanks to our law enforcement community at the Federal, State, and local levels, crime statistics in America are finally coming down, and they'll stay down. But I know that a few people, who note that we have less people in the crime-prone age, now want to attribute the encouraging downward trend in crime to this statistical correlation. Well, a coincidence isn't a correlation. The truth is that crime has sometimes risen with population growth and sometimes not. There's nothing historically inevitable about it. The really key factor has always been the will of a society to punish those who prey on the innocent and the willingness of the leaders of that society, especially those in the judiciary and the law enforcement system, to enforce that will.

Whether it's this administration's crackdown on drug traffickers and organized crime or the tougher sentencing laws being passed in so many States, the evidence abounds that Americans want to reassert basic values -- values that say right and wrong do matter, that the individual is responsible for his actions, and that society must protect itself from career criminals who prey on the innocent and undermine the respect for law vital to freedom and prosperity.

Crime is starting to come down because for the first time in many years at the Federal, State, and local levels we are putting career criminals in jail in greater numbers and for longer periods of time. This itself is a reflection of the return to common sense and moral values that I've mentioned. The statistics bear this out. Just take the case of major drug prosecutions. In fiscal 1983 Federal law enforcement took out of circulation 2\3/4\ million pounds of illicit drugs and 20 million doses of dangerous prescription drugs.

And the numbers of arrests and indictments are dramatically up. Organized crime convictions are up from 515 in fiscal 1981 to 1,331 in 1983. And I know that you've been especially active in pressing for collection of civil and criminal fines in government debt and fraud cases. In fact, the amount collected by the Justice Department this year is double what it was last year. So, all of you've played a major role in bringing about enormous changes in a very short period of time.

And yet, I feel the full weight of your contribution is still to be felt. As you know, we've had to spend much of our time in setting the stage for change. We had to get you the tools that you need to do your job. And we're getting results. After years of decline in our investigative forces, more than a thousand new investigators and 200 new prosecutors are joining the fight against crime this year.

We've improved State and local cooperation through your own local law enforcement coordinating committees and the Justice Department's Governors Project. We've added prison space and improved training opportunities for local and State police. With your help and leadership, our 12 new regional drug task forces are beginning to bring in the big cases against drug traffickers.

And, as I'm sure many of you know, our organized crime commission held some widely publicized hearings last week here in Washington. The commission will be the first indepth look at this problem since the Kefauver hearings. It will put the menace of organized crime front and center on the American agenda, and I'm certain that its work will make your job easier.

When I announced a year ago many of these steps, including the drug task forces and organized crime commission, I said that our goal was a frontal assault on criminal syndicates in America, and I stand by those words today. I know some people like to say that we shouldn't aim too high in our goals against the syndicates. They say the mob has been around for a long time and government will never eliminate the human impulses that lead to this kind of criminal activity.

But while drug trafficking and, certainly, organized crime remain our major concerns, I did want to say a few words about the importance of your work in the area of fraud against the government. I've referred to this before as an unrelenting national scandal. I want to urge you today to redouble your efforts to end this scandal. I hope that when these cases come to your attention, you'll remember that those who defraud the government are not just stealing from an institution; they're stealing from the Brooklyn cab driver, the Detroit autoworker, the Texas dirt farmer, and all the millions of honest working people in this county who pay their taxes and abide by the law.

One final note: A great many Americans, like myself, have become concerned at the widespread distribution of extreme forms of obscene materials, materials that degrade human beings -- women, children, and men alike. There are Federal laws that restrict obscenity, and I think it's time to see that those laws, as interpreted by the Supreme Court, don't need tighter enforcement in your districts.

You have an impressive record that will grow even more impressive with the years ahead. But there's one important piece of unfinished business I must bring to your attention and that of the public: If we're going to ask law enforcement officials like yourselves to wage war on crime, we've got to give you the tools you need. We now have a number of crime initiatives on the Hill.

You know many of the provisions -- determinate sentencing, bail reform, increased protection for witnesses and victims, enhanced drug penalties, reinstitution of the death penalty, moderation of the exclusionary rule, and many similar measures that the American people have been demanding at the State and local level for many years.

Now, it's important for the entire Congress to act, especially the House of Representatives, where this legislation has been tied up in committee far too long. You need this legislation. The American people want it. And now is the time for Congress to pass it.

Important changes have come to America in the last 2\1/2\ years. Our economy's growing. Our national security is improved. And crime is starting to come down. We're on the upward road again. And this is due, in no small part, to the work of each of you.

You know, if there's been one thing about this current job that bothers me, it is that there never seems to be enough time to say thank you to all the people like yourselves who are making the difference. Today, I wanted to take that time and thank you not just for myself but for the American people whose lives and futures are safer and more assured because of your unselfish efforts. And I just wanted to come over and say thank you, and God bless you all.

From the spring of 1985 until the spring of 1986, the Festival of India will offer a comprehensive view of the highlights of social and cultural life in India from ancient times to the present day. It will depict the variety, character, and quality of modern India by presenting the continuity of traditional skills in folk and classical arts simultaneously with India's industrial and technological advances.

The Festival will consist of a series of exhibitions and programs of music, dance, drama, and films, as well as seminars, workshops, and lectures on various aspects of Indian literature, arts, and social sciences. Major U.S. art institutions will participate in the Festival.

John H. Bunzel, formerly president of San Jose State University in San Jose, Calif., is currently serving as a senior research fellow at the Hoover Institution at Stanford University, Stanford, Calif. A longtime supporter of civil rights, Mr. Bunzel was honored in 1974 by the Board of Supervisors of the city and county of San Francisco when he was awarded a Certificate of Merit for ``unswerving devotion to the highest ideals of brotherhood and service to mankind and dedicated efforts looking to the elimination of racial and religious bigotry and discrimination.'' Mr.

Now, ladies and gentlemen, I know that all of you feel as I do tonight, that it is an honor and a privilege to salute an authentic hero and an American legend. In this country whose history is so rich with wartime valor and genius, only a few events have held a special place in the memory of the American people: Washington's ride across the Delaware, Stonewall Jackson's ride around the Union right and then up the Shenandoah Valley, Douglas MacArthur's brilliant invasion of Inch'on, and of course the courageous and daring raid in 1942 by a handful of Americans led by Jimmy Doolittle.

But seriously, General, it is for each one of us here tonight a privilege to be with you, to salute you not only for the heroism of your 30 seconds over Tokyo but for your service and devotion to our country over a great many years.

Many of us have a personal recollection of the hope that you and your men gave the American people in the darkest days of World War II. And if you don't mind me saying so, I also remember serving with you in another of your public-spirited exploits back in 1964 when we worked together for a man who was also an Air Force general known to many of you in this room and who is here tonight, Barry Goldwater.

I like to think that many of the dreams of a strong America that we had then are coming true today. This is only one more reason why the name of Jimmy Doolittle remains an inspiration to me and to the American people. The name's very mention reminds us that no matter how difficult the odds or how great the potential sacrifice, a dare for the sake of freedom and our fellow men is a dare well worth taking.

Q. One of the things I wanted to ask you was I think that most Americans thought the job of being President was impossible when you took office, and I think things have changed, and they feel that you thrive on it. And I sort of wanted to ask you how you discipline yourself and how you plan your activities so that it won't overwhelm you?

The President. Well, maybe the 8 years as Governor gave me some advance training for this, because I do remember that when I first became Governor there was a period that I went through in which I thought the world had fallen on my head. And I guess I learned there.

The President. Yes. And yet I have to say that I think that the Presidency -- the nearest thing to it in the country is a governorship. You don't have a foreign policy, which does add some problems, but it is the same thing. And it used to be -- if you'll look back at earlier days, in which our Presidents were mainly found among the Governors. And I think that is a better training place than, for instance, serving in the legislature or something.

The President. Yes. [Laughing] -- He might not be a friend afterwards -- [laughter] -- but, no, I have to say that for someone who really wants to do some things that he believes strongly in, this is the most fulfilling experience I've ever had in my life.

Q. Mr. President, we were curious. Many times in the last 6 weeks you've been awakened from a deep sleep with a world crisis. How do you get the news? Who brings it to you? Do you have to have coffee? Do you stay up all night? Does Mrs. Reagan get up with you?

The President. No, usually, just the bedside phone, that then -- well, when we were -- when it has happened -- it happened at Atlanta, Georgia, when we were on that weekend there. Well, there were two such calls and two such issues. And one of them was the phone, and, simply, it was Bud McFarlane asking could I come up in the livingroom and meet the Secretary of State there. So, I whispered that I was just going out in the livingroom for a little bit, hoping that she'd go back to sleep, and I put on a robe and went out there. Then the second incident down there, one of the stewards, he just slipped in, tiptoed in and touched me on the shoulder and whispered to me, and I slid out and did the same thing again. But then you stay there and do what has to be done.

Q. I wanted to ask you, do you think the American people are behind the commitment of troops for military action, and do you think -- this is a more serious question -- do you think that the number of casualties influences how they feel about something?

The President. Oh, it has to. This has to be the hardest thing in all of this job, and certainly in my life, and that is committing these splendid young men and women to tasks where you know there is that threat. I've never been so proud of anything as I am of the people in our Armed Forces.

A few years ago there was an entirely different situation. Everyone said the volunteer military wouldn't work. Well, it is working, and there is an esprit de corps, there's a pride out there among them. And this puts a lump in my throat. And then to -- even one of them, to have a horrible accident or incident such as the one in Lebanon, there just is no way to make that easy.

Now it's harder for them to understand Lebanon, because in Lebanon, they were not sent there to fight; that, hopefully, there would be no combat. We knew there was a risk because of the kind of violence that had been taking place in the streets over there for a long time. But the whole idea of the multinational force was in connection with our own peace proposal for the Middle East.

Lebanon was stalling that, if you remember. You had Israel and Syria both in. Israel had crossed the border because PLO terrorist units were attacking villages across their northern border from Lebanon. The Lebanon Government, as of several years ago, was virtually powerless in the face of what can only be termed warlords in their own country, of several factions, each with its own militia, fighting each other and fighting the Government. And you couldn't proceed with the peace mission until we resolved this problem.

So, we sent a force in with the idea that -- well, first of all, they'd gotten some 10,000 PLO out; now the idea was that both Israel and Syria get out, then a stabilizing force there while the Lebanese Government reformed and created a military force in which it could then take over jurisdiction of its own territory.

Well, the first blow was that the Syrians, after saying, yes, they would get out, said, no, they wouldn't. The Israelis were prepared to get out. Both sides wanted -- the idea was they would go out simultaneously. And so our force there is there for that purpose. And there wouldn't have been a shot fired by a marine or by our Navy or Air Force if they had not been shot at. And when that happened, I said wherever we send them, they're going to have the right to defend themselves and fire back.

The President. It isn't a case of whether we will escalate. That is up to the Syrians and to some of those rebel groups that are fighting the Lebanese military. But we have only fired back when we have been attacked. And I am hopeful that after this last exchange that the Syrians will decide that they don't want to go on on that path.

Q. But, Mr. President, if they remain recalcitrant, if they remain -- the Israelis have been bombing them and strafing them and haven't really budged them. If they remain the same and they remain shooting at our reconnaissance flights and downing more fliers, what is the next step?

The President. Well, we're taking the next step right now. Don Rumsfeld [President's Personal Representative in the Middle East] is on his way back there, and we still are going to try for a political solution. We're going to try to negotiate with the Syrians and make them understand.

The President. Well, that becomes a kind of a hypothetical question in which I almost have to wait and see what the circumstances are. Actually, the Lebanese military -- which we have helped to train and have equipped and which is a very good military force -- is supposed to be resolving the situation for themselves as we try to maintain a little stability in Beirut while they can go forward and do this.

Q. Do you see a day, either in your own -- in your next term, for instance, or in the very near future, where President Assad could be as, sort of, the dominant -- the present day dominant force in the Arab world; where he could become something like what Anwar Sadat became to us? I mean, do you ever see that kind of relationship ever being able to develop?

States, the more moderate states. I think that they are very ready for a negotiated settlement, continuing on with the Camp David accords and the U.N. resolutions. Syria is the big kid and the bad kid on the block, and the other Arab States have been trying, themselves, to persuade Syria to join in this effort and to withdraw. And now a new element has been introduced by Syria. They hadn't mentioned this before when earlier they said, oh, yes, they would get out, too. They now are not pretending that there is any assault on them or that they're in any danger and that's why they are staying there; they are now claiming that Lebanon properly is a part of a greater Syria.

The President. Well, any motion picture or any drama or play is based on one thing: It isn't successful unless it has or evokes an emotional response. If the audience does not have an emotional experience, whether it's one of hating something or crying or having a lot of laughter, then you've got a failure out there.

Well, certainly there was an emotional response to this type of horror film. But apparently it has not had a lasting impact; I haven't seen very much reference to it any more. And maybe one of the reasons was because it was -- [inaudible] -- it was a horror film, showing you what I'm sure all of us all knew, that a nuclear war is unthinkable, it is sheer horror, it must not happen. But it left you with no idea or solution, no suggestion as to what to do about it.

And I think that my own reaction to it was, look, if anything, if this can add to what we can say about the fact that there must not be a nuclear war, then maybe the people will understand why we're trying so desperately to get a reduction in those weapons worldwide. And I hope that if we start down the reduction road that the other side will see the common sense in eliminating them totally. Not since 1946 has there been such a suggestion, and that was made by this country. And even then, when we were the only ones, really, with a stock of such weapons, the Soviet Union refused.

The President. No. I think that it was high time that we got some realism and got people thinking that for too long we have kind of viewed them as just a mirror image of ourselves, and that maybe we could appeal to their good nature. And we've gone through the experience in a number of years past of saying, well, if we cancel weapons systems, if we unilaterally disarm, maybe they'll see that we're nice people, too, and they'll disarm. Well, they didn't. They just kept on increasing.

The President. Yes, because you have to look at the impact on what we were just talking about, with Lebanon. There they are with thousands of military advisers and technicians and so forth in Syria, have provided Syria with weapons that are not purely defense weapons -- ground-to-ground missiles that can cover virtually every target from Syria in Israel. And they are the ones that seek, whether it's out of paranoia on their part -- and, believe me, everyone's an enemy, and so they have to be aggressive -- or whether it is the Marxist-Leninist theory, more than a theory -- commitment -- that was handed them, and that was that they must support uprisings wherever they take place in the world to bring about a one-world Communist state.

Now, no Russian leader has ever refuted that. As a matter of fact, he hasn't had time yet, but every Russian leader up to Andropov, at some time or other, has publicly restated his commitment to world conquest -- world communizing.

Q. Let me ask you a question out of that. In the Jerusalem Post you were quoted -- and I don't know if the quote was accurate -- as saying that this generation might see Armageddon, that a lot of the Biblical prophecies are sort of being played out today, or could be -- [inaudible].

The President. I've never done that publicly. I have talked here, and then I wrote people, because some theologians quite some time ago were telling me, calling attention to the fact that theologians have been studying the ancient prophecies -- What would portend the coming of Armageddon?  -- and have said that never, in the time between the prophecies up until now has there ever been a time in which so many of the prophecies are coming together. There have been times in the past when people thought the end of the world was coming, and so forth, but never anything like this.

And one of them, the first one who ever broached this to me -- and I won't use his name; I don't have permission to. He probably would give it, but I'm not going to ask -- had held a meeting with the then head of the German Government, years ago when the war was over, and did not know that his hobby was theology. And he asked this theologian what did he think was the next great news event, worldwide. And the theologian, very wisely, said, ``Well, I think that you're asking that question in a case that you've had a thought along that line.'' And he did. It was about the prophecies and so forth.

The President. [Laughing] Not to the extent of throwing up my hands and saying, ``Well, it's all over.'' No. I think whichever generation and at whatever time, when the time comes, the generation that is there, I think will have to go on doing what they believe is right.

It's a lot easier to worry about someone else than it is to worry about yourself, and so I know what must go through her mind when I set out on some expedition or some public appearance or something. And I wish it didn't have to be.

Q. Mr. President, away from Armageddon and all this talk of dying, and back to 1984. Did you cringe when you had to sign the order to have your own aides take a lie detector test? And I'm curious: Have you ever taken one? And how did you feel?

We had a meeting that came up on national security -- rules and regulations of the security of the information there. And there was a leak. And it was a leak which could have cost some Americans their lives. And this is a criminal act when there's a violation of national security. And I called the Justice Department on this -- I thought it was serious enough -- and I said I want an investigation of how this happened, to guard against it in the future.

The President. I don't know. I don't even know whether the FBI even asked for them or not. They determine that, and that is within the law. And then if somebody says no, they report that also in their investigating report that they asked and it was refused. But I don't know whether any had been given or any had been asked for.

Q. I have two questions that I would -- not till Christmas. I'd like to ask two questions. What I was thinking, in this year of living dangerously, I wondered how in the world can you maintain the very obvious romance you have with Mrs. Reagan? I mean romance takes time, and it takes mood, and it takes not being harried. And what sort of special things do you do to maintain this togetherness in these tough times?

The President. Well, I don't know. We've always been very close, and there developed, as there would in 30-odd years, little things that kind of -- traditional, or that have a meaning to us from times back.

Q. Can you cite any of them that -- I mean, I think especially in your article in Parade, you showed how much you loved her and how much the romance continues and whatever. I just wondered if there's sort of small things you do to keep this touchingness together?

Q. Could I ask one more question for my mother, who you gave a story to last year, and we kept hearing from our readers about the peg-legged pig. Do you remember the story you told about the pig with the wooden leg?

It's a particular pleasure to have King Birendra back in our country for the first time since his student days. We hope that you will again feel at home and among friends here, not only at the White House, which you visited as Crown Prince, but throughout our country. And, Queen Aishwarya, this is your first visit to the United States, and we hope that our good will and hospitality will encourage you to return again.

The United States and Nepal are on opposite sides of the globe. We face different challenges, and our cultures symbolize the diversity with which mankind views the world. Yet our ties have grown stronger since our countries established relations in 1947. The vast distance which separates us is bridged with a miracle of modern communications and transportation. Our distinct cultures are linked in our peoples' common commitment to peace and human progress.

In Nepal, Your Majesty, you've set forth to win the battle against illiteracy, disease, hunger, and poverty. The challenges you face on the frontier of modernization are formidable. The very topography which makes Nepal one of Earth's most beautiful sites makes your task more difficult by limiting the amount of arable land and complicating communications. Although improved health and nutrition in your country has saved lives, it has also increased the pressures on finite resources. Education and information have expanded the horizons of your citizens, but have also raised their expectations.

Your development program, which began some 30 years ago, exemplifies the wise and progressive leadership provided by your family. From your grandfather's decision to seek modernization down to the present day, your people have been blessed by something money cannot buy: wise leadership. This, coupled with your country's hard-working people, tremendous hydroelectric potential, and access to substantial technical and financial support from the international community, all represent opportunities for dramatic progress.

American investment in Nepal's economic development during the next 5 years, including the funding of new agricultural research and training projects, areas which Your Majesty has identified as vital to improving the well-being of your people.

The Peace Corps will also continue its important work in Nepal. More than 2,000 volunteers have served in your country, one of our largest Peace Corps posts. The 180 volunteers presently there are carrying on their fine tradition of competence and compassion.

Nepal's efforts to build a better future. In the political arena your reforms are enlisting public participation in identifying national goals, thus guaranteeing that your people have a stake in their future. The United States respects these and other initiatives Your Majesty is making to develop popular institutions consistent with the spirit of the Nepalese people. There is every reason to be confident that your goals of economic progress, political stability, and national security will be reached. America is happy to offer encouragement and support in these noble efforts.

Your Majesty's moral leadership in condemning the Soviet invasion of Afghanistan is much appreciated here. We should not forget the heroism of the Afghan people in their fight for the freedom and independence of their country.

We're also grateful for the courage your nation has shown in the cause of peace. Nepal has been willing to do more than just cast a ballot at the United Nations. It has volunteered its military personnel to serve in some of the world's most troubled areas, giving depth and meaning to Nepal's commitment to peace. The world needs more nations like Nepal which are willing to help shoulder the burden of preserving peace as well as advocating it in world forums.

The King. Mr. President, Mrs. Reagan, ladies and gentlemen, I'd like to thank you, Mr. President and Mrs. Reagan, for this welcome ceremony and for the warmth with which my wife and I, along with the members of my entourage, have been received here. I also wish to convey to you -- and through you, to the Government and people of the United States -- greetings and good wishes of the Government and people of Nepal.

I do not feel a complete stranger to this land. Indeed, I come to you in the spirit of a friend who has had the benefit of studying in one of your leading institutions of learning. Inspired as Nepal and the United States are by the common goals of striving for freedom and dignity of man, it is also a fulfilling experience for me to be back here again.

Mr. President, few things in the history of man have been as eventful as the discovery of this new-found land. It gave birth to a republic known not only for its inspiring ideals but also for the most epoch-making feats of scientific endeavor. Viewed from this angle, America stands on the very forefront of modern history. Indeed, what the United States represents is a harmonious amalgam of high human and material achievements rarely surpassed elsewhere in the world. As a nation that has brought about such profound changes, it is only natural to look up to this country in joining hands with the rest of the world to herald a new age of peace, understanding, friendship, and prosperity for all.

Committed as we are in Nepal to these ideals, we hold you, Mr. President, in high esteem and wish to see the United States as a bulwark of peace and stability, cherishing the belief that all nations of the world -- whether big or small, rich or poor, developed or developing -- must have a place under the Sun.

It is in this spirit that I look forward to exchange views with you, Mr. President, on matters of mutual interest. I also hope to meet other leaders and seek the opportunity to renew my acquaintances with friends that I have known. I'm confident that our visit to this country will be fruitful as well as memorable.

We have great respect and admiration for Lech Walesa, the courageous leader of Poland's free trade union movement. We shall give immediate and serious consideration to the issues he has raised and will consult closely with our allies on this matter.

Well, Your Majesties, honored guests, ladies and gentlemen, today King Birendra and I had the opportunity to review our bilateral relations and to discuss our international concerns. We also had the chance to get to know one another as individuals. I'm pleased to inform you tonight that not only are relations between Nepal and the United States good, but King Birendra and I have each discovered a new friend.

Our discussion of bilateral relations revealed a refreshing lack of difficulties. Notwithstanding the great distance that separates our two nations, Nepal and the United States through the years have enjoyed a particularly amicable relationship. We prefer to think of you, Your Majesties, as neighbors on the other side of the world. We're so pleased that you've made this neighborly visit.

Your Majesty, the highest mountain on our planet, Mount Everest, is in Nepal. So are 8 of the world's 10 highest peaks. And the character of your people, the sincerity of your convictions stand as tall and strong as your mountains.

Any American who's visited Nepal returns home in awe, not only of the majestic beauty of your land but also of the religious strength of your people. There are countless religious shrines in Nepal -- outward symbols of your country's greatest strength. And, Your Majesty, this spiritual side which is so important to your nation speaks well of you and your countrymen.

Today we had the opportunity to discuss a proposal of which you and your people can be rightfully proud. Through the Nepal Zone of Peace concept, you're seeking to ensure that your country's future will not be held back by using scarce resources for military purposes. We Americans support the objectives of Your Majesty's Zone of Peace proposal, and we endorse it.

The King. Mr. President, Mrs. Reagan, distinguished ladies and gentlemen, I'm touched by your cordial welcome and the warm words with which you and Mrs. Reagan have received us here in Washington. We're equally honored by the generous remarks you, Mr. President, have just made about my country and people.

Seen from Washington, Nepal is almost on the other side of the globe, and yet, as this friendly gathering here tonight shows, distance notwithstanding, friendship and cordiality based on shared ideals can exist between countries that are geographically far apart. In 1947, as soon as Nepal broke her age-old isolation by seeking friendship beyond her borders, it was with the United States of America that Nepal sought to establish her diplomatic relations.

Since 1951, the year when my grandfather, late King Tribhuvan, led the Nepalese people to democracy, we have looked to the United States as a land of freedom and fulfillment. The enduring ideals of the Founding Fathers of America, who spoke to men of liberty and independence, have inspired men throughout the world, including those of us living in the mountain fastness of Nepal.

In our part of the world, if America is looked upon as a land of gold, grain, and computers, a country of skyscrapers and space shuttle, she is also regarded as a nation committed to respect man and his dignity. A land of discovery, America has distinguished herself in being inventive, in breaking new grounds, and opening newer horizons of knowledge for the betterment of man.

With a country such as the United States, one wonders if Nepal has anything in common. On the surface, there may seem very little. Yet, as men living in the same planet, we have common stakes in the global peace, prosperity, and, indeed, the survival of man in dignity and freedom.

The Nepalese people join me in appreciating the understanding with which on behalf of the people and the Government of the United States you have extended support to the concept of Nepal as a Zone of Peace. This recognition, I assure you, will go down not only as an important landmark in the history of our relations but also as a testimony of your personal commitment to the cause of peace, stability, and freedom.

The initiative and enterprise of your people are exemplary. Yet, what happens in this part of the world sends its ripples even to the roadless villages of Nepal. We receive their fallout. When America suffers a temporary drought, millions around the world get affected.

Indeed, if I may seek your indulgence, I would like to mention something that on the surface may sound trivial, but sometimes it is the small thing that can bring about profound changes. The corn maize in Nepal was introduced from this part of America, as were the potatoes from the Andes nearly 300 years ago. These new crops not only altered our hill economy but even the mode of life, by making settlements possible in the mountain terraces of Nepal.

Evidently, we do not live in islands, but in a world bound in a nexus of interdependence. What happens in America ceases, therefore, to be a local event. The United States as such has shown a consistent understanding towards this and has assisted Nepal in stretching her hand of friendship and cooperation in many fields, including the building of infrastructures.

Moon. It is indeed thrilling to reflect that one can soar into space to explore the unknown and scan the stars. Yet these adventures into outer space would carry still deeper meaning if the part of humanity living in Nepal could also rid themselves of their continuing poverty. Herself, a least developed, land-locked country, Nepal has always sought understanding and cooperation from our friends and neighbors. In fact, since the time I assumed responsibilities, I have sought that the minimum of basic needs must not be denied to people anywhere in the world. In this regard, I take comfort in the reassurance that the United States will continue to extend cooperation on a long-term basis into the future.

This situation demands that we create an enduring relationship based on a sense of purpose and meaning. With Nepal and countries in her region willing to join hands with the United States and other international agencies in a creative effort for prosperity by putting into use a fragment of their human and capital resources to harness the water potentials of Nepal, it would not only enable them to walk over a long road to progress for our region, as a whole, but would also continue to build bridges of understanding between a most advanced and a least developed nation of the world. It would also mean eliminating the perils of hunger on the one hand, and the danger of instability and extremism on the other.

I have no doubt that Nepal and the United States can cooperate in many fields of creative endeavors. As countries that have shown respect to the uniqueness of the individual, we believe in the conservation of the natural as well as the spiritual heritage of man. But most important of all, we both honor the freedom of man and the independence of nations. In this regard, we appreciate the support the United States has shown consistently to our identity as a nation.

Mr. President, I cherish the fruitful exchange of views we have had recently with each other. You have been very reassuring, and I wish to thank you and Mrs. Reagan for the warmth of hospitality shown to me, my wife, and members of my entourage.

Excellencies, ladies and gentlemen, may I now request you to join me in proposing a toast to the health and happiness of President Ronald Reagan of the United States of America, and the First Lady, Mrs. Nancy Reagan, to the peace and prosperity of the American people, and to the further development of friendship between Nepal and the United States.

The President. I've been waiting for the sound to get a little less. I just wanted to say something, and then I'm not going to take any more questions, or anything. I've got to get aboard to go to Indianapolis.

But I just wanted to say something about this supposed breakoff of negotiations in START and call to your attention that the Soviet Union -- this was a regular adjournment; it was scheduled to take place -- and the Soviet Union, in departing, simply said that they were not prepared at this time to set a date for resumption of meetings.

But I thought also that it might be a pretty good time to state our own position on this and why we're going to continue attempting these negotiations. It was just 30 years ago today, on December 8th, 1953, that President Dwight Eisenhower made a speech on this very subject of nuclear weapons. And in that speech, he said, ``To the making of these fateful decisions, the United States pledges before you . . . its determination to help solve the fearful atomic dilemma -- to devote its entire heart and mind to find the way by which the miraculous inventiveness of man shall not be dedicated to his death, but consecrated to his life.'' And this administration endorses this view completely, and this is what we are dedicated to.

The President. Well, other than in this one, I think -- they're pretty careful about their choice of words. And all they said in this one was that they were not prepared at this time to set a date for when they would come back.

The President. He's taking that up with the ministers right there now, and I would support such a thing. I think that it would be -- and that would sort of answer your question, too. I think there's some preparation. There's been no indication from them of any desire for such a meeting. But Secretary Shultz meets Gromyko in Stockholm at that meeting. And we have not been out of touch. We have kept in communications in a number of levels.

Thank you, Secretary Bell, Governor Orr, the other Governors here, Mr. Mayor, other mayors, and the Members of Congress, the guests here on the dais, and you ladies and gentlemen. And a special greeting to the students who are with us here today from six Indiana junior and senior high schools.

Three days -- I have an uncomfortable feeling that the spot I now occupy could result in just being an echo of what has probably been said several times already. But it's great to be back in Indianapolis, and great to be back with Hoosiers.

Just, oh, 10 minutes or so coming in here, east of here, the clouds broke, and suddenly down below you could see the fertile soil of your wonderful State and those orderly farms. And it was somewhat different from an old story about a farmer here in Indiana who took over a parcel of creekbottom land that had never been cleared. It was covered with rocks and brush, but he went to work. He cleared the brush, he hauled the rocks away, he cultivated, he fertilized, he planted, created a garden spot. And then one Sunday, proud of what he'd accomplished, he asked the reverend at the church if he wouldn't drop by after the service and see what he had done.

For more than a century and a half, American schools did that job and did it well. Nearly 200 years ago, Massachusetts enacted the first comprehensive State school law in the new republic, and other States enacted similar laws. And soon America boasted the first public school system on Earth.

In the decades that followed, our rich network of public, church, and private schools performed a miracle. With the tide after tide of immigrants thronging to our shores, our schools taught the children of those new Americans skills to earn their livings, a new language, and a new way of life -- democracy.

And today our children need good schools more than ever. We stand on the verge of a new age, a computer age when medical breakthroughs will add years to our lives. Information retrieval systems will bring all the world's great literature, music, and drama into the family home. And advances in space travel will make the space shuttle Columbia look as old-fashioned as Lindbergh's plane, The Spirit of St. Louis. But if our children are to take their places as tomorrow's leaders we must teach them the skills they need.

And yet, today, some of our schools aren't doing the job they should. Of course, there are many fine schools and thousands of dedicated superintendents, principals, and teachers. But from 1963 to 1980, Scholastic Aptitude Test scores showed a virtually unbroken decline. Science achievement scores of 17-year-olds have shown a steady fall. And, most shocking, today more than one-tenth of our 17-year-olds are functionally illiterate.

First, we need to restore good old-fashioned discipline. In too many schools across the land, teachers can't teach because they lack the authority to make students take tests and hand in homework. Some don't even have the authority to quiet down their class. In some schools, teachers suffer verbal and physical abuse. I can't say it too forcefully: This must stop.

We need to write stricter discipline codes, then support our teachers when they enforce those codes. Back at the turn of the century, one education handbook told teachers that enforcing discipline -- and I quote -- ``You have the law back of you. You have intelligent public sentiment back of you.'' We must make both those statements true once again.

Second, we must end the drug and alcohol abuse that plagues hundreds of thousands of our children. Chemical abuse by young people not only damages the lives of individual users; it can create a drug culture at school. We need to teach our sons and daughters the dangers of drug and alcohol abuse, enforce the law, and rehabilitate the users. Whatever it takes, we must make certain that America's schools are temples of learning, and not drug dens.

Third, we must raise academic standards. Today, 35 States require only 1 year of math for a high school diploma; 36 require only 1 year of science. Many exchange students from foreign countries -- Japan, West Germany, and others -- are quick to point out that our academic standards are not as tough as theirs.

They used to visit the capitol in Sacramento every once in -- well, every year. And I would have the exchange students in. And as Governor, I had one question I would always ask them. And I would flinch a little, because I knew the answer. I would ask them how our schools compared to theirs. And it would always be the same. There'd be kind of some sly exchanges of smiles, and then they'd begin to giggle, and then they would inform me how hard school was back where they came from and what a vacation this had been being here.

Our sons and daughters need to do more work, to do better work, and to spend more time in school. Now, that's not a prescription for gloomy students. Instead, educators have found again and again that when students know their parents and teachers believe them capable of a great deal and expect them to perform accordingly, students gain self-confidence, enjoy their work, and live up to those high expectations.

Fourth, we must encourage good teaching. Teachers should be paid and promoted on the basis of their competence and merit. Hard-earned tax dollars should encourage the best. They have no business rewarding mediocrity.

Fifth, we must restore parents and State and local governments to their rightful place in the educational process. Decisions about discipline, curriculum, and academic standards, the factors that make a school good or bad, shouldn't be made by people in Washington. They should be made at the grassroots, by parents, teachers, and administrators in their communities.

And sixth and last, we must teach the basics. Too many of our students are allowed to abandon vocational and college prep courses for general ones. So, when they graduate from high school they're prepared for neither work nor higher education. And compared to other industrialized countries, we're slipping far behind in such basic areas as in the sciences and math. In Japan, specialized study in mathematics, biology, and physics starts in sixth grade. In the Soviet Union, students learn the basic concepts of algebra and geometry in elementary school. So, Japan, with a population only about half the size of ours, graduates from college more engineers than we do, while the Soviet Union graduates from college almost five times more engineering specialists than we do.

But it isn't just basic subjects that need to be taught; it's also basic values. I believe that unless we educate our children all that we are -- the great devotions, the crucial writings, and the technical knowledge that have permitted millions to live in abundance and freedom -- then all these successes are in jeopardy. If we fail to instruct our children in justice, religion, and liberty, we will be condemning them to a world without virtue. They'll live in a twilight of civilization where great truths were forgotten.

In schools across the country, students are being taught the dangers of nuclear weapons and the burdens of national defense. Well, let's make certain they understand not only the price of defending America but the price of failing to. As students from St. George's University School of Medicine learned in Grenada, freedom is not free. It can be easily lost, but is worth sticking up for.

One other idea at the core of our basic values. I just have to believe that the loving God who has blessed this land should never have been expelled from America's classrooms. When we open ourselves to Him, we gain not only moral courage but intellectual strength. If the Members of Congress can start each day with a moment for prayer and meditation, so can our children in their schools.

I've directed the Departments of Justice and Education to find ways that we can help teachers and administrators enforce discipline. And this afternoon, I'm delighted to announce a new program to recognize outstanding students, the President's Academic Fitness Awards. These awards will be modeled on the Presidential Physical Fitness Awards begun under President Johnson. I'll be appointing a Commission on Academic Fitness to work out the details of the program with our nation's educators, and I look forward to presenting the first awards at the White House.

Since 1980 more than half of our 16,000 school districts have increased the number of credits they require in such basic subjects as English, science, and math. Almost 40 percent are set to raise their standards by 1985. Today, all 50 States have task forces on education; 44 are increasing graduation requirements; 42 are studying improvements in teacher certification; and 13 are establishing master teacher programs.

State by State, success stories are mounting. In Mississippi last December, the legislature passed a bill to improve teachers' pay and, for the first time since the fifties, implement compulsory school attendance. In Iowa, where only 1,560 high school students took calculus last year, the State is putting together a program of incentives for students who take upper-level math and science courses. In Tennessee, Governor Lamar Alexander has proposed a Better Schools Program that would beef up teaching in math and science and provide pay incentives for excellent teachers.

In New Jersey, Governor Tom Kean has a proposal that deserves wide support. Under his plan, the New Jersey board of education would allow successful mathematicians, scientists, linguists, and journalists to pass a competency test in their subjects and then go into classrooms as paid teaching interns. If they performed well, they would be issued permanent teaching certificates at the end of a year. And right here in Indiana, under the superb leadership of Governor Robert Orr, you've initiated Project Prime Time, a basic skills program for early grades. And you've increased high school graduation requirements for the first time in half a century.

The 50 States taking action to solve problems with efficiency and imagination -- this is federalism in action. You -- our Nation's Governors, legislators, school board members, school administrators, and teachers -- are meeting America's educational needs with common sense, vigor, and prudent use of taxpayers' dollars that Washington could never match. On behalf of the American people, I thank you.

I wish I could tell you all the success stories that I've heard about individual schools -- the 152 that received Secondary School Recognition Awards, so many others. Lincoln Park High, for example, used to be one of the worst schools in the city of Chicago. And then, District Superintendent Margaret Harrigan came along and turned it into one of the best schools in the State of Illinois. Today, Lincoln Park High boasts a school of science that offers a college-level course in biochemistry, a school of languages that offers French, German, Italian, and Spanish, and a tough 2-year international baccalaureate program that last year had 200 applicants for 30 places.

In my home State of California, El Camino High, in Sacramento, used to suffer from all the ills that plague so many schools -- drug and alcohol abuse, poor attendance, declining enrollment, low achievement. And then, El Camino principal, Dr. Joe Petterle, and the board of education put together a program designed to stress the fundamentals.

One measure required applicants and their parents to sign a form stating in part, ``(We) understand that El Camino High School will stress the basics, require homework, not have a smoking area, be a closed campus, require reasonable standards of dress, and have well-defined and enforced discipline and attendance policies.'' Today, achievement at El Camino is climbing.

A few moments ago, I spoke about the superb education American schools gave to immigrants in decades past. Well, I would like to close by reading an essay by a modern-day immigrant, a student who went to El Camino High. His name: Trong Bui.

And he wrote: ``As a Vietnamese refugee, I immigrated to America . . . with my family in search of freedom . . . . During this difficult stage of adjustments in my life, faculty members and students at El Camino . . . were especially important to me for without their invaluable help, I could not have progressed. . . . When I first came to El Camino, the only English word that I knew was `hello,' and I needed an interpreter to communicate with my counselor. But . . . this year I will graduate from El Camino High School with honors . . . . I have also been admitted to the California State University of Sacramento with honors.

An education that trains the mind and fills the heart with hope -- that's the treasure American schools used to give their students. And if all of us -- officeholders, school officials, teachers, and parents -- provide our schools with the support they need, I'm confident that in coming years American schools will give our sons and daughters richer treasure than ever before.

Your great success is a shining example of what free people working together can do. This cooperative effort between Americans and Europeans will add to our treasure of human knowledge and be put to practical use, improving our lives on Earth.

New horizons have been discovered and old boundaries pushed back. It proves that there's never a time when we should stop dreaming. We will continue to challenge our imagination and aim high. The ultimate frontier of space will be a quest for mankind's highest aspirations -- the opportunity for individuals, cooperation among nations, and peace on Earth.

Ladies and gentlemen, as you've just been told, I'm not dressed for the occasion, because I came by way of Indianapolis. [Laughter] And I'm delighted to be able to stop by here, however. And I thank you for that warm reception. It's an honor to be back with members of the AEI family.

Baroody, Sr. Tonight it's a great pleasure to return here on a happier occasion -- to give a salute to Bill, Jr., and to all the rest of you who have carried on so nobly and so well. As President Ford -- if he hadn't been here on his way someplace else -- would have borne witness, you richly deserve this 40th birthday celebration.

In the 40 years since its founding, the American Enterprise Institute has prospered by combining careful analysis with straightforward talk. You've demonstrated the crucial importance of limited government, a strong defense, and private initiative. Your driving concern has been the everyday citizen. And you've done everything that you could to help American families earn their livings and raise their children in prosperity and peace.

Well, today, thanks in large measure to your efforts and to that of others, America has cut the growth of Federal spending, pruned needless regulations, reduced personal income tax rates, passed tax indexing, and begun to rebuild her defenses.

Given the rate of inflation in the midseventies, the effective tax rate on real capital gains, in many cases, amounted to over 100 percent. Investment money dried up. Even one of the most brilliant minds in computers, Gene Amdahl -- one of the leading inventors of the IBM - 360 -- had to go to Japan for capital when he decided to start his own company.

Then, in 1978, we had a capital gains tax reduction, over the strong objections of the last administration. And in June -- or in 1981, I should say, we passed our own tax reduction package, which reduced capital gains tax rates even more.

Today investment money, so crucial to driving the whole economy and creating more jobs, is becoming available again. During the first 9 months of 1983 the venture capital industry raised some $2\1/2\ billion, nearly three times as much as in all of 1980. Together with our personal income tax cuts these capital gains tax cuts helped rescue the economy and start the recovery.

So, let me repeat something I've said before. We don't face large deficits because Americans aren't taxed enough; we face large deficits because government spends too much. And I welcome the help of the Congress to restrain spending, not to raise taxes.

I can't overstate the debt of this administration to you at AEI. You did so much of the intellectual groundwork for our policies. And to help put those policies in place you've given us over two dozen outstanding men and women to work in this administration -- our Ambassador to the United Nations, Jeane Kirkpatrick, our Ambassador to West Germany, Arthur Burns, our Chairman for the Federal Trade Commission, Jim Miller, my Assistant for Management and Administration at the White House, John Rogers, and many, many more.

Tonight I should tell you that with great reluctance I have accepted the resignation of one of your alumni, my Assistant for Communications, David Gergen. For 3 years he has served me with exceptional creativity, loyalty, and dedication. President Ford would have shaken his head yes in agreement, because he would have known from his own days at the White House, Dave is devoted to honest, open, and decent government. And we shall miss him. Happily I can also tell you that he's leaving to rejoin the AEI family and to join the Institute of Politics at Harvard.

In accordance with my desire that you be kept informed concerning the situation in Grenada, about which I reported to you on October 25, I am providing this further report on the presence of United States Armed Forces in Grenada.

Since then, the circumstances which occasioned the introduction of United States Armed Forces into Grenada have substantially changed. On November 2, the armed conflict in Grenada came to an end, and our task now, together with neighboring countries, is to assist the Grenadians in their effort to restore and revitalize their political institutions in a stable security environment.

States Armed Forces in Grenada, our forces are continuing to work closely with other components of the collective security force in assisting the Grenadian authorities in the maintenance of conditions of law and order and the restoration of functioning governmental institutions to the island of Grenada.

Armed Forces will continue to withdraw from the island as a part of a process whereby a peacekeeping force, composed of units contributed by friendly countries, takes over these responsibilities. I anticipate that this will be accomplished in the near future and that any members of the U.S. Armed Forces remaining in Grenada thereafter will have normal peacetime assignments, such as training, local security and the furnishing of technical services.

I am satisfied that the objectives of our operation in Grenada, including the protection of U.S. citizens, are being met successfully because of the valor and effectiveness of our forces. I ask for your continuing support as we strive to assist the people of Grenada in their efforts to restore peace, order, and human rights to their island.

Unlike many other countries which find their cohesion in cultural and social traditions, the citizens of our country find their unity and their heritage in the liberty that is shared by people with diverse cultural backgrounds.

Creator with inalienable rights. To secure these rights, it states ``governments are instituted among men deriving their just powers from the consent of the governed.'' Well, those words reveal the meaning of human rights and our philosophy of liberty that is the essence of America.

Sometimes we in free countries forget the richness of that precious possession. Our human rights are respected, so our freedom is almost indivisible -- invisible, I should say. There are no walls, no troops or guns to prevent us from traveling. There are no guards at our churches or spies in our congregations. And there are no censors at the newspapers or universities.

People who live in tyranny, however, can see freedom much more clearly. It shines like a candle in the midst of darkness, and America's freedom shines through a world of stormy seas, giving hope to tens of millions of people for a better way of life.

As Americans, it's our responsibility to speak out against blatant affronts to human rights. Yes, we must and we will speak out against the incarceration of Soviet dissidents in psychiatric wards, against the barbaric persecution of the members of the Bahai faith in Iran, against the racial injustice of the apartheid system in South Africa, and against the persecution of the Catholic Church and the Solidarity labor movement in Poland.

Just a personal note of regret: It's particularly unfortunate that Solidarity leader Lech Walesa, who has been awarded the Nobel Peace Prize for his valiant efforts to achieve peaceful reconciliation within Poland, feels that he cannot leave his own country to accept that prize out of concern that he would not be permitted to return.

American countries, the persecution of the churches and to the Miskito Indians in Nicaragua, and the resurgence of repression against national and religious groups in the Soviet Union, including Jews, Baptists, Lithuanian Catholics, Central Asian Moslems, and even members of the Russian Orthodox clergy.

We will, of course, maintain a strong defense, but an equally potent weapon against tyranny is to proclaim the truth. I think one of our great failings has been permitting leftist dictatorships to seize the initiative in the international debate. The adversaries of freedom allocate enormous resources to promote their brutal systems and propagate blatant lies. But we in the democracies, in comparison, have spent far too little to offer the world our message of democracy, human rights, and truth.

To turn this situation around, I've made supportive democracy a central goal of American foreign policy. And, specifically, to correct these communication gaps, we are significantly expanding the international broadcasting capabilities of the United States. We are strengthening operations of the Voice of America, Radio Free Europe, Radio Liberty, and we're establishing Radio Marti to communicate directly with the Cuban people.

Saint John told us, ``Ye shall know the truth and the truth shall make you free.'' Well, in many countries people aren't even allowed to read the Bible. It is up to us to make sure the message of hope and salvation gets through.

You know -- I should have brought it with me, although maybe some of you have seen it -- but I have a little book, about that big, and about that thick, that contains a verse or two, printed in small type in that little thing, from the Bible. It was smuggled out of Russia and was finally delivered to me as an example of what they do just to try and cling to their faith and belief, that when someone has a Bible, they then take just a verse so that everyone can have at least some words -- a few words of the Scripture -- and in something that can be easily hidden. And that, when we think of our own freedom, makes it very evident.

With us today in the front rows and on stage are a number of courageous individuals who've suffered for their belief in human rights and democracy. They come from countries which differ markedly from each other, and yet they're all heroes of the same cause. Their devotion to political and religious liberties unites them as it unites all of us who are committed to the freedom of mankind.

I note with sadness and concern that one hero not with us today, Dr. Andrei Sakharov, is reported to be seriously ill. This good and courageous man has struggled for years on behalf of human rights, and he's now banished to the city of Gorki -- supposedly free; he just can't leave Gorki. It's my hope that in the name of humanity the Soviet authorities will permit this noble individual to live his life in freedom and dignity.

In honoring these heroes today, we proclaim our confidence that good and decent people will triumph over evil. Dictatorships can pass away. On the right, we've seen it happen in recent years, in Spain, in Portugal, in Greece, in Argentina. On the left, totalitarian ideologies that brutalize human beings to rebuild mankind into that which it is not are destined to fail. Totalitarianism on the left, just like nazism before it, will be disgarded by a disgusted humanity. Much depends on us, but we can be confident that the tide of history is indeed running on the side of freedom.

To commemorate these advances in freedom, I am declaring December 10th, Human Rights Day, the week beginning December 10th as Human Rights Week, and December 15th, Bill of Rights Day. Let this be a call to action for all Americans. We must rededicate ourselves to respect at home for those fundamental human rights which form the basis of our self-definition as a people and a nation. We must also assure those brave men and women struggling for democracy around the world that we will be true to ourselves by supporting our common cause.

Americans have long honored the gift of liberty. So it is with glad hearts and thankful minds that on Bill of Rights Day we recognize the special benefits of freedom bequeathed to posterity by the Founding Fathers. They had a high regard for the liberty of all humanity as reflected by Thomas Jefferson when he wrote in 1787, ``A bill of rights is what the people are entitled to against every government on earth.'' In this century alone thousands of Americans have laid down their lives on distant battlefields in Europe, Asia, Africa, and in our Western Hemisphere itself in defense of the basic human rights.

The Universal Declaration, it was believed, would embody the consensus of the international community in favor of human rights and individual liberty. And the United Nations, it was further thought, would serve as the instrument through which the observance of human rights by governments would be enforced by the international community.

Thirty-five years after the adoption of the Universal Declaration, it is clear that these hopes have been fulfilled only in part. Nevertheless, the Universal Declaration remains an international standard against which the human rights practices of all governments can be measured. Its principles have become the basis of a number of binding international covenants and conventions.

Still, the fact remains that even as we celebrate Bill of Rights Day and Human Rights Day, human rights are frequently violated in many nations. In the Soviet Union, for example, brave men and women seeking to promote respect for human rights are often declared mentally ill by their government and incarcerated in psychiatric institutions. In Poland, the free trade-union movement Solidarity has been brutally suppressed by the regime. Throughout Eastern Europe and the Baltic States, the rights of workers and other basic human rights as the freedom of speech, assembly, and religion and the right of self-determination are denied. This same tragic situation also occurs just 90 miles off our southern coast. In South Africa the apartheid system institutionalizes racial injustice, and in Iran the Bahai people are being persecuted because of their religion. And, in Afghanistan and Southeast Asia, toxic weapons, the use of which is outlawed by international conventions, are being utilized by foreign occupation forces against brave peoples fighting for their freedom and independence.

As Americans recall these and other human rights violations, we should reflect on both the similarities and the differences between the Bill of Rights and the Universal Declaration of Human Rights. Both great human rights documents were adopted in the aftermath of a bitter war. Both envision a society where rulers and ruled are bound by the laws of the land and where government rests on the consent of the governed, is limited in its powers, and has as its principal purpose the protection of individual liberty.

Yet while the Bill of Rights was adopted by a Nation in which free institutions already flourished, many of the countries which adopted the Universal Declaration of Human Rights lacked free institutions. Since human rights are the product of such institutions as a free press, free elections, free trade unions, and an independent judiciary, it is not surprising that formal adherence to the Universal Declaration by governments which suppress these institutions has resulted in no real human rights gains.

By posing as champions of human rights, many governments hope to disguise their own human rights abuse. It was with special pleasure that I noted the recognition offered by the Nobel Peace Prize to Lech Walesa for his real efforts on behalf of human rights in a country where the government speaks only of the illusion of human rights.

Human rights can only be secured when government empowers its people, rather than itself, through the operation of free institutions. Because our Founding Fathers understood this, we are blessed with a system of government which protects our human rights. Today, let us rededicate ourselves to respect these rights at home and to strive to make the words of the Universal Declaration a living reality for all mankind.

These past several weeks have brought bitter tragedy and sorrow to all of us. The loss of even one of our splendid young Americans is an enormous price to pay. The number of dead and wounded is a terrible burden of grief for all Americans. It's un-imaginably more so for the families who have lost a father, husband, a son, or a brother. Their deaths are testimony to the savage hatreds and greedy ambitions which have claimed so many innocent Lebanese lives.

Lebanon's suffering began long before a single marine arrived. In the early 1970's many thousands of Palestinians entered Lebanon. Lebanon's fragile political consensus collapsed, and a savage civil war broke out.

The Palestinians also had a military, the armed PLO. Trained in terrorist tactics by Soviet-bloc nations and Libya, the PLO joined the civil war and attacked Israeli targets, villages and schools across the border between Lebanon and Israel.

In the midst of all this, Syria was asked to intervene and stop the civil war. In the process, it occupied a large part of Lebanon. However, Syria did nothing to control terrorism against Israel's northern border. Israel decided to neutralize the PLO and, in June 1982, mounted a full-scale invasion across the border. This resulted in another major round of fighting between Syria, the PLO, and Israel. Shelling and bombing pounded Beirut. Thousands more died.

Success in Lebanon is central to sustaining the broader peace process. We have vital interests in the Middle East which depend on peace and stability in that region. Indeed, the entire world has vital interests there. The region is central to the economic vitality of the Western World. If we fail in Lebanon, what happens to the prospects for peace, not just in Lebanon but between Israel and her neighbors and in the entire Middle East?

Once internal stability is established and withdrawal of all foreign forces is assured, the marines will leave. But because we care about human values for ourselves, so must we be concerned when freedom, justice, and liberty are abused elsewhere. That's the moral basis which brought our marines to Lebanon.

We have acted with great restraint despite repeated provocations and murderous attacks. Our reconnaissance flights have only one purpose, and the Syrians know it: to give the greatest possible protection to our troops. We will continue to do whatever is needed to ensure the safety of our forces and our reconnaissance flights.

The peace process is slow and painful, but there is progress which would not have been possible without the multinational force. Last May with our help the Governments of Lebanon and Israel negotiated an agreement providing for the withdrawal of Israeli forces. In September when the Israelis pulled back their forces from the Shuf Mountains near Beirut, Lebanese attempts to extend their authority into this area were met by violent opposition from forces supported by Syria. We will redouble our diplomatic efforts to promote reconciliation and achieve withdrawal of all foreign forces.

At a recent meeting in Geneva all the Lebanese parties agreed to recognize the present government as the legitimate representative of the Lebanese people. Talks have begun to broaden the base of the government and to satisfy the legitimate grievances of all the people.

Mr. Drake. I wonder if we could start right off on the Mideast, Mr. President. A Congressman said last week, after those hearings that they had on the Hill, that it seemed to him the marine force had become more of a lightning rod for attack than a peacekeeping force. And I was wondering whether you feel that the marines, in that particular position that they're in now, continue to serve a useful purpose, and whether you're likely to redeploy them.

Lebanon's request, this multinational force, that casualties could be avoided. But I have to believe that what is happening is an indication of the determination of some others to prevent Lebanon from having either peace or its sovereignty as a nation. And if there is a lightning-rod effect to the multinational force -- because this is happening to other forces there other than our own -- it is that their chances of destroying the peace in Lebanon would be enhanced if they could get us to go home.

The President. Meaning the forces. First of all, there are forces in Lebanon that are fighting not just with the new government of Lebanon but are fighting with each other. They have been for years. That's what caused the breakdown of Lebanon several years ago. But they're aided and abetted by others who have other ideas. The Syrians, for example, have made it plain that they believe that Lebanon is really intended to be a part of a greater Syria.

Mr. Drake. I think what I was getting at -- you said in your speech after the terrorist bombing on the marines that their operational role at the airport was to prevent the area from becoming a battleground. It would seem that it has become a battleground.

Lebanon, itself, was a battlefield, with thousands of innocent men, women, and children being slaughtered because of armed forces that were fighting in that congested city, using it as a battlefield. And remember that elsewhere, there was no stable Government of Lebanon. There were these other factions fighting each other.

The proposal was that, when finally the PLO -- which was one of the battling factions -- was ousted and left, that a multinational force would go in -- the idea that the two nations, Syria and Israel, would leave. Both had agreed to -- said that when the other left, they would leave Lebanon.

The multinational force was to be a sort of ``keeping order force'' while the Lebanese Government reinstated itself, developed an armed force that could then take over in these war-torn areas as those two nations left. Remember that originally, there was no quarrel on the part of Lebanon of Syria invading, because it was invading against the PLO. So, Lebanon actually invited Syria to come in and help because of this kind of trouble.

Now, the multinational force went in. I think there were a great many accomplishments. The fighting stopped. There was some withdrawal, and then Syria reneged on its agreement and has refused to leave. There is an agreement now between Lebanon and Israel, which Israel has agreed that it will leave. But it can't leave as long as it's threatened by the Syrian forces there.

The President. Actually the airport is probably not as hazardous as it might be to be where some of the other forces are that are out actually patrolling the streets, threatened by snipers and so forth everyday. But the importance is that's the only airport in Lebanon. If they're to have any communication with the outside world, if they're to have traffic back and forth -- including our own people, our own diplomats who are trying to help in this process -- that airport must be kept open. And they were there to keep the airport open.

The President. No. My function is only that the multinational force -- that includes the leaders of those other three countries -- that we must have a visible showing of our multinational force in Lebanon to perform their function. But as the actual tactics and locale, that I leave to the military.

We've had a direct military exchange with the Syrians. Are you worried that fears of war, of escalation will cause public and congressional support of your policies to erode? And what can you say to assure Americans that we are not about to be drawn into the kind of quagmire that it has been for so many other countries?

The President. We're not about to be drawn in. Let me call to your attention there's going to be no firing by the marines unless they are fired upon and they defend themselves. That's far different than going in as an aggressive force that is now going to advance and conquer territory. There's no intention on the part of the multinational force to do that.

The President. Certainly, I'm concerned. But I wish that some of those who are weakening in their resolve would recognize they're weakening precisely because that's what those who are committing the assaults on our forces -- why they have committed them. They feel that, if they can make enough trouble, that we will withdraw.

Mr. Drake. Let me ask you this to sort of interject. You know there was another terrorist attack on one of our Embassies this morning in Kuwait. You were reported last week to have made mention of a thousand terrorists massing, I think it was, in Lebanon. Is that an accurate report?

The President. Well, even you in the press have had some information that led you to print stories that worldwide terrorism, some of these -- [inaudible] -- on the increase and that the threats extend far and wide. You mentioned before about the casualties, the bulk of the casualties, the tragedies that we sustained in Beirut were from just one such suicide mission.

Mr. Drake. It was reported that when you met with the Citizens for America last week, you made reference to this large group of terrorists that had massed, I think, in Lebanon, you said. Do you or your officials connect the attack today to that?

Syrians' success in downing our two bombers had shaken the confidence of some Lebanese in us as a protector. Do you feel that's the case? And I also wanted to ask you whether you had any second thoughts about older aircraft being used for that mission when, as you've often said, we have the New Jersey offshore with its 16-inch guns.

The President. Let me set the record straight on that. All that I did -- I don't give tactical orders to the military when there is a mission that has been approved to be carried out. All I said was that I hoped that they would consider that and see if that was a viable alternative, because it wouldn't present more of a safety factor. And the decision, for a number of actual tactical reasons, was that the airstrike -- for one thing, the forces that we were going after are mobile. And there would be no way just in an artillery attack to know whether we're still shooting at them or not, or whether they've gone someplace else.

I don't believe -- the beginning of your question -- I don't believe that there's been any lessening on the part of the Lebanese in their trust in the multinational force or their belief that it is essential.

The President. Well, the Syrians immediately jumped onto the bandwagon of propaganda. But they haven't reported anything about the success of that mission. We knocked out a number of very important installations, including blowing up an ammunition dump.

So, yes, there were casualties. Yes, one of them was a complete tragedy. There were some things that -- the planning of that couldn't have been foreseen. The weather lowered in; they had to go in at a lower altitude. But, as I say, I think the mission accomplished its purpose.

Mr. Drake. What about the pact that we made with the Israelis? As Secretary Shultz is finding out, in the Mideast a lot of moderate and other Arabs are asking how can we say this doesn't undermine our credibility as a peacemaker, as an honest broker, in Lebanon and the Mideast as a whole, if we have now entered into this military pact with the Israelis.

The President. Well, I think that we have an answer to that and have been giving the answer to them on this. This relationship with the Israelis is something that we've had since 1948. And a restatement of it or a dealing with some specifics with the new government now in Israel is a natural thing to do.

But the net point is that at the same time we're doing that, we are working with the moderate states. For example, one thing that was mentioned was the possibility of joint maneuvers. Well, we've had joint maneuvers with some of the other Arab States. We have, regularly, joint maneuvers with Egypt. We have forces in other places there.

The President. No, there's a difference of opinion on that, and it has existed since Camp David, on the settlements. But we made our position plain that we still believe that that should stop -- that is one of the subjects for negotiation in a peace process. But we did tell them what we were going to do with regard to other Arab States who also require some of the same kind of cooperation that we're giving Israel, and we're going to do that.

The President. I don't know that there's any sign that they want a confrontation, particularly with us. But there's no question about their interest in the Middle East, and there's no question but that where there is trouble of any kind, they don't mind stirring the pot.

Middle East. It is a place of strategic importance to, particularly, the Western World -- Europe and Japan. Where would they turn to, what would they do if suddenly a force should shut off the energy supply that comes from the Middle East?

East. And you can't ignore the things that, as I say, that they've done in Yemen and Ethiopia, there in the horn of Africa. You can't ignore Afghanistan. You can't ignore the divisions that they have at the border of Iran.

Mr. Drake. On a completely different aspect of the Middle East, I've listened to you for many years, and you always spoke with emotion about the PLO. What are your thoughts on the fate of Arafat -- you know, where he stands today, and also on the specific issue of whether Israel, us, or the U.N. should provide guarantees for him to leave the country?

The President. I don't know. We haven't communicated directly -- or I haven't -- with them on this point and their now sudden statement about this. But I have to say that we had evidence that Arafat -- remember, he is one of those who has, as some Arab States have, declared that Israel has no right to exist as a nation, that it was war to the death with them. But then he modified that position in his discussions with King Hussein of Jordan, with regard to negotiations for peace, and then was overruled by his own people, which must have been the growing prominence of that radical force in the PLO that has been fighting him.

Now, it's a case of will the real Mr. Arafat stand up. I don't know whether he has lost any leadership in the PLO. I don't know whether that modification still exists or whether he is willing to go further with that. I think that he would find great support among the PLO. I think the PLO people, the Palestinians on the West Bank are more moderate and don't want war. They want a peaceful solution to their problems.

Mr. Drake. There's one thing I have to ask which is on the question of Ed Meese's comments the other day. I'm sure you've read it. I'm sure you read the controversy, all the reaction from the Democrats. I wonder if you could tell me your feelings about that and in specific whether you agree with his assertion that there's considerable information that some people who can afford to do otherwise are going to soup kitchens for free food?

Let me preface it by saying one thing: As long as there is one person in this country who is hungry, then that's one person too many, and something must be done about it. And I happen to know that Ed Meese agrees with that.

Now, we ourselves are the ones who have encouraged this getting into the picture of private groups, church groups, others in providing meals and the food centers. I've visited some of them myself around the country. We have contributed surplus foods to these people and to these food centers to help in what they're doing.

The President. We have found -- first of all, we are spending more on nutrition in this country than has ever been spent before in the history of the country. More people are getting food stamps than have ever gotten them before. I rejoice in these private groups, because there are more of those helping than have ever helped before.

But what he probably was trying to point out is that any time you've got a program of this kind -- how do we find cheaters on welfare, people that are getting welfare and being supported by their fellow citizens who don't really have a need and who should not be there. Well, isn't it logical to suggest that people of the same train of mind are going to take advantage of those who are privately trying to help? Now, the situation is that those private groups have no way of checking on the credentials of someone who comes there. They have opened their doors to invite those in -- the hungry in.

Now, this leads to why we have a commission -- and that, too, has been distorted, I'm afraid, in the accounting or the recounting of the -- the press and others have, every once in a while on an annual basis, have brought up finding an individual or people or a family that is doing without and that is hungry. I want to know why, because I know what we're doing; I know what the private sector's doing. And this commission was sent out not to find out if there's hunger in America; it was sent to find out how widespread is this. How many people are there who are suffering this?

The President. I haven't heard anything about that -- such a thing. I have to say that I don't inquire too much. I have a great faith in our security forces and I -- like the military, I leave them to do what they believe in their own best judgment.

The President. Well, in Kuwait, for example? [Laughter] This is the problem with worldwide terrorism. We do have some information on what they have threatened, their activities worldwide, and there are precautions that have to be taken.

The President. Well, yes. I have my own idea of one of the things about this terrorism. It's almost an impossible thing to detect and confine, but I believe that the countries and the groups in whose name the terrorists are operating have a responsibility.

For example, in this in Kuwait, if this is an Iranian group -- claims that this is part of a holy war and this is being done in the interest of the Government of Iran, then I think Iran has a responsibility to curb and curtail these things being done in their name, just as I would feel that if somebody went out doing these things and said they were doing them in the interest of the United States, I would feel that I had a responsibility to corral them and stop them.

I have to tell you that back in Hollywood I was warned that I should never share the spotlight with small children or animals. They would upstage you and steal the scene every time. But there was never a word of warning about sharing the stage with a presentation such as we've just seen.

May I just say when Americans see this, they're going to feel a deep pride in themselves, in their country, and a sense of humble gratitude for their fellow citizens whose deeds were memorialized in this production. My congratulations and thanks to everyone who made this film possible.

America that is morally strong with a creed and a vision. We are such people. This is what has led us to dare and to achieve. For us values count. They are the wellspring of our American way of life, the real meaning of the Hall of Honor -- service to country, patriotism, honor, and sacrifice.

Last week in Beirut, there was a need. Six marines heard that four of their buddies were in trouble. They went to help. Fifteen minutes later, eight fine, young Americans had added their names to the long list of those who have given their lives for their country. There was a need.

The price of freedom is high, but never more costly than the loss of freedom. And freedom, we must always remember, is never more than one generation away from extinction. Each generation must do whatever is necessary to preserve it and pass it on to the next, or it will be lost forever.

We must deal with the world as it is and not the way we would like it to be. If we turn a blind eye and a deaf ear when totalitarian regimes brutalize the hopes and dreams of people, we demean the valor of every person who struggles for human dignity and freedom. And we also demean all those who have given that last full measure of devotion.

The quest for freedom continues to build. There is a revolution going on in this world, a revolution for freedom and democratic ideals. It may not capture the headlines, but it is there, and it's growing. That is the real message of our time, and it may just be the reason why those who don't like to hear the truth are so worried.

History doesn't offer many crystal clear lessons for those who manage our nation's affairs, but there are a few. And one of them surely is a lesson that weakness on the part of those who cherish freedom inevitably brings a threat to that freedom. Tyrants are tempted. With the best intentions, we have tried turning our swords into plowshares, hoping that others will follow. Well, our days of weakness are over. Our military forces are back on their feet and standing tall.

Modern equipment is being delivered to troops, and more is on the way. The mobility and firepower of our ground forces are being strengthened with up-to-date equipment. And no longer is the American military being asked to defend freedom with equipment from wars past. I'm also pleased to report that training and readiness rates have really soared. Too often, we forget that the bulk of our defense dollars are spent to keep the troops well-trained, equipment in working order, spare parts and ammunition on hand.

And we do none of this because we seek war. Indeed, we hope we will preserve the peace. But when our citizens are threatened, it is government's responsibility to go to their aid, as we did in Grenada.

Our forces had what they needed to get the job done. And now the world knows that when it comes to our national security, the United States will do whatever it takes to protect the safety and freedom of the American people.

May I just say that, as of this morning, 950 of the 82d Airborne are enplaned on their way back to this country -- the last of the combat troops in Grenada. What are known as military service force -- engineers, Seabees, medical personnel, and military police -- will stay there in a detachment to help that country get back on its feet, and to replace and rebuild things that need replacing and rebuilding.

On wonderful thing is that today when you see a young man or woman in uniform, they chose to wear that uniform. And they wear it with honor. And they serve their country because they're proud to do so. And I know that our service men and women feel that it is an honor. And I hope this makes you as proud as it does me. From Grenada to Lebanon to the Demilitarized Zone of Korea to the NATO line in Europe, young Americans are carrying on in the finest tradition of those before them. They care; they understand; and they continue to give willingly of themselves.

There was a recent article in a Newsweek magazine that made the point very well. A 40-year-old father with five sons noted that he grew up in a generation where the military service was to be avoided. The recruiting stations were places to stage protests. Now his eldest son, in college, wants to be all that he can be, one of the select few. Each trip to the recruiting office generates enthusiasm among his younger brothers, who are proud of their older brother.

The father wrote in that article, ``My children somehow have settled on a place where it is their assumption that this country is right and just unless they are shown otherwise.'' Well, his children believe the basic values that made America great, God bless them.

And here today, with all of you who believe those values so much that you went beyond the call of duty in defending them -- many like you are no longer with us. They will be honored and remembered not just because you and they heeded the call of duty but because you and they performed above and beyond that call.

That's the meaning of this greatest recognition our country can give. Wear it proudly, because it is so much a part of what makes America unique in all the world. Yes, heroism in combat is recognized in every nation. But there is something in this particular recognition that is peculiar to our way of life. Maybe you'll let me illustrate it with a story.

World War II, I was in the Horse Cavalry Reserve, so it was only natural that when I was called up to active duty, I found myself an adjutant in an Air Corps post. [Laughter] The post happened to come directly under Air Corps Intelligence, so the general orders and all the citations from every branch of the service came over my desk. And I used to delay their arrival at the commanding officer's desk while I slipped them under my blotter so that I could read them in the leisure of the evening -- read those wonderful statements, those unbelievable statements of what individuals, all over the world in our Armed Forces had done, particularly those who were being cited for the Congressional Medal of Honor.

And some years after the war was over, I read where a man in Moscow had been awarded their highest honor, their gold medal, but apparently they don't give citations as we do to tell what the medal was awarded for. This man was a Spaniard, had lived in Moscow for 4 years. He'd been a refugee from the Spanish Civil War. He was an interpreter. There wasn't anything in that to warrant his getting the medal. I discovered that 8 years before that he had been in Castro's Cuba, but apparently nothing there. But a journalist, who had the ability to research further than I did, came up with the total story. Before the 8 years in Cuba, he had spent 23 years in Mexico, in prison. He was the man who buried that ice axe mountaineers, mountain climbers carry in the head of Leon Trotsky.

And I found my memory going back to those things that I had read during the war, any one of them a thrilling story of heroism above and beyond the call of duty. But one in particular seemed appropriate at that time. A B - 17 coming back across the channel from a raid over Europe, badly shot up by antiaircraft, the ball turret that hung underneath the belly of the plane had taken a hit.

And as the men started to leave the plane, the last one to leave -- the boy, understandably, knowing he was left behind to go down with the plane, cried out in terror -- the last man to leave the plane saw the commander sit down on the floor. He took the boy's hand and said, ``Never mind, son, we'll ride it down together.'' Congressional Medal of Honor, posthumously awarded.

They in another society give their highest honor to a political assassin. We gave ours to a man who would sacrifice his life simply to bring comfort to a boy who had to die. I think that explains the great difference between our societies and the great significance of this particular award.

The bedrock of our strength is America's moral and spiritual character. Peace with freedom is the highest aspiration of the American people. We negotiate for peace. We sacrifice for it. We will never surrender for it.

There are no words to express how honored I feel because, particularly, of all of you and what you mean who made this possible. My feelings are also compounded by a little guilt. It's a medal for patriotism. But it's so easy to love America that I don't know whether you're entitled to a medal for doing that. But I do. And I must say, thank you very much.

Medicine, where he was elected to Alpha Omega Alpha, the honor medical society, and president of his class in each of the 4 years. He received his M.P.H. degree from the University of Alabama in Birmingham School of Public Health. He was intern and then resident in pediatrics at the University of Colorado Medical Center in 1974 - 1977. He is board-certified in the medical specialties of pediatrics and preventive medicine. He has served on many professional and community boards and is the author of several articles.

Well, John -- Governor Volpe, I thank you very much for this report. I thank all of you, too. I'm delighted that so many were able to join us for this important event. Secretary Dole, distinguished Members of Congress, members of our Commission, concerned parents and all who've worked so hard to prevent drunk and drugged driving -- and, of course, the surprise, Elizabeth, that you had here, I'm most grateful for that. And I'm going to take it back to the office, and I'm going to read all those names that are on that long sheet of paper, I assure you.

Well, you've seen the beautiful Christmas decorations that are already up here in Washington. One of my favorites is the banner down near the National Christmas Tree. It says, ``Peace on earth to men of good will.'' A little change in the usual expression there, but I think it's pretty suitable. We as Americans across the country, as we begin to gather with family and friends, today we're helping to make this holiday season what it ought to be -- a time of peace and not of tragedy.

Drunk or drugged driving accounts for annual costs of over $20 billion in medical and rehabilitation costs, insurance payments, and lost production. There was a higher figure on the air last night given on some of the news, much higher, several times higher than that for the total cost if you added in a number of other elements, all of them which could be associated with alcohol and the abuse of it.

Each year drunk or drugged drivers cause half of all the highway fatalities, injure some 700,000 men and women and children. For those between the ages of 16 and 24, alcohol-related crashes represent the leading cause of death. I know the members of the committee have found out all of these statistics.

Last year, when we observed National Drunk and Drugged Driving Awareness Week, I said that if we worked hard enough we'd make progress, and as John just told us, we have. Twenty-two States and the District of Columbia have enacted tougher drunk-driving laws. And in part, because of those actions last year the highway death toll in America did drop, and the total drop was 10 percent.

Reports so far this year show that the annual death toll is still dropping, and again John gave us the figures on that. And the credit for this great achievement goes to you here today and to thousands of others throughout our country -- have so diligently pursued community and legal action to end drunk driving.

On behalf of the American people, I thank you. Let me also say a word of thanks to the members of our Commission on Drunk Driving. You've done an outstanding job, both in heightening public awareness of the problem and in developing recommendations for dealing with it.

And a special thanks to John Volpe. John, you've had a long career of distinguished public service. I could call you, as I did, Governor, because that's a title you get for life. Mr. Secretary or Mr. Ambassador, that's another title you get for life. But today, you're Mr. Chairman. And in recognition of the leadership that you've given to this Commission, and of your faithful service to our country, I am proud to present you with this Presidential Citizens Medal. Congratulations, my friend.

In proclaiming National Drunk and Drugged Driving Awareness Week, let's all do so with a renewed sense of commitment. Every accident that we prevent will keep fellow Americans from suffering and give our nation a merry, merrier Christmas.

Governor John A. Volpe has served the people of the State and this Nation with great distinction for three decades as Governor of Massachusetts, Secretary of Transportation, Ambassador to Italy, and Chairman of the Presidential Commission on Drunk Driving. His acknowledged success in each of these public service roles reflects his distinguished leadership qualities and high sense of personal commitment. His outstanding work with the Commission in its campaign against drunk driving is part of an outstanding career dedicated to perserving the lives and enhancing the welfare of all Americans.

The most serious problem on our Nation's highways is drunk driving. Drunken drivers kill and injure more people on the roads than any other cause. The cost of this slaughter is staggering, as much as $25 billion each year.

The drunk driving problem has stirred outrage among citizen groups, which have succeeded in arousing national interest in the problem. In response to these concerns, many States have set up task forces to examine their drunk driving laws. Several States have already enacted amendments to strengthen their laws. To encourage these efforts, I established the Presidential Commission on Drunk Driving in April 1982. That Commission successfully completed its work and has prepared a landmark report of its findings.

There is also a generally unrecognized menace in a category akin to the drunken driver: the drugged driver. The drugged driver is also a public hazard, perhaps less recognized because the cause of the individual's behavior may be less apparent. The driver who operates a motor vehicle while under the influence of mind-altering drugs also presents a significant danger on the roads.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this thirteenth day of December, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-three, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eighth.

The President. Good morning. I don't have any opening statement. But I just figured that it might be a good idea to come in here and get your questions now, and then I won't have to tonight at the press party at the White House.

Q. Mr. President, your Secretary of Defense has said that Syria sponsored and directed the attack against the U.S. marines in October. And many officials in your administration have said privately that Iran has been behind attacks in Kuwait and in Lebanon. My question, sir, is: Are we going to retaliate against the Governments of Syria or Iran?

The President. No. We have taken a position -- and it is our policy that if this continues -- we're not there to shoot first or to enter into combat. But I'm never going to send our men anyplace where they wouldn't be allowed to defend themselves. And it's been our policy that if they are attacked, they will defend.

Certainly, we're not there to enter into a war. And we continue to try and communicate and negotiate with them to let them know that, if they'll stop shooting at us there won't be any problems between us.

Khomeini ordered this -- but what we do know is that a group that has been taking credit for these attacks and has claimed that they're responsible for many of them is a group that seems to be of some size, that is definitely with an Iranian connection. Now, whether that's with the government or that they just are Iranians, and they seem to be -- well, they voice things that would indicate that they're interested in a kind of a holy war. They are a sect in the Islamic world.

Lebanon until that country had internal stability. Sir, that country -- respectfully -- has never had internal stability. Isn't that the kind of open-ended commitment that will mean many more marines dying and years and years of an American involvement there?

The President. No, I think we're making more progress than appears on the surface. And the original goal was the withdrawal of the foreign forces and then the reinstitution of the Government of Lebanon and helping them, as we have, to train and raise a force in which they can assume control over their own territory. The multinational force, they felt, was absolutely necessary. And they still feel that way, to be able to do some maintaining of order as they would then have to move out toward their borders once the foreign forces have gone. Now, this is still the goal, still the thing that we're trying to do.

In Geneva there was progress made where even those who are opposing each other within the country, the opposing factions, recognized the Gemayel government and agreed upon that government. Now, the thing of the multinational force, what I'm trying to say is, there are two ways in which they could be withdrawn. One of them would be if we achieve our goal. The second would, of course, would be if there was such a collapse of order that it was absolutely certain that there was no solution to the problem. There would be no reason for them to stay there.

The President. Well, we're getting into hypotheticals now of what the situation -- I'm simply saying that if there was a complete collapse and there was no possibility of restoring order, there would be no purpose in the multinational force.

But let me call to your attention that it's not just us, that all of the nations of the multinational force, within a matter of days recently, have reaffirmed their determination that the mission is sound and that we're all going to stay there.

Q. Mr. President, isn't there growing political pressure for you to pull out fairly soon, and aren't we -- have we lost our role as peacemaker and into -- a role of peacekeeper into a role of escalating violence? My question is, there are reports that you will pull the troops out before the political conventions this summer.

The President. I've seen those reports quoting unnamed sources again. Well, here's a named source, and I will tell you now, no decision that I'm going to make on anything of this kind is related to the election or the conventions or anything political. As a matter of fact, on all major issues I have reiterated more than once to our Cabinet that I don't want to hear the political ramifications of any major issue.

The President.  --  -- than putting our forces -- let me say -- someplace where these young men and women could be endangered. And, certainly, what we do in that regard is not based on any political consideration.

Q. We thought you were supposed to be in a budget meeting this morning, sir, although we're certainly delighted you came to see us instead. Does that mean that you've already decided the basics of next year's budget? Will there be a contingency tax as Secretary Regan suggested the other day? He seemed pretty solid on it.

No, we're not close to any decision. These are meetings in which we take up various segments of the budget, preliminary estimates and so forth. So, they can be handled anytime within the next few days.

But with regard to a contingency tax, first of all, I can tell you there won't be any tax in 1984. The thing is that's always been back of the contingency tax -- and I think this is what Don Regan was saying -- was that such a tax would only be considered on the basis of getting the spending reductions that we must have.

This whole matter of looking only at the deficits out there -- and I don't minimize them; I've been preaching too long, for a quarter of a century now, against deficit spending and having these deficits -- but the deficit is a symptom of the problem, a result of the problem. The problem is the Federal Government is taking too big a percentage from the private sector of the gross national product. And the answer to getting rid of deficits and not running up more deficits comes with reducing that percentage that the Federal Government is taking.

Now, if you get to the absolute point in which government cannot be any further reduced in size and cost and then it is still out of line with revenues, you would have to make an adjustment on that side. But if you would look at it actually, when a government is taking too much money, then it's got to match that with one of two ways: It's got to do a tax, or it's got to reduce government cost, one or the other -- or it's got to borrow, I should say. Now, either way you're taking more money from the private sector, whether you borrow it or whether you tax it.

Q. Well, sir, a number of economists, including Mr. Feldstein, have said that it's because of your military spending and your tax cuts that we have these deficits, and that taxes, some kind of taxes, are going to be the only answer.

The answer was said that, ``Well, yes, if the defense budget were reduced, and if you hadn't tried this tax thing, reduced revenues for taxes, yes, the budget would be -- or the deficit would be smaller.'' He did not say that it would be right to do those things, either to increase the tax or to reduce the defense spending.

Now, let me point out that some 20 years ago, during the Kennedy administration, defense spending was 47.8 percent of our budget. We are under 29 percent with regard to defense spending. We're spending about double on social reforms and social programs as to a percentage of the budget as was spent in those Kennedy years.

The President. Yes, we are trying to stay in communication with them. And I have to believe that they will come back, because it is to their advantage to come back. They stand to gain as much or more than anyone in coming back to those talks. So, we're still determined on the reduction, particularly of nuclear weapons, and I am determined that once you start down that path, we must come to the realization that those weapons should be outlawed worldwide forever.

The President. Are you trying to ask whether I'm going to be busy in 1984 or not? When the time is right, you don't go by what is a time period that is right for it. When there is an opportunity and evidence that we can achieve something, that there is an agenda that can go on the table in which some gains can be made for both sides, then you have a summit. You don't have one just to say that you've had a summit, because too many people get disappointed.

I believe the manner in which that's been treated by a great many of you is totally out of context with the entire interview which he gave. The policy, and my own feeling in this administration, is that if there is one person in this country hungry, that is one too many, and we're going to do what we can to alleviate that situation. And I happen to know that he feels the same way.

Now, one journalist the other night on one of the weekend talk programs said that we should be out on the front steps of the White House cheering those private agencies that are providing meals and providing evening dinners and lunches and so forth to the needy. Well, I may not be out on the front steps shouting, but you bet I'm cheering them. As a matter of fact, this is part of our private initiative program.

We've done everything we can to encourage this. Wherever possible, we have supplied surplus foods to them, because even -- whatever we've done, we're doing more to feed the hungry in this country today than has ever been done by any administration. More money is being spent; more people are getting food stamps. All of these things we're doing. But this private sector aid is essential also, because where government can justify providing the necessities, there is a need also, as there's always been, to help provide some of those things over and above bare necessity that make life worth living, and the private sector is doing that and doing it splendidly -- not only with the meals being served but with food distribution centers, and we're helping there also.

We get anecdotes that some of you have reported on, individual cases or something, of people that are hungry. What we want to find out is why. Is it a lack of or a fault in our distribution system at the government level? Or is it that there are people out there who don't know what's available to them or how to find their way to a government program? Or is there -- well, I think I've covered most of what it could be that they don't know how to find this, or that we somehow are bungling, bureaucraticwise, in making -- at a distribution. This is what we want to find out. Is there something we can resolve so that there won't be anyone, either through their own ignorance of what's available, or through falling between the cracks in a bureaucratic process, that we can resolve that and see that there is no one overlooked who's hungry.

Q. You don't think, sir, that those people were cheating who -- you don't -- the statement was that people might be going to a soup kitchen because they wanted to do it. You don't think that's happening?

The President. What I think was distorted in the reporting of that -- and that I'll only take because it was part of my statement; then I'm going to run before you ask any more questions -- that I think this is where there was something out of context. For example, we know that there are people who are not deserving of welfare who have been getting welfare. And one of our jobs has been -- and not too well understood -- to weed out, because every time someone who has the means and yet is subsisting on the help of their fellow citizens is doing that, they are reducing our ability to care for the truly needy. So, we try to clean up there.

Well, if that's true there, I'm sure that it must be true in these private groups. The difference is that these very worthwhile charitable efforts on the part of churches and community groups, unions, and others that are doing this, they have no way to establish eligibility. They can't set a rule and say, we're going to quiz you and determine whether -- they have to accept that people that come and ask for help must be needful. But on the other hand, if there are people who will cheat with regard in getting welfare, I think it's possible that some might be cheating in this other. But that doesn't mean that you close down the private groups, because I'm quite sure that the vast majority of the people who seek aid there, it is of benefit to them and their families.

This year one and one-half million Americans will suffer a heart attack, and nearly one million people will die from diseases of the heart. The economic drain on our resources in the form of direct medical costs and lost wages and production will exceed $60 billion.

These organizations have channeled their efforts and resources to reduce heart disease through such measures as prevention, diagnosis, and treatment; training of new research workers and clinicians; support for community service programs; and public education.

It is gratifying to note that mortality rates for heart disease and stroke are declining. Deaths from coronary heart disease have declined by more than 25 percent since 1972, while those from stroke have decreased by more than 40 percent. In large part, this favorable trend is the result of more Americans being aware of the personal risk factors for heart disease and adopting healthier life styles by changing their habits in such critical areas as smoking, cholesterol intake, exercise, and in controlling high blood pressure.

At the same time, science and medicine have made great strides in the past few years in technology to diagnose and treat diseases of the heart and blood vessels. The dedicated scientists and clinicians who labor to uncover the hidden causes of heart disease also deserve recognition.

Lifesaving technology now in the hands of physicians has brought about more certain diagnoses of these diseases as well as the means to treat heart conditions that in the near past were considered beyond effective treatment.

As we crossed and settled a continent, built a Nation in freedom, and endured war and critical struggles to become the leader of the Free World and a sentinel of liberty, we repeatedly turned to our Maker for strength and guidance in achieving the awesome tasks before us.

From the poignancy of General Washington's legendary prayer in the snow at Valley Forge to the dangerous times in which we live today, our leaders and the people of this Nation have called upon Divine Providence and trusted in God's wisdom to guide us through the challenges we have faced as a people and a Nation.

By Joint Resolution of the Congress approved April 17, 1952, the recognition of a particular day set aside each year as a National Day of Prayer has become part of our unification as a great Nation. This is a day on which the people of the United States are invited to turn to God in prayer and meditation in places of worship, in groups, and as individuals. Since 1952, each President has proclaimed annually a National Day of Prayer, resuming the tradition started by the Continental Congress.

I am providing herewith a further report with respect to the situation in Lebanon and the participation of the United States Armed Forces in the Multinational Force. This report, prepared by the Secretaries of State and Defense, is consistent with Section 4 of the Multinational Force in Lebanon Resolution. This report also includes the information called for by the House version of the Resolution and is submitted in accordance with its more restrictive time limits.

The President. Well, it's a pleasure for me to speak directly to you -- the editors, publishers, and news directors in 35 cities from Utica to Tucson. Gannett represents one of the most creative forces in American journalism today. And under your able leadership, Al Neuharth, Gannett has 85 daily newspapers, 13 radio stations, 6 TV stations, and a successful new venture that's reshaping the print media, your nationwide newspaper, called U.S.A. Today.

Now, I am going to take your questions, but I can't let an opportunity like this go by to say a few words about our economy and foreign policy with the hope that you'll share a few of those words with your listeners, viewers, and readers.

We've reduced the growth of government spending. We've pruned needless regulations and reduced personal income tax rates. We passed an historic tax reform called tax indexing that means that government can never again profit by creating inflation. And today, just over 2 years since these policies were put in place, we're seeing a vigorous recovery.

The prime rate is only a little bit more than half what it was when we took office. Inflation has plummeted to 2.9 percent during the past year. Factory orders, retail sales, and productivity are all up from a year ago. And during the past 16 months, the stock market has risen sharply, boosting investment in productive sectors of the economy and raising the value of pension funds that so many millions of our people depend on.

Unemployment is still too high, but last month it showed how fast it was dropping when it went down by nearly half a percentage point. Federal deficits pose a challenge, and some in the Congress are saying the answer is a tax increase. But it was tax cuts that gave birth to the recovery, and this recovery's boosting government revenues. Deficits are caused by government spending too large a percentage of the gross national product. The solution is for government spending to be reduced to a point that it neither causes a deficit nor interferes with the ability of the economy to grow.

Just as we're turning the economy around, I think we're bringing a new sense of purpose and direction to foreign policy. In Grenada we set a nation free. In Central America we're giving firm support to democratic leadership. And I believe that, thanks in large measure to the American example of what a free people can do, there's a rising freedom tide in the world today from Poland to Argentina and Venezuela.

In Lebanon the peace process is arduous and painful, but there has been some progress in spite of the continued horror tales that we are subjected to. Talks have begun to broaden the government's base and to satisfy legitimate grievances. And the goal must be internal stability and the withdrawal of all foreign forces.

As we pray for peace on Earth in this holiday season, the American people should know that, because we've strengthened our defenses and shown the world our willingness to negotiate, the prospects for peace are better than they've been in many years. I'm convinced that historians will look back on this as the time that we started down a new and far better road for America.

And, Al, could I just say, again, one other thing? I sure do like a press policy that is based on hope, legitimate hope, and not just undue optimism. I think the things that we've seen throughout the depths of this recession prove the quality of the American people -- that in the very depths of it, more money was given to charity and to worthy causes than has ever been given before in our nation's history.

Today the partnerships with schools -- we call attention at the national level to the problem in education, and suddenly business groups, communities, organizations are forming partnerships with schools throughout the country to help in whatever way they can. Name it, and the people, themselves, are finding an answer for it.

And I think you're right, that I think when you look at a TV news program sometime and the national news -- and they have to announce that unemployment went down by hundreds of thousands of people in just the 1-month period. And then they immediately switch to showing some derelicts sleeping on heating grates, and so forth, to take the taste out of our mouth of that good news that they'd just given is the only excuse I can find for doing that. But you must have some questions.

Steinbrenner is going by is the old baseball superstition that, you know, if you're pitching a no-hitter, don't say anything about it. That was one of the hardest jobs for me as a baseball announcer, when I was a sports announcer. The pitcher -- you're going into the seventh inning, and he hasn't allowed a hit. And I wouldn't say it; I wouldn't mention it because it's supposed to jinx him.

The President. Well, I don't know how far George went around the barn, but there was no conscious decision by anyone in his department over there or in the White House that said, ``Now, we must zero in and not let the press go.'' We only had 48 hours to plan that operation.

So, in that limited time, they planned what turned out to be a most successful and brilliant operation aimed at immediately getting to the locale of the some 800 students that were there and offering them protection, and so forth. And I was responsible for only one part of that. I said that this is going to be a military operation in which civilians are not going to sit back here in the White House or in the Government and look over the shoulders of the field commanders who were there on the scene, and they were going to run the operation. Now, it was only when some of you started squealing that I discovered that part of one of their decisions had been that they would go in without press.

I have to ask your understanding of this. The preparations that would have been needed, the word that would have had to go out, just offered too much of a possibility of a leak. I have found out that the White House -- I don't know how it holds the rain out. [Laughter] Sometimes I read memos in the paper that I haven't gotten yet. [Laughter] But we felt that it was absolutely imperative that we have the ultimate in security. We knew that a half dozen other governments knew because they had requested us.

I am going around the barn now, George. I have to tell you this, that even there while we had to have some contact with them, we did not actually even declare to them that we were going in, that we were going to do it or what our plans were. And it worked.

Now, I won't do -- in any operation of the same kind, I won't do what someone suggested, and that is that, yes, sir, we guarantee the press go along, and we put them right in the front row of the landing barges, so they'll be the first off. [Laughter] I won't do that.

The President. I think any deficit is too much. I've been preaching for the last quarter of a century or more that government -- well, we should have had the rule that Jefferson advocated back in his day when he said that the one thing lacking in the Constitution was a rule that the Federal Government could not borrow a penny. Now, you might have an emergency like war where you'd do that.

But deficits, deficits are the result of a disease. And to look alway and focus on the deficit and ignore what brought them about -- when you have deficits, the government is spending, taking too big a share from the private sector. And when it does that and over and above its revenues, you can go one of two ways: You can either borrow, or you can raise taxes. But in either case, you are taking more money out of the private sector when that's already what the trouble is.

So, I think that the answer to deficits must be control of government spending and getting this government back to a certain percentage. I can't tell you what that exact percentage is, but I know that we're taking too much now.

There ought to be a point that we can figure out is the optimum point at which if you go beyond that percentage point in government taking from the private sector, you are interfering with prosperity and with a sound economy. And once decided on that point, we do that. So, whichever way, borrowing or raising taxes, is just further going to harm the economy.

We need to zero in -- we've only gotten about 40 percent of what we asked for from 1981 on in spending cuts. If we had gotten all that we asked for, the deficit today would be $50 billion less than it is.

So, this is -- now, on taxes, yes, it could possibly be that in our organization -- it's hard to tell with a recession whether the tax structure that we have in place is sufficient to match what we think should be the spending outlay. Once, as recovery comes on and we're sure that it is definite and we can do some measuring, we can look and see, did we overdo? Is there room there for some tax increases?

So, what Don Regan was talking about was a contingency tax that says to the Congress, ``If you will make the cuts that are necessary and the cuts that we're going to ask for, and then that isn't enough, yes, we will have in mind, as a contingency, a tax increase, then, to flesh this out and go after the rest of the deficit.'' So, I feel that way.

Incidentally, let me just warn you about something that most people have forgotten. 1977, under the previous administration, they passed some social security reforms, and those called for years of increases in the social security tax, and those go all the way through the rest of this decade.

By the end of the decade, the tax rate is going up for social security to 7.65 percent from the employee and the employer. So, that's more than 15 percent. And at the same time, every year virtually, they're increasing the amount of income against which that tax is assessed. So, you're going to be having some tax increases, and they're not saying anything about those. I think what they want is, with people's tendency to forget, they want, are looking forward to the day when they can say, they're my tax increases. I didn't pass them, and I don't want them.

Q. The lowest Federal pay grade is 25 percent higher than the minimum wage is. We all have to live with the minimum wage as our lowest pay grade for the least jobs. I've wondered if you've considered reducing that pay grade to the same level we live with, the minimum wage, as the lowest point?

The President. No, I can't recall anyone has proposed any such thing or that we've even discussed that, but I would have to tell you that I believe a lot of our ills are due to the minimum wage. I think we have priced a number of people and jobs out of existence by making the price for them too high. And if you go back, figures will bear out that every time the minimum wage increases, there is an increase, particularly in young people who have no job skill to bring to the market.

The very least that we should do -- and we haven't been able to get any response from Congress to this -- the least that we should do is have two stages and have a lower minimum wage today for young people who are entering the job market for the first time and have no skill to bring to -- they're the ones that are sitting on the sidelines because no one can afford to hire them.

The President. Oh. [Laughter] Well, you'd get a lot of bureaucratic answer to that. But no, I think the minimum wage was really designed for the most menial of jobs, the jobs requiring no particular job skill, the entry jobs and so forth. And I think it's been overdone. And, as I say, it's caused some of our problems.

Let me say that the biggest percentage of unemployment that's keeping our percentage level so high is for teenagers, young people. And I sometimes think that this isn't a fair measurement of unemployment, because would it interest you to know that almost 48 percent of those who are listed as unemployed teenagers are presently going to school? They're looking for after-school jobs or weekend jobs. We all did. I did when I was in school myself. But to tie that, as a measure of the Nation's unemployment and -- is, kind of, taking our attention away from the real problem, which is the wage-earner with a family to support, the person that is out there with a job skill and no job to which he can apply it.

The President. On military spending -- I ran on the idea that we had been starving our military for so long that there really was a window of vulnerability. I think we've closed, largely, that window of vulnerability. We haven't closed it completely. We haven't caught totally up. But we've made a great difference.

Now, with malice aforethought, I asked Cap Weinberger to take that job. He was my finance director, for a time, when I was Governor, and he didn't earn the name ``Cap the Knife'' for nothing. [Laughter] But what everyone, particularly in the Congress, seems unwilling to admit is that they have been, themselves -- over there, under his direction, reducing the budgets as they find ways to save and ways to improve.

All these horror stories recently about the high price of spare parts -- those are our figures. We're the ones who found those high prices, and we're the ones who are doing something about it. And we've already had a number of indictments; we have had refunds; we've had dismissals of personnel -- we're getting at that. We sent some inspectors out that were mean as junkyard dogs, and they found that this was going on.

What numbers of personnel and all? And once you've decided on that, then you figure out -- and figuring just as sharply as you can with a sharp pencil -- what does it cost to provide that kind of national security? And if you've gotten it down to where all the waste is out -- and we've taken advantage of our reduction of inflation below what our anticipation was. I can tell that right now the defense budget that is presently being talked about has been cut by the Secretary of Defense $16 billion, before he came in with it.

I can tell you that when I started here, everyone said that we would have to reinstitute the draft, that the volunteer military would never work. Would you be interested to know that it not only has worked -- I get a lump in my throat when I see those young people out there, those young men and young women in uniform; their esprit de corps, their pride -- and would it interest you to know that we have the highest percentage of high school graduates in the military that we have ever had in our history, even back in wartime when we were drafting so many millions.

We have the highest percentage above average -- the average intelligence level in the military. We have a waiting line of people who want to enlist in the service. We have the highest retention now of noncommissioned officers. When we came here the first year, if we had gone to a draft, we didn't have enough noncommissioned officers to train the draftees, and that's all changed.

And I tell you, when I get a letter from a hundred marines stationed over in Europe, and those marines write me, as they did about a year ago in the budget talk, and say, ``If giving us a pay cut will help our country, cut our pay.'' I wouldn't cut their pay if I bled to death. The response from them, all of them, is just so remarkable.

Their pride, their -- I've made a lot of telephone calls lately, tragic calls to families of those who've lost their lives. And I hang up the phone in worse shape than they were on the phone. I've never heard such pride; I've never heard such willingness to accept that this was necessary. And I've learned that the hardest thing that a President will ever have to do, as far as I'm concerned, is issue an order that some of our uniformed personnel have to go into an area where there is a possibility of harm to them. That's the one -- that's the only problem that ever causes me to lose sleep.

But now I think that the military budget, the defense budget -- incidentally, when we set out over a 5-year period, we had expected to increase over the Carter projections for the next 5 years, that $116 billion. We have already, ourselves, cut $79 billion out of that $116 billion increase, and still we have a military that is further up to readiness -- well, you saw the result in Grenada.

Grenada came there at our invitation, and we had 40 of the military back from Grenada from all four branches. And to see them, all the same age, roughly, the medical students and the military, and to see those students -- they couldn't keep their hands off those young men in uniform.

I had some come up to me and tell me that when they were escorted to the helicopters and there'd been gunfire all around, that our men in uniform placed themselves in a position that if there was firing on them, they would be hit, not the students. They shielded the students with their bodies.

I've got a great deal of hope and optimism about the future of this country now, having weathered all the riots on the campus when I was a Governor, to now see the quality of these young people and their dedication.

The President. The Prime Minister and I have just concluded a very useful and a wide-ranging discussion of some of the most crucial issues that are facing the people of Canada and the United States and, indeed, facing people everywhere.

Prime Minister Trudeau briefed me on his recent discussions with leaders in Europe and Asia, on his concerns for world peace and disarmament and improving the East-West dialog. We fully share the concerns for peace which the Prime Minister has expressed. We appreciate his strong statements supporting the joint efforts of the Western allies to negotiate meaningful arms reductions and to promote dialog with other nations.

The Prime Minister. Well, as you have just heard, the President supported what is being known as my peace initiative. But I think he did more than support it. I think he has been showing through his administration and the past months, at least, that as far as we are concerned on the NATO side, we want to change the trend line. We want to make it clear that not only the alliance is strong, that it will defend itself, that it will not be intimidated but that it is also pursuing peace.

And if I were to tell you, for instance, that the President agrees that we shouldn't seek military superiority in NATO, we should seek a balance; that we do not think that a nuclear war can be won; that we think that the ideal would be to see an end to all nuclear arms; it might come as news at least to some of the press in Canada, because we haven't been hearing that. But this is what the President said at the Diet in Japan, and this is what our Foreign Ministers have said just a few days ago in Brussels, that we respect each other's legitimate security interests.

Whether this is news or not, I don't know, but this, at least in perception, is a complete change of a trend line which I saw when I embarked in my initiative several months ago, as one which was going downwards rather than upwards, which was -- to use Carrington's phrase -- which was characterized by ``megaphone diplomacy.'' In Brussels last week, there was no megaphone diplomacy. There was a call for dialog repeated two or three times in the message and in the communique.

So, I'm grateful -- not that I've said anything new this morning -- but I'm grateful that I was able to hear from the President of the United States, the leader of the alliance, that these are not just words, that these correspond to the intention of the alliance, and that the other side can know, the Warsaw Pact can know that we're not trying to be superior, we're not trying to not recognize their legitimate security interests. We just want them to realize we want to be at least equal in balance and that they should recognize ours. And I think this is a great step forward.

Prior to his appointment, Mr. Breger was associated with the Heritage Foundation as a visiting fellow in legal policy and is on leave from the New York School of Law, where he was an associate professor of law. Additionally, he was an associate professor of law at the State University of New York at Buffalo Law School and the University of Texas Law School.

I know there's a special feeling that we share when we push the button lighting up that tree. It's as if each one of those twinkling lights sends a new spirit of love, hope, and joy through the heart of America. And, of course, the brightest light of all is the Star of Peace, expressing our hopes and prayers for peace for our families, our communities, our nation, and the world.

Christmas is a time for giving, and as we reach out to family and friends, I hope we'll also open our hearts to those who are lonely and in need, citizens less fortunate than ourselves, brave soldiers working to preserve peace from the tip of Alaska to the shores of Lebanon, to the DMZ in Korea, families maintaining a constant vigil for their missing in action, and millions forbidden the freedom to worship a God who so loved the world that He gave us the birth of the Christ Child so that we might learn to love each other. I know they would welcome your expressions of love and support.

Many stories have been written about Christmas. Charles Dickens' ``Carol'' is probably the most famous. Well, I'd like to read some lines from a favorite of mine called, ``One Solitary Life,'' which describes for me the meaning of Christmas. It's the story of a man born of Jewish parents who grew up in an obscure village working in a carpenter shop until he was 30 and then for 3 years as a preacher. And, as the story says, he never wrote a book, he never held an office, he never had a family, he never went to college, he never traveled 200 miles from the place where he was born. He never did one of the things that usually accompany greatness.

He was nailed upon a cross between two thieves. While he was dying, his executioners gambled for the only piece of property that he had on Earth. When he was dead he was taken down and laid in a borrowed grave.

Nineteen wide centuries have come and gone. And today he is the centerpiece of much of the human race. All the armies that ever marched, all the navies that were ever built, and all the parliaments that ever sat, and all the kings that ever reigned, put together, have not affected the life of man upon Earth as powerfully as this one solitary life.

I have always believed that the message of Jesus is one of hope and joy. I know there are those who recognize Christmas Day as the birthday of a great and good man, a wise teacher who gave us principles to live by. And then there are others of us who believe that he was the Son of God, that he was divine. If we live our lives for truth, for love, and for God, we never need be afraid.

Well, Amy, the nicest Christmas present I could receive is helping you make your dream come true. When you press the button over here -- we're going over there -- the whole world will know that Amy Benham lit up the skies, sending America's love, hope, and joy all the way to heaven and making the angels sing.

I have to point out that, with all this talk about the supposed strain in relations, there is an inference that somehow it is our fault. But we didn't kill Russian citizens by shooting down a civilian airplane. We didn't attempt to conquer an adjacent country to ours. We didn't walk out on negotiations and refuse to give a date for when we would resume. If there is a strain, it has not been caused by us.

Q. Do you believe the extended absence of Andropov from the picture -- where under certain circumstances you might have been able to have a meaningful exchange with him -- is affecting this relationship with the Soviets?

We'll be at that negotiating table when the Soviets decide to come back ready to negotiate in good faith. We have never broken off communications. We have at several levels continued to meet with the Soviets -- and we are ready. I know, on the other hand, that the absence of Andropov must have had some influence on their side on exactly what could be done.

I believe that the Soviet Union has more to gain than we, or anyone else, in taking a look at changing the situation and, in effect, them joining the family of nations the way the rest of us have who are concerned with peace.

Q. Issue number two deals with the Middle East. A main concern is Lebanon. Do you believe that in 1984 it is going to be possible to withdraw our marines? And will it be feasible to do that only if and when a stable government is able to unify Lebanon?

The President. Yes, it will be possible to withdraw the marines in 1984. And that applies as well to the whole multinational force. Let me remind you why we sent the marines to Lebanon as part of the multinational force.

Our whole idea all along has been to bring peace to the Middle East area generally and to act as a kind of go-between to bring these warring nations together. But Lebanon stood in the way. You will remember that in the summer of 1982 Beirut was being shelled in every direction, and in 1976 the authorities there had asked the Syrians to come in and help keep order, because the Government of Lebanon was virtually nonexistent and powerless to do anything about it.

We believe that the purpose of the multinational force would be accomplished with the withdrawal of the other foreign powers and the establishment of a stable Lebanese Government, supported by a rebuilt Lebanese Army. We have done a fine job of training and equipping the Lebanese Army. It needs to be some bigger than it is. But it is a good and a well-trained force.

The idea was that as the foreign forces left and as the Lebanese forces moved out toward their borders to reinstitute control and stop the internecine fight, the multinational force would maintain order -- for example, in areas like Beirut -- because the Lebanese military couldn't do both. This is still the goal.

The President. I think that, with all that's happening, we're overlooking the progress that's been made. At recent discussions in Geneva, all of those involved -- even those who are presently hostile -- agreed to recognize the Gemayel government as the legitimate Government of Lebanon.

I don't say that the multinational force has to stay until all those foreign forces are out. I think that even if they gave an assurance that they're going to go and start the process maybe we could then leave.

The President. One of the hardest things, of course, is to prove that the terrorist attacks are sponsored by a government. For example, these groups that are taking credit for the recent suicide attacks are believed to have an Iranian connection. There is a faction of Iranians that believe in a holy war. We do have the evidence that Khomeini has spoken a number of times about advocating a holy war in the Moslem world to promote his type of fundamentalism. So, it's hard not to believe that he must, in some way, instigate or at least egg on those that are doing these things.

The President. I believe that if terrorists are claiming triumphs when they do these terrible deeds, acknowledging what their goal is and that they have a connection with some country -- then I think it's up to the government of that country to try to curb and control such groups. If some of our own terrorist groups commit these outrages -- such as the group that just bombed a naval recruiting station in New York -- it's our responsibility to corral them, find out who and what they are, and bring them to justice. But the same is true for all the other countries.

But the one thing we can't do is what so many people, even here in our own country, are advocating in the face of the terrorist attacks against our forces in Lebanon. That is to bring home the marines from Lebanon. If terrorism can succeed in its goal, then the world is going to find itself under the control of the terrorists. You have to stand against that and not let it succeed.

Q. Another issue; you're going to China in the spring. What, in your view, is going to be necessary to develop closer relations with that country, particularly in the strategic field? And do U.S. ties with Taiwan inhibit the process of improving relations with China?

The President. I don't think they do. I know that the People's Republic of China is uncomfortable with our position on Taiwan. But we have reiterated time and time again to them that the people of Taiwan are long-time friends and, in fact, once were allies of ours. We have recognized that there is one China and that its capital is Peking. But we believe that the differences between Peking and Taiwan should be settled by peaceful negotiations.

Republic has to speak out about this issue, but our trade relations and cooperation in the area of high technology, all of these things represent milestones and successive steps in improving our relations.

Now, the head of their government is coming here, and I am going there in the spring. We're going to find other areas where we can improve and increase our relationship -- cultural exchanges, things of that kind. All of this, I think, is on a good track. We've made some gains.

Q. Fifth: What strategy does the administration intend to pursue in Central America? Is it to underwrite the Government of El Salvador indefinitely? And in Nicaragua, is it to settle for nothing less than the overthrow of the Sandinistas?

The President. Our policy in Central America is regional. This is very much what the Contadora process is. We're supporting the efforts of the Contadora group -- Mexico, Venezuela, Panama, and Colombia -- to assure that democratic elections are used to settle the internal political conflicts and that verified agreements assure peace among the countries.

Now, as for the El Salvador Government: There has been important progress in recent years achieving democratic ideals, practices, and policy. They're beset by Cuban- and Soviet-backed insurgents who don't want that kind of government. They want the old-fashioned idea that we've seen for the last few hundred years -- the idea that if you have a revolution, it is only to exchange one set of rules for another set of rulers. For once, we've got a government there that says: ``No.

At the same time that the Government in El Salvador is fighting against this potent enemy on the left, they're being harassed from behind by small violent rightwing groups who want to go back to the old concept of government over the people, not by the people. So, we shouldn't be blaming the present Government of El Salvador for not being able to deal effectively with these rightists when it is beset by this other force on the left.

Congress. It's almost as if they're saying, ``Well, we'll give you just enough to let them bleed to death slowly.'' What we really need -- and remember that three-fourths of our aid is for economic and social reforms, and the other 25 cents out of each dollar is for military aid -- is the kind of aid that will let them accomplish the job and eliminate this leftwing guerrilla force that is doing the attacking.

At the same time, wherever we can, we should help them find out these behind-the-scenes moves by the violent right that we will not accept. And where the government needs help in dealing with this, we should help. That was one of the missions that Vice President Bush performed when he was in El Salvador recently. I think some progress has been made in that regard. But we shouldn't let the violent right keep us from doing what is necessary to end the war that's going on.

The President. No. We are not demanding the overthrow of that government. All they have to do is go back to the 1979 democratic commitments they made to the OAS as part of the political agreement leading to the end of the Somoza regime. Remember, the U.S. gave them immediate diplomatic recognition and significant financial aid until we found out that one faction of the revolutionaries was exiling or imprisoning their more democratic partners in the revolution, who discovered the Sandinistas intended to have a totalitarian form of government.

Now, the Sandinistas' promises of human rights, of democratic principles, of free elections, union rights, and so forth -- all of those promises were made in writing to the Organization of American States when they persuaded the OAS, during the revolution, to persuade Somoza to resign, which he did. They have not kept that contract.

Some of the leaders of the contras were fighting alongside of them in the revolution and then were ousted, just as Castro ousted the same kind of people and imprisoned some of his best lieutenants because they wouldn't go along with him to a Communist, totalitarian form of government.

Q. It deals with the use of power. The other day you spoke of ``the end of the days of weakness'' with the rebuilding of American military power. How do you envision the use of military power in pursuit of this country's foreign policy?

Q. Mainly, what we're talking about is deterrence. I have always believed -- in fact, the Chinese had this idea thousands of years ago -- that your army is really doing its job if it never has to fight.

Now, the Soviets have found out they are facing a belated U.S. modernization program which will assure the effectiveness of our deterrent. I think that is the only reason they came to the table to discuss arms reductions. They have come to realize that we'll do whatever is necessary to make it evident that hostile moves on their part would result in equal or greater punishment to them.

The National Endowment for Democracy is, just as we've been told, more than bipartisan; it's a genuine partnership of Republicans and Democrats, of labor and business, conservatives and liberals, and of the executive and legislative branches of government.

It's such a worthwhile, important initiative that I'm tempted to ask: Why hasn't it been done before? Well, we're doing it now, and it's largely because of the hard work of good people. Chuck Manatt, Frank Fahrenkopf, Dante Fascell, Bill Brock, Lane Kirkland, Mike Samuels, you have my heartfelt thanks and warmest congratulations. And a special thank you to our Vice President, who has been carrying this message for quite some time now on missions here and there throughout the world.

Last year in London I spoke of the need and obligation to assist democratic development. My hope then was that America would make clear to those who cherish democracy throughout the world that we mean what we say.

What had been preying on my mind that prompted me to say that in that speech to the Parliament was that in my lifetime, my adult lifetime, the world has been beset by ``-isms''. And we remember one of those -isms that plunged us into a war. And it suddenly dawned on me that we, with this system that so apparently works and is successful, have just assumed that the people would look at it and see that it was the way to go. And then I realized, but all those -isms, they also are missionaries for their cause, and they're out worldwide trying to sell it. And I just decided that this nation, with its heritage of Yankee traders, we ought to do a little selling of the principles of democracy.

Speaking out for human rights and individual liberty and for the rule of law and the peaceful reconciliation of differences, for democratic values and principles, is good and right. But it's not just good enough. We must work hard for democracy and freedom, and that means putting our resources -- organizations, sweat, and dollars -- behind a long-term program.

Well, the hope is now a reality. The National Endowment for Democracy, a private, nonprofit corporation funded by the Congress, will be the centerpiece of this effort. All Americans can be proud of this initiative and the congressional action which made it possible.

This program will not be hidden in shadows. It'll stand proudly in the spotlight, and that's where it belongs. We can and should be proud of our message of democracy. Democracies respect individual liberties and human rights. They respect freedom of expression, political participation, and peaceful cooperation. Governments which serve their citizens encourage spiritual and economic vitality. And we will not be shy in offering this message of hope.

American people and democratic groups abroad. It'll stimulate participation in democratic training programs and institution building overseas. The Endowment will work closely with those abroad who seek to chart a democratic course, and all this work will be sensitive to the needs of individual groups and institutions. And, of course, it will be consistent with our own national interests.

The National Endowment will let the people at the grassroots, who make our democracy work, help build it elsewhere. And the organizations that are now being formed by the Republican and Democratic parties and by labor and business will be the key to success. There'll also be expressions of what's best and most valuable in American public life.

Now, we're not naive. We're not trying to create imitations of the American system around the world. There's no simple cookbook recipe for political development that is right for all people, and there's no timetable. While democratic principles and basic institutions are universal, democratic development must take into account historic, cultural, and social conditions.

Each nation, each movement will find its own route. And, in the process, we'll learn much of value for ourselves. Patience and respect for different political and cultural traditions will be the hallmark of our effort. But the combination of our ideas is healthy. And it's in this spirit that the National Endowment reaches out to people everywhere -- and will reach out to those who can make a difference now and to those who will guide the destiny of their people in the future.

Much depends on us. But we can be confident that the tide of history is a freedom tide. That's the real message of our time. And it may be just the reason why those who don't like to hear the truth are so worried.

The nine countries which joined the United Nations since 1978 are democracies. In Africa, important states like Nigeria and Senegal have entered fully into the community of democratic states. In our hemisphere, 27 out of 35 countries are democracies now, or in transition. And just last week, Argentina completed its dramatic return, with the inauguration of President Alfonsin.

Yes, beyond the world's troublespots lies a deeper, more positive, and hopeful trend. The march of democracy and the National Endowment will be a part of it. Of course, any undertaking will ultimately be judged by the challenges it accepts and those that it overcomes. All of you in this room have good reason to be proud. You've accepted a worthy challenge.

The National Endowment for Democracy can make lasting and important contributions. It's up to all of us to make it happen, to harness the resources, experience, and wisdom of both the public and the private sectors. It's up to us to broaden our efforts, make them grow. And with the people in this room, I know we can, and I know we will.

This is the season when we appreciate our families and friends and spend time looking for just the right gifts for them. We arrange our homes with decorations and make an effort to prepare for special moments. Yet, during these holiday festivities our loved ones are in danger. That's why I want to ask you today for your help.

Unless all of us unite to take action, thousands of our citizens, perhaps a member of your own family, will suffer terrible deaths. I wish I were overstating the case, but I'm not. And there are tens of thousands of parents who have lost children. Their heartaches and tears are testament to the magnitude of the threat that hangs over us.

If I were alerting you about a foreign power brutally murdering tens of thousands of our fellow citizens, a cry for bold action would sweep our country. Well, I'm not referring to a foreign enemy; I'm talking about drunk drivers.

Every year, nearly 700,000 people are injured in alcohol-related crashes. Every one of these casualties is someone's son or daughter, husband or wife, mother, father, or friend. The personal tragedies behind the statistics are enough to break your heart.

House to proclaim this week National Drunk and Drugged Driving Awareness Week. It was fitting they be here. About 2\1/2\ years ago, their son Timothy was killed by a drunk driver. Then, just a year ago, their daughter Elizabeth was killed when a drunk driver veered onto her side of the road.

Commission Chairman John Volpe and the other members took their jobs seriously, and they've made some suggestions you ought to know about. Right off the bat, we should understand there are no magic solutions. It'll take a long-term commitment, coming at the problem from different directions.

The first step, according to the Commission, is making sure that our friends and neighbors -- as well as the people in the city halls and in the State legislatures -- fully comprehend what we're facing.

Secretary of Transportation Elizabeth Dole has been speaking tirelessly around the country on this issue. Just this week, the Licensed Beverage Information Council, the Outdoor Advertising Association of America, and Secretary Dole joined in unveiling this year's Friends Don't Let Friends Drive Drunk campaign to enlist all of us to protect our friends from themselves. This is an excellent example of the private sector and government working together to attack a serious problem.

The Commission found out that some of our laws and law enforcement are lax, as well. Some drunks have been arrested more than once, but they're still out there on the highways. What greater travesty could there be than knowing your loved one was killed by an individual already convicted of drunk driving?

We must make it harder on the first-timers. And we must make sure that repeat offenders are taken off the road. The Commission made numerous, specific recommendations, and we're moving forward on them. But in a free society such as ours, with the separation of powers between Federal, State, and local governments, it will take all of us working together.

Much of the credit for focusing public attention goes to the grassroots campaign of organizations like MADD, Mothers Against Drunk Drivers, and RID, Remove Intoxicated Drivers. The activists in these organizations, many of whom have lost loved ones to drunk drivers, have helped strengthen laws and law enforcement at the State and local level. And in those States that have toughened their laws and their enforcement, lives have been saved.

The automobile has always been close to the hearts of Americans. We've valued our mobility as a precious freedom, and individual ownership of a car has provided greater mobility to more people than ever before. If there's one lesson we've learned in the last 200 years, it is that with freedom must come responsibility.

Some of our citizens have been acting irresponsibly. Drinking and driving has caused the death of many innocent people. It is up to us to put a stop to it, not in a spirit of vengeance but in the spirit of love.

But good morning, and welcome. It's always a pleasure to meet with the people who are responsible for making our government work. The ability of this or any other administration to succeed is -- in no small measure depends on the energy, the dedication, and the spirit of our Federal employees. And government service is a partnership -- in other words, a relationship between political leaders, who do most of the talking, and career employees, who do most of the work.

When we speak of government, we may think of an impersonal bureaucracy with lots of regulations and paperwork, but just as this is a government of the people, it's also a government run by people -- people like you, who've committed your lives and your careers to jobs that are vital to our nation. Your work is government, and without you it would come quickly to a halt.

Even if there were no awards like those for today, most of our Federal employees would still do their best, working to give our citizens honest government. People don't choose government service for prestige, glamour, or recognition. They're not trying to get rich. They're just trying to make a difference, and that's important.

In this centennial year anniversary of the Civil Service, we should remember that government is only as good as the people who make it work one day at a time. Government must limit what it does, but it still must perform its responsibilities with care and professionalism. You can't have good programs without good people. Well, you're the good people. And the Presidential Rank Awards provide the opportunity to recognize your great services to our nation. And it gives us a chance to show our appreciation for your contributions, your imagination, and your hard work.

These awards also provide an incentive for all Federal employees to help us improve the effectiveness of government. There's always room for improvement. You haven't earned your awards by luck. It's because of exceptional performance.

The nearly 7,000 members of the Senior Executive Service are among the finest group of executives anywhere. To be singled out and selected for the prestigious Presidential Rank Award is an honor. You have good reason to be proud, and America is fortunate to have you on our team.

You've searched for ways to reduce the growth of the budget, and you succeeded. You've looked for more efficient ways to run programs, and you've found them. You've tried to better serve our citizens, and you're doing it. From the Johnson Space Center to the Fish and Wildlife Service in Anchorage, Alaska, and from the Department of State to the VA Medical Center in Gainesville, Florida, you are on the frontlines, day in and day out, setting high standards for us all.

And, ladies and gentlemen, you're what is best about government: the commitment and determination of individual citizens in service to our nation. Through your efforts, we can make today's Federal Government a model for the generation that'll follow us. And I'm counting on you, and so are the American people.

Voluntarism is a uniquely American tradition. The concept is as old as our Nation itself. It was individuals working towards dreams, visions, and hopes that created this country. Today, that vitality still exists, as manifested in the large number of private initiative and volunteer efforts in which Americans strive to improve the lives of their fellow citizens. People from all walks of life; of all ages, races, and income levels; members of business and labor; and community organizations of all types are contributing their share in partnerships with neighbors and friends to help others.

In this holiday season and time of giving, I call upon all Americans to reflect this spirit of generosity and private initiative by providing additional food to those in need. I enlist the aid of each American who is able to donate an item of food for the needy. In addition, I strongly urge those in the food industry to donate and distribute extra food to food banks, so that this effort may complement the government programs which are providing unprecedented levels of total food assistance to low-income Americans.

The investigation of Taiwanese practices centered on the import licensing procedure that allegedly restricted imports of non-rubber footwear and on tariff and customs charges. The American Institute in Taiwan (AIT) and the Coordinating Council for North American Affairs (CCNAA) consulted regarding these matters on January 17 and September 21 of this year.

Section 301(a)(2) authorizes the President to take all appropriate and feasible action in response to any act, policy or practice of a foreign country or instrumentality that is inconsistent with the provisions of, or otherwise denies benefits to the United States under, any trade agreement, or that is unjustifiable, unreasonable, or discriminatory and burdens or restricts United States commerce. The investigation revealed that imports of non-rubber footwear into Taiwan have been exempt from import licensing requirements, or have been subject to automatic approval by foreign exchange banks, since 1973. Evidence, therefore, does not indicate that import licensing procedures constitute a barrier to United States exports of non-rubber footwear. Beginning in September of 1982, a series of temporary tariff reductions on non-rubber footwear were implemented. These temporary tariff reductions have been extended administratively until mid-1984. Legislative approval for permanent tariff reductions for these items is being sought.

No further tariff reductions for footwear are planned in the immediate future. The CCNAA indicated that, in principle, requests for further tariff reductions in specific footwear products might be received sympathetically if there were some evidence that United States suppliers would benefit significantly. The United States has maintained that the existence of high tariffs dissuades United States exporters from exploring the Taiwan market.

In light of the offer of marketing assistance and indications that proposals regarding specific tariff reductions would be received sympathetically, discussions directed toward assisting exporters of United States manufactured footwear to enter the Taiwan market should be continued.

This festive occasion is celebrated in many different ways. We exchange gifts, attend church services, decorate our homes and Christmas trees, and enjoy a family dinner. But perhaps the tradition that most warms the heart is the sound of Christmas music.

Christmas was given to us by the angelic host that holy night long ago. Christmas is the commemoration of the birth of the Prince of Peace, Jesus Christ, whose message would truly be one of good tidings and great joy, peace and good will. During this glorious festival let us renew our determination to follow His example.

Christmas present possible: a strong economy that will ensure more jobs and opportunities in the months ahead. Confidence is in the air and with good reason. Today's encouraging news on the strength of housing starts and personal income, recent reports on prices, retail sales, employment, and factory use, all confirm a welcome fact: 1983 has been a banner year for the American economy with the United States economy enjoying a strong recovery and its lowest rate of inflation since the 1960's.

Wholesale prices last month actually fell. Consumers are flocking into stores during the holiday season. Our factories are operating at nearly 80 percent of capacity, up more than 10 percentage points from a year ago. Unemployment is still too high, but there are more people working in this country today than ever before, and every month we're creating over 300,000 new jobs.

In the last few weeks I've been involved in a number of meetings about next year's budget, and it's clear that here in Washington all of us, both in the Congress and in the executive branch, still have our work cut out for us. If the Congress will help me to restrain government spending, we can justify the people's confidence and keep America moving forward. We can make 1984 a year of strong and steady progress for America: continuing economic growth, unemployment coming down, and inflation staying under control.

Q. Mr. President, last week you said that if there's a complete collapse, you'll pull the troops out of Lebanon. Did you mean that if Gemayel fails to put together a broad, viable government that you'd pull out, or can you clarify? And I'd like to follow up.

The President. Yes, I can clarify, Helen. Actually I was asked a hypothetical question about whether there were any other circumstances other than achieving our goal by which the marines might leave or the whole multinational force, and I tried -- I guess I tried to give a hypothetical answer to that and maybe a bad choice of words.

I simply meant that the only thing I -- and I don't foresee this -- but the only thing I could think of, other than achieving our goal, would be if perhaps that government and the forces that he's dealing with in trying to broaden the government, if there should be a complete change of course to the place that we were no longer asked to be there, that they were going in a different direction than the one that brought us in in the first place at their request, then I suppose that would be a reason for bringing them out. But I wasn't trying to send anyone a message or anything. I was just trying to say, well, yes, you can't say there isn't any other way by which they wouldn't come out.

The President. Helen, we didn't make any pact or anything that was different than what has been our relationship all along. There was a reaffirmation of this. In talking to Prime Minister Shamir we also emphasized to him that we were going to go forward with our relations with the moderate Arab States as part of our hope for being a catalyst -- or trying to be -- in bringing them all together and ending once and for all these hostilities that have so disturbed that area and caused such tragedy for so long.

It really -- there was no signed agreement or anything else. We were really reaffirming the relationship that we've had since 1948, but at the same time, as I say, telling them that if we're to have any chance of bringing them together or continuing a process that started at Camp David, where Egypt and Israel wound up with a peace treaty -- if we're to have a chance of bringing that kind of a peace, we've got to befriend all those countries. And they've got to be able to trust us that we can be fair to all of them.

Q. Mr. President, the death squad activity is continuing in El Salvador. I was wondering, are you satisfied now with the progress the government there is making in halting it, and if not, how long can you continue supporting a nation where this takes place?

The President. Well, I feel that we have to continue supporting them just as long as we would supporting them against the leftist guerrillas that are trying to take over the government. We have a situation here of a 400-year history of mainly military dictatorships. And now, for the first time, virtually, in all that country's history, we have a government that has made it plain that they are trying to establish democratic principles and policies.

They're being assailed from the left by the Cuban- and Soviet-backed guerrilla forces. But at the same time they're being sniped at from the rear by -- they're called the death squads and the so-called rightists, who, by the same token, don't want democracy. They want to go back to what they've had in this 400-year history. And the El Salvador Government has made great progress in establishing democracy. They're hindered in their fight against the guerrillas by this action behind their backs. But you have to look at punishing that government for trying to be democratic when it is being assailed from radicals from both sides -- I think our obligation is to try and help democracy triumph there, and this is why we've offered some help.

And I must say, when the Vice President went down there recently and told them about how essential it is to get a handle on this force from the rear as well as the one on their front that they're fighting, he was very well received, and there was no disagreement with what he said. And there has been a stepped-up effort, and they want technical help from us in that regard that we are willing and can provide.

Q. Mr. President, the House subcommittee investigating the bombing in Beirut has found -- and I quote -- ``very serious errors in judgment were made both by officers on the ground and up the military command.'' Do you feel that disciplinary action should be taken against officers found responsible by Congress or the Pentagon?

The President. Well, Chris, there are two reports. There's a very voluminous report and a complete one that has been brought in by the military team that's been investigating this, as well as the congressional group. Both of those have just arrived at the Defense Department, and Secretary Weinberger is having a complete study made of them and then will submit a report to me on his findings, probably within the next several days. But, as I say, they are voluminous, and it's going to take a little while. So, I can't comment now until I see what those findings have been in both reports.

Q. Well, if I may follow up, sir, 2 days after the bombing, the Marine Commandant, P. X. Kelley, was in Beirut and said that he was completely satisfied with the security there. Was he being straight with the American people, and do you still have confidence in him?

The President. Yes, I do, very much. And I think he was, on the basis of what he saw, what was there -- I think the main issue, then, that he was addressing himself to was, could anyone prepare themselves for this unusual attack that took such a tragic toll? And the moving of the men in such numbers into that building was done because that was the safest building from the standpoint of the weapons that had been used against them up until that point -- mortar fire, small-arms fire -- and it was a steel-reinforced concrete building. So, I -- no, I don't think he was attempting to cover up for anyone.

There are reports that there are gound-to-air missiles now near the White House. Could you tell the American people what the nature of the threat is and how this all makes you feel as President to have this going on around you?

No, let me just say on that, I -- frankly, I had not noticed the blocked intersections. I hadn't paid any attention to it, and I was waving to the people along the street in that appearance. The only thing I regret is the inconvenience -- when necessary moves have to be made -- the inconvenience that I can cause to many other people in this.

There are no specific or definite threats that any of us know of here. We only know that worldwide there has been a call in a number of these terrorist groups for stepped-up violence. The term ``United States'' has been used as a potential target.

The President. Well, I don't think it's giving in to set up a barricade to keep somebody from doing this. You know, there have been attempts to ram the gates at the White House during these 3 years that we've been here. There've been some people that have gone over the fence.

So, I think that these are just normal security precautions in a climate that has shown us that this sort of thing can happen. And, as far as I'm concerned, I haven't let it interfere with my sleep or my work in the office.

Q. Mr. President, a question and followup, sir. It seems evident from the polls that the American people do not support the U.S. Marine presence in Lebanon right now. Respectfully, sir, whether the policy is right or wrong, do you believe the public will put up with continuing American deaths there?

The President. Well, I can understand the public opinion, because they're hearing great attacks from a number of sources on our presence there; some of them, I think, politically motivated. But I have to say this about the mission, the purpose in being there. And let me just take a moment, if I can, on this. They do have a purpose and a mission there. And there has been a result from this and progress made.

If you will recall, it's been several years, of course, since Lebanon, kind of, came unglued and the government was helpless to stop some of the troubles in its own land. But we had the factor of more than a million refugees, Palestinian refugees in Lebanon. They've been there for decades.

And over this period of time, they created their own militia, the PLO, a military and terrorist group. Well, this group was not only causing trouble within Lebanon; it was crossing the northern border of Israel. It was preying on civilians, citizens there. And, finally, Israel crossed the border into Lebanon.

The first goal was to simply push them back some 25 miles so they'd be beyond rocket or artillery range. But the others just repeated and then kept on attacking them. So, they went all the way to the edge of Beirut. And then we had a war taking place right within the city of Beirut in which thousands of civilians have been killed and wounded by this kind of combat.

In the meantime, during all of this, the Lebanese asked the Syrians -- asked them to come in and help preserve order, because in Lebanon we had, and have, groups -- various, sometimes religious groups, but other groups that kind of, like warlords with their own militias. And they're fighting each other and, at times, fighting against the forces of the Lebanese Government.

We were then asked to come in with the multinational force. And we went in, once the government had been formed there and once the PLO, when they were rejected, as they were -- granted they came back later by way of Syria, but the goal and the idea was for the two foreign forces that were then left in there after the PLO left, for them to get out. But the Lebanese Government needed time to build its strength to where it could then go in with these internecine groups that were fighting there -- go in and establish order over its own territory.

Israel, having completed its mission, announced its willingness and intention to get out. Syria did, too. And then for some reason Syria reneged on that promise and has refused to get out, even though they have now been officially asked to get out by the government that asked them to come in.

We have helped train the Lebanese Army, and it is a capable force. We have armed it. And when the other forces -- the foreign forces get out and the Lebanese military advances to try and establish order in their land, the multinational force is supposed to, behind them, try to achieve some stability and maintain order, because Lebanon doesn't have the forces to do both. Well, this is the mission.

And, as I say, progress has been made. The warring forces meeting in Geneva have acknowledged that the Gemayel government is the legitimate government of Lebanon. There is an agreement that has been reached and signed between Lebanon and Israel in which Israel has agreed in writing that they will withdraw. Indeed, I think they're anxious to. Now, the stumbling block still seems to be Syria.

But at the same time, the Gemayel government is trying to bring these other forces in Lebanon, and if they will remember that they're Lebanese also and they want a Lebanon for the Lebanese people, they will come in at his request and join the government. And he's trying to broaden the base of the government to give them representation and end that kind of fighting there.

Q. But, sir, respectfully, each week the U.S. seems to be using greater and greater firepower there. We had returning hostile fire, then artillery, then airstrikes, and now the 16-inch guns of the New Jersey. You said last week that you don't want escalation or a war. Can you avoid it without Syrian cooperation?

The President. You can avoid war. But I will say this, and I'll reiterate it: I will not okay a mission or ask or order our Armed Forces to go someplace where there is danger and tell them that they have not the right to defend themselves. So, when the sniping began and there was no retaliation, I made it plain by way of the channels in the Pentagon, as far as I was concerned, when an American military man is shot at, he can shoot back. And I think that there's been some indication that rather than stepped-up activity that there has been some pause for thought on those that were deciding that the multinational forces were fair game.

I don't say that they won't try these terrorist activities again; I'm sure they will. But are we, and where would we be in the world -- are we to let the terrorists win? Are we to say that, well, if terrorists are going to be active, we'll give in to them; we'll back away?

Q. Mr. President, on the press, Secretary Shultz said the other day that in World War II, reporters went along because on the whole they were on our side. And then he observed that these days it always seems that the reporters are always against us, and they're trying to report things to screw things up. Is that your view of the press also?

The President. Now, you're not going to get me into the middle of that, are you? I'm simply going to say that I do believe, Sam, that sometimes, beginning with the Korean conflict and certainly in the Vietnam conflict, there was more criticizing of our own forces and what we were trying to do to the point that it didn't seem that there was much criticism being leveled on the enemy. And sometimes I just wish that we could get together on what is of importance to our national security in a situation of that kind, what is endangering our forces, and what is helping them in their mission.

You're ignoring the needs and wishes of the Hispanics. You have cut programs that benefit the poor, and you're against equal rights for women. So, do you think you'll have enough white males to win, and aren't your actions really hurting Republican national and State candidates?

We haven't, in our social reforms, picked on anyone, and, indeed, what we have done when we came here was my belief -- and we operated on this basis -- that it wasn't that we were feeding too many of the needy; we were taking care of too many of the non-needy. And where we have trimmed rolls, we've trimmed them up at the upper level. Today, any family with an income at a level of 130 percent of poverty, the poverty level, or lower, is eligible for these government programs, and, indeed, we are taking care of more people than we've ever taken care of before.

And there has been nothing in our programs or anything else that can be taken as prejudice against any sector of our society. Indeed, with regard to the civil rights movement and racial prejudice in this country, I'm old enough to have been on the right side of that long before the term ``civil rights'' was ever used.

But I do know that a perception has been created and right today with these employment figures that I gave, with the drop in unemployment, blacks and women are getting a higher proportion of those new jobs than is anyone else.

Q. [Inaudible] -- follow up on that because there are 17 and 5 percent -- five-tenths percent of the blacks are still unemployed. And discrimination plays a part in it. And you seem to be against those methods that have been put into place for eradicating discrimination.

Q.  --  -- a telephone conversation that one of the causes was the seniority system. And I asked you what you would do about it, and you said, ``We have speeded the process.'' But you didn't explain that process. I wish you would explain to me that process.

The President. Well, I think you're -- I think that you've given an example there that is a very difficult one because of fairness to all people involved where you pick a situation in which seniority and service is the basis for employment. And you also picked at a level of government in which the Federal Government has no business interfering. There isn't anything that we can do unless there's an outright violation of some individual's civil rights.

But I just think that there can be commonsense programs worked out to where you won't have to wait until someone has accumulated a great many years of seniority before he becomes eligible; that there might be some fair way in which you can recognize the rights of seniority, but also recognize the fact that others don't have seniority because, for a long time, they were discriminated against.

Q. Mr. President, you said earlier tonight that you would not send American soldiers or marines into a situation where they could not fight back. Haven't we sent them into a role in Beirut, a political, a diplomatic role as peacekeepers where they do not have adequate safeguards against terrorism?

The President. No, I don't know what you call adequate safeguards against terrorists or what we would call it. You know anytime that you -- and particularly in a place like that, where even innocent civilians in the street are mowed down simply because snipers want to shoot someone -- it's been that kind of a scene. It's that kind of a thing that we're trying to resolve in behalf of the innocent people there who want to live in peace like the rest of us.

Lebanon who tell us what life would be like if the multinational force wasn't there, and what it has meant in their lives as individuals living in the midst of that kind of brutality and bloodshed. And I was under no illusion -- and I have to tell you that I have discovered for myself that the hardest thing you'll ever have to do in this job is give an order that put some of those wonderful young men and women in our military uniforms in places like that. But in the interest of our own national security and in the interest of overall peace, some of these things have to be done.

The Middle East is a tinderbox. It is the one place that could start a war that no one wanted because of its importance, particularly to the free world and to our allies. And we can't just turn away and say if we don't look, it'll go away. And this all started because of our determination to try and bring about peace between those factions that have been for so long warring with each other. The moderate Arab States again and the progress that we've made -- there was a refusal on their part to even acknowledge the right of Israel to exist as a nation. So, therefore, there could be no negotiation.

Anwar Sadat, God rest his soul, broke out of that mold, and we have peace between two countries. And the territory of the Sinai has been returned to Egypt by Israel, and they're at peace with each other. Our goal was to see if we couldn't find more leaders and more governments that would become Egypts, in a sense, in settling their disputes and having peace.

Q. Mr. Reagan, the subcommittee report that was mentioned earlier tonight also concluded that continued deployment of the marines will almost certainly lead to further casualties. I know you don't want to discuss what the security arrangements were before the attack, but what about now?

The President. I won't be able to answer that again until I too see the reports, particularly the report that is coming in that's very voluminous and must go into great detail. It's about that thick, and it has been made by military experts. So, I just can't comment until I know.

The President. I think they are to the extent that those on the field and the officers that are involved there are doing everything they can to ensure that. And I just have to assume that. And I think that I'm justified in assuming it.

Q. Mr. President, within days of your inauguration in 1981, you vowed that Americans would not be held hostage again. Well, the Syrians are holding airman Lieutenant Robert Goodman and say they won't release him until the marines leave Lebanon. Do you consider Lieutenant Goodman a hostage? And what efforts are underway to secure his release?

The President. Well, we have believed for a long time that the settlement there must be -- in this whole area -- must be political. I should have said this earlier, in my answer before about the history of this Lebanese situation. But we've had Ambassadors there from Phil Habib to Ambassador McFarlane, and now, Don Rumsfeld, because we're determined that there is a possibility. And it is the only way. You cannot -- this can't be settled by force. And it is going to be settled that way.

And Ambassador Rumsfeld has been in Damascus. He has met with the Syrians. Certainly, that is very high on the agenda. The Syrians claim that he's a prisoner of war. Well, I don't know how you have a prisoner of war when there is no declared war between nations. I don't think that makes you eligible for the Geneva accords.

But, yes, we want that young man back. And, as I say, we're not missing anything, any possibility in trying to bring to terms these various factions so that we can achieve the goal of restoring order, a broader based government in Lebanon acceptable to more of the people, those that are presently hostile to this government, and the foreign forces back to their own borders.

The President. No, I'll tell you, I'm very happy. And I would just like to feel that all of you have a very happy holiday and a Merry Christmas and for all of the people in America, I hope that they all have hope now and can see the progress being made.

The President. There have been some suggestions made with regard to bringing them home that some of my considerations might be based on the fact that in an election year -- and politics are coming up -- I will tell you this: No decision regarding the lives and the safety of our servicemen will ever be made by me for a political reason.

Last April 27, before the Joint Session of the Congress, I signaled our deep concern with the need for advancing peaceful and democratic solutions in troubled Central America. In that speech I indicated my intention to name a special envoy for Central American negotiations. Ambassador Richard B. Stone, our special envoy, has performed extraordinary service in communicating with the countries of Central America and the Contadora group to help bring democratization and an end of fighting to all the countries of the region.

Ambassador Stone has just informed me of the current status of the various efforts at achieving a peaceful settlement in Central America. I want to reiterate my support and commitment to his delicate but crucial mission. As my personal representative, he speaks for me in our efforts to advance peace and democracy in this nearby area. He plans to return to the area shortly after the first of the year, and I join with all in wishing him the greatest success in his mission.

Assistant Secretary for Health of the Department of Health and Human Services, and for the purposes of specifying certain communicable diseases for regulations providing for the apprehension, detention, or conditional release of individuals to prevent the introduction, transmission, or spread of communicable diseases, the following named communicable diseases are hereby specified pursuant to Section 264(b) of Title 42 of the United States Code: Cholera or suspected Cholera, Diphtheria, infectious Tuberculosis, Plague, suspected Smallpox, Yellow Fever, and suspected Viral Hemorrhagic Fevers (Lassa, Marburg, Ebola, Congo-Crimean, and others not yet isolated or named).

The Secretary of Energy has advised me that no purpose is currently served by the existing system of licensing of imports of petroleum and petroleum products. The Secretary of Energy also recommends that I retain the current prohibition on imports of Libyan crude oil into the United States, its territories and possessions, which was adopted in Proclamation No. 4907, on the ground that such imports would be inimical to the United States national security. The Secretary further recommends that he continue to monitor imports of petroleum and petroleum products in order to be able to advise me as to the need for further action, as appropriate, under Section 232 of the Trade Expansion Act of 1962, as amended.

Sec. 2. The Secretary of Energy shall continue to monitor imports of petroleum and petroleum products and shall, from time to time, in consultation with the Secretary of State, the Secretary of Commerce, and such other federal agencies as he deems appropriate, review the status of such imports with respect to the national security. The Secretary shall inform the President of any circumstances which in his opinion might indicate the need for further action by the President under Section 232 of the Trade Expansion Act.

Proclamation No. 3279, as amended, if such requests were filed with the Secretary prior to the effective date of this Proclamation. Any such requests shall be considered in accordance with the previously applicable provisions of Proclamation No. 3279, as amended, and implementing regulations thereunder.

Sec. 5. The revocation of Proclamation No. 3279, as amended, shall not affect the authority of any federal department or agency to institute and conduct any administrative, civil or criminal audit, investigation or proceeding based on any act committed or liability incurred while the Proclamation was in effect.

You have served as Administrator of the FAA during one of its most eventful and productive periods. Although the firm stand you took during the air traffic controllers' strike is your best known accomplishment, the follow-up to that story is less well known. You have taken seriously the mandate I gave you to modernize our nation's air transportation system and make it the safest and most efficient in the world. The actions you have taken to accomplish this goal will be remembered for many years to come, and I want to thank you personally for a job well done.

As you know, the past three years have been dramatic ones for the nation's air transportation system and for the FAA. When you took office, there were many challenges facing the FAA. The air traffic controllers' strike was imminent. The nation's airspace was in need of a systematic modernization program. The national system of airports was in need of an integrated plan to ensure availability and balanced access to all user segments. There were numerous other pressing needs. All had to be acccomplished in a period of great budgetary restraint, without sacrificing safety and convenience.

We have met these challenges, and I believe my job is now largely done. With your firm support, we kept the nation's airplanes flying during the controllers' strike, bringing the air traffic control system capacity back to pre-strike levels rapidly on a schedule I outlined at the start of the strike.

Much of this strategic plan has already been put into place. I am absolutely confident that the superb professional career management team at the FAA fully accepts and believes in the course we have established. My successor will reap a legacy of detailed programs, plans, and funding of which I am proud.

You have given me the opportunity to preside over perhaps the most fertile and dynamic period in the history of aviation development and safety. It has been a very demanding task. The commitment of time and energy required to run the FAA is enormous, leaving little time for anything else. The outstanding quality of the career FAA staff, and its willingness to work virtually around-the-clock with me to handle these demands, has earned my greatest respect and appreciation.

Early last summer, with our objectives accomplished or on the way, I decided to leave government service no later than February 1984. Because of the importance of preserving the progress we have made, I felt obligated to remain through the FY 1985 budget formulation period. That process is now completed, and the time is at hand to implement my decision to return to the private sector in order to resume an active role in strategic consulting and business planning.

To allow time for the new Administrator to prepare for Congressional hearings and for orderly transfer of functions, I will plan to remain as Administrator through January 31, 1984. I have so advised the Secretary of Transportation.

You have established a progressive record in aviation safety and modernization that sets a new standard for Presidential action in the aviation field. It has been an honor to participate in that process.

The turmoil there is taking an incredible human toll. There are more than 850,000 refugees and displaced persons in Costa Rica, Honduras, El Salvador, Guatemala, and Mexico. In El Salvador alone, more than 400,000 men, women, and children have been forced to flee their homes by guerrillas seeking control of the country through violence. Tens of thousands more have fled the brutal revolution of broken promises in Nicaragua.

Meeting the desperate needs of the victims of aggression and oppression is a key part of what we are seeking to achieve in the region. Through our government programs, we have relieved some of the human suffering in the region. Much more can be done, and much more needs to be done.

America in which you have confidence. They need your financial support and your technical and medical skills. If you would like to contribute or offer your services and don't know of a volunteer organization, please write the American Committee for Voluntary Agencies, 200 Park Avenue South, New York, N.Y. 10003. I can't think of a better way to share the spirit of Christmas and work for peace on Earth and good will toward mankind.

The President. Well, I think there are always things that you'll think you did wrong. But I think, basically, we have continued on the path that we set in 1981. The progress that we've made economically is apparent. It is the first time in many years that we've had a recovery from a recession in which not only is industrial -- well, let's say just productivity -- increasing, personal earnings increasing, inflation and unemployment both going down -- all of these things happening at the same time. This hasn't happened in a recovery for many, many years, which makes me believe we are on a firm footing and have laid a foundation for a solid recovery. That part is won.

There are things -- if you say what should we have done differently? -- well, there are things. In trying to negotiate bipartisan agreements on some of these, you look back and think, well, maybe if we'd worked harder in one direction or another we might have gotten more cooperation in our need to reduce government spending.

On the international scene, I think that our continued buildup of our strength has changed international relations a great deal. I don't think without that we would have had the beginning negotiations that we've had with regard to reduction of nuclear weapons, both the INF and the START talks. I think it is due to that.

I think we've got a finer relationship than we've had for a long time with our own friends and allies. This is particularly true in the efforts that we've made in Asia, as well as our longtime friends in Europe.

The President. Oh, well, I probably could get incensed about -- but this was before 1983, earlier than that -- going for the tax bill on the assumption that we'd been promised about $3 in reductions in spending for every dollar of tax revenue, and we have never seen the $3 in reduced spending.

The President. Well, Helen, I'm always a little leery about saying a breakthrough, but I do think this: We are optimistic about this because if you look at the relationship there and the two countries -- or the two peoples that were involved, Mubarak is the head of state of the one country in the Arab world that has gone forward and has a peace treaty with Israel. We're hopeful that the peace process will bring about more Arab nations making their peace with Israel.

And Arafat has, in the past, has been one who has refused to recognize Israel's right to exist as a nation. But the fact that earlier, and before this split in the PLO ranks, he had begun to discuss with King Hussein negotiations and participating in those negotiations on behalf of the Palestinians -- then that broke down with the split in the Palestinian movement.

Now I think that what President Mubarak is doing is talking to him about returning to where he was earlier, making contact with King Hussein, and getting those peace negotiations, our peace proposal, underway again.

The President. Yes, I do. I really do, because we had believed that a settlement in Lebanon had to precede going further with that. I don't think that's necessarily true now. I think enough progress has been made there that we can go forward with the peace movement.

The President. Well, I don't think it was a violation. I can understand their feelings in view of the recent tragedy in Jerusalem, and the group taking credit for that claimed to be a PLO group and all. But at the same time, I think as they look at this a little more clearly, they will see that Mubarak, based on the experience of Egypt and its willingness to go forward for peace, is simply trying to persuade others to change their thinking.

There was one point not too long before the peace treaty with Egypt, in which Egypt was as violent in its hostility as perhaps today the elements of the PLO are. So, who is better able to try and bring in another person into the peace process than someone who has made the change that Egypt has made?

The President. Well, this is what we need to find out. I can't believe that that radical group that, under the influence of the Syrians, created all this tragedy around Tripoli and the innocent people that were killed because of the violence of that battle -- I can't believe that the millions of Palestinians are going to choose that leadership.

Q. Mr. President, on a slightly different subject, you mentioned that due to our arms buildup, that brought the Soviets to the negotiating table. And now we've had a breakdown in the arms talks, and there seems to be an increased level of tension. Do you think we are at a confrontation state with the Soviets?

The President. Yes, but since then there have been statements to the fact that they just are not ready and that they're unwilling at this point to set a date. I believe they will be back, and I believe we're further from a confrontation possibility because of the deterrent capability of the United States and our allies at this point. I think there was a far more unstable condition when we had let our own strength deteriorate to the point that there was a window of vulnerability.

And I would like to call your attention to one thing. There have been 19 -- prior to this, to our talks -- there have been 19 efforts since World War II to engage the Soviet Union in talks about arms reduction. There has never been any progress made in those. The SALT talks, actually, were not arms reductions; they were supposed to be setting a ceiling on how many more weapons would be built. And that has not been ratified, the SALT II treaty.

Now, that is the first time they have ever done that in any negotiations, in all these previous 19 attempts. And I think that now that they see that we are determined to maintain our own ability to defend ourselves, and our allies with us are included in that, I think that they have to see that these negotiations are in their interest as well as ours.

The President. No. I think the things that we have heard. I think that this is, you might say, almost a part of the negotiating process. Their whole principal move over this last year or so has been an effort to stop the deployment of the intermediate-range weapons that were asked for by NATO.

The President. Well, maybe the scientists know more about science. And from the standpoint of the power of the weapons, yes, they are more powerful; they are more destructive on both sides than they were before. And maybe looking at it from a scientist's viewpoint, that moves up their doomsday clock. But they're not involved in the diplomatic and political end of this as we are.

Q. Mr. President, can I come back on the prospects of these talks, these arms talks? There's a lot of concern, especially in Europe, that with the lack of dialog between West and the East, especially as the U.S. is entering an election year -- if you run for reelection -- that the Soviets are not likely to help you. How do you see the prospects for some kind of an agreement before the elections?

The President. Well, I would hope that the Soviet Union would remember their failure in trying to influence the German election and decide not to go down that road again. But as far as I am concerned, whoever our candidate may be, I don't think any decisions on a subject of this kind should be made on our part, on our side, on the basis of -- as I said the other night -- political considerations.

They have no real place in a civilized world. The goal is peace. And I've been a little disturbed by the tendency of so many in this country who seem to feel that somehow we're at fault, when they are the ones who left the table without setting a date for return.

The President. Oh, we're in communication. We haven't broken off communications. We're not, as we've been portrayed, that the two superpowers are here separated with no contact at all. No, we're in communication with them. And we want to continue these policies that would lead toward reduction of arms and that would lead toward peace.

The President. I think the deterrent capability, yes. See, we have a weapon here in the world today, the nuclear weapon, that for the first time in the history of all man's weapons has never resulted in a defensive weapon being created against it. The only thing we have is deterrence. The only thing we have is the knowledge that on both sides the punishment would be more than any nation could afford. If they started it, they would have to be prepared to accept virtually as much punishment as they were administering. And this has kept the peace.

Q. Mr. President, in Central America recently there have been some apparently conciliatory gestures from Nicaragua. Do you think these are sincere moves, or are they propaganda ploys, and do you intend any response to them?

Stone has made it plain to them that all they have to do is reinstitute the principles of their own revolution -- the things that they promised the people they were going to bring about if their revolution succeeded. And they have not done that. They betrayed their own revolution and created a totalitarian state.

The President. Well, we set out after the revolution succeeded -- and prior to my administration, the previous administration immediately started to come to the financial aid, economic aid, to the Sandinista government until it found out that the Sandinista government was not keeping the promise of its revolution. And the aid was withdrawn.

Governor General, the people of Grenada, our own people who were there and were rescued have revealed this was not an invasion. This was something in the nature of a commando operation, and it was a rescue mission. And the people of Grenada have made it very plain that they feel they, too, were rescued. And the fact that we have withdrawn our combat troops so precipitously, that some of the Grenadians are a little alarmed -- that they don't think we should have left yet.

Q. We've all heard that it in some way criticizes everyone in the chain of command. Do you philosophically, or in any way, feel that that chain of command is -- you're at the top of it in this case -- and you bear some of that responsibility?

The President. Well, there's no way to discount responsibility. As Commander in Chief, the operation could not have gone forward without my approval. And so, in that sense, I think the investigation was being very thorough. Yes, there would have been no mission without my decision to go forward with it.

Q. Mr. President, in Lebanon, President Pertini of Italy today called for a withdrawal of the Italian contingent of the multinational force. Apparently there have been 15 countries who were asked to join that force and who have refused. Are you not concerned that the United States, by siding with Israel, is going to end up alone in Lebanon?

The President. No. I think that there was a not completely thorough statement of our meeting with Prime Minister Shamir. It was portrayed, and many people saw it, as somehow arriving at some new coalition with them, and even the word ``conspiracy'' was used by some in there. But, no, there was a reaffirmation by us of what our relationship with Israel has been since 1948. And we discussed this not from any standpoint of Israel and its relationship with Arab countries, in the sense of taking their part in anything of that kind. We're dedicated to the idea of trying, if we can, to act as a friend to both the Arab States and Israel in settling those longtime disputes and bringing about the kind of peace that we find between Egypt and Israel now.

The President. I would have wished from the very first for a U.N. force. But what has prevented it? The Soviet Union veto. If you look at the UNIFIL [United Nations Interim Force in Lebanon] force that is presently in the south of Lebanon, it is so bound by restrictions that were imposed in order to get the Soviet Union vote that it literally is helpless to do anything. It isn't that these people are ineffective or that they aren't capable, they are restricted.

The President. Well, I could still hope that the Soviet Union now would recognize the value of having a U.N. force in there. And as I say, we would have preferred this from the very first, but it was something that couldn't be obtained.

The President. Well, we have been in communication. And I think that they understand better now, because we were just as forthright in talking to Prime Minister Shamir about our intentions in our dealings with the Arab States and the things that we were going to do in linkage with them.

But that is up to them to negotiate. And I think our meeting with the Foreign Minister of Egypt, my own personal communication with President Mubarak, other communications that we have made straightening out what the situation was and what our relationship with Israel is and what we want in a relationship with them. And I don't think -- I think there was some discomfort at first; I don't think so any more.

The President. Ah, but you're going back. Remember when -- I think this was back when we were putting it together, we were trying to get forces that would join in it. Well, now, there could be a number of reasons why a nation wouldn't. There could be the very fact of cost to some nations.

Like so many of your homes, the White House is brimming with greens, colorful decorations, and a tree trimmed and ready for Christmas day. And when Nancy and I look out from our upstairs windows, we can see the National Christmas Tree standing in majestic beauty. Its lights fill the air with a spirit of love, hope, and joy from the heart of America.

And she said that her wish was to help me turn on its lights. Well, Amy's wish came true. But the greatest gift was mine, because I saw her eyes light up with hope and joy just as brightly as the lights on our national tree. And I'm sure they were both seen all the way to heaven, and they made the angels sing.

Christmas is a time for children, and rightly so. We celebrate the birthday of the Prince of Peace who came as a babe in a manger. Some celebrate Christmas as the birthday of a great teacher and philosopher. But to other millions of us, Jesus is much more. He is divine, living assurance that God so loved the world He gave us His only begotten Son so that by believing in Him and learning to love each other we could one day be together in paradise.

It's been said that all the kings who ever reigned, that all the parliaments that ever sat have not done as much to advance the cause of peace on Earth and good will to men as the man from Galilee, Jesus of Nazareth.

Christmas in particular, 1776, our first year as a nation. The Revolutionary War had been going badly. But George Washington's faith, courage, and leadership would turn the tide of history our way. On Christmas night he led a band of ragged soldiers across the Delaware River through driving snow to a victory that saved the cause of independence. It's said that their route of march was stained by bloody footprints, but their spirit never faltered and their will could not be crushed.

Christmas Eve services. Together, we'll renew that spirit of faith, peace, and giving which has always marked the character of our people. In our moments of quiet reflection I know we will remember our fellow citizens who may be lonely and in need tonight.

Presbyterian Meeting House in nearby Alexandria, Virginia, is simultaneously sponsoring hot meals on wheels programs, making and delivering hundreds of sandwiches and box loads of clothes, while visiting local hospitals and sending postcards to shut-ins and religious dissidents abroad.

Let us remember the families who maintain a watch for their missing in action. And, yes, let us remember all those who are persecuted inside the Soviet bloc -- not because they commit a crime, but because they love God in their hearts and want the freedom to celebrate Hanukkah or worship the Christ Child.

And because faith for us is not an empty word, we invoke the power of prayer to spread the spirit of peace. We ask protection for our soldiers who are guarding peace tonight -- from frigid outposts in Alaska and the Korean demilitarized zone to the shores of Lebanon. One Lebanese mother told us that her little girl had only attended school 2 of the last 8 years. Now, she said, because of our presence there her daughter can live a normal life.

With patience and firmness we can help bring peace to that strife-torn region and make our own lives more secure. The Christmas spirit of peace, hope, and love is the spirit Americans carry with them all year round, everywhere we go. As long as we do, we need never be afraid, because trusting in God is the one sure answer to all the problems we face.

I received the report of the Long commission last Friday and have reviewed it thoroughly. The report draws a conclusion that the United States and its military institutions are by tradition and training inadequately equipped to deal with the fundamentally new phenomenon of state-supported terrorism. I wholeheartedly agree.

The thrust of the history of this country is that we've recognized a clear distinction between being at peace with other states and being at war. We have never before faced a situation in which others routinely sponsor and facilitate acts of violence against us while hiding behind proxies and surrogates which claim -- they claim they do not fully control.

Now, this problem is not unique to Lebanon. We've seen the ugly manifestation in Kuwait, the terrorist bombing in Rangoon, the senseless murder of Turkish diplomats, the attack on the Pope, the bombing of our own Capitol, and on the streets of London.

In the days ahead we need to systematically redevelop our approach to this problem, recognizing that the worst outcome of all is one in which terrorists succeed in transforming an open democracy into a closed fortress. Now, one fact, though, is already obvious: The problem of terrorism will not disappear if we run from it. This is not to say that we're not working as urgently as possible to create political conditions in Lebanon that will make it possible for us to remove our forces. But we must not delude ourselves into believing that terrorism will vanish on the happy day that our forces come home.

For terrorists to be curbed, civilized countries must begin a new effort to work together, to share intelligence, to improve our training and security and our forces, to deny havens or legal protection for terrorist groups and, most important of all, to hold increasingly accountable those countries which sponsor terrorism and terrorist activity around the world.

The United States intends to be in the forefront of this effort. For the near term, corrective action is being urgently taken to ensure the maximum possible security of our forces. Nearly all the measures that were identified by the distinguished members of the Commission have already implemented -- or have already been implemented, I should say -- and those that have not will be very quickly.

The Commission report also notes that the mission of the marines is extremely difficult, and with this, too, there can be no dispute. We recognized the fact at the beginning, and we're painfully mindful of it today. But the point is that our forces have already contributed to achievements that lay the foundation for a future peace, the restoration of a central government, and the establishment of an effective national Lebanese Army. We do not expect utopia, but I believe that we're on the verge of new progress toward national reconciliation and the withdrawal of foreign forces.

And let me finally say that I have soberly considered the Commission's word about accountability and responsibility of authorities up and down the chain of command. And everywhere more should be done to anticipate and prepare for dramatic terrorist assaults. We have to come to grips with the fact that today's terrorists are better armed and financed, they are more sophisticated, they are possessed by a fanatical intensity that individuals of a democratic society can only barely comprehend.

I do not believe, therefore, that the local commanders on the ground, men who have already suffered quite enough, should be punished for not fully comprehending the nature of today's terrorist threat. If there is to be blame, it properly rests here in this Office and with this President.

In this holiday season, our minds are drawn more than ever to the Middle East. And while the violence of this region has been the cause of much of our anguish -- certainly over the recent years -- it is also worth recalling that the three great religions of the modern world have their roots in this ancient and austere soil.

From this paradox, we can take hope. And I intend to bend every effort to ensure that those who died in this tragedy can claim as their ultimate legacy the mantle of peacemaker over this troubled and vital land.

The President. No. I've been concerned that sometimes, in some of the debate and some of the political discussion about this, that an effort will be made to create this. And I think it would be tragic for the families who have lost a loved one if this comes about, because it hasn't been in vain.

The President. We are reviewing all the facets of this -- the locale, everything else -- and going to intensively look at all the alternatives there might be. But I do believe that, yes, that while there's hope for peace we have to remain.

The President. No. I was talking about nations, themselves, recognizing that this terrorism isn't just some fanatical individual who gets an idea and goes out on his own. There is evidence enough -- even if you couldn't go into court with it -- that it has at least a kind of tacit encouragement from various political groups, and even from some states.

The terrorist activities have multiplied, as the report shows, to three or four times as many incidents around the world as there were in 1968. And, incidentally, 53 percent of those have been aimed at American -- at United States' targets.

Q. Sir, if I may ask just one followup. You say in your statement we should expect more terrorism. And the impression that I get -- and, perhaps, the American people may get -- is that government knows a lot more than it's saying about what we could expect. I mean is there, again, any definite plan that you've discovered which may lead to, perhaps, more terrorism in this country?

The President. Well, we just know that these various groups have threatened. Well, and many times you, yourselves, in the press, have carried these threats where they've made them public, that they are going to continue these activities and step them up.

We are making every effort, and stepping up our diplomatic efforts, to bring about what I think must be the answer -- not a military, but a political solution there. And we're going to, as I say, step those up and continue doing everything we can to bring that about.

We have, now, an agreement between Lebanon and Israel which has Israel's agreement to withdraw. I don't believe that it's impossible to have a similar kind of agreement with Syria, which would recognize some of Syria's interests. And we know that at Geneva there was a kind of tacit recognition that the present government of Lebanon was the government of Lebanon.

We are doing everything we can, and working as completely as we can, diplomatically, to bring about his release. And it's possible that, sometimes, someone with the best of intentions could change the balance unfavorably.

While Americans are thankful for the blessing of peace at home this holiday season, we do not forget that the tragic war in Afghanistan continues. For 4 long years the Soviet Union has occupied that unhappy land. But for 4 long years the brave Afghan people have held the might of a Soviet occupation force at bay. These Islamic fighters in a faraway land have given new meaning to the words ``courage,'' ``determination,'' and ``strength.'' They have set the standard for those who value freedom and independence everywhere in the world.

Afghanistan's freedom fighters -- the resistance or mujahidin -- represent an indigenous movement that swept through their mountainous land to challenge a foreign military power threatening their religion and their very way of life. With little in the way of arms or organization, the vast majority of the Afghan people have demonstrated that they will not be dominated and that they are prepared to give their lives for independence and freedom. The price they have so willingly paid is incalculable.

While we will continue to do our part to maintain and improve the U.S.-Soviet dialog, we cannot remain silent on the tragedy of Afghanistan. There should be no misunderstanding that the Soviet occupation of Afghanistan has created serious international tensions. It is not only the Afghan themselves who oppose the Soviet occupation of their country but virtually the entire world community. This has been demonstrated time and again in five consecutive votes of the United Nations General Assembly, when resounding majorities of the world's nations called upon the Soviet Union to end its occupation and restore the independence and nonaligned status of Afghanistan. In fact the most recent U.N. resolution was adopted on November 23 by the largest vote yet: 116 to 20.

Early this year, I had the privilege of receiving in my office a group of six Afghan freedom fighters. I was moved by their simple dignity and pride and their determination to continue their struggle for independence. These brave individuals have returned to the fight.

The struggle for a free Afghanistan continues. This is not because of any outside manipulation, but because of the Afghan people's own desire to be free. And their struggle will continue until a negotiated political settlement can be found to allow the Afghan people to determine their own destiny.

Soviet forces from Afghanistan, ends the agony and destruction of the Afghan nation, and restores that country's independence and nonalignment. Clearly, a neutral and nonaligned Afghanistan would not be a threat to its huge Soviet neighbor.

Thus, we mark the fourth anniversary of the Soviet invasion with sadness and continued indignation. But we are convinced that a settlement is possible, and we are glad that consultations in the U.N. process of indirect talks will go on. We call upon the Soviet Union to reach a settlement of the crisis which restores the freedom, independence, and nonalignment of Afghanistan.

Let all of us who live in lands of freedom, along with those who dream of doing so, take inspiration from the spirit and courage of the Afghan patriots. Let us resolve that their quest for freedom will prevail, and that Afghanistan will become, once again, an independent member of the family of nations.

As we bring this year to a close in holiday celebration, I want to call to your attention the serious problem of drunk and drugged driving. It is one of the leading causes of violent death in our Nation.

Against Drunk Driving (MADD) and Remove Intoxicated Drivers (RID). Task forces in many cities and States are working to solve this problem. Private sector programs alerting employees to the drunk and drugged driving problem are multiplying. Legislators, spurred by concerned citizens, are making changes in laws to reduce the loss of life and injury caused by drunk and drugged driving.

We as Federal employees have an important role to play in removing the drunk and drugged drivers from our roads. Your heightened awareness, coupled with your continued commitment to halt this needless death and destruction, can make a difference, particularly during the holiday season.

I hope your resolutions for the New Year will include not mixing alcohol or drugs with driving, driving defensively at all times, and wearing your safety belts regularly -- your best defense against the drunk and drugged driver.

The nine countries have demonstrated to my satisfaction that their laws, practices and policies are in conformity with the designation criteria of the CBERA. The governments of these countries and entities have communicated on these matters by letter with Secretary of State Shultz and Ambassador Brock and in so doing have indicated their desire to be designated as beneficiaries (copies of the letters are attached). On the basis of the statements and assurances in these letters, and taking into account information developed by United States Embassies and through other sources, I have concluded that the objectives of the Administration and the Congress with respect to the statutory designation criteria of the CBERA have been met.

Sec. 5. Effective Date. The adjustments in rates of monthly basic pay and allowances for subsistence and quarters for members of the uniformed services, and all other adjustments of salary or pay, shall be effective on the first day of the first applicable pay period beginning on or after January 1, 1984.

New Year's Eve is a time for looking back on the year past, and in a moment, I want to talk about all that 1983 meant to America. But first I want to mention the topic of my radio talk 2 weeks ago -- drunk driving.

A drunk or drugged person at the wheel of a car isn't a driver, that person is a machine of destruction. So, let's enjoy all the wonderful celebrations that go with New Year's Eve, but, please, when we drive, let's drive sober.

Nineteen eighty-three was the 207th year for our Grand Old Republic. Though the year had its measure of hardship and even tragedy, it was a time when we Americans acted with courage, self-confidence, and vigor.

We had reason to feel glad. America was on the mend. And as our economy regained strength, we watched the progress of a sparkling recovery -- one of the strongest recoveries in 20 years. I said from the beginning it would take time for our economic program to work. You can't cure 25 years of failed economic policies overnight. And, yes, we had some hard months at first. But 1983 saw our patience pay off as our program took hold.

On this New Year's Eve, the prime interest rate is 11 percent, about half of what it was when we took office. Inflation for 1983 is running at only 3.2 percent, about a quarter of what it was just 3 years ago. Housing starts are running 60 percent higher than on this day last year.

Nineteen eighty-three saw the stock market reach new highs as it pumped vast new funds into the economy and raised the value of pension funds where millions of working Americans have their savings. During 1982, American manufacturers sold 5.8 million new cars. This year, they've sold 6.7 million.

As our basic industries and agriculture gain new strength, American ingenuity and enterprise are creating whole new industries -- industries like robotics and bioengineering. Just a few years ago, home computers were unheard of. By the end of 1982, American companies had sold some 2\1/2\ million home computers. This year, the figure is expected to climb to 7\1/2\ million.

This is one of the seasons when we Americans fly the most, to visit family and friends, because there's nothing like being home for the holidays. Well, the deregulation of the airline industry has increased competition and helped push fares down. And deregulation of banking is helping millions.

All this means that in 1983 it was easier to pay bills, put children through college, buy homes, or borrow the money to start a new business than it had been in many years. Once again, the American economy has begun to reward fresh ideas and good, hard work.

Just as 1983 saw our economy recovering, it saw a new sense of purpose in our Armed Forces and foreign policy. In the military, morale has soared. Some pundits used to claim we could only attract recruits when our economy was weak. But now, even with a strong economy and growing opportunities in civilian life, our Armed Forces are attracting more and better qualified recruits than ever. There's one statistic that shows just how dramatic the turnaround has been. If 1979 Air Force retention rates had continued, three out of four pilots would have left the service after their first tours. In 1983, better than three out of four stayed in.

Morale has improved partly because we've given our men and women in uniform better pay and better equipment. But I just have to believe the courage of our soldiers and marines in Lebanon and Grenada has a lot to do with it. And, as we celebrate the New Year, I wonder whether you would all join Nancy and me in setting aside a moment to remember those who, in 1983, gave their lives in the cause of freedom and to pray for those brave young men spending this day so far from home.

In Grenada we set a nation free. In Asia, our trip to Japan and Korea further strengthened our partnership with those nations. In Europe, 1983 saw the NATO alliance pass through harsh trials, but the alliance has emerged more firmly united than ever -- more ardent in the cause of freedom and peace, more dedicated to the paths of deterrence and dialog.

In Lebanon, the road to peace has proven long and hard, but there has been progress that would have been impossible without our marines and the other troops in the multinational peacekeeping force. Representatives of all Lebanese factions agreed in Geneva to recognize the government of President Amin Gemayel. And talks have begun that will broaden the government's base. It isn't easy. Progress is painfully slow, but progress is being made.

You know, when this good old house was built our country was little more than a band of towns, a very thin band, running along the eastern seaboard -- people clinging to the edge of a vast and untamed continent. And when it came to art, drama, and music, Americans looked back to the old country from where most had just come.

But as our nation grew and our people pushed West -- plowing fields, felling forests, and building new cities and towns -- a new and distinctive culture began to develop, a culture that was as fertile as this new land, as bold and confident as the American people. It took on the twang of the frontier fiddle, the joy of jazz, the excellence of the new American orchestras, and the sparkle of Hollywood movies. And today our nation has crowned her greatness with grace, and we gather this evening to honor five artists who have helped her to do so.

Lena Horne, when you started making movies a columnist wrote, ``Lena Horne has put dignity into daring. She has given glamour manners. Hollywood has never before seen such a combination.'' And neither had the world.

And, Lena, you got your start at the age of 16 as a chorus girl at the legendary Cotton Club and then broke into the Big Band scene as a singer with Charlie Barnet. And during this period, one observer remarked that your voice could thaw the ice in a customer's drink. [Laughter] And in the 1940's you became the first black woman ever to be signed to a long-term Hollywood contract.

You often had to battle prejudice, but your work expanded the roles available to black performers. During the 1960's you became an ardent champion of civil rights, appearing in benefits, joining protests, and speaking out again and again. And through it all, you've played a direct and vital role in the cause of justice.

Gian Carlo Menotti, you have always kept your Italian citizenship. But you've spent so many years among us and contributed so much to our national life, perhaps tonight you'll allow us to claim you as an honorary American.

York. And by your midtwenties, you were performing some 90 concerts a year. Today your repertoire ranges from the classics to the moderns. And one critic has called you, ``The only major violinist exclusively a product of American environment and training.'' And you've spent a lifetime showing how that American environment glitters with artistic excellence.

Indeed, Isaac Stern once said that after his New York debut, and I quote, ``I was convinced that I didn't know my elbow from A flat.'' [Laughter] Yet they worked long and hard, following their dreams, and succeeded in bringing music, drama, and laughter into our lives. And tonight, as we appreciate their work, let us take comfort and inspiration from their lives.

During this holiday season, I call upon all Americans to reflect this spirit of generosity and cooperation by joining in partnership with others to provide food to those in need. I ask the agricultural and food industries to donate surpluses to food banks around the country and to complement government programs that are providing food assistance to low-income Americans. I look for the support of community groups, charitable organizations, and individuals in donating food items and in transporting and distributing them to those in need. Let the caring, sharing, and goodwill generated by private initiative spread across this great Nation of ours and bring joy to each and every individual.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 3rd day of Dec., in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-four, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and ninth.

President Lusinchi of Venezuela has been one of the finest of friends of our country. We have worked together in Central America to bring about the birth of democracy in many countries where that had not been known. And it's an honor today to welcome one of this hemisphere's shining examples of freedom and democracy, President Jaime Lusinchi of Venezuela.

President Lusinchi is a man dedicated to those principles of liberty that are held dear by the people of the United States. It's a pleasure for us to have as our guest an individual who played such an important role building freedom in his own country and who now, as a spokesman for his people, is such a force for good in this hemisphere.

Romulo Betancourt, threw off dictatorship and began laying the foundation for a stable democratic society. Their struggle was not dissimilar to the one that's going on in Central America today. The fledgling Venezuelan democracy was immediately put to the test by Cuban-supported guerrillas and terrorists who would have turned Venezuela into a Marxist-Leninist dictatorship.

Mr. President, your triumph in this 10-year struggle, and the subsequent success of a freedom in your country, should serve as a model for today -- the Venezuelan model, if you will. Granting amnesty to those guerrillas willing to put down their weapons and participate in the electoral process, Venezuela's leaders held firm to the principles of democratic government and individual freedom and never gave in to the armed Marxist-Leninist minority.

The peace, liberty, and seniority -- or security, I should say, enjoyed in your country today is a result of that valor and determination. Nothing less should have been expected from the heirs of the Great Liberator, Simon Bolivar. He once said of Venezuela: ``By establishing a democratic republic, she has declared for the rights of man and freedom of action, thought, speech and press.

Venezuelans who understand that democracy is a path to peace and progress can be proud that their government is standing shoulder to shoulder with the forces of democracy in Central America today. All freedom-loving people should rejoice that El Salvador and other countries in the region, like Venezuela before, are maintaining or establishing democratic governments, despite challenges of Soviet bloc-sponsored subversion.

The exception to this trend in Central America is Nicaragua, where a ruling clique of Sandinistas, allied with Cuban and Soviet dictators, have betrayed their citizens. Despite their assurances in 1979 to the people of Nicaragua, and to the Organization of American States, that they would hold genuinely democratic elections, they have, to the contrary, persecuted the democratic opposition parties, trade unions, and civic and religious organizations. Instead of free elections, they chose to hold a Communist-style sham election, orderly in form, but without the participation of the democratic opposition, because Sandinista-controlled gangs of thugs beat down freedom of speech and assembly, wiping out any chance for genuine political competition.

Venezuela has been and continues to be a leading force in the Contadora process, which seeks peace in Central America, based on democratic principles, and we applaud your efforts. The United States places great importance on all 21 objectives of the Contadora process, which include truly democratic elections, as originally promised by the Sandinistas. The Contadora objectives, if put into practice simultaneously with effective verification, offer the best hope for peace in Central America. I can assure you that the diplomatic efforts of the United States are designed to attain these objectives.

Well, his words rang true. In two decades, great things have been accomplished by the free people of Venezuela. The people of the United States are happy to have played a small role, offering a helping hand to people who have become close friends.

Yesterday's election marked the first time a Marxist-Leninist dictatorship has been succeeded by a government that receives its authority from free elections. And congratulations are due to the people of Grenada.

Mr. President, we're keenly aware that Venezuela is now going through a period of economic adjustment. We support the responsible decisions that you are making to put your country back on the track to strong economic growth. We, too, have undertaken some fundamental reforms in recent years and more will be forthcoming.

We continue to believe that strong economic growth is the foundation of social justice, the key being greater incentives, opportunity, and freedom for every person. Each year in every corner of the globe, evidence continues to build. Today no objective observer can deny that individual freedom, not government control, is the strongest spark for economic development and human progress.

Washington, responding to the kind invitation you have extended to me. Mr. President, I interpret this deference as a distinction marking my country and as an expression of good will of the Government of the United States.

I represent Venezuela, but also, in some way, I represent undoubtedly Latin America as a whole, in view of the identification of our populations, the community of our interests, and the coincidence of our aspirations. I thus come, Mr. Reagan, to hold with you and the senior officials of the Government of the United States a dialog that is to be frank, sincere, amicable, and thoughtful, as well.

I represent one of the soundest democracies of Latin America. I come from a country where pluralistic democracy constitutes an irreversible experience. Our history has been traumatic; you know it well. I am the sixth President of a process that, throughout the last 26 years, has shown Venezuelans that democracy enables them to progress in freedom. Our system rests on the free and secret practice of the universal right to vote.

The concept of alternativeness, of republican governments in an intrinsically democratic country such as ours, guarantees us a future of progress. We believe in the need for social reforms and embark on them in a frame of free expression of ideas. All this is inherent to our way of life and our way of understanding our political responsibility. For Venezuelans there is no valid alternative to democracy. Experience has shown it to be an indivisible truth.

We are a peaceful country and, therefore, believe in peaceful solutions to controversies. Our history has been one of friendship and solidarity. We do not interfere in the affairs of others and zealously watch over our own affairs. We have fought and shall continue to fight for the achievement of equity in international economic relations. We believe that the unprecedented advancement of science and technology enables all of mankind to reach rational levels of well-being if only the great statesmen of our times pursue in good will their mission in an ever more interdependent world.

South Cone, with their great tradition of intellect and historical achievement, tread again the path of liberty and democratic order they themselves had once opened up and pioneered. Let us encourage them at this time openly, unselfishly, and fearlessly in their process to freedom and enforcement of the fundamental values of the human spirit.

America, conflicts are raging, and their complexity, ever more apparent, are due to the summation of international factors to the already longstanding problems of the region traditionally ruled by inhuman dictatorships and insatiable oligarchies.

The conflict of Central America demands of all of us ponderation, equilibrium, and firmness if we are to cooperate in seeking solutions compatible with the essence and idiosyncracy of those depressed nations. We firmly believe that the solution to the existing crisis rests on an effective democratization of the region and the exclusion of external factors, be they continental or extracontinental.

We do not believe that the solution to this delicate and complex crisis of the Central American countries can be one of force or military involvement. Rather to the contrary, we believe that the only viable path and the only lasting solution rests on designing and implementing a policy of democratization, pluralism, social justice, and economic development for all the countries of the region to the exclusion of none, and without exerting any imposition.

President -- would not feel that we can meet our own expectations as long as in this continent, from the Canadian Arctic to the Tierra del Fuego, a democratic way of life has not become the practice and the resolve of all our countries.

Finally, I come, Mr. President of the United States, with an open mind and an open heart, free from all prejudices, and convinced of the soundness and fairness of our views to engage with you in a dialog -- fruitful, I hope -- for the consolidation of the relations traditionally friendly between Venezuela and the United States.

I thank you, Mr. President, in my own name, and on behalf of those who accompany me, for your kind words of welcome, which lead us to expect a positive exchange of ideas and mutual experiences. Your words correspond to the spirit of friendship and sympathy which, through the passing of time, has been characteristic of the relations between the United States and Venezuela.

Both nations, Mr. President, share the common ideas of Bolivar and Washington and those of the standard-bearers and shapers in the world of the Americas, of the principles of liberty, democracy, national independence, and respect for the dignity of man.

Caribbean States, the United States participated in the rescue mission which freed the Grenadian people from chaotic and brutal misrule. That action led to the creation on Grenada of an interim government, chaired by Mr. Nicholas Brathwaite, who deserves much of the credit for following through on the pledge to turn over the nation's administration through free and fair elections. The interim government also deserves admiration for the humaneness and respect for law which it has exercised in its treatment of those who served with the former Grenadian Government.

We applaud the Grenadian people for their peaceful, orderly, and genuinely democratic exercise of popular sovereignty on December 3. We look forward to working closely with the new Government of Grenada.

Today, Japan is firmly united with us as an ally in defense of the freedom we share. But the lesson of Pearl Harbor is as important today as it was over forty years ago. In an uncertain world, democracies should always seek peace but also be prepared to defeat aggression. Military strength can deter war and give diplomacy time to achieve its beneficial results.

This has been a special time for us. Today we've had the opportunity to exchange views and get to know President Lusinchi, an individual whose strength of conviction and personal bravery helped give birth to democracy in his country. Tonight we honor you, Mr. President, for what you've done, for what you're doing, and for the kind of man you are.

In this beautiful setting, the hard sacrifices of our own Founding Fathers seem so long ago, yet all of what we have has been built on the foundation they laid. President Lusinchi remembers well Venezuela's fight for political freedom. He was part of it. As a young man, he committed himself to the cause of democracy. He was arrested and tortured by the dictatorship. And, Mr. President, I'm told the beatings left welts on your back similar to the stripes of a tiger. Well, you had the spirit of a tiger, and you never gave up your ideals.

Venezuela is free today because it has people of such character. Last year you celebrated 25 years of continuous democratic government in Venezuela. Commemorating that, you said, ``We have discovered that democracy and liberty go together inextricably together.'' It was fitting that last year was also the 200th anniversary of the birth of Simon Bolivar, a Venezuelan whose struggle gave independence to the hemisphere. Today you carry on the work of this truly all-American man. And when we say ``American,'' we mean every one of us, from the North Slope of Alaska to the tip of Tierra del Fuego -- all of us are Americans in this hemisphere.

I'd like to thank you, Mr. President, for what your country is doing for the cause of democracy in this hemisphere. Your support during the Grenada crisis was most appreciated. Your efforts in Central America and the Caribbean are of great importance to the future of freedom there. Your personal guidance to me in the years ahead will be as invaluable as it has been today.

As a political figure, you've been concerned about the freedom and progress of your people. As a physician, you understand human suffering. This understanding is reflected in the energetic commitment that you've made to battling the flow of narcotics through Venezuela and the Caribbean region. As you're aware, the drug abuse problem is something that your dinner partner, Nancy, and I feel strongly about. Nancy has spent many hours here trying to help the victims of drug addiction, especially young people.

Tony Armas hitting towering homeruns like they were the easiest thing to do. Well, the free people of Venezuela and the United States are on the same team, and we're up to bat. So, in keeping with the lessons Tony Armas has been teaching us, let's set our sights high, work as a team, and assure democracy and improving economic well-being for all the people of the Americas.

President Lusinchi. Mr. President, Mrs. Reagan, I understand fully that this evening, this dinner, is a homage to my country, Venezuela, a country which, taking account the difference in dimensions, has much in common with the United States. For just as the United States, it is an integrator of races, religions, and ambitions. Your country and my country, Mr. President, are both lands of possibilities. I understand this fully, and this is why I believe that both the United States and Venezuela have had a common history in the past and have for the future a common destiny.

This, in part, has made us very proud to be here and very happy to see that these Americans can organize things so well. They know so much and they understand so much that they were able even to make the climate work in favor of the beautiful reception we had this morning. And President Reagan has been very kind this evening to sit me beside your guardian angel on one side and a Venezuelan angel on the other side, Mrs. Cisnaros, who is highly representative of Venezuelan women.

President, have compelled me to use, before I say those words, all my old parliamentary resources. But one hesitates here on a visit of state such as mine -- and I came here as head of government and President of the Republic of Venezuela -- so I must say therefore, in this capacity, that we small countries seem to have cultivated somewhat the right to dissent; and discrepancy has often become the object of much worship, and disagreement with the strong has become the consolation often of the weak. At times, we disagree just to highlight the existing difference or simply to reaffirm our wish to exercise autonomous thought and action. There are many occasions to dissent, to express different views, or to celebrate coincidences. And this, also, is totally legitimate.

Even if the United States is the most powerful nation on Earth, besides holding diverging views, we also find with you many convergences and totally legitimate ones, as well. And I must say this very frankly, proudly, and candidly. In a ceremony such as the present one, I think it is much more intelligent, much more human, to highlight, rather, all that unites us, all that identifies us to each other and leave aside what might have been something that can separate this great world power from a country such as ours, cognizant of its dimensions and its possibilities.

Permit me to leave aside thoughts on important substance matters. I do not want to run the risk of appearing solemn when it would be out of place to do so. I am not a declared enemy of solemnity itself, but I do believe it must be exercised on appropriate occasions. Some people never depart from it and yearn to appear solemn every single hour and minute of their lives. I'm happy to say that this is neither your case, Mr. President, or mine. And, in part, this is because both of us are common men. In some way, must one become, after all, eligible for the benevolence of history, even if it is to be through the exercise of discretion.

I have come to the United States and to this mansion of Presidents as a spokesman and representative of a country and a people friendly to the United States. I have come to express our views on bilateral issues of two friendly nations -- on issues of our hemisphere, we cannot and shall not be indifferent to and on world issues on which we Venezuelans do not exert much influence, but which affect us to a high degree.

The biggest pride of Venezuelans is perhaps to feel that we are a country that holds no prejudices, no dogmas, no intolerances. And I say this to you -- I've said it to you, Mrs. Reagan, with great pride during this dinner -- and I believe that this is what makes us firmly believe, in part, that in spite of our backwardness in some economic and social areas, we are a country the future will favor, perhaps because the future lies for those who, as ourselves, show an open mind and a willing heart.

I said before that all work today to make this a beautiful celebration for me, and even the fact that a year ago -- it is just a year ago that I won elections, Mr. President, by as large a landslide as you did. [Laughter] And there is something even more important, because in our case, we even got all the votes of your Minnesota. [Laughter] So, today we have really given to us a great present -- you have been so kind, you have shown to us so much graciousness. Your words have been so pleasant, you have given me the occasion to speak to your beautiful and distinguished wife, beautiful representative of American women we much admire.

And so, allow me also to take this occasion of having many common friends with us to congratulate you here, Mr. President, on your electoral victory and to wish you an extraordinary second term. The Government, all the people of the United States, hope to get from you and as citizen of the world, all the contribution you and your country can make to peace, solidarity, a better living for all the people of this planet.

Mr. President, allow me again to thank you for this beautiful reception, for your kindness, and also for having invited distinguished friends of yours, people you love, and friends of mine -- people who are of great value and precious to my own country, Venezuela. And allow me to exemplify and identify all of these fellow countrymen of mine with the name of Marisol Escobar, a famous sculptress who forged the image of the liberator, Simon Bolivar, and left this image at the United Nations forever in time.

Thank you again, Mr. President, Mrs. Reagan. You have in me, be assured of the fact, a loyal and sincere friend who admires you, esteems you; a friend good enough to dissent with you and to applaud at the same time all your kindness, your good will, and your good heart.

At the recommendation of the Secretary of State, I have today asked Ambassador Paul Nitze to serve as adviser to the Secretary for the Geneva talks. Ambassador Nitze has a long history of distinguished service to his country, and I am very pleased that he has accepted.

Following the luncheon, they met in the Oval Office with Ambassador Nitze for a discussion of the forthcoming Geneva talks. During the afternoon, the President held additional meetings with his advisers to discuss arms control issues.

Three hundred thousand metric tons of wheat from our government reserve is being made immediately available for emergency food programs. In addition, $50 million from other accounts is being transferred for emergency food use. Finally, additional requirements are under review, and, if necessary, we will seek additional resources from the Congress.

The people of Africa continue to be in desperate need and the cost in human lives, as Jack has told us, is horrible. The United States will continue to uphold our humanitarian tradition. While our emergency aid seeks to help remedy today's suffering, our regular programs of development and assistance will continue to work to eliminate the root cause of famine. These programs will help Africa grow more food in the years to come.

And beyond any governmental program, however, I want to pay tribute to the outpouring of support which the African crisis has produced in the private community. Organizations such as CARE, Catholic Relief, Lutheran World Service, AFRICARE, the Red Cross, the International Rescue Committee, Save the Children Fund, and many others have provided the manpower on the ground which has permitted programs to reach those most needing assistance. The contributions and support of millions of caring individuals have been absolutely stunning and are essential. And this is America at its very best.

A major disaster exists in the developing countries of Africa and South Asia. Therefore, today I am directing the Secretary of Agriculture to release up to 300,000 tons of wheat from the Food Security Wheat Reserve for use to provide urgent humanitarian relief to those suffering from widespread hunger and malnutrition. I am also directing the Food Aid Subcommittee of the Development Coordination Committee to determine and act upon the specific needs that can be met through release of this reserve.

I am taking this extraordinary action today because relief cannot be programmed for this purpose in a sufficiently timely manner under the normal means of obtaining commodities for food assistance due to the unanticipated and exceptional needs currently existing. This action will help maintain our generous response to the suffering of needy people and keep the pipeline supplied as we continue to assess needs and other possible responses.

Exchange Program in which: (1) outstanding private sector executives, primarily those who have achieved senior level management positions, and also those exceptional managers who have unique qualifications and extremely high potential for policymaking positions, will be selected as Presidential Exchange Executives and assigned to positions in the Senior Executive Service or positions of comparable rank or stature, reporting, as appropriate, to Cabinet Officers, Ambassadors, Agency Heads, Under Secretaries, Assistant Secretaries or other high-ranking Government officials for not more than one year, with an extension of up to ninety days in extraordinary circumstances; and (2) career Federal Executives who are members of the Senior Executive Service, or equivalent level, will be selected as Presidential Exchange Executives and assigned for one year to positions in the private sector offering significant challenge, responsibility and regular and continuing contact with senior private sector officials.

Sec. 3. Responsibilities of Executive Agencies. Each Executive agency shall, to the extent permitted by law, provide the Commission with such assistance as may be necessary for the effective performance of its functions.

The President. Fifty years ago Jay Berwanger, of the University of Chicago, was a powerful halfback and a hero to millions of football-loving Americans, including a certain sportscaster named Dutch Reagan. In 1935 he won a new award, the Heisman Trophy, and a great American tradition was born.

The list of Heisman Trophy winners reads like an honor roll. There was Nile Kinnick, of Iowa, who was a brilliant runningback and true patriot, who gave his life during World War II. There were the great young men of Notre Dame -- Angelo Bertelli, John Lujack, and others who kept on going out there for the Gipper. In recent years we've seen players set new standards of excellence -- champions like Earl Campbell, Herschel Walker; last year's trophy winner, Mike Rozier. And this year there's a young man who stands in a class by himself -- Doug Flutie.

When Doug Flutie arrived on the Boston College campus in 1981, he was just a fourth-string quarterback. And since that time, he has put together the most prolific passing career any major college quarterback has ever had. He's given us fans a host of moments to remember, including a play during the final seconds of this year's Boston College-Miami game that will go down in football history.

It's a once-in-a-lifetime opportunity for me. The Heisman Trophy is something that means a lot, and it's something that I never would have expected. And as for you guys, if you can dream it, it's possible. I never could have dreamed winning the Heisman or being here in this situation. And it's something I'll treasure for the rest of my life.

Mr. Reinauer. Mr. President, Mr. Vice President, it is an honor to be here today. And I'd like to inform everyone in honoring Heisman's 50th of the Downtown Athletic Club, for the first time in award history, we have made a reduced replica to bring to Washington today.

The President. Well, they're both absolutely essential and have to do with the deficit in that the tax program is a part of our belief that growth in the economy is going to be a major contributor to the deficit going down. But the other track is the one that we have been dwelling on right now, which is the necessity for real budget reform.

The President. Oh, well, we expect more. We've set our goal higher than that. What we're trying to project is a deficit reduction as a percentage of gross national product in three installments out there. The first one is the most important, because you're not going to get the others if you don't get the first one.

In the defense situation, the Pentagon has made dramatic reductions from its original 5-year program proposed in '81, and a great many of those can be attributed to management improvements, overhead elimination.

Let me give you a figure that will give you a glimpse of what can happen. We folded some 62 domestic categorical grants into 10 block grants to local and State government. In doing that, we found that that reduced the overhead of administering those programs by 3,000 employees at our end. Out at the local and State government end, 885 pages of regulations that had been imposed on them moved down to 30 pages.

The President. Well, we're not going to make any cuts -- I've spoken already of the reductions we've made -- we're not going to make any cuts in defense spending that are going to drive us backward with regard to what we're trying to do in overcoming the years of neglect in guaranteeing our security. But we haven't dealt with defense simply because Secretary Weinberger has been over there at the NATO meetings. When he comes home, we'll be talking to him.

All these figures about $500 hammers and wrenches and so forth, it's all true. But nobody has pointed out that we're providing those figures. This is what has been going on, and this Defense Department now is finding that and correcting it.

And it certainly doesn't make the evening news. But I think the people also have been treated to so many stories back over the years when things like that did happen that they're prepared to believe the worst.

The truth is we have made wonderful progress in the quality and quantity of manpower, weaponry, and everything else in our Defense Establishment. And as I say, we have also -- we have definite programs going over there, providing incentives for people who find extravagances, even a hotline you can call anonymously.

The President. I have to wait and find out whether what Barry is talking about is impatience with all of the restrictions that have been put on the MX up there on the Hill and in Congress and the continued cutbacks.

In the past 15 years, the Soviet Union has come up with development of more than five new systems, completely new, and we're still playing catch-up. And if we're going to sit down with them in January and begin talking arms reduction, as they have agreed to talk, it would be a mistake to start unilaterally canceling out weapons systems before we do that. We've got to think at all times about how to keep our negotiating position as strong as possible.

The President. There may be a couple of items in there that I want to look at very carefully. We want to make sure not to penalize someone or take away some necessary incentive. I've seen the Treasury report. I think they've done a fine job.

The President. Oh, we're going to try. I think that Congress, or that portion of it that's been blocking us, has been very irresponsible. The contras are veterans of the revolution that put the Sandinistas in power. And it was a total revolutionary effort aimed at democracy.

The President. Well, this would give us something that we would have to look at very closely, because right now we can honestly say that what we're trying to do is simply modify the existing situation and return to the principles that all of the parties and elements opposed to Somoza, including the Sandinistas, were fighting for, according to what they said.

Q. On another foreign policy issue, but different continent, you've said that you wouldn't turn against Jonas Savimbi's people in Angola, but there are now reports that the U.S. is considering, along with South Africa, working with and recognizing the Angolan Government if the Cuban troops are removed. Is there anything to that? And what would happen to the UNITA forces?

The President. Yes. This is all part of the Namibian package that we've been negotiating. Now, the Savimbi forces are not a part of the negotiations; haven't been. But at the same time, Savimbi supports the removal of the Cubans from Angola and says there is no chance of reconciliation as long as they're there. So once the Cubans leave, UNITA and the Angolan Government would have a better chance of coming to a reconciliation.

The President. Again, I think the Savimbi forces and the Angolan Government recognize this is an internal problem. I say we won't turn them down if they believe that we, in any way, can be helpful in arriving at some kind of settlement.

The President. Here and there, there may be some. But right now, the only two we know of are the two that everyone else knows of. But you'll remember back when we were setting up the administration I said I would ask people to come that I thought were qualified, or best qualified, if they could only stay for a matter of a year or 2, however long they could stay, and then we'd try to find somebody equally good. I'm gratified by the fact that not only have they stayed through the first 4, but it seems that there's going to be quite a retention in this second 4-year period.

But I can't complain if some of them, during the second term, come to me and believe they have to return to their own private lives and careers. I'll sure hang on to them as long as I can, but I have no plans for making any changes.

The President. She's turned around what was a really tough situation for us in the U.N., where we were literally being picked on by about 140 other nations. And she's made all the difference in the world.

I don't know whether her desire is straight return to academia or whether there are other things that would appeal to her in government, but, believe me, if there's a way to keep her in the administration, I'll sure try.

Q. If I could return to the first topic we were discussing -- the budget and trying to reduce the deficit. I know that you pledged that you would not cut anyone's social security benefits. But in light of the reports that the administration is considering a 5-percent cut in pay for Federal workers, would it be a violation of your social security pledge if you were to forego the cost of living increase for 1 year? That wouldn't be a cut, would it?

The President. Well, I have to say my pledge during the campaign carried with it the clear implication that present social security beneficiaries would get their cost-of-living increases as well. I made that pledge and so, therefore, I feel bound by it.

This does not seem as serious to me as some people present it with regard to the deficit, because if you really analyze it, social security is not part of the deficit problem. Social security is totally funded by a payroll tax. And if you made a reduction in some way of social security, you wouldn't do a thing for the deficit. That money would just go back into the social security trust fund.

Congress incorporated it into the unified budget for reporting purposes. But as I say, if you look at it, there's no way that any savings at the social security end could go anyplace. You have one of two choices: reduce the social security payroll tax or leave it in the trust fund for the future.

And so, this doesn't strike me as a tough problem. And I'll tell you something else. I am not going to give some of those practicing demagogues who have made this a demagogic issue in the '82 election and who tried to do it again in the '84 election, I'm not going to give them a handle.

The President. Not at all. Enterprise zones is very high on the list. I think that enterprise zones could probably be more effective in helping those people -- unemployed, poverty-stricken who need help, who need opportunity -- and improving the growth in the economy, which would further reduce the deficit, than almost any of the so-called social programs that have been a part of the Great Society.

No, we want that very definitely. And the tuition tax credit, I think, is just simple fairness. And we have not retreated from any of the social reforms that we asked for. We're going to try for them.

We believe that they should be transferred back to other Departments where they had fit in before they created a Department of Education. But we don't believe that the Federal Government has that important a role to play that it should have a Cabinet agency at the Federal level.

Q. One area of Federal support for education that many conservatives have questioned over the years, which exits now, is the expenditure of Federal funds for research and development of and promotion of new curriculum. Many conservatives feel that that would be better left to the free market and to the local level, that they'll get more competition in that area. If an attempt is made to eliminate some Federal programs, would that area be one that might be dropped?

The President. I think they'd all be looked at, all of them, whether they were legitimately a Federal function and, thus, should be maintained, or whether that should be something left out there at different levels of government. But we haven't begun to look at that yet. We're still focusing on, hopefully, eliminating the Department.

The President. Well, whether I use that word or not, let me just say I think the people made it very plain that they approved of the course we've been on so far and what we've been trying to do. And I think they also indicated by their votes that they wanted us to continue on that course.

The President. No. Actually, I was surprised that there was such a cry raised that we hadn't done that -- maybe because people hadn't been out there in all the districts. First of all, I did an awful lot of TV ads and radio tapes and so forth for our candidates, letters -- solicitation, fundraising letters, and so forth, for all of them. Granted, there was a limitation on how much personally I could do in actually campaigning with them, because when you're the incumbent you've got a job to do at the same time. But that was left to the congressional and Senate committees. And where they said they wanted me to go, I went.

Q. I guess people were talking about the possibility of a nationwide television program, maybe a half hour, in which you focused almost exclusively on the need to elect a Congress that would support you.

Q. Oh, sure it was. And the Vice President made a pitch, also. I recognize that. But there have been people who said, well, there should have been a whole half hour devoted just to that since you were so far ahead in the polls.

The President. You know what our polls showed also, though. The problem with us in the House is the result of somebody else being in charge for the last 50 years in reapportionment, because the polls show that a majority of the people who voted for Members of Congress voted for Republican candidates. But we only elected a minority, about 40 percent of the total. They've got us all bunched up into as few districts as possible.

The President. Very frankly -- well, I don't talk about anyone under consideration for an appointment until it comes time to say who it's going to be. I don't believe in embarrassing those then who might be considered or not. I have the highest respect for him, a fine man.

The President. Well, we still would like to achieve that. And the man who's doing the job would like to achieve it. But so far, we haven't been able to make a dent in that, or in the Education Department, up on the Hill.

The President. Well, I've learned that making commitments this far in advance of anything is not the best idea. But I do have to say that I have always adhered to the idea that in this job you are the titular head of the party, and as such, you should let the party decide who the nominees would be. And so, as I say, I still believe in that as a policy.

In the first few weeks attention has -- or in the past few weeks, I should say, the attention has been focused heavily upon ways to control spending. And that's important, but let me try to put this in a broader perspective.

In the November elections, the people made clear that, first and foremost, they wanted to continue policies that would assure strong economic growth. So, the people voted against tax increases, and they were right. And they voted against wasteful government spending, and they were right. They voted for the expansion of opportunity for all, and that's what we mean to achieve with policies that will control spending, simplify the tax system, improve America's productivity and competitiveness, so that we can keep this great nation of ours moving forward.

Q. Mr. President, since we've last seen you there's been a number of statements from the Soviets about arms control and desiring peaceful relations with this country. How do you assess the prospects now for a genuine arms control agreement? And are the Soviets just talking, or do you think they really want some kind of agreement?

The President. Well, Lou, there's no way for me to make a judgment on that until we get in conversation with them. I was very gratified when both Gromyko at the United Nations and Chairman Chernenko publicly made statements in which they expressed a desire to see the elimination of nuclear weapons -- the same thing that I've been talking about for quite some time.

Q. Mr. President, on Secretary Regan's tax package, why haven't you embraced that so far? And are you going to actually propose your own tax simplification package from the State of the Union address?

The President. No. That, like the present budget proposal that you've all been writing and talking about, is a working paper. And we have a Cabinet process, and we also have a process of consulting with our own leadership up on the Hill. And I think that it is probably the best and most complete study of the tax system and the best proposals for changing the tax system that has ever occurred within my lifetime. And it is presented, however, as a broad package in which, obviously, there are points that you want to look at. But we've been so busy with the immediate problem of the budget that we have just set aside for a bit the actual consideration of every phase of that tax proposal.

Q. Mr. President, the hostage and hijacking situation in Kuwait at the moment: What exactly is the United States Government doing about it, and do you think that the Iranian Government is at all collaborating with the hijackers?

The President. First of all, we are in touch with the heads of state of other countries, and we have, through other diplomats, been as much in contact as we can be. I have no evidence that I can lay out here that there is actual collaboration of the Iranians. I have to say, however, that they have not been as helpful as they could be in this situation or as I think they should have been.

Q. Mr. President, you are saying this is a great tax plan -- and no one expects you to know it, you know, detail for detail -- but you have not come out for it. And until you take that kind of leadership, do you think you will get that kind of support? And I'd also like to tie in, how do you feel about defense cutting, since you have, you know, opened up with the budget situation?

I believe that this is the finest proposal that has ever been offered. This doesn't mean that there aren't certain options in there on specific items. But I think it is -- it does simplify, it does reduce for most individuals, and it does broaden the base in the sense of getting some people or some businesses back to paying more of a fair share rather than leaving it to someone else.

The President. On defense. Well, as I said, that's included. But, again, I can't get into the specific details within that budget process because of the state that it is in right now. But I'd like to point out to you that without cutting back on our need to improve our defenses after years and years of neglect, the Defense Department itself, on its own, has found ability to cut its original request -- its 5-year program of buildup that they launched in 1981 -- they have cut that by $116 billion to date.

And as soon as the Secretary is back from the NATO meetings, we'll be talking. Some of that has been made possible by the cut in inflation, but a lot of it has been done by improvements in management, things of that kind. So, we will discuss with him, then, as we're discussing with everyone else, each particular -- we'll discuss his defense budget to see what he can contribute.

Q. Mr. President, Bishop Tutu has just come out and said that while you had a good meeting, that your policies have worsened the situation for blacks in South Africa. Would you, at this point, consider changing your policies and consider at least the idea of economic sanctions or of some harsher measures against the regime there?

The President. Well, Andrea [Andrea Mitchell, NBC News], we had a good meeting, and he made some suggestions and proposals. We had an opportunity to explain to him the things that we have been doing in what I like to call quiet diplomacy. I think many of them were a surprise to him.

I have to disagree with him on the fact that the situation has worsened. It has not. We have made sizable progress there in expressing our repugnance for apartheid and in persuading the South African Government to make changes. And we're going to continue with that policy.

Q. But the regime has become more repressive, and the arrests have increased. Would you consider any kind of economic sanctions? And do you feel that your policies have, at all, given credibility to that regime?

The President. I know that there has been a surge of violence here and there and that has resulted in violence from the other side. We regret this. But, as I say, I think that the policy we're following -- and it wouldn't be quiet diplomacy anymore if I started talking about things openly -- but we have made solid progress, and we want to continue doing that.

United States Government to change its policies. There's been growing pressure from elsewhere in the international community. And I think a lot of people might be wondering how the United States can justify dealing with a nation that does not recognize something so basic as the concept of racial equality.

The President. Maybe some nations can't because, as I say, if you're practicing quiet diplomacy, you can't talk about it or it won't be quiet anymore. And I have always believed that it is counterproductive for one country to splash itself all over the headlines, demanding that another government do something, because that other government then is put in an almost impossible political position. It can't appear to be rolling over at the demands of outsiders.

We are working -- for example, many people are critical and some of the protests and the demonstrations here have voiced disapproval of American investment in South Africa, of American companies that are in business there. Well, this is based on ignorance when they say this. The simple truth is that most black tribal leaders there have openly expressed their support in American business investment there, because our American businesses go there and observe practices with regard to employees that are not observed by South African companies.

American concerns; where they have jobs with opportunity. American business has spent over a hundred million dollars so far in education, in training, in management, in business, in things of that kind, in entrepreneurship. And for those who are criticizing, it's just that they're ignorant of that, and they don't know how much gain has been made for the blacks in South Africa that we're interested in helping.

Q. Sir, two questions of fairness on your prospective budget cuts. Republican leaders say they've told you that unless you include some defense scaleback, they can't sell it on the Hill, because it would not be perceived to be fair. And secondly, government workers complain that when you ask them to take a 5-percent pay cut -- with a mean average working income of government workers of $24,000 -- you are asking them in a nonrecessionary time to do something that other Americans don't have to do.

The President. They're wrong about that other Americans don't have to do. We just thought in approaching this and making that suggestion about taking a pay cut -- it starts with me -- that we're doing something that has been done in a number of major industries in the United States.

Coming out of the recession, labor renegotiated their contracts, and labor took cuts to help those industries in which they were employed get back on their feet, get back in business again. Is it fair for those who are employed by government, at a time when the deficit spending has become such a crisis that everyone is calling it the number one problem -- the deficit -- that government employees should be immune from the same thing that the other workers in America have done to try and help the economic situation?

The whole thing -- our plan of the budget cuts, of what this request that we are talking about, the tax simplification program -- is all aimed at ensuring continued economic growth, because we're not going to solve our problems, we're not going to solve the deficit problem without continued economic growth. And that's what all of our policies are aimed at doing.

The President. Well, we know that the image that's been created of the Defense Department -- if all of you, hopefully, will headline the news that the Defense Department has already made $116 billion in cuts, maybe the people will change the image they have somewhat of an extravagant Defense Department. But we know that that's important. We know that it's important across the board, to see that everyone participates in trying to achieve this freeze. And so, we will be sitting down with Cap. But again, as I say, I'm not going to get into specifics on this, because it's still in the process.

The President. I haven't had a chance to talk to him about that yet, but I wonder if what he isn't speaking is his resentment of the continued harrassment and niggling at that program that's been taking place in the Congress. That program is essential. It is the first modernized weapon in the strategic field that we have come up with after at least five such new systems by the Soviet Union.

Security does not contribute to the deficit. Social Security is totally funded by a payroll tax. If there was a reduction in Ssocial Security outgo, only two things could be done: either you would reduce the Social Security payroll tax or that money would revert to the Social Security trust fund. It would not, in any way, reduce the deficit.

The President. Yes, and much of this has been based on the levels of inflation. But again, as I've said, in 1983 -- after being victimized by political demagoguery unequaled in many years, regarding our supposed enmity towards Social Security, finally, having used it successfully in the campaign of '82 -- our opponents quieted their demagoguery and joined us in a bipartisan commission to put a bankrupt program, Social Security, on its feet. And we not only have done that, but contrary to what they said, we've improved Social Security so that the average married couple is getting $180 a month more than they were getting before we came here.

The President. As I've said, the process is still going on. And now you're trying to trap me into discussing individual items in this. We'll came back at you when we know what the program is going to be.

Q. Bishop Tutu was asked if you had any policy -- if any of your policies worked and specific examples of constructive engagement working in South Africa, and he said, no, that you had not given any specific examples.

The President. Well, we ran out of time, as a matter of fact, in our conversation, but he continued for another hour with the Vice President and the Secretary of State and others. So, I haven't had a report yet on this continued discussion.

But, no, I did tell him a number of the things and told him the very fact of our private investment and the things that I've told you and what it has meant to those who are employed by those companies over there. I told him also we have a government program we've been spending some millions of dollars over there in education and training -- job training and so forth.

Q. Sir, can you make cuts in the large, high-level Assistant Secretaries of Defense and other high-paying jobs like that, rather than cutting back the budget for women and children on nutrition and poor veterans and poorly paid civil servants?

The President. We're not destroying, in anything we're considering, the safety net. And, as I say, the cut in salaries, if this is one of the features that comes into the finished package, it will be across the board.

But I think I would like to point out also that if you compare the executive salary level in government, a great many people have to make a personal sacrifice in order to take those positions, because they are so far out of line with the comparable pay scales and benefits out in the private sector.

Q. Mr. President, you made a point in the campaign of saying the deficit was going down because of economic growth. Since the election your own advisers have put out figures that the deficit went up by 30 billion. Were you wrong when you made that prediction? And do you still believe the deficit will go down because of growth?

So, growth in the economy -- look at what it can mean. There are 6 million more people working and paying an income tax, hopefully, than there were when we came here in 1980. There are 6 million, roughly 6 million more jobs than there have been in the past. We not only put some of the unemployed back to work -- and you do know the change in the figures as of the month of November, that there has been a decline in unemployment -- but we have also kept pace with the increasing number of people entering the job market. We now have more people employed than at any time in the history of the Nation.

The President. Well, some of the same things, including every year that you continue deficit spending you add that much more to the debt and that much more interest that has to be paid, a very sizable increase in that. So, that's just one of the factors.

Q. During the campaign you said that taxes would be a last resort. You've spent the last several weeks looking over the budget and how to come to grips with the deficit. Are you any closer to going to that resort now than you were during the campaign?

The President. Not one bit. I believe that the two things we're looking at -- that tax proposal and the budgeting proposal, when it's finally completed -- are going to be consistent with what we've been seeking, and that is a policy that will stimulate growth at the same time that it will reduce unnecessary government spending. Let me leave you with just one figure: When you ask about puzzles, about deficits going up and so forth, between 1965 and 1980 -- or 1981, includes 1980 -- the budgets of the Federal Government multiplied by 4\1/2\ times to what they were in 1965. The deficit multiplied by 38 times what it was in 1965. So, we think that there is a structural cause of much of the deficit spending, that unless we turn government policies around it's going to continue and is out of hand and will be out of hand.

The President. So far, I don't know of any. There hadn't been up until the time that I left the office there. But I came over here not for some questions, but to add to our little meeting over there in the Press Room.

The President. Yes, we've been doing a number of things, and we've been working through channels that can communicate with the Iranian Government. It's a tragic situation and, as I said earlier, I don't think the Iranian Government -- I can't charge that there's complicity, but I certainly don't think that there's been any effort or a proper effort to help.

The President and the American people welcome the news that 11 black South African leaders have been released by the South African Government today. This is an action that we have publicly and privately urged on the South African Government since the day these individuals were detained over 3 weeks ago. Among those released are key trade union officials, including Phiroshaw Camay and Chris Dlamini.

This action is evidence in our view that the South African Government is prepared to respond constructively to those, both within and outside the country, who support a meaningful dialog between the Government and representatives of all racial groups. As the President explained to Bishop Tutu today, we have long called for such a dialog which would encourage progress away from apartheid toward a system based on the consent of all South Africans. Similarly, we have long pointed to the importance of the healthy development of a genuine trade union movement in South Africa. Today's news lends hope to those prospects.

You know, when this grand building was built, volunteer effort was an everyday part of our national life. Farmers would travel miles to help out with a barnraising. Food was distributed to the needy by churches and volunteer groups. And when someone fell ill, he would more than likely be cared for by his neighbors. For decades this shining tradition of voluntarism helped to give life in America a sense of security and warmth.

Yet in recent years, I think we must admit that the focus on volunteer efforts began to fade somewhat. Too many began expecting big government to perform tasks that could have been done more efficiently and with greater humanity by the private sector. In many cases, billions of dollars were spent on government programs that failed to do any lasting good.

And throughout government, we've urged the formation of partnerships between the public and private sectors. One of our most important steps was the establishment of our White House Office of Private Sector Initiatives, headed by our fine director, Jim Coyne, and the Private Sector Advisory Committee -- or Council, a council that's made up of private citizens dedicated to encouraging volunteer efforts across the country.

The members of the Council and their Chairman, Bob Galvin, of Motorola, I know are with us today. And I want to thank you all for your outstanding work. Over the past 4 years, all these efforts have had a powerful effect.

Last year alone, the United Way Campaign collected almost $2 billion, making 1983 the best year for that campaign in almost three decades. And last year was the third consecutive year that the increase in giving was higher than the inflation rate. And as Bob Galvin and his fellow members can tell us, the Private Sector Initiatives Advisory Council has found the American people are ready and eager to lend a hand.

The Council has been able to create outstanding programs -- like partnerships in education, under which nearly 16,000 American schools have formed partnerships with businesses and professional organizations; the summer jobs program, which last summer provided hundreds of thousands of young people with their first employment; and a direct, dynamic initiative in Grenada, under which more than $1\1/2\ million has been committed, in Grenada, by private American concerns since the people of that island were set free.

Over the past 4 years the American people have gained new confidence in themselves and a new optimism about our nation's future. At the same time, we've rekindled an old ember of openness and generosity. And now we Americans are giving our time, money, and skills to good causes with renewed joy and dedication. And today it's our privilege to highlight two initiatives that will help to carry the spirit of American voluntarism even further.

Army to the Grocery Manufacturers of America have generously agreed to take part. And I understand that in thousands of grocery stores across the country, collection centers will be set up for shoppers who want to make donations.

I signed the proclamation naming this date in the holiday season National Care and Share Day so that we could help to make this part of the year truly a time of good will toward all. And I urge every American to participate.

May I add one personal thought? In light of the tragedy in Ethiopia, last week I signed an order releasing 300,000 tons of wheat to the developing countries of Africa and South Asia. I know that private American efforts have already done much to help the needy around the world, especially in Ethiopia, and I would hope that on National Care and Share Day Americans would once again remember those nations that are less fortunate than our own.

Now, everybody from Chicago knows that ``C'' stands for Cubs. [Laughter] But in this case it stands for something else -- commitment. Often when we discuss voluntarism we concentrate on the efforts of individuals. But each year, business and professional associations show just as much of that national quality -- commitment -- donating millions of dollars and thousands of hours.

Permit me to give you one more example, and this one is a little close to my heart. Some months ago I devoted my Saturday radio talk to the problem of missing children. It so happened that Jim Kerrigan, chairman of the Trailways Bus Company, heard that talk and on the following Monday called the White House to say that Trailways would like to help. Working with the International Association of Chiefs of Police, Trailways put together a program where once a missing child was identified by local police, the youngster could ride home on a Trailways bus for free.

Across the country, businesses and associations with community involvement projects will be urged to register them with our Private Sector Initiatives [Partnership] DataNet, and when the projects are registered, the businesses and associations will be able to fly ``C Flags'' with pride. Of the companies that qualify for ``C Flags'' each year, 100 with outstanding programs will be selected for Presidential citations. And of these, each year 30 will receive a Presidential medal.

Now, these citations and medals we hope will become sought after, spurring businesses and professional associations on to even greater efforts. And as more and more ``C Flags'' snap in the breeze across our land, all Americans will be reminded of the vital role that our private sector plays in helping so many.

And now I would like to unveil the first ``C Flag'' and present it to Peter Ueberroth for his leadership in the Olympics, a private sector initiative of unparalleled success, and on behalf of all the businesses which made the Olympics possible.

Thank you very much. This ceremony marks more than another event on the White House calendar or another worthy cause for the national agenda, for in observing Human Rights Day, we rededicate ourselves to the cause of human dignity and freedom, a cause that goes to the heart of our national character and defines our national purpose.

So, today we dare to affirm again the commitment of the American people to the inalienable rights of all human beings. In reaffirming the moral beliefs that began our nation, we strive to make the United States what we pray to God it will always be -- a beacon of hope to all the persecuted and oppressed of the world. And we resolve that as a people, we'll never rest until the blessings of liberty and self-government are extended to all the nations of the Earth.

Two years ago in London, when I called for a crusade for freedom and human rights, I noted that these ideals -- embodied in the rule of law, under God, and in the institutions of democratic self-government -- were on the march. Because these ideals represent the oldest and noblest aspirations of the human spirit, I said then that this power is irresistible when compared to totalitarian ideologies that seek to roll back mankind's march to freedom.

Today I want to take special note of evidence that this desire for self-determination, this recognition by the state of the inalienable rights of men and women everywhere, is nowhere stronger than close to our own borders in the lands of Latin America. In contrast to only a few years ago, today more than 90 percent of the people in Latin America and the Caribbean live in nations either democratically governed or moving in that direction.

While we're still doing all that we can to promote democratic change in nations such as Paraguay and Chile, we must not forget that over the last 5 years in Argentina, Bolivia, Ecuador, El Salvador, Honduras, Panama, Peru, and most recently, in Uruguay, military juntas have been replaced by elected civilian governments. And just last Monday, democratic values triumphed again as the people of Grenada freely elected a new civilian Prime Minister.

Today all who cherish human rights and individual freedom salute the people of the Americas for their great achievements. And we pledge to our neighbors the continued support and assistance of the United States as they transform our entire hemisphere into a haven for democracy, peace, and human rights.

In other nations farther from our shores, we've also seen progress toward reducing the repression of human rights and some strengthening of democratic institutions. In some of these nations, which have authoritarian governments but friendly ties to the United States and the community of democratic nations, quiet diplomacy has brought about humane and democratic change.

But we know there are occasions when quiet diplomacy is not enough, when we must remind the leaders of nations who are friendly to the United States that such friendship also carries responsibilities for them and for us. And that's why the United States calls for all governments to advance the democratic process and work toward a system of government based on the consent of the governed.

The United States has said on many occasions that we view racism with repugnance. We feel a moral responsibility to speak out on this matter, to emphasize our concerns and our grief over the human and spiritual costs of apartheid in South Africa, to call upon the Government of South Africa to reach out to its black majority by ending the forced removal of blacks from their communities and the detention, without trial, and lengthy imprisonment of black leaders. Such action can comfort only those whose vision of South Africa's future is one of polarization, violence, and the final extinction of any hope for peaceful, democratic government. At the same time, we note with satisfaction that the South African Government has released 11 black leaders, including the top leaders of two of that country's most important labor unions.

Because we care deeply about the people of South Africa and the future of that nation, we ask that the constructive changes of recent years be broadened to address the aspirations of all South Africans. Peaceful change in South Africa, and throughout southern Africa, can come only when blacks and whites find a durable basis to live together, when they establish an effective dialog, a dialog sustained by adherence to democratic values and a belief in governments based on the consent of the governed.

We urge both the Government and the people of South Africa to move toward a more just society. We pledge here today that if South Africans address the imperatives of constructive change, they will have the unswerving support of our government and people in this effort.

A few years ago, when I spoke of totalitarian ideologies as the greatest threat to personal freedom in the world today and the most persistent source of human suffering in our century, I also pointed out that the United States, too, has faced evils like racism, anti-Semitism, and other forms of intolerance and disregard for human freedom. So, while we work to see human rights extended throughout the world, this observance of Human Rights Day reminds us of our responsibility to assure against injustice and intolerance in our own land as well. And today I call on the American people to reaffirm, in our daily lives and in the workings of our private and governmental institutions, a commitment to brotherhood and equal justice under the law.

But we do a serious disservice to the cause of human rights if we forget that, however mistaken and wrong, however stumbling the actions of democracies in seeking to achieve the ideals of freedom and brotherhood, our philosophy of government permits us to acknowledge, debate, and then correct mistakes, injustices, and violations of human rights.

Let us always remember the critical moral distinction of our time -- the clear difference between a philosophy of government that acknowledges wrongdoing and injustice and one that refuses to admit to such injustices and even justifies its own assaults on individual liberty in the name of a chimeric utopian vision. Such brutal affronts to the human conscience as the systematic suppression of individual liberty in the Soviet Union and the denial of religious expression by Christians, Jews, and Muslims in that country, are tragic examples. Today, for example, the largest remaining Jewish community in Europe, Soviet Jewry, is again being exposed to a systematic anti-Semitic campaign. Ominously, teachers of the Hebrew language have been arrested and their efforts to preserve their culture and religion treated as a crime.

Soviet authorities are continuing to threaten many ``refuseniks'' with confinement in psychiatric hospitals, expulsion from their jobs, and internal exile. Yet thousands of Soviet Jews have applied for permission to emigrate. We have and shall continue to insist that those who wish to leave must be allowed to do so.

Our heart also goes out today to an individual who has worked so hard for human rights progress in the Soviet Union and suffered so much for his efforts -- the Nobel Prize Laureate, Dr. Andrei Sakharov. Nothing more clearly illustrates the absence of what our Founding Fathers called a ``decent respect to the opinions of mankind'' than the cruel treatment of this great humanitarian.

The Soviet Union, itself, would do much to regain respect within the international community if it would allow academician Sakharov and his wife, Yelena Bonner, to live the rest of their lives in dignity in a place of their own choosing. We're pleased to have the Sakharovs' son-in-law here with us today.

The Sakharovs are the best-known victims of human rights violations in the Soviet Union, but thousands of other Soviet citizens, such as Yuriy Orlov or Anatoly Shcharanskiy -- whose wife, Avital, is here with us today -- suffer in Soviet prisons and labor camps for the sole crimes of expressing a personal opinion, seeking to emigrate, or openly expressing their love of God.

We Americans recognize a special responsibility to speak for the oppressed, wherever they may be. We think here of special cases like the persecution of the Baha'i religious minority in Iran. But we also acknowledge a special obligation to speak for those who suffer the repression of totalitarian regimes, regimes that refuse to acknowledge and correct injustice and that justify absolute state power even as they seek to extend their cruel rule to other lands.

So, we call today for all free peoples of the world to unite in resisting and bringing to an end such intolerable practices as the suppression of free trade unionism, the campaign against the church and against political freedom in Nicaragua, the continuing Vietnamese occupation of Cambodia, and the barbaric war waged by Soviet troops in Afghanistan -- a war which began 5 years ago this month with the Soviet invasion of that once nonaligned country.

Finally, we welcome the recent steps taken by the Polish Government, but we urge that they are followed by lasting efforts for genuine, national reconciliation through effective dialog with the Polish people.

So, today we the people of the United States, in conjunction with other freedom-loving people everywhere in the world, rededicate ourselves to the cause of human rights, to the cause of democratic self-rule and human freedom. We reassert our belief that some day the repression of the human spirit and the special tragedy of totalitarian rule will be only a distant chapter in the human past. In doing so, we're deeply aware of our nation's long struggle toward achieving these goals and our own heritage of seeking to promote these ideals throughout the world.

Another great American literary figure, F. Scott Fitzgerald, suggested that America is ``a willingness of the heart.'' We've recently read a great deal about the young people of this nation about whom, some say, this willingness of the heart no longer exists. Well, my own experiences with this generation suggest that the traditional idealism of the young, their hope to accomplish great things, their willingness to serve the cause of humanity, is not only intact but stronger than ever. And like every generation before it, this generation hungers for a cause, for a mission that will take it outside itself and let it help lift humanity beyond the material and the immediate to new heights of human and spiritual progress.

So, today let us challenge these young Americans to make our nation an even better example of what she was always meant to be -- champion of the oppressed, defender of all who reach for freedom and to the right of self-determination. Let us challenge young Americans, excited by technological and material progress, to ensure that this progress enriches political freedom and human dignity as well. Here's a challenge that's worthy of our youth, of their vision, their energy, and their vigor. Let our younger generation lead young people throughout the world to join the democratic nations in promoting human rights and self-government and the cause of human freedom.

The other night at the Kennedy Center, they had a choir, a United Nations choir of 90 young people, children, in the costumes of their native countries from all over the world. And looking at them down there, singing together, I couldn't help but think, ``Good Lord, if we turn it all over to them, they'd get along just fine together.'' And maybe the world should follow their lead.

There is in the Book of Genesis a story of great loss. It's a story of man alienated from his fellow man and turning to persecution and hatred for others. Well, I believe that history is slowly working itself back to the restoration of brotherhood and mutual respect among all the peoples of the Earth. So, today we rededicate ourselves to this vision and mission. We do so mindful that human might and will alone cannot achieve this goal, aware that our ultimate success will be determined by our faith in the power of prayer, in the promises of Him who made us and even now guides us in our quest for human dignity and freedom.

For the first time in the history of nations, our Founding Fathers established a written Constitution with enumerated rights based on the principle that the rights to life and liberty come not from the prerogative of government, but inhere in each person as a fundamental human heritage. Americans believe that all persons are equal in their possession of these unalienable rights and are entitled to respect because of the immense dignity and value of each human being. With these great principles in mind, the Founding Fathers designed a system of government limited in its powers, based upon just laws, and resting upon the consent of the governed.

When Americans first proclaimed this noble experiment in self-government and human liberty, it seemed to some to be a utopian, unrealistic ideal. Today, virtually every nation in the world has adopted a written constitution expressing in varying degrees fundamental human rights. One hundred and fifty-seven years after the ratification of our Bill of Rights, on December 10, 1948, the United Nations adopted the Universal Declaration of Human Rights affirming an international consensus on behalf of the human rights and individual liberties that we value so highly.

Thirty-six years after the adoption of the Universal Declaration of Human Rights, however, it is clear that this consensus is often recognized more on paper than in practice. Throughout the world, many governments nominally adhere to the Universal Declaration of Human Rights while suppressing free elections, independent trade unions, due process of law, and freedom of religion and of the press.

The United States recognizes a special responsibility to advance the claims of the oppressed; to reaffirm the rights to life and liberty as fundamental rights upon which all others are based; and to safeguard the rights to freedom of thought, conscience, and religion. As we are free, we must speak up for those who are not.

As Americans, we strongly object to and seek to end such affronts to the human conscience as the incarceration in the Soviet Union of men and women who try to speak out freely or who seek to exercise the basic right to emigrate; the harsh treatment accorded one of the great humanitarians of our time, Andrei Sakharov, the denial of basic human rights and self-determination in Eastern Europe and the Baltic states; the failure of the Polish authorities to establish an effective dialogue with the free trade union movement in that country; the manifest injustices of the apartheid system of racial discrimination in South Africa; the persecution of the Baha'i religious minority in Iran; the lack of progress toward democratic government in Chile and Paraguay; the campaign against the Roman Catholic Church in Nicaragua; the suppression of freedom in Cuba and Vietnam; the brutal war waged by Soviet troops against the people of Afghanistan; and the continuing Vietnamese occupation of Kampuchea.

The American people recognize that it is the denial of human rights, not their advocacy, that is a source of world tension. We recall the sacrifices that generations of Americans have made to preserve and protect liberty around the world. In this century alone, tens of thousands of Americans have laid down their lives on distant battlefields to uphold the cause of human rights.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 10th day of Dec., in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-four, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and ninth.

We have received confirmation that the remains of the two murdered Americans departed Tehran for Frankfurt. The remains will be identified by U.S. military forensic specialists. After identification, tentative plans call for the bodies to be transported to Andrews AFB. I do not have an arrival time for you at this time.

Messrs. Kapar and Costa have been flown by a Kuwaiti aircraft to Kuwait, where they are being picked up by a USAF aircraft and will be transported to Frankfurt, West Germany. I understand they should be leaving Kuwait just about now, noon, December 11. A determination on their onward itinerary has not yet been made.

The fact of the matter is that two passengers were murdered by the hijackers, more were tortured, and many were brutalized for an extended period of time without any effective measures being taken by the Government of Iran. Granting selective media access, broadcasting statements and screams of tortured passengers, permitting photographers aboard the aircraft, clearly encouraged extreme behavior by the hijackers. The passengers, the families of the murdered passengers, and the world deserve answers from the Government of Iran.

Previous actions by the Government of Iran have shown that it has the capability to act rapidly and effectively to end hijackings when it so wishes. On this occasion, when the lives of innocent American, Kuwaiti, and other citizens were at stake, it did otherwise. Two U.S. Government employees were murdered. We will probably never know what would have happened had the Iranian Government acted more firmly.

Under the Hague Convention for Suppression of Unlawful Seizure of Aircraft, to which Iran is a party, the Government of Iran has an obligation to submit the hijackers' case to prosecutorial authorities or to extradite them to another country for trial.

Iran's failure to try or extradite several previous groups of hijackers is clear evidence that it has not met its obligations and reinforced the impression that it is sympathetic to and provides a safe haven for hijackers.

The American attitude and actions toward the Government of Iran in the aftermath of this tragedy will be conditioned by whether it meets its obligations and by our assessment of its role during this tragic incident. We have been and will continue to watch Iranian actions closely.

Our meeting takes place at a time when the world's attention is focused on the serious food crisis in Africa. Niger has not been spared the ravages of the drought. However, through the constructive efforts of President Kountche's government and the help of the international community, including the United States, the effects of the drought in Niger will be reduced.

President Kountche represents an impressive example of the kind of serious, concerned leadership that Africa will need to overcome its economic problems. His reputation as a dedicated and capable leader has been confirmed by his visit to Washington today.

In our conversations this morning, and at lunch, we covered many of the important international problems of the day, particularly those concerning Africa. We have benefited from President Kountche's views on the problems of drought and economic development in the Sahel, as well as the political problems of that region. We support Niger's efforts to maintain its independence and territorial integrity.

Niger and the United States together are committed to the resolution of international problems through the pursuit of realistic dialog in international organizations and through the exercise of rational economic policies at home. And I have assured President Kountche of our support for him and his country, and I've expressed our admiration for his accomplishments at home and abroad.

President Ronald Reagan. We discussed bilateral cooperation, as well as African and international issues regarding the effects of world recession, the persistent drought and famine in Africa, and the flashpoints existing in almost all the continents. Our discussions were also especially focused on the role of the United States of America in the search for a better international political, economic, and military balance. And I can say that the views of our two countries were consistent with each other, and there were a good understanding on most of the issues discussed.

As far as Africa is concerned, you know that we are currently preoccupied by the harsh drought that is once again affecting extensive areas of our continent, the result of which is the reappearance of hunger in many countries, especially in extensive regions of the Sahel, in the whole of Africa, and eastern Africa.

I'm glad to note that both President Reagan and his administration are fully aware of this situation and that not only do they sympathize with us, but they are also seriously concerned by the great sufferings affecting several thousands of Africans that have been seriously hit. President Reagan and the American administration have already provided substantial food aid, and Niger is grateful to them for that. The President also assured me that the United States will continue to use significant means to decisively help in the crusade against hunger and death in Africa. And this is essentially in a humanitarian spirit.

Namibia and the persistence of apartheid in South Africa engender an untenable situation in the frontline states. President Ronald Reagan and I agree that more consultation between Africa and the United States of America will make it possible to remove the obstacles and solve these problems in serenity, in justice, and in the rule of law.

Besides, I would be right to say that through these discussions we were able to compare our common desire to see peace and security prevail throughout the world on the basis of the great ideals of the right of the peoples to self-determination and liberty, respect for all the countries' sovereignty and territorial integrity, respect for the countries' domestic political choice, and respect for the rules of good neighborliness and peaceful coexistence among the nations.

Naturally, we did not lose sight of the economic issues, because Niger and all Africa are severely hit by the economic crisis that unfortunately affects all the continents. In this regard, we both recognized that the United States have a top role to play in order to safeguard peace in the world and, mostly, to save the stability of small nations.

President Ronald Reagan for all the efforts that he has been making and for the great vigilance that he has personally shown concerning Niger and regarding the problems of Africa. You know that in recent years, President Ronald Reagan and his administration have launched a diversified, dynamic, and especially friendly and fruitful cooperation with my country. And I can say today that the United States of America are among our most active and most effective partners.

Moreover, I have been seriously impressed by the fact -- by his awareness of the global problems, his worshiping of liberty and the fulfillment of man, his determination to build an American society ever stronger and more prosperous.

I wish him good health, a continuous clearmindedness, a growing clear sight to fulfill the well-deserved new term of office with which he has just been entrusted by the people, following his reelection, that in all aspects was a personal triumph and a general satisfaction expressed to him by the great American people.

This year marks the eighty-first anniversary of human flight in a powered, winged aircraft. The dedicated efforts of Orville and Wilbur Wright made this possible. In the years that have passed since that time, the world has undergone a revolution in transportation that has brought nations closer together and helped unite the global community in ways never before possible.

Brothers' aero-vehicle on December 17, 1903, was truly the ``flight heard round the world.'' That flight -- limited in immediate, practical application but infinite in conceptual progress -- helped foster the Nation's spirit of innovation and dedication to technological advancement. This spirit has thrust the United States into world leadership in all facets of aviation, both civil and military.

Secretary-General Perez de Cuellar that the two Cypriot communities have agreed to participate in a summit meeting in January. We view this as a very positive development, one that would create new opportunities to end the division of Cyprus and establish a reunited Cypriot Government.

I was in the White House a few moments ago looking out at all of you down there surrounding the tree, and I thought of how God gives us moments that lift us and that bring us together. For many of us, Christmas is a deeply holy day, the birthday of the promised Messiah, the Son of God who came to redeem our sins and teach us that most needed of all lessons, ``Peace on Earth, good will among men.'' For others of us, Christmas marks the birth of a good, great man, a prophet whose teachings provide a pattern of living pertinent to all times and to all people. Either way, his message remains the guiding star of our endeavors.

For the past few years in this great house, I've thought of our first real Christmas as a nation. It was the dark and freezing Christmas of 1776, when General Washington and his troops crossed the Delaware. They and Providence gave our nation its first Christmas gift -- a victory that brought us closer to liberty, the condition in which God meant man to flourish.

It always seems to me that Christmas is a time of magic. Each December we celebrate a Prince, the Prince of Peace, born in utter poverty. And the fact of his birth makes hearts turn warmest at the coldest time of the year.

Many of us do good at this time; most of us all mean to, but sometimes good intentions get lost in the hurry and bustle of the holiday season. Well, this is only the 13th day of December. We still have a dozen days to answer that letter of a child who wrote Santa Claus at the post office, or to buy an extra gift for a Toys for Tot program, or whatever. So, if you've forgotten to do it -- well, do it, and do it tonight or tomorrow. One of the great messages of this season is that it's never too late to touch a life and maybe change the world forever for someone.

Over the next few weeks let us all remember those who serve our country abroad -- the 800,000 men and women in uniform, the members of our Foreign Service, the people who work in our information agencies throughout the world, and the men and women in the Peace Corps. Even though they can't be at the table this Christmas, they must not be far from our hearts. And let me add, there is no one we hold in our hearts more closely than those MIA's -- those missing in action in Southeast Asia, some of whom may be serving our country still. They, too, are absent at the table, and the gathering will never be complete until they return or are accounted for.

Now, I know you're all waiting, and in the immortal words of the astronaut Alan Shepard, ``I'm going to stop talking and light the candle.'' Light it in a nation at peace, a nation united, for the ties that bind still bind. So, now I light the Nation's Christmas tree. May its thousand lights illuminate our best resolves and cast a great glow on our affection for each other, and our thanks for each other, and our love.

The President. Let me answer any questions you may have with just one statement on that. All of the things that I've been reading about this -- which are obviously based on leaks -- those leaks are without any solid foundation.

Note: The exchange began at 10:55 a.m. on the South Grounds of the White House, where reporters had assembled for the presentation of the first set of commemorative Inaugural license plates to the President.

As the result of several years of efforts in a series of intensive discussions, the U.S. was able to reach agreement with Cuba today on the return to Cuba of approximately 2,700 who came to the United States in the Mariel boatlift of 1980. Representatives of the Department of State and the Immigration and Naturalization Service of the Department of Justice participated in these discussions.

Those persons to be returned to Cuba are ineligible to remain in the U.S. because they admitted to committing serious crimes in Cuba, have committed serious crimes in the United States, or suffer from severe mental disorders. It was agreed that these persons will be returned in a phased and orderly manner.

I would like to point out that those who will be returned represent only a very small percentage of the persons who came to the United States in the Mariel boatlift. The vast majority of these 129,000 persons have incorporated themselves into American life and are now being processed by INS under the Cuban Adjustment Act of 1966 for legal resident status.

Cuba's agreement to accept the return of those individuals removes an impediment under U.S. law and permits us to resume normal processing of visas for Cuban applicants, as had been the case in Havana prior to 1980. Processing of all immigrant visas, other than for immediate relatives of U.S. citizens, and processing of refugee applications have been suspended since 1980 because of Cuba's refusal to accept the return of persons whom the U.S. has declared excludable. Under the refugee program, ex-political prisoners in Cuba will be eligible to apply to come to the United States under established U.S. procedures. We cannot predict how many Cubans will apply for entry into the United States, but I would reemphasize that both those returning to Cuba and those applying to come to the U.S. will be handled in a phased and orderly process.

The talks were limited only to migration matters. Moreover, the conclusion of an agreement on this issue does not signal any change in U.S. policy toward Cuba. That policy reflects our serious concern about Cuba's international behavior. We see no evidence that Cuba is prepared to change that behavior.

The President has made his decision regarding the defense budget. The decision is based on his determination that all agencies and departments, including the Department of Defense, will be involved in the plan to reduce the deficit. Consistent with this directive, the budget originally submitted by Secretary Weinberger for fiscal year 1986 will be reduced by 11 [11.1] billion in budget authority and by 8.7 billion in outlays. These reductions will bring the President's fiscal year '86 request for defense to levels below the amounts previously approved in October in the congressional budget resolution for both budget authority and outlays.

The President is also committed to a deficit reduction plan with the objective of shrinking the deficit at a percentage of gross national product from 4 percent in fiscal year '86 to 3 percent in fiscal '87 and 2 percent in fiscal '88.

On September 18, 1984, the President announced his decision to deal with unfair trade in steel by seeking negotiated agreements with major steel suppliers within a 90-day period. The 90 days ended yesterday. Today the President is very pleased with the successful conclusion of these negotiations, carried out by his United States Trade Representative. He considers these agreements to be a step in the right direction.

We believe that overall steel import penetration of the U.S. market will decline significantly as a result of these agreements and that the U.S. steel industry will be able to compete in the world markets.

The first Christmas was a time of family joy for Joseph and Mary and the child Jesus. Although they had made a long journey to reach Bethlehem and were lodged in humble surroundings, they knew that the child Mary bore was a gift not to them alone, but to all mankind. The shepherds who gathered around the manger, and the wise men who traveled from the East to honor the King of Kings, knew that the star above Bethlehem was a guide not only for the pilgrims of that day, but for those in every age seeking the peace which passes understanding.

An early American hymn sang of the Christ-child that ``this richest babe comes poor in being, more pearled within than to the seeing.'' More than any gift or toy, ornament or tree, let us resolve that this Christmas shall be, like that first Christmas, a celebration of interior treasures. And let us resolve to share our many blessings with others now and in the year to come -- from the hungry or the helpless near at hand to those in trouble or turmoil in distant lands from Africa to Asia and beyond.

Today, as we gather with our family and friends to honor Christ, we can experience the same peace and joy as the shepherds and the Magi did almost two thousand years ago. If we make that peace and joy a part of our lives, our example will serve as a guide and an inspiration for everyone we meet. Nancy and I pray that the joy of this holiday season will remain with us all throughout the coming year. May God bless you.

This holiday commemorates the Maccabees victory over their oppressors and the valiant spirit of their battle. Two thousand years ago, God blessed their efforts to retain an independent Jewish commonwealth and to preserve the Jewish religion. Today, their descendants have been similarly blessed. Truly, Hanukkah is a festival whose celebration is meaningful in a contemporary as well as an historical context.

The President. I have read all of that and, no, it is not true. And he and I have met and discussed all of the changes that are being made and most of those are just rotations. The individuals are going from one place to another. And it just isn't true.

The President. No, he is being most cooperative, and he has some of the same problems I do. He has some people in government that don't always agree with what he's trying to do, but we have made great progress. But there's a long way to go yet, and he knows that, too.

The President. Well, I know that in that great distance there's probably a reason why he doesn't know what he's talking about. He doesn't understand exactly what it is that we're researching, but we're going to be very pleased to let them know exactly what it is that we're talking about. And I think they'll see that maybe it's better if we have a world in which you've got some kind of a defense that maybe can destroy weapons without killing millions of people.

The President. Well, I'll get them to understand what it is, too. Today the only defensive weapon we have is to threaten that if they kill millions of our people, we'll kill millions of theirs. I don't think there's any morality in that at all. We're trying to look for something that will make those weapons obsolete, and they can be eliminated once and for all. Mr. President, when you come back from Christmas and from New Year's, do you think you'll have a second honeymoon with the Congress?

Railway Labor Act applicable to commuter railroads and created Emergency Board No. 204 to investigate and report on this same dispute. Emergency Board No. 204 investigated the issues and prepared a report and recommendations for settlement. The board's report was submitted to the President on September 24, 1984.

Following the release of the report and recommendations by Emergency Board No. 204, the parties unsuccessfully continued their attempts to resolve their differences. The statutory period allotted for this process expires at midnight December 23, 1984.

Section 9A(e) of the Railway Labor Act provides that a party to the dispute or the Governor of any State through which the service runs may request the President to establish a second emergency board if the dispute remains unresolved. Emergency Board No. 207 was created in response to such a request made by the Port Authority Trans-Hudson Corporation. The parties will now submit their final offers to the board within 30 days, and the board will report its selection of the most reasonable offer within 30 days thereafter. From the time a request to establish a board is made until 60 days after the board makes its report, no change, except by agreement, shall be made by the parties in the conditions out of which the dispute arose.

Five years ago the army of the Soviet Union invaded Afghanistan, overthrew its government, and installed a puppet regime subservient to Moscow. This regime enjoys no popular support from the people of Afghanistan; it is propped up by the guns of 115,000 Soviet occupation troops.

This fifth anniversary of Afghan defiance stands in stark contrast to the joyful holidays we celebrate at this time of the year. Yet there is a message of inspiration in the cruel tale being written this winter in the mountain passes and valleys of Afghanistan. The Afghan freedomfighters -- the mujahidin -- remind us daily that the human spirit is resilient and tenacious, and that liberty is not easily stolen from a people determined to defend it. The Afghan people are writing a new chapter in the history of freedom. We Americans salute their magnificent courage.

By overwhelming margins in the United Nations, the world community has repeatedly expressed its condemnation of the Soviet occupation of Afghanistan. For our part, the United States has made clear to Soviet leaders that the presence of Soviet occupying forces in Afghanistan constitutes a serious impediment to the improvement of our bilateral relations. We cannot and will not remain silent on Afghanistan. We join our voice with other members of the world community in calling for a prompt, negotiated end to this brutal conflict.

Nations: the withdrawal of Soviet forces from Afghanistan; the restoration of Afghanistan's independence and its nonaligned status; self-determination for the Afghan people; and the return of the millions of Afghan refugees to their homes with safety and honor. Until these goals are achieved, the Soviet Union will continue to pay a high price for its suppression of Afghanistan's freedom.

In this season when people of good will everywhere turn their attention to the greatest blessing a nation can enjoy -- peace at home and abroad -- we will not forget the people of Afghanistan who are struggling to live once again among the free nations of the world. These brave people will continue to have the support of all Americans in their noble struggle.

The President. Well, it would be a continuation. It's something we're talking about as part of the whole budget process -- the deficit process. It wouldn't be a further cut; it would be a continuation of the freeze.

The President. A President once called a similar day a ``day of infamy.'' I guess that's exactly what this is also, the anniversary of a day of infamy. There is no legitimate excuse for a great power like the Soviet Union that is doing what it is doing to the people of Afghanistan.

For more than 700,000 Americans with cerebral palsy, life is a struggle to overcome the challenges posed by brain abnormalities present since very early life, often before birth. As cerebral palsy victims mature, they must confront lack of movement control and, possibly, seizures, loss of hearing, vision, or other senses, or mental or emotional impairment. This year, nearly 7,000 children will be born with cerebral palsy.

Health care professionals and educators throughout our Nation are making bold strides in helping those affected to deal with this disorder. Through physical rehabilitation and occupational therapy, many cerebral palsy patients are learning to lead happy, productive lives in the mainstream of society. These efforts have been spearheaded by two voluntary health agencies, the United Cerebral Palsy Associations, Inc. and the National Easter Seal Society.

Investigators supported by the National Institute of Neurological and Communicative Disorders and Stroke and by voluntary health agencies are developing new drugs and devices to alleviate the symptoms of cerebral palsy. Scientists also are learning how to prevent the disorder, particularly with closely monitored prenatal care to minimize risks to the developing child. With the combined efforts of concerned voluntary and public health agencies, the tragedy of cerebral palsy can be substantially reduced.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-seventh day of December, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-four, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and ninth.

For the past 24 years, the Poison Prevention Week Council has coordinated a network of health, safety, business, and voluntary organizations to raise public awareness of the problem. In addition, the Consumer Product Safety Commission, which administers the Poison Prevention Packaging Act, requires child-resistant closures on many products that are potentially harmful to children.

While these efforts have been very successful, we must not be satisfied with the progress we have made. Because we believe that almost all such poisonings are preventable, we must continue working to reduce this annual toll by reminding parents and other family members of the steps they can take to avert these tragedies. We must remind them to keep household chemicals, cleaning products, and medicines out of the reach of children and to use re-securable, child-resistant closures on these products.

The President. Those 40 years have seen some remarkable changes in the world. One of the most remarkable has been the reconciliation between former adversaries, including the United States and Japan. Today Japan and the United States are close partners and good friends. We share the common values of freedom and democracy. We are bound by a security treaty. Unfortunately, Japan, the United States, and other democracies continue to be confronted by a system that stands for different values.

Geneva. Could you tell us something about your expectations of the meeting? What do you hope to agree to at this specific meeting? Six major items on the agenda of the U.S.-Soviet negotiations will be the status of space, strategic, intermediate-range, conventional, and chemical weaponry, as well as certain confidence-building measures. How could these items be interrelated with each other in the framework of an umbrella formula in the negotiations to follow up the Shultz-Gromyko meeting?

But we must temper our expectations with realism. A 2-day meeting cannot solve the complicated issues before us. We hope it will be a constructive beginning for further detailed negotiations, but it isn't an easy job. Only time will tell how rapidly the process moves, or in which specific framework.

Meaningful progress on arms control has a high priority in this administration. We have been working long hours to prepare for Secretary Shultz's meeting with Mr. Gromyko. The Secretary will enter those meetings with concrete suggestions on a full range of arms control issues. We hope the Soviets will show a similar constructive spirit.

The fundamental objective of our talks with the Soviets has to be kept in mind. We are not looking for an agreement for its own sake. We are striving to improve stability, reduce the risk of war, and to lower the levels of nuclear arms. That involves hard bargaining on issues of great mutual concern. The U.S. is committed to conduct that process seriously and creatively.

I've met with Foreign Minister Gromyko, and our discussions were useful. The Soviets say they would want a very carefully prepared agenda for any summit meeting. That makes sense to me. In the past, meetings that there were not carefully prepared often led to great expectations and great disappointments, and I don't think we ought to go into something of that kind.

Q. In what way may the Western allies, including Japan, support successful U.S.-Soviet negotiations? Do you support independent action on the part of the allies for relaxation of tensions with the U.S.S.R. and the Eastern European nations?

Williamsburg summit the Western leaders were united in their commitment to arms reductions and continued thorough and intensive consultations. Further, we noted that security is indivisible and must be approached on a global basis. Prime Minister Nakasone was a key participant in the discussions that led up to this united commitment.

Alliance solidarity behind NATO's 1979 dual track decision on INF modernization has prevented the Soviets from unilaterally dictating Western security policy. This solidarity stems from the extensive consultations which the U.S. conducts with its European and Japanese allies on arms control issues. These consultations have assured a consensus among the allies which is essential in dealing with the Soviets on these vital issues.

The President. We welcome recent efforts by the Chinese and the Soviets to put their relations on a more normal footing. Differences between the Soviet Union and China run very deep, however, and center on three major problems: massive Soviet troop deployments along the Chinese border with the Soviet Union and Mongolia; Soviet support for the Vietnamese invasion of Cambodia; and the Soviet invasion of Afghanistan. These are serious impediments, it seems to me. The Chinese are very positive about our forthcoming arms talks with the Soviets. They want these discussions to bring a genuine reduction of nuclear weapons. They don't want the Soviets merely to redeploy their missiles, from west to east. We agree.

Q. As you prepare to receive Prime Minister Nakasone in Los Angeles in early January, we would like to ask about your fundamental assessment of U.S.-Japan relations today. For the promotion of friendly and constructive relations, what do you expect of Japanese policy in economic matters, defense, and foreign affairs?

We've had excellent meetings before. My visit to your country when he was my host was just wonderful. I think U.S.-Japanese relations are as good as they have ever been. When I meet with the Prime Minister on January 2, I know that we will begin our talks on the basis of our common desire to make the U.S.-Japan relationship even closer. I don't think there's any confusion about what it will take to succeed. Economically, we need to work hard to continue and enhance the progress made after our talks in Tokyo in November 1983. We have made progress in our security relationship, which will continue to develop to the benefit of both sides. But it is in foreign affairs that the real payoff of close U.S.-Japan relations can increasingly be found. As our ability to cooperate and coordinate our policies increases, so does the scope of what we can accomplish together. Our international cooperation will reflect our ability to handle problems in our bilateral relationship, including trade issues. It is my hope that as leading democracies and as the leading free world economies, Japan and America will be able to provide solutions by putting our heads -- and our hearts -- together in a partnership for the cause of good.

Q. Cooperation between the U.S. and Japan in a Pacific Basin initiative is said to be a leading topic of discussion in the upcoming Los Angeles meeting. Could you elaborate on your ideas about its realization?

The President. Although the United States has long been a two-ocean nation, in the past we focused most of our attention on our Atlantic coast because of our historic relationship with Europe. But during the past decade or so, the growth of democracy and the dynamic economic development of the Pacific region also have earned our admiration and our very close attention.

As a result, while Europe certainly remains as vital as ever to us, a new perspective has emerged toward the Pacific. Japan, of course, plays a key role in this new American perspective. Both our countries are prepared to devote our resources and energies to seeking ways to cooperate with our neighbors in the Pacific. But it is important that we not be rushed in our eagerness to get started. Pacific Basin cooperation, in whatever form it eventually emerges, will not be successful and will not last unless it has the full support of all our Pacific neighbors, and unless there is benefit for all. The Pacific Basin will be a topic of conversation between the Prime Minister and myself in Los Angeles, but it is too soon to talk about or expect any specific announcements or agreements.

Q. The United States trade deficit with Japan may reach $35 billion this year. Renewed calls for import surcharges are coming from Capitol Hill and industry circles. Will your present position on free trade change in response to calls for the protection of U.S. industries? And what are your expectations on Japan in light of the current deficit? For instance, as yet there are several unsettled matters concerning trade and the opening of the Japanese market: (1) the expansion of voluntary export restraints on '85 automobiles, (2) reduction of tariff rates on wood products and (3) total liberalization of agricultural products. We would appreciate any thoughts you might give us about specific approaches to settling these and other trade issues.

The President. I believe that free trade is a powerful force for progress and peace. The winds of commerce carry opportunities that help nations grow and bring citizens of the world closer together. Increased trade spells more jobs, higher earnings, better products, less inflation, and more cooperation. The freer the flow of world trade, the wider the benefits of economic progress.

Nowhere is free trade more important than in America's commercial ties with Japan -- our largest overseas trading partner. And we are Japan's most important market. This year $85 billion in goods and services is flowing across the Pacific between our two nations. But the potential would be even greater if it were not for some trade barriers Japan still maintains which reduce competitive foreign imports.

We've worked hard to encourage Japan to open its domestic market fully to foreign products. We want American companies to have the same opportunity to sell their goods and services and to invest in Japan that your companies already enjoy in our market. You have responded by reducing some trade barriers and we appreciate these measures. The efforts by the Japanese Government to open capital markets for foreign participation and to liberalize the yen are also important steps in the right direction.

But many U.S. companies still cannot compete in Japan on an equal basis. High tariffs stymie our efforts to sell competitive U.S. exports like processed forest products. While there has been some liberalization of agricultural quotas, these should be eventually eliminated so that Japanese consumers have the chance to buy U.S., beef, citrus, and other farm products in quantities and at prices freely set in the marketplace. And I hope that the transformation of Japan's government telecommunications monopoly into a private company will allow U.S. suppliers of these products a fair shot at your market, just as Japanese companies already have here. Your question also refers to Japan's voluntary export restraints on automobiles which expires at the end of March. I think that it is premature for me to make any comment on this, and, in any case, this is a decision for the Japanese Government to make.

On the trade deficit with Japan -- it will approach $35 billion by the end of the year -- I realize there is no easy answer to this problem, but the sheer size of the deficit has generated growing protectionist sentiment in this country. Therefore, I urge the Japanese Government and people to move even more quickly to open Japan's market to competitive foreign products. If this is done, our trans-Pacific trade relations can continue to expand and flourish to the mutual benefit of our two countries.

Q. With the Olympic Games scheduled in Seoul in 1988, the Korean peninsula may become a focus of international attention. What is your evaluation of the current state of affairs on the peninsula as the date approaches? Do you have any initiatives in mind to maintain peace there?

Korean invasion of the South in 1950. Such tension has at times grown even more serious, as, for example, after the North Korean bombing in Rangoon in October of 1983, which almost killed President Chun and did kill several of his key advisers. However, we have seen welcome signs of tension reduction between the two Korean states recently. Talks on economic cooperation and Red Cross talks on such matters as family unification have taken place, and representatives of both Korean Governments will meet again in January to discuss these topics. I think that peace initiatives or tension reduction measures, like the economic and Red Cross talks, must properly come from the two Korean Governments themselves. They must be the major interlocutors in any inter-Korean dialog, but Japan, China, the U.S.S.R., and the U.S. all have an interest in seeing that peace is preserved and that tension on the peninsula is reduced.

Q. Are you planning any initiatives in your second term for the solution of problems in these specific areas of the world? What contribution do you expect from the allied nations, including Japan, to help solve regional conflicts?

The President. One way to solve regional conflicts is to convince the parties to the conflict that they have more to gain by seeking peace. The United States is committed to the peace process in the Middle East, Central America, southern Africa, and elsewhere.

Another way to deal with regional tensions is to create an environment of political stability and economic development that deals with the source of the problem. Japan has increasingly contributed to this process throughout the world through its growing aid programs. I hope Japan will continue to exercise a positive and increasingly visible diplomatic and economic role in the Asian region and throughout the world.

Q. Could you elaborate on your principal ideas about reducing the United States budgetary deficit and the high interest rates which are also matters of concern to your allies? Please comment on your position during the coming term.

The President. As a result of our economic policies, millions of jobs have been created, inflation has been cut sharply, interest rates reduced, and in general the U.S. economy has enjoyed a strong, sustained recovery. In turn, America's economic return has helped the economies of our trading partners, including Japan.

Let's look at the record. The U.S. should enjoy a 4-percent growth rate next year. Consumer incomes are rising at a steady pace and consumer confidence is strong. Robust business spending, spurred by our 1981 tax cuts, helped propel the current expansion, and prospects for continued strength in capital spending remain favorable. Inflation will remain low and under control in 1985.

There has been much criticism of the strength of the dollar by many of our allies. Critics have charged that the dollar is substantially overvalued because of high U.S. interest rates resulting from large budget deficits. They contend that the high dollar threatens the global recovery and the U.S. must ``correct'' its value.

These arguments are not supported by the facts. While the levels of interest rates have periodically played an important role in determining exchange rates, this has not been generally the case during this administration. The improved U.S. business climate and the sharp drop in our inflation are probably the key to the dollar's performance. I am sympathetic to the view that the value of the dollar is high, but I disagree that it is ``overvalued.'' Such a view implies that we can calculate the ``right'' rate independent of market forces. I believe that we cannot do so.

Q. The forthcoming Bonn summit marks the 40th anniversary of the end of World War II. What are your thoughts on the development of this organization as it convenes for the 11th time? What will be your basic position in the forthcoming talks?

The President. The annual economic summits are a very useful opportunity for the leaders of the seven main industrialized countries to explain to each other their perspectives and plans for their own economies and their participation in the world economy. In addition, it is an occasion to review the year ahead. Summits are not and cannot be meetings at which we draw up detailed blueprints for solving the world's problems. Whenever that was tried in the past, it failed. But a summit can and does give each participant a clearer understanding of how others see current problems and the tasks before us, so that we can better determine how we should be moving, both separately and together, to deal most effectively with our common agenda.

It is too early to say what will be the main themes of the Bonn summit. However, we have much unfinished business still before us. We need to reaffirm our determination to promote sustainable noninflationary growth in each of our economies. We need to move rapidly to begin a new round of trade negotiations as the best assurance against resurgent protectionist pressures. We need to continue the policies we outlined at the Williamsburg and London meetings to deal in the longer term with the debt problem and the need to integrate the developing countries more effectively into the open world trade and finance systems. As with previous economic summits, the Bonn summit will provide an opportunity for us to discuss informally the more important international political issues facing all our countries, of which the search for meaningful arms reduction is one of the most pressing. In this search, I'm proud to know that Japan is our ally and friend.

States of America, to implement the portion of the consolidated Annex to the Agreement which pertains to articles imported into the United States, recorded in the decision of March 22, 1984, upon his determination that the additional duty-free treatment to be accorded by the United States, as set forth in the Annex to this proclamation, is comparable to the expanded coverage provided by other signatories to the Agreement.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-eighth day of December, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-four, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and ninth.

And Mike Frankovich, you share those words of gratitude; everybody knows how devoted you are to Variety. [Laughter] And Ben Vereen, you've danced your way into America's heart. And Emmanuel Lewis, we should never lose sight of what you said -- wait a minute -- even if sometimes we lose sight of you. [Laughter] Well, there you are, Manny. And that was a lovely sentiment that was expressed by the International [National] Children's Choir. And Chuck Heston, I knew you had leadership qualities when I saw you play Moses. You were eloquent and gracious in your remarks about me -- that guard on the Eureka varsity -- thank you.

To all of you associated with the good work of Variety, you have our eternal gratitude for arranging this party, for all the good work that you have done in your half a century of giving and caring for those who need our help the most, the innocent children of the world. Having my name associated with your good work -- the University of Nebraska Medical Center will always have a special place in my heart, and I thank you all very much.

Variety Clubs International. Following his remarks, he attended a dinner for program participants and guests. At the end of the evening, the President went to the Century Plaza Hotel in Los Angeles, CA, where he stayed overnight.

Thank you all very much, and I was delighted to see these young people here, because that's what these elections for the next few times are all about -- them and the America that they are going to grow up in. Well, I thank you, Senator Gorton, for your very kind words about party duties. I think I should confess: I'm doing penance for all those wasted years before I -- [laughter]. Senator Evans, Congressmen Miller, Morrison, and Chandler, Bill Ruckelshaus, and you ladies and gentlemen, it's an honor for me to be here today in support of a courageous champion of good government and fiscal responsibility, your Senator, Slade Gorton.

There's a story -- you knew I'd have a story -- about a fellow who had a different kind of job in mind, but he was out there working for the job. And then he saw an ad in the help wanted ads, where the zoo wanted a worker at the zoo, and he immediately applied because he had always wanted to work and loved to work with animals. And when he got there, though, he found that the job was to put on a gorilla suit, sit in the cage, and be the gorilla for the people who came to visit the zoo. Their old gorilla had died, and they had not yet received delivery of his successor.

Well, seriously though, Slade and I were both elected in 1980 because there was a critical job to do. And thanks to the policies of tax and tax and spend and spend, our country was heading toward an economic catastrophe. We were suffering the ravages of both double-digit inflation and stagnation. Our military strength had been permitted to erode, and our confidence as a people was shaken. Turning around that situation was no easy job, but with the leadership of Senate Republicans like Senator Gorton, we went to work. It took some doing to reverse the decades of more and more government as the answer to every problem and to put our program in place, and even more to stand firm until it had time to produce results. There was enormous pressure to go back to the policies that we'd left behind. Let me just ask you: Were we right to stick to our guns?

We can all be proud that there's a new spirit alive in America today. We've left cynicism and pessimism behind and recaptured that confidence and optimism that has been a hallmark of our people. We have it within our power to lay the foundation for a generation of prosperity and peace. With the leadership of responsible, hard-working, future-oriented elected officials like Senator Slade Gorton, we'll do just that. We can be proud that since he arrived in our Nation's Capital, Senator Gorton has remained immune to the Potomac disease, which causes too many elected officials to give up a better tomorrow for America in order to placate special interests today. I think that reflects well on you, the people he represents.

California, have always been able to see a great future just beyond the horizon and understand that it is not beyond our power to get there. You are America's doorway to the Pacific rim, the most dynamic region of the planet. We have to keep leading the great advances that are being made there, or we'll be left behind by people who are waiting for no one. While others are overwhelmed by fear and apprehension, you are excited by the vista of new challenges and opportunities. Underscoring this, Senator Gorton has been a timeless defender of free trade. He knows that free trade is a cornerstone of America's prosperity.

I know that there's been much talk of late about America's trade challenges. But we've been leading the way out of a global recession and pulling the world into better times with us. As foreign economies strengthen, their currencies are strengthening, too. As this happens, other nations will buy more from us, and pressure on the trade balance will ease. Short-term protectionist measures now will undermine the chances of economic growth, not only in friendly countries but here as well. Protecting an industry here by imposing these restrictions will inevitably result in countermeasures that will cost the jobs of Americans in other industries. Those who claim to be concerned about the American farmer, for example, should realize that protectionism is the greatest single threat to the well-being of American agriculture, which is one of our main exports.

Instead of shooting ourselves in the foot with job-killing protectionism, what we can, should, and will do is demand that free trade be a two-way street. And I can assure you our representatives are doing just that. The markets must be open on both sides of the ocean. The solution we seek is not decreasing what others send us, but increasing what we send them. Balancing the trade deficit up means a better life for all. Balancing it down through protectionism and weaker economic growth means stagnation and decline. I firmly believe that if the deck is not stacked against us, the American people can outproduce and outcompete anyone in the world. The genius, creative talents, and hard work of our people have always been our greatest assets. With freedom and the profit motive, there's nothing we can't do.

Seattle has a man who exemplifies this spirit: Mr. T. Wilson, a giant of American enterprise. And thanks to the business sense, foresight, and everyday effort of individuals like Mr. Wilson, America is today on the edge of vast new frontiers. The world already marvels at American aircraft and space technology. Our latest aircraft are doing more and using less fuel than ever before. The common man now jets across continents and it's no big thing. Our space shuttle missions now are all but routine, and we're just beginning to touch the commercial use of space, something which, in the not too distant future, will be a tremendous asset to our country. I know that Senator Gorton is one of the Senate's leading advocates of putting space to use to benefit all mankind.

Our technology can also help us leave behind the threat of nuclear holocaust, which has hung over our heads like the sword of Damocles for four decades. Our leading minds have been mobilized to see if it's possible to build a defense system, not to kill people, but to protect them. If successful, our research could usher in a new era of security. A space shield could make arms reduction more feasible by rendering nuclear missiles obsolete, and so they would become more negotiable. I expressed these sentiments to General Secretary Gorbachev during our recent meetings in Geneva. I went to Geneva as a first step. I didn't expect miracles; I did expect progress, an opening, a crack in the door, for improved relations. General Secretary Gorbachev and I spoke frankly, over many hours, about our differences, about a wide range of issues including Soviet expansionism.

As I reported to a joint session of Congress and to you, the American people, when I returned, I was pleased with the results of our sessions. It was the fresh start we wanted. We're not claiming any great breakthroughs and so forth, but -- start. As a matter of fact, we had thought before we left that if we could even get agreement from them to continued meetings in the next few years to come that that would make the trip worthwhile. Well, we got that promise from them on a parking lot on the first day we were there. [Laughter] It was, as I say, the fresh start that we wanted.

We have to understand which policies work and which ones don't. Blurring the issues and ignoring the areas of friction between the Soviet Union and the United States is no way to create a more peaceful world. In fact, the progress we made at Geneva was possible only because in the last 5 years we've been determined to make America stronger. That's how the meeting came about. Because we've spoken out clearly about Soviet policies that threaten peace, that policy is working. I'm confident that if we remain firm in our convictions, realistic in our approach, and strong enough to defend our interests, the competition that we have with the Soviets can remain peaceful. Jefferson is quoted as saying, ``Eternal vigilance is the price of liberty.'' Well, it's as true today as it was two centuries ago.

But just as in Jefferson's day, Americans are preparing themselves for great strides forward. Our technological advances of the last four decades are only the foundation for a new era that is almost beyond imagination. We have just given thanks as a nation to God for all our many blessings, but we should be also grateful for this bright future that lies just over the horizon.

And, again, I have to say to you we have a representative government that represents the will and the desires of the people. And I think it is high time that we not only dwelt on sending someone in charge of the executive branch of government but send those people, as you have sent your two Senators there, to represent the interests of your State and of the people of this country in seeing that we can put forth the policies that apparently the people of this country have approved. So, 1986 -- there'll be a November day, and you send Slade Gorton back there to join your junior Senator. And just think, you won't have a situation in which one Senator is canceling out the other Senator's vote for the things that you want done in Washington. There'll be two votes there for all those right things. Send us people back there in the Congress to help with the things that we have started so far, and I think maybe you'll be very pleased with the result.

Good afternoon, and welcome to the White House. It's a pleasure to be able to welcome participants in the National Initiative on Technology and the Disabled -- men and women who've given so much to their fellow Americans.

We have home entertainment centers that put the great music and literature of the ages at a family's fingertips. And we have dazzling communications. Indeed, I remember my disbelief -- and I still have trouble with this -- when I was told one day of a satellite that could transmit the entire Encyclopaedia Britannica in 3 seconds.

They thought that maybe technology could be applied not just out in space but here on Earth. If we could give astronauts jetpacks, couldn't we give the disabled better wheelchairs? And if we could enable a spacecraft orbiting the Earth to talk to Houston control, couldn't we help those with speech impairments? And so it was that an exciting new partnership between the Government and the private sector was born, the National Initiative on Technology and the Disabled. Already, the initiative is hard at work, encouraging the development of dramatic new technologies.

Our one new device is called Compu-talk and is designed for people incapable of intelligent speech -- intelligible speech, I should say. The person simply types the phrase he wants to pronounce, then a computer synthesizes the sound. And the whole unit -- that's the one that fits inside a suitcase -- it can bring to an end the misery of those who can think clearly but cannot make themselves understood. Another new device is called the blink writer, and this is designed to help persons, like stroke victims, who are completely paralyzed and can neither speak nor write.

Imagine the frustration they encounter when trying to communicate. But with the blink writer a paralyzed person can look at a television screen and construct phrases simply by blinking. In a very real sense, the blink writer is a device of liberation, an instrument which sets free men and women who would otherwise be trapped in the isolation of their own minds.

Other new high-tech medical instruments and techniques are being developed every day. There are motorized wheelchairs made of strong, lightweight metal alloys. There are the artificial heart, the pacemaker, and a handheld x-ray device called the Lixi- scope. There's an implantable device called the human tissue stimulator which shows great promise for controlling chronic pain, like that associated with arthritis, rheumatism, and cancer. And there's a remarkable arrangement called the programmable implantable medication system or, for short, PIMS. Although still in the testing stages, it's hoped that PIMS can actually be inserted into the patient's body and used to deliver specified doses of medication to particular parts of the body at carefully chosen times. It holds out enormous hope for people who must receive periodic injections, people like diabetics or patients with inoperable tumors.

Initiative on Technology and the Disabled are assembling Tech-Net, a national information network that can be consulted by physicians and disabled citizens alike. You're also working on Tech-Team, a network of local technological professionals who are applying their skills, knowledge, and talents to the problems encountered by the disabled. And day in and day out, you're hard at work raising the money to make all these efforts possible. In the last year alone, I understand the Initiative has raised more than $2 million. What it all comes down to is remarkable American know-how being used to help the American people.

Tom Cusworth, on the dais with us today, understands. Five years ago at the age of 19, Tom suffered a swimming accident which left him a paraplegic. But Tom went to a high-technology rehabilitation center in Seattle and overcame his handicap so well that he even learned computer programming. And I have to tell you, Tom, that's a subject we didn't have when I was your age.

Susan Yim is also with us today. She is also someone who understands. While a graduate student in biology at Duke University, Susan suffered a severe brain stem stroke which left her a quadraplegic. She was unable to speak and unable to move any part of her body except her thumbs. But Susan's mind was sound. For months she struggled to communicate, always dependent on others to decipher her thoughts. Then nothing less than a miracle took place. Jim Jaklitsch, a brilliant engineer who's also with us today, designed a computer that could be operated by Susan's thumb movements, and Susan became able to communicate on her own. And today she has retained a large measure of the freedom that she thought was gone forever. And, Susan, you're what it's all about and you make us very proud.

Technology and the Disabled into being. And I know that each of us wants to express his deep gratitude to Robert Kirk, the head of the Initiative's executive committee. But the Initiative would be nothing without its many participants and so it is that I want to thank you, the men and women who have given this Initiative its drive and substance.

Americans have always cared for one another in both good times and bad. When a family has a loved one -- elderly, disabled, or a child -- needing special care at home, it will inevitably respond by doing everything to keep that person at home. This is the American spirit. Home health care has a long tradition in our Nation. The Federal government, the States, and families are now working in a cooperative way to see that this commitment continues.

No one would suggest that a family can do more for a patient when a hospital or other appropriate institution is clearly needed. But American families go the extra step or mile, if needed, to protect, care for, and serve a member in need. The Federal government has done its share to help. Now, our many States have taken on the initiative to create special programs to enhance home health care. They are to be commended for this humane action.

In addition, there are countless churches, voluntary organizations, and private agencies that assist our families to care for a member at home. Our Nation is learning that, in spite of a time when ``doing your own thing'' is in, caring for a mother, father, sister, or brother -- or any relative or friend -- in the home is vastly more important. Independence, under God's loving care and guidance, is to be cherished. Who, then, should care for our own than those who love them best?

The temporary services industry provides employers much needed flexibility to tailor their work forces to meet short-term needs. It also provides important job opportunities for American workers: last year, the temporary services industry provided employment for an estimated five million people.

The temporary services industry currently is the second fastest growing business sector in our economy, in terms of new jobs created. Approximately one out of every two hundred nonagricultural jobs in the United States is provided through temporary services.

When you heard that you'd have to cancel your scheduled class for a special assembly, well, I hope you weren't too disappointed. [Laughter] I know I've been looking forward to this chance to speak to you, because I've got a very important mission that I want young Americans to be a part of. Let me first just give a little background.

As you know, Nancy and I returned almost 2 weeks ago from Geneva where I had several lengthy meetings with General Secretary Gorbachev of the Soviet Union. I had more than 15 hours of discussions with him, including 5 hours of private conversation just between the two of us. I found him to be a determined man, but one who is willing to listen. And I told him about America's deep desire for peace and that we do not threaten the Soviet Union and that I believe the people of both our countries want the same thing -- a safer and better future for themselves and their children. You know, people don't start wars, governments do. Our meeting should be of special importance to all of you. I know you're concerned about the future, about the growth in nuclear arsenals, about injustice and persecution of fellow human beings, and about threats to peace around the world. Well, it's because I shared that concern that I went to Geneva to begin a dialog for peace with Mr. Gorbachev.

We talked about many things -- the need to cut the number of offensive nuclear weapons on each side, the wars of independence being waged by freedom fighters against Soviet-backed regimes around the world, human rights, and how we could improve our overall relationship. I also stressed to Mr. Gorbachev how our nation's commitment to the Strategic Defense Initiative, our research and development of a nonnuclear, high-tech shield that would protect us against ballistic missiles, and how we were committed to that. I told him that SDI was a reason to hope, not to fear; that the advance of technology, which originally gave us ballistic missiles, may soon be able to make them obsolete. I told him that SDI history had taken a positive turn, that men of good will should be rejoicing, that our deliverance from the awful threat of nuclear weapons may be on the horizon, and I suggested to him that I saw the hand of Providence in that. What could be more moral than a system based on protecting human life rather than destroying it? I could no more negotiate away SDI than I could barter with your future. As I told Mr. Gorbachev, as far as I'm concerned, a defense shield is an insurance policy for your future, and I think he understood our sincerity on this issue.

Union are as different as any two nations can be. These differences are based on opposing philosophies and values and no differences could be more profound or meaningful. It is virtually impossible for us to understand their system and how, over these -- what -- 70 years, it has imposed a way of thinking on their people. So, we didn't expect miracles. But we wanted these talks, if possible, to plant the seeds of hope in our relationship, the hope that some day, perhaps, might blossom into a real peace, a lasting peace, resting upon the only foundation on which a true peace can be built -- the indestructible foundation of human freedom. And I was determined to see if we could begin to narrow some of our differences and even come to some agreements where there was common ground. I believe that we've made a good start.

This is the mission I've come to speak to you about. One of the most exciting developments to come out of Geneva was Mr. Gorbachev's agreement to people-to-people exchanges. We're still negotiating the specifics, and it remains to be seen how much the Soviets will be willing to open up their closed society. But our objective is massive exchange programs between private citizens in both countries -- between people, not government bodies. Let's allow the people of the Soviet Union and the people of the United States to get to know each other, without governments getting in the way. And that's one reason I'm here today -- to encourage young people like you from across the country to take part in these people-to-people exchanges as never before in our history. I believe such contacts are an essential part of our building a lasting foundation for peace, because true peace must be based on openness and people talking to each other rather than about each other, and the peace must also be based on understanding. And that's why I proposed to Mr.

Gorbachev that we let young people from each country spend time in the other's schools, universities, summer camps, and homes. Americans would be able to see for themselves what life is like in the Soviet Union, and their young people could see for themselves the freedom and openness of our society and that we do not bear the people of the Soviet Union any ill will.

So, we'll establish scholarship funds to make it possible for the best and the brightest of both countries to take part in these exchanges. We will also exchange teachers to impart a deeper understanding of our respective histories, cultures, and languages -- where we have much to learn from one another. We'll resume cooperation in cancer research to combat one of the century's most hated diseases. And we can jointly prepare for the demands of the 21st century with a cooperative program for the development of educational software. It won't be all work and no play. We'll have regular meets in various sports and increased television coverage of these sports events. We can't eliminate competition from our relationship, but we can channel some of it to the playing fields and courts rather than the international arena. These programs and others that may be worked out will not solve all the problems that exist between us, but they can be a beginning to building communities of trust and understanding. If Soviet mistrust of our country is at the bottom of some of the tension between us, then, I know that even a few hours spent with America's open and eager younger generation would dispel mistrust in even the most suspicious soul. So, those who participate in these programs will be our good-will ambassadors to the Soviet Union.

I know that all of you have dreams and hopes for the future. For some, there are dreams of college and a challenging career; for others, a good job, a car, a house of your own. And most of you, I'm sure, plan to marry and raise a family. All these dreams can come true if we have peace.

Twice in my lifetime I have seen world wars that robbed our young people of their dreams. And the awesome power of nuclear weapons makes me even more determined to see that it doesn't happen again. As I've said many times before, a nuclear war cannot be won and must never be fought. So, I went to Geneva to set a course for enduring peace. And while I can't say that the path is clear, we've made a start.

Mr. Gorbachev and I agreed to press on in several arms control areas where there is common ground, especially to achieve deep reductions in nuclear arsenals. We will also continue talking about our differences on regional issues. And we had a heart-to-heart talk about human rights.

These are the cornerstones on which peace and your future rest. You and young people like you have a vital role in bringing about a better future by keeping America strong and by helping draw the people of the United States and the Soviet Union closer together. And we will continue the dialog begun at Geneva to reach agreements for deep reductions in nuclear arsenals with strict compliance; to help support an end to the regional conflicts that carry the seeds of wider wars; and to uphold the ideal of human rights and justice for all peoples.

Mr. Gorbachev, as the leader of the Soviet Union -- the new leader -- has held out the promise of change. He has said that he wants better relations between our two nations. Well, what better way than allowing people to travel freely back and forth? Let's begin, at the very least, to draw back the barriers that separate our peoples from one another. We're asking for no more than what the Soviets have already agreed to in the Helsinki accords. Freedom of movement and information, contact between peoples -- the Soviet Union has already signed its name to a commitment to these things. We should have no illusions that people-to-people contacts will solve all the problems, however, that exist between us. The Soviet Union is not a democracy. The hopes and aspirations of the Soviet people have little or no direct effect on government policy. But these changes are a beginning to building a better world, one based on better human understanding.

I promise the young people of America that I will see to it that information on these people-to-people exchanges is widely disseminated. I want all of you throughout America to have a chance to meet and get to know your counterparts in the Soviet Union, so that you can tell them all about this great country of ours. And we'll continue our efforts to reach agreements for deep reductions in nuclear arsenals with strict compliance; to help support an end to regional conflicts; and to see to it that human rights are respected. Together we can build a future that will be safer and more secure for you and your children.

I couldn't help but -- one point in our discussions privately with General Secretary Gorbachev -- when you stop to think that we're all God's children, wherever we may live in the world, I couldn't help but say to him, just think how easy his task and mine might be in these meetings that we held if suddenly there was a threat to this world from some other species, from another planet, outside in the universe. We'd forget all the little local differences that we have between our countries, and we would find out once and for all that we really are all human beings here on this Earth together.

Moore, the 9th grade student representative. Prior to his remarks, the President was presented with a stuffed cougar and the school's academic letter, given to those students demonstrating outstanding academic achievement.

Q. Mr. President, my name is Bill Greer. Mr. Gorbachev and yourself are very strong proponents of your respective political systems. It was apparent that the two of you formed a friendship, but there was also a sense of mistrust between you. Do you really believe we can achieve world peace with the Soviets?

The President. Yes, I have to believe that we can, and I'm optimistic and hopeful of it. In spite of the differences between our systems, I think one thing on our side is the Soviet people are virtually obsessed with the desire for peace because of the suffering they underwent in World War II. The Soviets lost 20 million people in that war. And that was not just military; that was the civilians that died as the attacks went into their cities, like at Stalingrad and all. So, there is a great desire for peace there. At the same time there is a mistrust, and we have to at least recognize that.

And I tried to disabuse them of that thought by pointing out that when World War II ended, ours was the only country that our industry hadn't been bombed to rubble in the war. Our military was virtually intact. We had 12\1/2\ million people, men and women, in uniform. And we were the only ones with the nuclear weapon. We were the only ones who had the bomb. At that point we could have literally dictated to the world if we'd chosen to do so, and we didn't. We set out to help the other nations in the war, including our enemies. And I pointed this out to him -- that we had some evidence on our side that we didn't have hostile intentions. And I can only hope that it registered.

Q. Mr. President, I'm Craig Hatfield. The recent outburst of terrorist actions in the Middle East has shown that both the U.S. and the Soviet Union are victims of terrorism. Have you considered some way the Soviets and we can join forces to prevent further terrorism?

The President. This is one of the things that I think could come out of these meetings that we're having, because now that they, too, have been victims of terrorism, I think that they've got a very definite reason for wanting that. We do cooperate with all the other nations in the world -- or most of them. We've managed to establish a contact, exchange information, and so forth on terrorism, and I hope the same thing can happen with them.

And your research indicates the potential of some weapons system, and you go forward. And now and then you're going to find that defensive abilities have been developing all the time, too. And suddenly, you find that something that looked good when you first planned it and ordered it has now been overtaken by a superior defense. And I don't know any answer to that. Just try our best and see that those kinds of things don't occur.

The President. Yes, but it's going to take confidence and trust on both sides. This was one of the first things that I talked to General Secretary Gorbachev about -- that for us to start talking, reducing arms, or doing this or that, we would first have to -- by deed, not just word -- prove that we were losing our distrust of each other. Because as long as we distrust to the point that there are restrictions on whether you can go in and verify what the other fellow is doing, then you're going to have to be suspicious and believe that those restrictions are based on a desire to not keep the agreement. And this was the basis of one of our talks -- and made it plain again that it's more than just words. There have to be deeds, both sides, to show that we mean we want to get along.

And this was why I offered to them, with our Strategic Defense Initiative -- I told him that their scientists could come into our laboratories if ours could come into theirs, where this research was going on, so that they could see exactly what it was we were trying to develop.

The President. We have the quotas, and, here and there, there are violations, and sometimes there are countries that get into the steel business that haven't been there before. Our whole system is based on equity in trade between the countries, and we just have to pursue that. And wherever we find a violation, why, we then bring that case forward and nail the other country or where that violation is occurring.

The President. I think the most important thing was the very fact that we decided to continue having the meetings. We had thought when we left that the Soviets might be so resisting to future meetings that this alone could make the summit a success, if we could get an agreement. And we got it on the first day there, and with no problem at all. He was almost eager for that.

And I think that our agreement -- you know, ever since 1946 our country has been proposing controls of weapons and, in more recent years, the controls of nuclear weapons. And we've had negotiators -- Vienna, in Stockholm, and in Geneva -- on this subject. For the first time, really, now, the Soviets have actually suggested a figure to which, if we can work out the conditions, they would be willing to reduce their numbers. Up till now, we've been the only ones that have had a number and said, let's do away with x number of weapons. And there's never been, in the negotiation, of them coming back and say, well, we're willing to reduce this number, so you could then haggle about it. Now we've both come to the agreement that the idea would be, right now, to start with 50 percent of the nuclear weapons. And so, I think this was an accomplishment, also.

The President. Well, you're a pretty outstanding high school, and you're also here, within range of the Capital. I'd like to do this in more areas of the United States. But we just thought that this was a pretty good place to start telling your generation about our dreams of people exchanges, and with the hope that we have that it will be your generation that will start these exchanges where we can get better acquainted.

Secretary Gorbachev about that. They feel very strongly that they could appear to be yielding to an outside influence if they changed their laws and so forth that we think are so repressive. So, I felt that that was something that we should talk about in private. And I can tell you that he has our full view and understanding of how we feel about the differences between our two nations in that respect. But it isn't something that I think you go public with because of this resistance of anyone in a leadership position in a government about seeming to give in to an outside government. But I can assure you they know how we feel, and they know what we think would be a good move.

The President. Well, there are certain areas of trade now, as you know, between us. And this, too, would come along with this better understanding. Right now, with the conditions the way they are and the arms race that has been going on and their evident desire to be number one militarily, we've had to have restrictions on trading with them things that might help them in their arms race.

Q. Mr. President, I'm Ericka Pearce. On the issue of arms reduction, do you believe that there will ever be any significant agreement settled between the U.S. and the Soviet Union, because of the unwillingness on either side to deplete nuclear weapons out of each other's major stockpiles?

The President. I think, as I said before, that we made a pretty good start here on this matter of the nuclear weapons. I think that both sides recognize that as long as we keep building these mountains of armaments higher in an effort to stay even with each other -- and here I have to say on our behalf, we are the ones who are trying to catch up. They are the ones who went out ahead and have placed their military emphasis on offensive weapons, where we have thought of them as a deterrent to war, and why we're seeking a defensive shield right now that would render nuclear missiles, if not obsolete, at least more harmless as a threat. But I believe that, for the first time, they recognize, with some of their problems, that the arms race has helped create those problems for them. They have dwelt so much on military buildup that they've had to deny their people many of the things that you and I think are just everyday -- in our ability to go down to the store and buy them. Well, they don't have such privileges. And we hope that with that as a help that maybe we can begin a reduction.

Back in 1980, when I was running for this job, there had been a number of arms agreements, but all of them were limitations on how fast and how much we would increase. And I got pretty outspoken that those weren't the kind of agreements we needed, that we needed an agreement that started reducing them. And so, for the first time, that's what we're proposing and what is going on in Geneva.

The President. The risk, oh. Well, this is a thing that we're trying to put together here and have proposed, and they seem very willing to go along with this. And this is to have, again, meeting places where our own military can meet with each other so that there wouldn't be danger of one or the other of us thinking that a hostile action had been taken. This is more information on maneuvers, war games, practice war games, and so forth. And we would have these centers where we could immediately communicate with each other at a military level and know what's going on. So, we are going to go forward with those. And it's kind of a new experiment, so I can't tell you exactly how they'll work out.

Karl Marx had always said that socialism could never succeed until the whole world was a one-world Communist state. And so, this has caused us to view with alarm, as I say, their outright buildup of offensive weapons. Now, I think this would be one of the things and the type of deeds that we would talk about if they do not still follow that Marxian principle. If they are not aimed at expansionism and conquering or taking over the whole world, then they can help prove that by joining in arms reductions to show that they have no hostile intent. But this is one of the reasons for the basic suspicion between us.

Q. Mr. President, Greg Romanski. I have a question concerning a different issue. Due to the success of the crew of the Atlantis experiments in the area of space construction, what are your plans concerning a skylab or space station?

The President. We believe that the newest frontier in the world is space, and we believe that the shuttle experiments so far have shown us so many, literally, miracles that can be performed in the weightlessness of outer space -- that instead of these just shuttle flights going up with experiments, that we should see if we cannot put together out there a place where then the shuttles could carry workers. And workers in space could develop -- let's take in the fields of medicines alone, we have an incurable ailment, diabetes. We have found in the experiments in the shuttle out there that a cell which, in order to have a cure for diabetes, must be able to be divided and split. We can't do it here on Earth as we could do it up there in the weightlessness of space.

The President. Well, it's something anyone in this position has to live with. It isn't easy, and I have come to understand very much why Abraham Lincoln once said that he had been driven to his knees many times because there was no place else to go. And he said if he didn't believe that he could call on someone who was stronger and wiser than all others, he couldn't meet the responsibilities of his position for a single day. And all you can do is to try to the best of your ability, with all the input and knowledge you get, then hope that the decisions you make are based on what is morally right. And that's all you can do. As I say, I've come to understand very much what Mr. Lincoln meant. He's supposed to be around the White House, you know, now and then.

The President. We haven't made a decision on that yet. We have compiled a report right now that shows the Soviet Union has committed 23 violations of the SALT II agreement. And we have to decide whether we can have complete agreement on both sides that we're going to abide by it, even though it has never been ratified. Or we're going to have to conduct ourselves on the basis of what they are doing also. There's no way that we could be so one-sided as to be destroying missiles and things of that kind, stay within a limit that they are violating. This is one of the things -- when I talk about an arms buildup and where the race started -- when SALT I was agreed upon, from the time of SALT I, the Soviet Union has added 6,000 warheads, nuclear warheads.

And since SALT II, 3,850 of those have been added. And this is what I mean about agreements that were aimed at trying to limit the increase instead of flatly saying, ``Let's get rid of some of these things.'' So, we have a decision yet to make on that. And it's going to, in part, depend on our negotiations with them about the present violations of that agreement.

The President. That another nation other than the Soviet Union or the United States could start a nuclear war? Well, we know that there are a few other nations -- some allies of ours -- that have some nuclear weapons. We suspect that, here and there, there have been efforts. Whether they've succeeded yet in creating a missile or not, we don't know. But other countries -- and some of them, the countries that are in the Third World and where there is a lot of hostility and instability, wars can start by accident. If you take World War I, it's been called by everyone who ever knew in history, the war that no one wanted. But it started when a terrorist, a radical, threw a bomb at a leader of a European country -- assassinated the leader of the European country. And out of that came World War I, which finally included even the United States.

Nicaragua. And this is why this was one of our subjects also for negotiation. We want to help in any way we can to persuade the Soviet Union to withdraw its troops, that they've had there fighting for 6 years, and bring them home and then let the people of Afghanistan, within their country, settle peacefully what kind of a government they want. The present government of Afghanistan was installed there by the Soviet Union, so that's why they're in, defending that government.

The President. My first impressions of him? A very intelligent man. And, while at the same time I recognize that he, heart and soul, believed in the system that he's grown up in -- he's young enough that this is all he's ever known. He grew up from even earlier than you in this system. He has faith in it and believes in it. But, at the same time, having dealt with other leaders -- the Soviet Union who can kind of pound the table and get quite excited about things, no. Our discussions, I must say, would be like we're having. He listened well, and I listened to him. And we were affable in this. And it was a case of disagreeing on particular issues, but no hostility, no enmity.

And I had to believe that he believed some of the propaganda that's been going on for 70 years about us, that he -- he's never been to the United States -- and that his impression of us -- he was ready to believe, for example, that our Strategic Defense Initiative, that we're trying to find a defense against nuclear weapons, that, really, out of that research we might develop something that would be a weapon in space for attacking them. And I countered that by telling him that if our research yielded a defensive weapon, we would sit down with them and with our allies -- with all the world -- and share it, and say, ``Look, why don't we all have this, and then none of us have to have nuclear missiles.'' And I hope that that had some impact on him.

Assistant for National Security Affairs. Bud's more than 30 years of service to his nation have been exemplary in every respect. He has served in peace and war, ranging from his early days at the Naval Academy to Vietnam and to the White House. And few have served with more dedication, none with more loyalty.

A little over 2 years ago, I asked Bud to serve as my national security adviser. He continued his record of distinguished service in this most sensitive and critical assignment. I know of no President who has been better served. Bud has offered me wise counsel and has been a trusted adviser and confidant in carrying out our administration's foreign policy goals and objectives. He has an impressive list of successes of which he can justly be proud: his key role in the preparation for the Geneva summit meeting and his contribution toward greater stability in East-West relations; his unending efforts which have helped strengthen the Western alliance; his service in the Middle East as my personal envoy at a most difficult time and at great personal risk; his key role in carrying out our counterterrorism policies, as exemplified by the TWA hijacking incident and our recent operation leading to the apprehension of the hijackers of the Achille Lauro.

Bud, I know that you're eager now to move on to new personal and professional challenges. Let me say that I shall never forget the sacrifices that you and your family have made in the service of your country, and I wish you and your family the best success and happiness in the future. But before you get too comfortable, I should warn you that I'll probably be calling on you from time to time for your wise counsel and advice.

As in all things in life, while Bud's departure is a cause of deep regret for me, I'm pleased to announce that I have appointed Vice Admiral John M. Poindexter to be the new Assistant to the President for National Security Affairs. I appointed John as Deputy Assistant for National Security Affairs on October 17th, 1983. He has served in that capacity in an exemplary manner and has proved to be a truly steady hand at the helm. Since he first joined the National Security Council staff in June 1981 as the Military Assistant, he has played a key role. His naval career began with his graduation at the head of his class at the U.S. Naval Academy. And he was not only first in his class at the Naval Academy but, also, brigade commander, an achievement rarely duplicated. And I know of only one other, and that was Douglas MacArthur at West Point.

In choosing Admiral Poindexter for this key position in our national security affairs structure, I am acknowledging the very important contribution that he has already made to the formulation and carrying out of our major foreign policy objectives. I'm also underscoring the great value I place in the continuity of our foreign policy. For 5 years John has been intimately involved in this administration's national security affairs and is well prepared and able to assume this very important post. So, I welcome you onboard the captain's deck, John, and wish you the very best success.

Admiral Poindexter. Thank you, sir. Mr. President, I'm greatly honored by this position that you are bestowing upon me. It's going to be very difficult to fill in behind Bud. We've worked together as a team -- really, the three of us -- for over the past 2 years, and it's always difficult to lose one of the team members. But we've got a very good staff, and we will continue to provide the President with the best advice available.

Mr. President, for you have allowed me to serve in your administration at a moment in our history that is terribly exciting, where the opportunity for our country has been enormous. I think philosophers have devoted a great amount of thought to whether or not intrinsic flaws in democracy and free enterprise would, over time, lead such systems to decline. And I think it's fair to say that 5 years ago many were saying that that decline was in fact taking place: We'd lost a war, our economy was in great chaos, the military balance had shifted dramatically against us, and with it the willingness of the Soviet Union to take risks was being expressed from Angola to Ethiopia, Cambodia, Afghanistan, Nicaragua. And yet the importance of your stewardship, Mr.

President, has been that those predictions have declined, have been reversed, and that a great national renewal has taken place. Today, 5 years later, we see the expression of that renewal, foremostly, in the reality of peace, that the United States is once more leading and deterring, and an economy that is recovering with impressive pace and quality, and with it the resources going to provide assistance where it's needed to struggling countries that gives them some hope for their own futures.

That's not to say the job is finished. There are very, very fundamental questions to be answered in the next 3 years. For example, can the impressive renewal of the American economic strength be replicated in other democracies? Can the countries of Europe follow this model, reduce government intervention in their economy, reduce consumption of the product of their own societies? With regard to developing countries, can the United States -- without imposing its model, by sheer example -- provide sufficient political, economic, and moral incentives to lead these countries in the post-colonial period to adopt democracy, free enterprise? With regard to East-West relations, after the enormously successful renewal of a stable discourse, can we move beyond to wage peace and wage a peaceful competition with a fundamentally different system at lower levels of arms, with broadened cooperation, but always at peace? Based upon the strength of your leadership, Mr. President, and the support you've engendered from industrial democracies and developing countries in these past 5 years, there's no question in my mind but that your stewardship will include as its legacy continued peace, stability, arms reduction, and an evermore inspiring model for developing countries throughout the world.

Q. Mr. President, there's been a lot of talk, as you well know, that Mr. McFarlane is really leaving because of personality clashes, turf battles, with Mr. Regan. Could you and Mr. McFarlane both speak to this question of what role the McFarlane-Regan problems had in his decision to leave?

The President. Whether he feels he wants to speak or not about this, let me just say -- and I say this with full confidence that he endorses what I'm going to say -- you have all been misinformed about that. The reason that has been given is one in which, after 30 years in which this country has been his first priority, he feels a responsibility, that I think all of us feel, toward his family. And the things that he just spoke of here and about what I might have contributed and what has taken place and the change in America in these last few years, he has been a very, very major part of that change. And we're all going to miss him.

Q. Mr. President, there are those who suggest that you were better served when there were multiplicity of voices competing for attention inside the west wing. And that under Mr. Regan, there will be no point of view funneled to you, which doesn't go through him. What do you say to that, sir?

Admiral Poindexter. Well, as you probably know, the Navy and the Marine Corps always get along well together. [Laughter] I don't anticipate any problems. Don and I are good friends. I've known him since he was Secretary of Treasury. And with regard to the last question about access to the President, Don Regan told me that yesterday, that I had direct access. So, it won't be a problem.

The President. I have read stories that have disturbed me probably more than anything that has happened since I've been in this office, things of that kind. I happen to believe in something that might be a little unusual in Washington with regard to the Cabinet structure and staff. And that is that I want to hear all sides of every issue before I make the decision that I have to make. And as I understand it, normally, that's not been the nature of Cabinet and staff workings in this office.

Whether that's true or not, I don't know; I only know about ours. But for that to be translated into what I am desiring -- for that to be translated into as somehow friction and every time someone leaves -- I said in the very beginning, when I first came here and realized I had appointments to make, that I would take people if they could only stay a year, 2 years, whatever it might be, because the kind of people I wanted were the kind of people who didn't necessarily want government jobs. And I wanted that kind of success in here. And so, every once in a while someone has to move on and have their own obligations, their own responsibilities, and this is the case here.

Q. Mr. President, in terms of Mr. Beggs and others who have had to leave government under your regime, don't you wonder at the clearance policies of the administration, where so many people have had to leave under a cloud?

It is with deep regret and reluctance that I accept your resignation as Assistant to the President for National Security Affairs. Your more than thirty years of service to the United States have been exemplary in all regards. As a career Marine, you served your country in peace and war -- from your days at the Naval Academy to Vietnam.

Your contributions since 1981 have been in the highest tradition of national service. As Counselor to the Secretary of State and as Deputy Assistant to the President for National Security Affairs, you served tirelessly. A little more than two years ago, I asked you to be my National Security Adviser. You continued your record of distinguished service in the most sensitive and critical assignment in the national security area. I know of no President who has been better served. You have offered wise counsel and have been a trusted adviser and confidant. Your kind words to me regarding our national renewal are due in no small part to your own efforts over the last five years.

It is with a deep sense of gratitude, sadness and fulfillment that I tender my resignation as your national security advisor. Five years ago, without knowing me, you appointed me to serve in your administration. It was an important moment in our history. During the previous five years, a number of historic events had occurred: we had lost a war, with all that implied for our reputation as a reliable ally; our economy was stricken -- overseas, leaders were asking whether we could solve our own problems, much less lead in the resolution of theirs; and finally, there had been a dramatic shift in the military balance, and with it a greater willingness on the part of the Soviet Union to challenge us through ambitious excursions from Angola to Ethiopia to Cambodia to Afghanistan to Nicaragua. But it was also a time at which the deep and enduring self-confidence of the American people was reasserting itself in a call for leadership.

Looking back over these five years, it is difficult to encompass the enormity of change. Under your leadership, America has indeed come back. We are deterring, ``Not one square inch of territory has been lost . . .'' and democracy is once more the ascendant model for developing countries everywhere. There is little doubt that history will record this period of your stewardship as the time when Spengler was disproved. Truly, you have led in the highest tradition of Churchill and Roosevelt.

As for me, to have been a part of this national renewal has been an honor and privilege beyond expression. For that I am deeply grateful. In the coming years, as you continue to consolidate this foundation of political, economic and military strength and move beyond it to greater stability in East-West relations, I shall be one of the millions of proud Americans out there in support.

Beggs. While reluctantly acceding to his request, the President has asked Mr. Beggs to assist temporarily in the orderly transition of his responsibilities to his colleagues at NASA to facilitate continuity of management at this critically important agency. Mr. Beggs has agreed to do so.

The congressional vote of support for the Unified Nicaraguan Opposition (UNO) reflected in this legislation is a recognition of the threat the repressive Sandinista regime in Managua poses to all the peoples of Central America. H.R. 2419 demonstrates our resolve to support the brave men and women of the Nicaraguan resistance in the crucial campaign to achieve a democratic outcome in Nicaragua. Although the Congress did not authorize the full program requested by the administration to support the democratic forces in Nicaragua and to facilitate the reconciliation of the Nicaraguan people, the legislation is a positive step and furthers important United States policy objectives in this vital region.

I am disappointed that H.R. 2419 is used as a vehicle to amend the National Security Act of 1947 and mandates reporting requirements that are best left to working arrangements and guidelines agreed to by the Congress and the Director of Central Intelligence. Despite my disappointment, I believe, on the whole, that this legislation represents a positive step toward fulfilling our commitment to strengthen our intelligence capabilities.

Committee and the Ways and Means Republicans have developed proposals that, like our own, represent substantial progress from current law. Each would simplify the tax bracket structure, lower individual and corporate rates, remove families living at or near poverty level from the tax rolls entirely, and substantially increase the personal exemption and standard deduction.

We do not want to risk damaging, perhaps irreparably, an entire year's effort to achieve real tax reform, so I strongly believe the legislative process must be allowed to go forward. But let me add this caveat: This can only be considered a good start, not an end product. More can and must be done to broaden the tax base, reduce tax rates further, and lower the cost of capital, so we can strengthen economic growth and personal opportunity for every American. Any legislation that ends up retarding economic growth and thereby diminishing the number of jobs upon which American families depend is not what we mean by tax reform. True tax reform is imperative. The first step must begin with a positive vote in the House of Representatives. I urge Members of the House to act affirmatively on this important matter.

Consistent with the Joint Statement issued by General Secretary Gorbachev and me at the conclusion of the Geneva meeting and with our efforts to promote a more constructive East-West relationship, we and our NATO allies are introducing in Vienna today a new proposal designed to break the long deadlock on conventional arms reductions in Europe.

Since the early 1970's, NATO has engaged the Warsaw Pact in discussions aimed at limiting the numbers of troops on both sides in central Europe. These discussions, known as the Mutual and Balanced Force Reduction Talks (MBFR), now constitute one of the longest continuously running arms control negotiations in history. The NATO allies have consistently tried to move these negotiations forward. In 1982 and 1984, the U.S. and the allies presented new proposals designed to achieve progress in the MBFR negotiations. Regrettably, both proposals were rejected by the Warsaw Pact. After extensive national reviews of these talks and their objectives, we and our allies have concluded that a significant and forthcoming new move could provide new impetus to the negotiations.

In an effort to move the negotiations forward, and taking into account expressed Eastern concerns, we have today tabled a new proposal for reductions with effective verification. The proposed package of verification measures is intended to verify the numbers of troops withdrawn as well as the numbers which will remain. Thus, in exchange for a comprehensive and effective package of verification measures, NATO would be willing to accept the general framework of the February 1985 model proposed by the Soviet Union and its allies for a noncomprehensive agreement. We will no longer insist, as we have since the outset of negotiations, that the sides come to an agreement on Eastern troop levels before treaty signature. Nor will we continue to insist, for now, on a comprehensive approach whereby East and West must agree at the outset on all the steps needed to reduce to parity.

In this context, the U.S. is now prepared to accept a reduction of 5,000 U.S. and 11,500 Soviet ground troops in the central European reduction area. These figures reflect the ratio between existing U.S. and Soviet troop levels in the area. As soon as these reductions are completed, NATO is prepared to accept a commitment by both alliances not to increase forces in central Europe. As verified by implementation of the verification measures, this no-increase commitment would last for 3 years.

These include a time-limited, noncomprehensive agreement; reductions without prior data agreement on Eastern forces; and a no-increase agreement. The main element which NATO has added is in the area of verification. Fair, effective, and reciprocal verification measures are essential so that both sides will be able to know whether the terms of the accord are being complied with. This is especially important if we are to accept a no-increase commitment on troops in the area without prior agreement on the level of those troops. The Soviets have contended that such prior agreement was unnecessary and that Western concerns could be satisfied through implementation of verification measures. This new Western proposal offers them an opportunity to pursue that approach. Agreement on all aspects of the proposed verification measures would, of course, have to be reached prior to the signature of a treaty.

We urge the Soviet Union and the other Warsaw Pact countries to consider carefully the details of our proposal. This NATO initiative can help fulfill the commitments made at the Geneva summit and produce real progress in Vienna which would reduce forces in central Europe.

Because ours is a free society, we Americans are blessed with many choices. We can choose to live where we want. We can choose our education and our vocation. We are free to speak our minds, to worship God as our conscience prompts us, and to choose our political affiliation. And nowhere else in the world is there a wider variety of goods and services from which to choose, thanks to an open marketplace and the freedom to produce and purchase. This bountiful marketplace has provided us with a standard of living that is the marvel and envy of the world.

The outlook for the future is even brighter. The regulatory reform of recent years is spawning innovation and reinvigorated competition; by opening new markets, it has resulted in even more choices for consumers. This gives buyers both a new opportunity and a new responsibility to make informed decisions about the quality and value of products and services offered for sale.

To make responsible decisions in our dynamic and abundant economy, consumers need both information and education if they are to reap the full benefits of the marketplace. They need information, the facts about the goods and services; they need to be educated so they can analyze those facts before making a purchase. This will enable them to make wise choices whether they are shopping for food, shelter, clothing, transportation, recreation, health care, entertainment, and so on. Prudent, informed, discriminating consumers put pressure on suppliers to keep improving products and services while devising production efficiencies that will permit them to keep their prices competitive.

In light of the central role of the consumer in our free economy, it is especially appropriate to recognize that relationship during National Consumers Week, 1986. The slogan for 1986, ``Consumers Rate Quality,'' acknowledges that consumers, by seeking quality and value, set the standards of acceptability for products and services by ``voting'' with their marketplace dollars, rewarding efficient producers of better quality products and performance. It is also a ringing declaration that consumers are entitled to and can insist on honest value for their hard-earned income.

Indeed, American businessmen and women are becoming aware that the broadened competition of a global marketplace necessitates attention to quality if they are to succeed. They must do more than just build better products -- they must strive to improve marketing, sales, warranties, and service. Quality demands efficient management, productive use of human resources, and responsiveness to consumer needs and preferences.

Q. Mr. President, if you would get the possibility of replaying the summit with Mr. Gorbachev, would you change anything in what you did and said in Geneva? Would it have been possible to produce better results?

We were both frank and serious in discussing our points of view. I told him exactly what I wanted to, and I found Mr. Gorbachev to be energetic and clear in making his points. I'm ready for the difficult, step-by-step work it will take to achieve lasting results in arms control, human rights, on regional issues, and in bilateral and other vital areas. Important as they were, our words in Geneva were not as important as the deeds that must follow them if we are to reduce the mistrust and suspicions between us. I believe Mr. Gorbachev and I have made a fresh start.

Q. Mr. President, you are pursuing a military program, the SDI, that will last some years before producing results. How can you be sure that your successor will not abandon the program? How can you assure the allies about the continuity of this initiative?

The President. No freely elected leader can guarantee the actions of his successors. Our allies understand this. They also understand, however, that democracies tend to sustain those defense programs that are vital to their national interests and to the defense of freedom. I believe that the Strategic Defense Initiative is one of those programs. You must keep in mind that SDI is, at this stage, a research program designed to answer basic questions about whether defenses against ballistic missiles are feasible. This effort enjoys broad bipartisan support in the United States. Over the longer term, if we find that strategic defenses are feasible, I believe that SDI will continue to command support because it holds out the promise of effective deterrence through defense, rather than through the threat of massive death and destruction. It will endure because it offers the hope of creating a safer, more stable world and of someday rendering nuclear weapons obsolete.

Q. Mr. President, in the last few years, Italy has become more active on the international scene, not always in full agreement with the American policy. How do you assess this more autonomous role of Italy, for instance in the Middle East, and do you see any danger of potential misunderstandings or concerns in U.S.-Italian relations?

The President. We assess Italy's international role as positive. For instance, Italy has played a valued role in Middle East peacekeeping by its participation in the United Nations Interim Force in Lebanon (UNIFIL) and the Sinai multinational force. Italy and the United States sometimes have differing assessments on how best to promote the Middle East peace process. But both Italy and the United States firmly support the peaceful resolution of the Arab-Israeli conflict and Israel's right to exist behind secure and recognized boundaries. I do not see a danger of misunderstandings in Italo-American relations. We will continue to stay in close touch and consult with each other in a manner befitting our very friendly relations. The United States certainly intends to do this, and we are confident Italy has the same desire.

Germany in technologies which could have direct applications in the Strategic Defense Initiative research. The technical expertise and scientific capabilities of German institutions and corporations involved in advanced research would be helpful and very welcome. We believe that the technological results of joint efforts will lead to enhanced security for the alliance as a whole and that the participation of the Federal Republic of Germany and other NATO allies in the research effort itself will foster closer cooperation within NATO.

The President. We are firmly committed to reaching agreement on an effective, comprehensive, and verifiable global ban on all chemical weapons. As you may know, Vice President Bush tabled a draft chemical weapons treaty at the Conference on Disarmament in April 1984. This treaty would ban chemical weapons throughout the world. Since then, we have worked closely with our allies and others to improve upon our draft provisions and to press for progress in the Geneva Conference on Disarmament negotiations. We feel, however, that the negotiations on that treaty, particularly with regard to the essential verification measures, have not progressed as rapidly as they should.

This was one of the issues which I discussed in Geneva with General Secretary Gorbachev. I was heartened that we could record our agreement in the joint statement to accelerate our efforts to conclude an effective and verifiable global ban. We also agreed to intensify bilateral discussions on all aspects on such a chemical weapons ban, including verification questions. Further, we agreed to initiate a dialog on preventing the proliferation of chemical weapons. The United States has often expressed concern with the spread of chemical weapons, particularly with regard to instances of chemical weapon use. We welcome Mr. Gorbachev's expression of interest in this problem and hope the U.S.S.R. will take concrete steps to help deal with it. Ultimately, the way to stem the spread of chemical weapons is to conclude an effective and verifiable global ban on them.

The President. Since I took office, I have sought to deal realistically with the U.S.S.R. We are all aware of the facts of the past 40 years of international relations. The basis for my meeting with General Secretary Gorbachev was 5 years of firm and consistent policies pursued by the United States and its allies. It was on this basis that I came to Geneva, ready for a constructive dialog and to make a fresh start. In Geneva, I spent a good deal of time with Mr. Gorbachev, including 5 hours in one-on-one conversations. I found him an energetic exponent of Soviet policy and a good listener. Our exchanges were lively, open, and serious. We had a lot of give-and-take. We agreed on some things and disagreed on much else. But we agreed that deeds, and not words, will be necessary to make real and lasting progress in our relations. We are ready and eager for step-by-step progress in the months ahead.

Q. When do you expect an agreement on intermediate-range missiles, separate from the other negotiations, and if there will be an agreement before 1988, is there a possibility that Holland won't need to deploy the cruise missile?

The President. As you know, the United States made a new proposal on intermediate nuclear forces (INF) systems at the end of the last round of the Geneva arms talks. This new proposal, drawing on the positive elements of the Soviet INF counterproposal made during the round, establishes an interim ceiling on United States and Soviet longer range INF launchers in Europe or in range of NATO Europe, but allows freedom to mix under that ceiling. The Soviet Union has not yet fully responded to our new proposal, which we intend to pursue when the talks resume in January.

Gorbachev and I have agreed that our arms control negotiators should accelerate their work toward arms control agreements which provide for significant reductions and increased stability and which can be effectively verified. As we noted in our joint statement of November 21, both sides have called for early progress on an interim INF agreement. Further, I would note that the Government of the Netherlands has stated that it would accept its proportional share of cruise missiles under the terms of an INF agreement which provides for reductions in U.S. and Soviet LRINF missiles. If the Soviet Union were to agree to the United States objective in INF, the total ban on LRINF missiles, that would of course be a significant step toward improving stability and prospects for peace.

Q. In the area of more cooperation with the Soviet Union, are you prepared to soften your policy on high-tech exports to Eastern Europe, and is the new American-Russian nuclear fusion project a first step in that direction?

Soviet Union and its allies, we maintain export controls to ensure that American exports to these destinations do not undercut our security interests. In addition, we, our NATO allies, and Japan control strategic exports to the Soviet Union through COCOM. COCOM maintains a list of controlled items with potential military significance which cannot be exported to the Soviet Union or its allies without special approval. Since the Soviet invasion of Afghanistan, we and our COCOM partners have followed a policy of strictly enforcing these controls. We generally do not authorize exports to the Soviet Union of items on the COCOM control list. This policy will be continued. Cooperative fusion research with the Soviets would not result in the transfer of COCOM controlled technology to the Soviet Union. American and allied participation in the fusion project would be carried out within existing COCOM guidelines to prevent transfer of sensitive technology with military potential.

Africa, and will continue to do so. My administration has on repeated occasions publicly condemned the system of apartheid as systematic racial discrimination that denies the black majority its unalienable rights. We have done so even more often in private discussions with officials of the South African Government. American policy is based on ensuring peaceful change in South Africa. Change is inevitable. The issue, in our view, is not whether apartheid is to be dismantled, but how and when. All men of good will want to see it replaced by a just society, not through a racial conflagration where the people could well exchange one oppressor for another.

To encourage peaceful change, on September 9, I ordered a set of measures aimed against the machinery of apartheid. We favor actions against the racist system, not actions that would penalize the black population in South Africa or the peoples of the neighboring states.

Q. Your perceptions of the Soviet leadership, its policies, interests, and long-term aims seem to have changed during your time in office. Is this a normal development, reflecting changing times, preoccupations, and interests in the U.S., or do you see a different type of leadership at work in the Kremlin with a real prospect for change?

We have no illusions about the nature of communism and Soviet foreign policy. We must not hold out hopes for immediate, dramatic change. Given these facts, our relations with the U.S.S.R. have been and will continue to be essentially competitive. At the same time, we must and will ensure that our competition remains peaceful. As I have said many times, and as General Secretary Gorbachev and I agreed in Geneva, a nuclear war cannot be won and must never be fought. We must strive for real progress in human rights, regional issues, arms control, bilateral and other areas wherever we can. In Geneva, a new Soviet leader and I made a fresh start. I have no illusions, but I do have hope. And I hope and believe Mr. Gorbachev is ready, as I am ready, for the hard, productive work that lies ahead.

The President. The United Nations has not been a panacea for all of the world's problems as some expected. Nevertheless, it has been and can be a force for great good. The U.N.'s peacekeeping and peacemaking efforts have been important at many critical times, for example, in Korea, the Congo, Cyprus, and in the Middle East. Many of its specialized agencies have served the purposes for which they were intended and performed valuable services in the fields of health, economic assistance and development, care of refugees, and in various other humanitarian and technical areas. While acknowledging the U.N.'s achievements, we must not close our eyes to its disappointments: its failures to deal effectively with essential security issues, the politicization of too many of its agencies, the misuse of too many resources. Given the divided state of the world, realism demands we recognize the U.N.'s limitations. But we must not overlook its real potential and opportunities, opportunities that for the good of mankind we cannot afford to waste. The principles of the U.N. Charter are as valid today as in 1945 and provide a guide for action. If the member states live up to them, the U.N. can be the means to a better and safer world.

The more than thirteen hundred community, technical, and junior colleges, public and private, in the United States have contributed enormously to the richness and availability of American higher education. Nearly half of all undergraduate college students in the Nation today are enrolled in such institutions.

By providing educational opportunities at costs and locations accessible to all who are qualified, community, technical, and junior colleges have greatly enhanced the opportunity for every ambitious student, young or old, to enter a postsecondary school program. As community-based institutions, these schools provide varied programs and offer specialized training for more than one thousand occupations.

In recognition of the important contribution of community, technical, and junior colleges to our total educational system, the Congress, by Senate Joint Resolution 158, has designated the month of February 1986 as ``National Community College Month'' and authorized and requested the President to issue a proclamation in observance of this event.

House will decide whether the Congress will continue working on this important issue. While the proposals before the House are far from perfect, they do represent an essential step toward a tax code that is fairer, simpler, and encourages greater growth. I hope the House will vote yes next week and allow the Senate to consider debate and to improve this important measure.

Debbie speaks for thousands of farmers from Maine to California. The reason our farmers are facing such hard times are complicated, but three main reasons stand out. First, a dramatic drop in land values as the inflation of the seventies was cut dramatically. Suddenly farmers who used their land as collateral found it much harder to obtain the loans they needed to purchase goods like chemicals, livestock, and tractors. The second major problem involved a fall in the demand for farm exports. The last administration contributed to this by imposing grain embargoes, a failed policy that our administration will never repeat. Later, many countries that had been purchasing large quantities of American farm goods began to purchase less, in large part because their economies had weakened. The third cause involved a sharp drop in the prices of many commodities as inflation slowed. Indeed, in the last year alone, prices that farmers receive for grains have fallen nearly 15 percent. All these problems mean hard times. I'm reminded of the troubles I saw during the Depression, growing up in Illinois, the heart of the Corn Belt, and living later in Iowa. The worst of it then was the hopelessness. Well, I'm determined not to let that terrible hopelessness spread through our farm communities today.

Our farm communities have, as I said, been hurt by grain embargoes and failed policies of other administrations, by past inflation and the difficulty of adjusting to our success in bringing that inflation under control. Well, since government had much to do with causing these problems, government must do its part to help our farm communities get back on their feet. Government should do so, of course, in a manner consistent with its obligation to cut deficit spending. But lend a hand government must.

Jones, and Coleman, has reported out a similar bill. I hope to sign an acceptable measure soon. To expand farm exports, Secretaries Block and Baker have been working to open markets and promote stronger economic growth in Europe and the Third World. And Secretary Baker is continually working with his foreign counterparts to ensure that the value of the dollar reflects economic conditions here and abroad. The dollar's decline during the past few months will brighten prospects for agriculture exports. The Congress is also putting together a comprehensive farm bill to guide our agricultural policy for years to come. As they work, the House and Senate must understand that more Federal dollars alone are not the answer. Indeed, during our administration farm price and income supports have more than quadrupled. What's needed is policy reform, including a long-term plan to get government out of farming and establish a more market-oriented farm policy. I call upon the Congress to send me a bill I can sign, one that provides America's farmers with hope.

Perhaps most significant, our administration is continuing the policies that have already done so much to foster economic growth: the encouragement of sound monetary growth, the limiting of government, and the preventing of tax hikes. In the past 3 years, we've enabled America to put 8.8 million more people to work. And in recent months, the news for farmers has been hopeful as interest rates have dropped; indeed, the prime rate has dropped a full point since last spring. And inflation has remained low, helping to hold down the prices farmers must pay for equipment and supplies. Times are still hard, but I'm convinced that a more prosperous future for our farms is beginning to take shape at last.

Cincinnati, OH, in an atmosphere steeped in the law; indeed, his father, a prominent lawyer and former Cincinnati mayor, once served as a member of the Ohio Supreme Court. Potter went east to study at the Hotchkiss School, Yale, and Yale Law School. But just a few years after receiving his law degree, he returned home to practice in Cincinnati.

In a moment of reflection, Potter once remarked, ``I never thought of putting a label on myself, except trying to be a good lawyer.'' It is as a patriot and a good lawyer -- indeed, a brilliant man of the law -- that we remember Justice Potter Stewart this day. Nancy and I join Potter's family and his close friends, the Vice President and Mrs. Bush, in mourning Potter's death and in cherishing the memory of his magnificent life.

Motorists who drive while impaired by alcohol or other drugs are one of our Nation's most serious public health and safety problems. Each year, drunk drivers account for tens of thousands of highway fatalities and hundreds of thousands of injuries.

This needless carnage on our streets and highways can be reduced through increased public awareness and a willingness to take the necessary steps to prevent it. We must not wait until personal tragedy strikes to become involved.

Statistics show that a disproportionate number of our young people are involved in accidents in which alcohol and drugs are a contributing factor. In recognition of the considerable evidence that such accidents can be drastically reduced by raising the legal drinking age, the Federal government is encouraging each State to establish 21 as the minimum age at which individuals may purchase, possess, or consume alcoholic beverages. Many States have already raised the legal drinking age, as a result of efforts of dedicated citizen volunteers and the growing awareness that motor vehicle accidents are the leading cause of death among young people. States that have not raised their legal drinking age should review these developments carefully.

We need informed, concerned citizens who are willing to help generate awareness; we need education and action to eliminate drunk and drugged drivers from our highways. With the continued involvement of private citizens and action at all levels of government, we can control the problem of drunken and drugged driving.

In line with the recommendations of the Presidential Commission On Drunk Driving, we have embarked on a long-term sustained effort to focus the resources of our local, State, and Federal governments on this problem.

The tax reform proposals pending before the House are a substantial improvement over present law and represent a significant and essential first step toward real tax reform. Under both proposals, individual and corporate tax rates are reduced substantially, with the top individual tax rate reduced to its lowest level since 1931. The personal exemption and standard deductions are increased substantially, and millions of working poor families would be removed from the tax rolls. Tax shelters are curtailed, special preferences are eliminated or restricted, and a stiff minimum tax is imposed.

I share the concern many have over particular aspects of the pending bills. As I have said, they can only be considered a good start, not an end product. More can and must be done to reduce tax rates further, and lower the cost of capital, so we can strengthen economic growth and opportunity for every American.

A tremendous amount of work has already gone into the process that has brought us this far. If a bill does not move forward from the House now, it is reasonable to suggest that tax reform might be ``dead'' for several years. From this perspective, the House vote is essentially a vote on whether or not to sustain the possibility of tax reform -- to allow the legislative process to continue in the difficult effort to fashion a satisfactory bill.

To fail to advance a bill now would mean maintaining the status quo -- a tax system with all its inequities, complexities, and tendencies to discourage efficient economic growth. That is not what I want. It is not what the American people want. I trust it is not what the House wants.

I strongly urge you to vote for tax reform -- the Republican alternative or, should it not prevail, the Ways and Means bill. A vote against final passage in the House would doom our efforts to achieve real tax reform for the American people. We must not allow that to happen.

The story of the Maccabees and their brave struggle has inspired Jewish families down through the ages, calling to mind the valor and zeal of their forebears and bringing to life the rich character of their heritage. Hanukkah provides a fitting opportunity to reflect on the gifts a generous God ever wills to bestow on those who are faithful to Him.

As each candle of the menorah is lighted over the eight days of celebration, Jewish families gratefully remember the miracle of God's sustaining love which has brought them through every trial and persecution. The Miracle of the Flame is a message of hope against great odds, of rededication in the midst of doubt and oppression. It, and all the other beautiful traditions of Hanukkah, remind people everywhere that the light of God's presence can never be extinguished by the night of fear and human malice.

Nancy joins me in wishing His choicest blessings on all who observe this holiday. May the fires of faith and reverence you seek to rekindle on this feast blaze with renewed power the whole year through.

Ms. Newman is president and owner of Village Real Estate, Inc., in Seattle, WA. She is also treasurer of Pacific Factors, Ltd., Inc., and sole proprietor of Braemar Associates, consulting services. She was on the board of directors of the Washington State Council on Economic Education and was secretary/treasurer, on the board of directors and executive committee for the Association of Washington Business.

Affairs and Special Assistant to the President. In December of 1983 he was appointed to the rank of Deputy Assistant to the President with responsibility for policy development. From February 1981 until joining the National Security Council staff, Mr. Fortier served as Deputy Director for Policy Planning at the Department of State. He received the Department's Superior Honor Award for his work in that position. Prior to his service in the Department of State, Mr. Fortier served for 5 years as a senior member of the professional staff of the House Foreign Affairs Committee.

The President. Well, good afternoon, and welcome to the White House. Today we mark the 37th anniversary of the signing of the Universal Declaration of Human Rights, a document to which virtually every nation on Earth subscribes. It's a day for us to take stock, to survey the globe with an eye not so much to words, as to actual deeds, to measure the world against the noble assertions of the Universal Declaration, and to reaffirm our commitment to the cause of human dignity.

America has, since its founding, been a refuge for those suffering under the yoke of oppression. A belief in the dignity of man and government by the consent of the people lies at the heart of our national character and the soul of our foreign policy. I had the pleasure of explaining that to a gentleman in Geneva not too long ago. [Laughter] But here the difference is our documents, such as the Constitution, say we, the people, will allow government to do the following things.

Today, more than ever, we're proud to be champions of freedom and human rights the world over. So, in observing Human Rights Day, we celebrate our commitment to the beliefs and moral teachings on which our own nation is founded, a belief in liberty, in the dignity of man, and in the inalienable rights of free men and women to choose their destinies. We have not hesitated when these rights and freedoms have been threatened. Last month on Veterans Day, I visited the graves of our soldiers who gave their lives so that the rest of us might know the blessings of peace and freedom. Our sons, brothers, and fathers also lie in cemeteries and fields from Flanders to Manila, under undying testimony to our determination that these rights shall not perish.

We've learned from history that the cause of peace and human freedom is indivisible. Respect for human rights is essential to true peace on Earth. Governments that must answer to their peoples do not launch wars of aggression. That's why the American people cannot close their eyes to abuses of human rights and injustice, whether they occur among friend or adversary or even on our own shores. And we must be particularly appalled that, on the threshold of the 21st century, when man has made gigantic strides in opening the universe of space and finding cures for dread diseases, millions of our fellow men still suffer the grossest abuses. There are regimes, some friendly, some adversarial, that engage in frequent violations of human rights. There are other regimes which by their very nature are built upon the denial of human rights and the subordination of the individual to the state.

In Afghanistan and Cambodia, for example, alien dictatorships, with the support of foreign occupation troops, subject their peoples to unceasing warfare. Today, 6 years after the Soviet invasion of Afghanistan, up to 120,000 Soviet troops remain. They have slaughtered innocent women and children. They have employed poison gas. And they have loaded toys with small explosives, an attempt to demoralize the people by crippling Afghan children. Some 3\1/2\ million Afghans, fully one-fourth of the prewar population, have been forced to flee to Pakistan and Iran.

The Communist rulers of Vietnam have launched vicious attacks upon Cambodian refugees, refugees who were fleeing a Communist regime in Cambodia itself, which led to the deaths of up to one-quarter of the entire Cambodian population.

In the Western Hemisphere, where so much progress toward democracy has been made, Cuba stands out as the country where institutionalized totalitarianism has consistently violated the rights of the citizens. Unfortunately, the Sandinista regime in Nicaragua seems determined to embark on the same course.

On three continents we see brave men and women risking their lives in anti-Communist battles for freedom. We cannot and will not turn our backs on them. This year the House of Representatives has heeded their call and voted aid to the freedom fighters in Cambodia, Afghanistan, and Nicaragua and repealed a ban on aid to freedom fighters in Angola. Elsewhere we have seen considerable progress toward observance of human rights. In El Salvador, Grenada, and Honduras, freely selected -- or elected governments, I should say, represent the best hope of their peoples for the future. And just over the last weekend, a new civilian president was elected in Guatemala -- that's the first time in 15 years. We laud those achievements, but our concern remains for those who are still captive and oppressed. This is where our voices must speak for justice, for the force of world opinion can and does make a difference.

Since 1979, 198 Baha'is have been put to death, 767 are imprisoned, some 10,000 made homeless, and over 25,000 forced to flee their country. Only the continued world outcry can help bring an end to their suffering. In South Africa the inhuman policy of apartheid continues. The declaration of a state of emergency has given the police in that country essentially unlimited powers to silence critics of the government. Thousands of South African citizens have been detained without cause -- or charge, I should say, and denied even elementary judicial protection.

I have said that apartheid is abhorrent. It's time that the Government of South Africa took steps to end it and to reach out for compromise and reconciliation to end the turmoil in that strife-torn land. In Chile and the Philippines, too, we've shown our strong concern when our friends deviate from established democratic traditions.

In Eastern Europe the hopes and aspirations of millions of people for religious freedoms, civic rights, remain alive despite years of repression. The Solidarity labor union is still outlawed in Poland, and the Polish regime has once again moved to restrict the few freedoms that its people still enjoy. In Romania religious persecution includes the destruction of Bibles, while in Bulgaria the repression of the Turkish minority and the Islamic faith are witness to the unyielding denial of the basic freedom of speech, assembly, religion in this region.

I addressed human rights in my meetings with General Secretary Gorbachev, and I made it very clear to him that human rights are an abiding concern of the American people. We had a long and confidential discussion, and at the conclusion of our meetings, we declared in a joint statement that humanitarian issues would be resolved in a humanitarian spirit. Americans will be watching hopefully to see whether that pledge is observed. Make no mistake about it, human rights will continue to have a profound effect on the United States-Soviet relationship as a whole, because they are fundamental to our vision of an enduring peace.

President Lincoln once called America the last, best hope of man on Earth. Mr. Lincoln's remark has special poignancy today, when American determination and strength are central to the peace and freedom of the entire democratic world. It is therefore incumbent upon us to work for the expansion of freedom throughout the world. In this great effort, my friends, I deeply believe we have a good cause for hope. Evidence of the triumph of the ideal of freedom and respect for human rights can be seen in every corner of the globe, and this is because freedom is not only morally right but practical and beneficial. Indeed, governments that rest upon the consent of the governed and the rule of law are more successful in fulfilling their people's aspirations for a better life. Democratic government and economic freedom have turned a number of small nations into economic giants. It even appears to have roused a giant nation from its economic slumber.

Permit me in closing to return to Mr. Lincoln: ``What defined America, what gave our nation its purpose and mission,'' he once said, ``was something in that Declaration of Independence giving liberty not alone to the people of this country, but hope to the world. It was that which gave promise that in due time, the weights should be lifted from the shoulders of all men.'' Well, let us always be true to that distinctly American cause. Let us never cease to work and pray that the weights should be lifted from the shoulders of all men.

Baha'is in Iran. And though the mullahs of that country may choose to perpetuate these atrocities, they must know that because of you and the voices that you will encourage to speak out against it, these cannot now be perpetrated, except in the full light of public opinion. For this we are deeply and eternally grateful. We are aware also, Mr. President, that this is not a one-dimensional commitment; that in addition, you are morally and spiritually committed to the establishment of the peace we all want among the nations of the world -- peace, the most pressing of all issues facing humanity today, and for which the Baha'is ardently pray, and that this country will help lead the world out of its current predicament.

The President. Well, thank you very much, and thank all of you for what you're doing in this. I had the pleasure of quoting a statement of Thomas Jefferson to my colleague there in Geneva, and he called it, after he had heard it, very profound when Thomas Jefferson said, ``If the people know all the facts, the people will never make a mistake.'' So, you, the people, and all of us together, I think, can continue to be a tide that will prove irresistible. Thank you all very much.

Mindful of this, and deeply convinced that fundamental human rights are not a concession from the state but a gift of God, the Founding Fathers knew that government has a solemn obligation to safeguard those rights. That is why they were at pains to devise and ordain a constitutional system that would ensure respect for the dignity and uniqueness of every human being. Thus, they brought into existence a form of limited government -- representative democracy -- whose powers are circumscribed by law and whose legitimacy derives from the consent of the governed. For the first time in the history of nations, a written Constitution based on the inalienable God-given rights of the individual was promulgated.

It is with sincere thanksgiving that we reflect on the successful efforts of those wise patriots of two hundred years ago who laid the political foundations of our beloved Nation, and also to those millions of citizens ever since who have cherished and defended the Constitution and the principles it embodies. Many have given their lives on the field of battle so that freedom and human dignity might live both at home and abroad; let us never forget our debt to them or fail to honor their sacrifice and courage.

One hundred and fifty-seven years after the adoption of our Bill of Rights, the fundamental concepts enshrined in our Constitution were internationally acknowledged as applying to all peoples when the United Nations adopted the Universal Declaration of Human Rights on December 10, 1948.

Although we can take heart at the number of nations in which human rights are respected and real progress towards democratic self-government is being made, a disturbingly large number of governments continue to commit serious abuses of human rights. In the tradition of our forefathers, we protest against these abuses wherever they occur. We condemn the practice of torture, racial and religious persecution, and the denial of the right of free expression and freedom of movement.

The United States will never cease to be in the forefront of the noble battle for human rights. We have committed our resources and our influence to efforts aimed at extending throughout the world the rights we enjoy, rights which are rightly the prerogative of all people. This Nation must remain and will remain a beacon of hope for all who strive for human dignity. There is no better way of showing our gratitude for our inheritance of liberty.

We believe it is a right, not a privilege, to be allowed to speak freely; to assemble peacefully; to acquire and dispose of private property; to leave the country of one's residence; to form trade unions; to join or not to join groups and associations; and to worship according to one's conscience. Experience teaches us that the best check against tyranny is a government of the people in which leaders are elected in fair and open balloting and where the government's powers are subject to constitutional limitations. We pray that one day all nations of the earth may share with us the joys and rewards of living in free societies, and we resolve not to rest from our labors until the most noble longings of the human spirit, those for freedom of belief and expression, are fully realized.

I am pleased that the Senate and House conferees have produced a bill that I can support which will bring the Federal budget into balance by 1991. I strongly endorse this measure and urge the Congress to act quickly and make this the law of the land. The American people have made clear their desire to eliminate the Federal deficit, and this bill provides a realistic way to accomplish that goal. Additionally, it is my strong hope that the Congress will build upon this effort to adopt a balanced budget amendment to the Constitution to ensure that these deficit reductions are permanent.

While this proposal is welcome, I am concerned that in the extreme it could have adverse effects on maintaining adequate levels of defense spending. We have no higher priority than maintaining a strong national defense. To that end, I am committed to and will propose budgets that meet this requirement. I look forward to working with Congress to implement our previous agreements on defense spending levels. In pursuing our commitment to a balanced Federal budget, I am pleased that Gramm-Rudman-Hollings does so in the proper way, by providing the incentive to reduce Federal spending, not by raising taxes. As I have said, the budget deficits are not the result of Americans paying too little in taxes; they come from the Federal Government spending too much money.

The President today gave formal notification to the Congress of the administration's intention to enter into negotiations leading to a bilateral free trade arrangement with Canada. The notification, required under 1984 amendments to section 102 of the Trade Act of 1974, requires 60 days' notice to the House Committee on Ways and Means and the Senate Committee on Finance.

On September 26, 1985, Canadian Prime Minister Brian Mulroney telephoned the President, followed by a formal letter proposing that the two governments explore more directly the scope and prospects for a new trade agreement ``. . . involving the broadest possible package of mutually beneficial reductions in barriers to trade in goods and services.'' The President thereafter instructed the United States Trade Representative (USTR), Clayton Yeutter, to begin the process of informal consultations with the Congress and the private sector. That process having been completed, Ambassador Yeutter recommended that the President proceed with formal notice.

In his notification letters to the congressional committees, the President emphasized that he viewed the initiation of negotiations as an opportunity to significantly enhance U.S. efforts to eliminate trade frictions with Canada. The President also welcomed the Canadian proposal as consistent with administration and congressional efforts to further open foreign markets for U.S. exports. ``As you know, Canada is both our largest trading partner and fastest growing export market, representing one-fifth of our total exports,'' wrote the President.

It's a deeply significant vote in our long, uphill climb to streamline the Nation's tax code to make it the strongest possible engine for growth and opportunity and a model for simplicity and fairness.

Now, we do not believe that after all our efforts, good-faith efforts on both sides of the aisle, and after today's developments, that our work should be lost for lack of a handful of votes. I hope Members will vote yes on final passage to allow this important issue to move forward.

Both the tax reform proposals before the Congress would reduce corporate and individual tax rates substantially, bringing the top individual rate down to its lowest level since 1931. The minimum tax would be strengthened, even as tax shelters and special preferences are eliminated and restricted. And millions of the working poor would be removed from the tax rolls as the personal exemption and standard deduction are increased.

But I realize there are loyal supporters of mine who have difficulties with the Ways and Means bill, even some with the Republican substitute. But let me say here that despite the good aspects of these proposals, as far as we're concerned, more improvement needs to be done. We continue to insist that true tax reform is imperative, but when we examined the legislation, we did conclude that, in many respects, it is better than the current tax law. It is the beginning, or at least it can be the beginning, of a final product that is true and historic tax reform. And it's your support and help that can give us the chance to move forward now on the tax reform.

We can't afford to wait. If we let tax reform die, I think it will be years before we can bring it back. You only have to look back in your own memories to say, how far back do I have to remember before anyone ever attempted to reform this tax system, which has grown more complex and more cumbersome and more unjust as the years have gone on. So, what I'm saying and urging you today is simply this: Give us the chance to finish the job. Give us the chance to improve this initiative in the Senate based on what I've just said. I thank you for all that you're doing, but we need you more than ever right now.

Today I have signed H.J. Res. 372, which increases the statutory limit on the public debt and includes the Balanced Budget and Emergency Deficit Control Act of 1985, also known as the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings amendment. With the passage of this landmark legislation, the Congress has made an important step toward putting our fiscal house in order. Deficit reduction is no longer simply our hope and our goal; deficit reduction is now the law. From here to the end of the decade, mandated cuts can put the deficit on a declining path and eliminate governmental overspending by 1991. It is my hope that we will move even one step further to secure the gains we have made by adopting a balanced budget amendment to the Constitution.

Deficits have threatened our economic well-being for too long. For years the Congress has talked about the deficit, and now it has done something about it. But the tough work of controlling Federal spending still lies ahead. It is important that we now cooperate in good faith toward building a solid fiscal foundation for economic growth. This legislation mandates that the President and the Congress work together to eliminate the deficit over the next 5 years. The first step in that process will begin early next year. At that time I anticipate that we will have to take some significant across-the-board reductions in a wide range of programs. That means cutting back on the expansion of government, an expansion which has slowed, but which still continues apace. Whether increased government spending is financed through taxes or borrowing, it imposes a heavy burden on the private economy, the source of our prosperity and the foundation of our hopes for the future. That is why increasing taxes is not an option: Deficit reduction must mean spending reductions. We must also never lose sight of the necessity to maintain a strong national defense. Restoring our defenses has been vital not only to our security but to the cause of freedom. Today our once ailing alliances are stronger than before. America is looked upon with renewed admiration around the world, and the principles of human freedom that we embody are no longer in retreat. I am confident that implementing our previous agreements with Congress for steady real growth in defense will keep our defenses secure.

In signing this bill, I am mindful of the serious constitutional questions raised by some of its provisions. The bill assigns a significant role to the Director of the Congressional Budget Office and the Comptroller General in calculating the budget estimates that trigger the operative provisions of the bill. Under the system of separated powers established by the Constitution, however, executive functions may only be performed by officers in the executive branch. The Director of the Congressional Budget Office and the Comptroller General are agents of Congress, not officers in the executive branch. The bill itself recognizes this problem and provides procedures for testing the constitutionality of the dubious provisions. The bill also provides a constitutionally valid alternative mechanism should the role of the Director of the Congressional Budget Office and the Comptroller General be struck down. It is my hope that these outstanding constitutional questions can be promptly resolved.

Similar constitutional concerns are raised by a provision in the bill authorizing the President to terminate or modify defense contracts for deficit reduction purposes, but only if the action is approved by the Comptroller General. Under our constitutional system, an agent of Congress may not exercise such supervisory authority over the President. As the Supreme Court made clear in its Chadha decision, Congress can veto Presidential action only through the constitutionally established procedure of passing a bill through both Houses and presenting it to the President.

My administration alerted Congress to these various problems throughout the legislative process in an effort to achieve a bill free of constitutionally suspect provisions. Although we were unsuccessful in this goal, I am nonetheless signing the bill. In doing so, I am in no sense dismissing the constitutional problems or acquiescing in a violation of the system of separated powers carefully crafted by the framers of the Constitution. Rather, it is my hope that the constitutional problems will be promptly resolved so that the vitally important business of deficit reduction can proceed.

The many Senators and Representatives whose hard work has borne fruit in this bill are to be commended. The American people expect their elected officials to take action now to reduce the size of government and to set upon a reasonable and equitable course to eliminate Federal budget deficits. I am unequivocally committed to that goal. I am hopeful and confident that Congress will act responsibly in meeting its obligations under the bill and thus in future years will render implementation of the automatic budget reduction mechanism unnecessary. Deficit reduction is on the horizon. We are embarked on this promising new path together, and together we will make it work.

Thank you all very much. Who's tending the store? [Laughter] Connie Horner and ladies and gentlemen, good morning, and welcome to the White House. We've assembled today to -- if some of you think that's strange, I always have to explain that. I had to have it explained to me -- that they technically call this the White House. I know we're across the street. [Laughter] But we're assembled here today to honor the best of our Senior Executive Service, those of you whom it is my privilege to bestow distinguished Presidential Rank7E7E Awards.

Each President, each administration, is a rendezvous with Father Time. Father Time -- I did -- I went to school with him; he was a classmate. [Laughter] But the clock is ticking, and even as our administration has called for government to play a more limited role in American life, we've worked hard to see that government performs its legitimate functions with greater diligence and efficiency. It's men and women like you who have made this vital effort successful. At Treasury and Justice, in the Army, the Navy, the Air Force, at Agriculture, NASA, and so many others, you've become shining examples of individuals who have delivered on the promises of the Government to the American people.

Now, time won't permit me to discuss each of your achievements, but I do want to mention just, at least, a few. One of you has fought crime by developing a program to help cut drug smuggling in Miami; another helped put Americans on the Moon and is now working to make NASA's space station a reality. Several of you've made advances of critical importance to our national defense.

Even more important than these specific savings and advances -- each of you has provided an example, an inspiration to others in the civil service, to work hard and to be more conscientious of the great trust that is shared by all in public service. Through your personal achievement, you, whom we honor today, have improved the lives of millions of your fellow citizens throughout our nation. And these awards represent the appreciation that each of us feels for you having accomplished so much for so many.

Nancy and I are deeply shocked and saddened by the report of the tragic crash of a chartered airliner returning U.S. troops to the United States from peacekeeping duty with the United Nations' Multinational Force and Observers in the Sinai. The loss, tragic at any time, is especially painful at this holiday period. I have been advised by the Secretary of Defense that the full resources of the U.S. Army and the U.S. Government are being made available to assist families of victims however possible. Our hearts go out to the loved ones of these brave soldiers who have paid the fullest price in the service of their country and the cause of peace.

My fellow Americans, thank you for joining Nancy and me on this festive evening. The menorah stands lighted in Lafayette Park, for this is also the time of Hanukkah, and this season is rich in the meaning of our Judeo-Christian tradition. In a moment we'll be lighting the National Christmas Tree, carrying forward what is now a 62-year tradition first begun by Calvin Coolidge.

Tonight we're drawn in warmth to one another as we reflect upon the deeply holy meaning of the miracle we shall soon celebrate. We know that Mary and Joseph reached the stable in Bethlehem sometime after sunset. We do not know the exact moment the Christ Child was born, only what we would have seen if we'd been standing there as we stand here now: Suddenly, a star from heaven shining in our eyes, shining with brilliant beauty across the skies, a star pointing toward eternity in the night, like a great ring of pure and endless light, and then all was calm, and all was bright. Such was the beginning of one solitary life that would shake the world as never before or since. When we speak of Jesus and of His life, we speak of a man revered as a prophet and teacher by people of all religions, and Christians speak of someone greater -- a man who was and is divine. He brought forth a power that is infinite and a promise that is eternal, a power greater than all mankind's military might, for His power is Godly love, love that can lift our hearts and soothe our sorrows and heal our wounds and drive away our fears. He promised there will never be a long night that does not end. He promised to deliver us from dark torment and tragedy into the warming sunlight of human happiness, and beyond that, into paradise. He's never been a halfway giver; His generosity is pure and perfect and sure.

This, then, expresses the true meaning of Christmas. If each of us could give but a fraction to one another of what He gave to the whole human family, how many hearts could heal, how much sorrow and pain could be driven away? There's still time for joy and gladness to touch a sad and lonely soul, still time to feed a hungry child, to wrap a present for a kind old man feeling forlorn and afraid, and to reach out to an abandoned mother raising children on her own. There's still time to remember our Armed Forces, to express our profound gratitude to those keeping watch on faraway frontiers of freedom, and to redouble our energies to account for our MIA's. They are not and never will be forgotten. And there's still time to remember the deepest truth of all: that there can be no prisons, no walls, no boundaries separating the members of God's family.

Let us reach out tonight to every person who is persecuted; let us embrace and comfort, support and love them. Let us come together as one family under the fatherhood of God, binding ourselves in a communion of hearts, for tonight and tomorrow and for all time. May we give thanks for an America abundantly blessed, for a nation united, free, and at peace. May we carry forward the happiness of the Christmas spirit as the guiding star of our endeavors 365 days a year.

I have two subjects to speak about today. First, taxes. I think you know how strongly I want to improve our unfair and complicated tax code. A problem that's grown so monstrous over the years isn't easy to correct. But we're on the edge of a breakthrough that can bring personal income tax rates down to the lowest level in over 50 years. This past week the House began final consideration of crucial reform legislation, but because of a parliamentary impasse, the House was unable to vote. Unless it's overturned, the result can only be a defeat for all Americans, who know taxes are too high and the system is hopelessly unfair. Today I'd like to make a personal request of the House of Representatives. You have the opportunity to provide the relief millions of Americans demand. If, together, Republicans and Democrats would agree to a format for considering this vote, I believe there will be sufficient bipartisan support for tax reform to pass.

This is one time politics must be put aside on both sides of the aisle. There are ways to permit this much-needed reform to go forward. There are ample excuses for not going forward; there will be no justification if it does not.

Now, I must address recent disturbing events in a country close to our borders -- the Communist dictatorship in Nicaragua. Nicaragua today is an imprisoned nation. It is a nation condemned to unrelenting cruelty by a clique of very cruel men -- by a dictator in designer glasses and his comrades, drunk with power and all its brutal applications. They stripped the Nicaraguan people of their rights by a state decree last October 15th, yet that decree only made official, and by their reckoning permissible, the theft of liberty that took place years ago.

No institution more deeply embodies or glorifies or seeks to perfect the moral and spiritual goodness of man than the church in all of its denominations. Yet in Nicaragua, the church is the enemy. Protestant ministers and lay people have been arrested, interrogated, and tormented at secret police headquarters; some forced to stand naked in very cold rooms for long periods. A tiny population of Jews was bullied and driven out. Cardinal Obando y Bravo, a great hero of truth and courage, is prevented from speaking freely to his flock. The state police have expelled foreign priests and drafted seminarians, who are virtual prisoners in the Sandinistas' armed forces.

And the Catholic Church's newspaper has been seized and Radio Catolica censored, sometimes shut down entirely. The same dictators who insulted Pope John Paul II also stopped Radio Catolica from broadcasting a letter from the Pope and this beatitude: ``Blessed are those who are persecuted for righteousness sake, for theirs is the kingdom of Heaven.'' The truth is, these men are nothing but thugs, a gang of hardcore Communists to whom the word of God is a declaration of liberation that must be stamped out.

Their denial of rights, their trampling of human dignity, their wrecking of an economy with suffocating socialist controls -- all hurt and deeply offend us. But there's a cause for deeper concern: the specter of Nicaragua transformed into an international aggressor nation, a base for subversion and terror. Some 3,000 Cuban military personnel now lead and advise the Nicaraguan forces down to the smallest combat units. The Cubans fly the Soviet assault helicopters that gun down Nicaraguan freedom fighters. Over 7,000 Cubans, Soviets, East Germans, Bulgarians, Libyans, PLO, and other bloc and terror groups are turning Managua into a breeding ground for subversion. A delegation of Nicaraguans is now in Iran. Nicaragua's border violations against Honduras and Costa Rica continue. And Nicaragua's connection with the recent terrorist attack against Colombia's Supreme Court is now clear.

Communist states and terrorist regimes and prop up a hated Communist dictatorship, should not the forces fighting for liberation, now numbering over 20,000, be entitled to more effective help in their struggle for freedom? Yes, and to reinforce this message, I sent my new national security adviser, John Poindexter, this week to visit the Central American democracies and make clear our commitment to a democratic outcome in Nicaragua. Those who struggle for freedom look to America. If we fail them in their hour of need, we fail ourselves as the last, best hope of liberty.

I have been quite surprised in the last few moments, and every bit of show business instinct in me tells me I ought to keep my mouth shut and sit down. [Laughter] But Nancy and I want to thank all of you for being here tonight and tell you how grateful we are for your kind efforts on behalf of the foundation. Paul Laxalt mentioned the other day how fitting it was that so many old friends there from the beginning should be associated with a project that someday will mark the formal end to 8 years of government, though we pray not an end to the idea and principles for which we stood.

Now, like the good chairman that he is, I think Paul also said something about creating a proper mood for fundraising. Entrepreneurial leverage, I think he called it. [Laughter] Shame on you, Paul. [Laughter] You're talking bureaucratese. That's a language peculiar to Washington, and there are no interpreters of it. Let me give you an example. Some of you have heard this before, but I'm going to tell it anyway. One day early in my first term a native bureaucrat stood in front of my desk and said, ``Action-oriented orchestration of meaningful indigenous decision-making dialog, focusing on multilinked problem complexes, can maximize the vital thrust toward nonalienated and viable urban infrastructure.'' [Laughter] Now, that's pure basic bureaucratese.

But I look out here tonight and I see so many old friends. I'm gravely tempted to reminisce. I could tell a few stories that I think would interest future historians, but there isn't time for that this evening, except to say the moments that we've spent together are locked away forever in our memory and our hearts. Nancy and I want you to know that we looked forward to this dinner for a special reason: We thought this a particularly good time to extend our thanks, first, because of the season -- and we wanted to share the joy of it with you -- and second, through this foundation you are helping to guide future generations of Americans to a deeper appreciation of our nation's past.

And you know, what we've done as friends and fellow citizens to keep faith with those who came before us, those who won for us the blessings of liberty, is at the heart of our purpose here this evening. Have we had some success? Well, I believe we have. But we haven't won all the battles.

Just these last few days we lost a skirmish, but the battle goes on. And it's the nature of this battle, and the other battles in these last 5 years, that has changed. We're no longer the embattled few trying to stem the tide of ever-increasing government growth, fighting to halt the adoption of new programs and the increase of government interference in the people's lives. No, today the debate has switched; it's over how much government should be reduced, which programs should be eliminated, and how best to make government less intrusive in people's lives and less costly.

In one of the Geneva meetings, I spoke of having read the constitutions of a number of countries, including that of the Soviet Union. And in each, the government enumerated the privileges granted to the citizenry. For the most part, they were very much the same as the privileges that we take for granted here. But I pointed out to the General Secretary that there was one difference between those other constitutions and ours, a difference that's often overlooked and yet a difference so great that it tells the entire story. Those other constitutions are grants to the people by government; our Constitution says we the people grant to government the following powers and government shall have no power or privilege that is not granted in that document by we, the people. This administration, which you have so generously helped, has one guiding thought. I have said it very often to the people surrounding me in the administration. That guiding thought is, when we start talking about government as ``we'' instead of ``they,'' we've been here too long.

For that, and for helping through this foundation to record a part of the American saga, Nancy and I extend to you tonight our heartfelt thanks and wish you the best of the season and a joyous New Year.

So, it's appropriate that in the Christmas season we honor the little children. Like the Savior who first appeared in this world a helpless infant, our children, in their vulnerability, innocence, and trust, carry the light of the world in their hearts. With our children, we literally hold the future in our arms. Let us follow the better angels of our nature and come to see this thing which the Lord has made known to us in the spirit of every little child.

The Boy Scouts of America, our Nation's largest organization for young people, has served our youth since 1910. Thanks to dedicated adult volunteers, more than 70 million young people have learned Scouting's lessons of patriotism, courage, and self-reliance over the past 75 years, and millions more have benefited from the service, inspiration, and leadership of the Boy Scouts.

Former Scouts have gone on to become leaders in all fields, including business, education, and government. The values they learned through Scouting have given them the confidence to make ethical choices and to realize their full potential as active and responsible citizens.

America's future. The Boy Scouts have clearly shown that it is possible to innovate while remaining faithful to their original principles. I am confident that they will continue to play an important role in American society for many years to come, molding our youth with programs that build confidence and competence, and instilling in them principles that can guide them through their lives.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this fifteenth day of December, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-five, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and tenth.

I am pleased to sign into law today S.J. Res. 238, in which the Congress states that it favors the agreement for peaceful nuclear cooperation between the United States and the People's Republic of China, which I transmitted to Congress on July 24, 1985. The agreement will have a significant, positive effect on the relations between the United States and the People's Republic of China and will lead to a continuing dialog with China on important nuclear energy and nonproliferation matters. It will further U.S. nonproliferation and other foreign policy interests. I therefore welcome the Congress' support for the agreement. Since I submitted the agreement without exempting it from any requirement in section 123(a) of the Atomic Energy Act, no affirmative legislation was required to permit the agreement to be brought into force after the legally stipulated time periods for congressional review had been completed. The agreement may therefore be brought into force at that time in accordance with the procedure set forth in article 10 of the agreement.

China under the agreement may commence. It assigns exclusively to the President the responsibility to review the matters to be certified to and to decide whether the certification may be made. Three matters must be certified: (1) that the arrangements for visits and exchanges of information made pursuant to article 8 of the agreement are, as called for by this article itself, designed to be effective in ensuring that nuclear exports under the agreement are used solely for intended peaceful purposes; (2) that, after examining all information available to the United States Government, including any additional information that China has provided, nuclear exports to China are not precluded under section 129(2) of the Atomic Energy Act; and (3) that the obligation to consider favorably a request to carry out activities described in article 5(2) of the agreement does not prejudice the decision of the United States to approve or disapprove such a request. In addition, the joint resolution requires a report on Chinese nonproliferation policies and practices before exports commence.

The joint resolution also states that U.S. exports are subject to U.S. laws and regulations in effect at the time of export. This is a restatement of existing U.S. law and does not conflict with any obligations undertaken by the United States under the agreement. Finally, the joint resolution contains a section intended to ensure that the provisions in the China agreement that are textually different from provisions of the type contained in other U.S. peaceful nuclear cooperation agreements will not be the starting point for future nuclear cooperation agreement negotiations with other countries.

This joint resolution serves our interests in promoting peaceful nuclear cooperation and a nonproliferation dialog with China. For this reason, I have decided to sign the joint resolution. I appreciate the efforts of Senators Lugar and Cranston and Representatives Fascell, Broomfield, Bonker, Solarz, as well as others, in developing a joint resolution text that both the administration and the Congress could accept. I understand that an amendment relating to the U.S.-China peaceful nuclear cooperation agreement is currently under consideration in the conference on the continuing resolution. I strongly object to that amendment.

Office Building -- [laughter] -- the carriage entrance. [Laughter] But it's an honor to welcome you all here during this National Drunk and Drugged Driving Awareness Week, a week when Americans throughout the country will reflect upon an urgent and worthy cause -- the battle against drunk driving.

Today in America we have people like Secretary Dole, who is doing all within her power to make our highways safer. We have people like Jim Aducci, the Chairman of the National Commission on Drunk Driving, and John Volpe, the Chairman of the Presidential Commission on Drunk Driving, who are devoting untold hours of their time to studying the problem with a view to recommending specific solutions. Perhaps most important, we have people like Mothers Against Drunk Driving, and thousands of others like them -- everyday Americans, mothers and fathers, teachers and students, who are, frankly, fed up with drunk driving and absolutely determined to bring it to an end. The progress has been encouraging. During our administration, fatalities from drunk driving have fallen to their lowest point in more than two decades. And between 1980 and 1984, the number of fatally injured drunk drivers dropped from 14,000 to 11,000, a decrease of 24 percent. The use of seat belts, the best defense against drunk drivers, is up.

Concern through the country, moreover, has led to the passage of important new laws. Today we have child safety seat laws in all 50 States and the District of Columbia. And a year-and-a-half ago, it was my honor to sign into law a measure encouraging a uniform drinking age of 21 across the country. And I'm pleased to be able to tell you that 37 States have adopted the law and that efforts are afoot to raise the drinking age in still more States. I'm sure you'll agree there's no measure more vital to the safety and well-being of our young people. But perhaps the most effective work against drunk driving has involved not government, but private, volunteer efforts, efforts like the seminars sponsored by Mothers Against Drunk Driving and the work of student groups to reduce drunk driving among young people. Today I'm pleased to announce a new private sector initiative that I know you'll find inspiring.

CBS will air public service announcements during their broadcasts of NBA games. These announcements will feature basketball stars, including one of my favorites, Magic Johnson, of the Los Angeles Lakers. All told, this new team effort will reach millions, and it's just getting started.

This holiday season, as American families gather from around the country, they'll be able to drive on roads that are safer than they used to be, and getting safer still. Everyone in this room has helped to make that possible. And now, at the beginning of National Drunk and Drugged Driving Awareness Week, I want to give you -- and I think on behalf of an awful lot of people -- my heartfelt thanks. And just thank you for what you're doing, and God bless you. Thank you.

But it was not until early in this century that the remarkable ingenuity and dogged determination of two young Americans finally made that dream come true. On a sandy strip of the North Carolina coast on the morning of December 17, 1903, Orville Wright, then 32, made the first piloted power-driven flight in a heavier-than-air vehicle. He did it in a 750-pound machine designed and built by him and his older brother, Wilbur. It was the culmination of four years of intensive research by the two inseparable brothers whose talents and temperament complemented each other perfectly.

Neither of these boys from Dayton, Ohio had ever attended college. Indeed, although they were bright students, neither ever formally graduated from high school. They made a living manufacturing bicycles, but all their spare time was devoted to the conquest of the skies. Wilbur read everything available in the local library and then wrote away to the Smithsonian Institution for more.

But what others had written was not enough. The Wright Brothers experimented for years with kites and gliders. They took detailed notes and made up tables of ratios. To master the challenge of controlling their craft, they designed and built their own wind tunnel and tested hundreds of different wing designs in small scale models.

They continued to pioneer developments in flight for as long as they lived. Wilbur died in 1912, while jealous rivals were still contesting their claims to priority and just before the rapid development of aviation. But Orville, who sold the Wright company in 1915, served for many years on the National Advisory Committee for Aeronautics and lived to see his and his brother's claim fully vindicated and universally recognized. Before he died in 1948 the revolution they had set in motion was moving on to new achievements. Jet planes had broken the sound barrier and Bill Odum had flown around the world in just over 73 hours.

That revolution continues, and America has stayed on its cutting edge. This year some 400 million passengers will fly some 334 million miles, and almost 66 percent of all the aircraft they will fly on are made in the U.S.A. America leads in space, reaching the moon and beyond. And today our engineers are working on aircraft that will be able to travel coast to coast in 12 minutes and reach any point on the globe in an hour and a half.

Truly, the age of flight is still young and its greatest achievements are yet to come, but we must never forget those two extraordinary young men, the Wright Brothers. Eighty-two years ago they turned an impossible dream into reality.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this seventeenth day of December, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-five, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and tenth.

Congress has once and for all cast the final vote that will ensure true tax reform for the American people. Tonight there will be another step in that process. I want to urge all Members of both parties to send a bill on to the Senate, so they can finish the job when they return after Christmas.

America. I congratulate the Members of both parties who worked together to enable the long and arduous process of tax reform to go forward. We now look to the Senate to move quickly, and to make all necessary changes, to ensure that the final bill is unequivocally profamily, projobs, and progrowth.

I am returning herewith without my approval H.R. 1562. It is my firm conviction that the economic and human costs of such a bill run far too high -- costs in foreign retaliation against U.S. exports, loss of American jobs, losses to American businesses, and damage to the world trading system upon which our prosperity depends.

At the same time, I am well aware of the difficulties of the apparel, textile, copper, and shoe industries, and deeply sympathetic about the job layoffs and plant closings that have affected many workers in these industries.

As I stated in my trade speech in September, I will not stand by and watch American businesses fail because of unfair trading practices abroad. I will not stand by and watch American workers lose their jobs because other nations do not play by the rules.

Policy Council, to investigate the import levels of textiles and apparel to determine if these imports have exceeded those limits agreed upon in international negotiations. I have directed that he report back to me within 60 days and recommend changes in existing administrative and enforcement procedures, if necessary, so that corrective action is taken.

Also, I am directing the Office of the United States Trade Representative to most aggressively renegotiate the Multi-Fiber Arrangement (MFA) on terms no less favorable than present. Our trading partners must be put on notice that we will not allow unfair trading practices to continue.

Finally, I have directed Secretary of Labor Brock to work with the Congress to provide an additional $100 million increase in funds appropriated to help retrain and relocate displaced workers under the Job Training Partnership Act. The Job Training Partnership Act is a more effective way than Trade Adjustment Assistance for the Secretary of Labor to target those American workers and geographic areas most affected. This is the way we can best help dislocated workers -- and without pitting one American worker against another.

Free and fair trade policies have helped create nearly 9 million new jobs in the last 3 years and given us the highest rate of employment in our Nation's history. Still, for some workers in troubled industries, these are difficult times. The personal distress of those who lose their jobs is very real. None of us wants to see American workers lose their jobs or American businesses suffer. I pledge to you to do everything possible to combat unfair trade practices. But in so doing we must take wise and positive steps to redress wrongs. To do otherwise would be counterproductive.

Unfortunately, H.R. 1562 would invite immediate retaliation against our exports resulting in a loss of American jobs in other areas. Because this bill is so sweeping in its provisions, we could expect that retaliation to be extensive. The United States exported tens of billions of dollars worth of goods to the countries which would be most affected by this measure, including approximately a third of our farm exports. Workers in agriculture, aerospace, high-tech electronics, chemicals, and pharmaceuticals would be the first to feel the retaliatory backlash, but the damaging effects would soon be felt by every American in the form of lost jobs, higher prices, and shrinking economic growth.

We are pursuing an aggressive trade policy, based on the knowledge that American know-how is still number one and that American industry thrives on fair competition. Where U.S. industries are hurt by unfair practices, we will continue to take vigorous actions. Where foreign trade barriers lock out U.S. exports, we will do everything in our power to knock those barriers down. Our philosophy will always be to increase trade, increase economic growth, and increase jobs. We want to open markets abroad, not close them at home. In a fair and open world market, we know that America can out-produce and out-compete anybody.

I have given my approval today to S. 1639, the ``Gold Bullion Coin Act of 1985.'' I have previously indicated support for legislation to permit the Secretary of the Treasury to mint and sell gold bullion coins. Indeed, when I issued Executive Order No. 12532, concerning South Africa, on September 9, 1985, I specifically requested that the Treasury conduct a study ``regarding the feasibility of . . . expeditiously seeking legislative authority to accomplish the goal of issuing such coins.'' Legislation prepared pursuant to this directive was under review within the administration at the time S. 1639 was passed by the Congress. Although I would have preferred that the Congress defer action on S. 1639 until the administration's proposal could have been submitted and duly considered, I support the principal objectives of this legislation.

I must note, however, that certain provisions are troublesome. Specifically, enactment of this legislation may raise questions about the willingness of the United States to honor its international obligations. In this regard, my administration will strongly support the prompt enactment of appropriate legislative clarifications, should any prove to be necessary. In addition, I am also concerned about a provision of this legislation that would effectively prohibit the Secretary of the Treasury from using gold held in the United States' reserves in producing gold coins. In my view, this restriction denies the United States a potentially major source of revenue. At a time when we have committed ourselves to eliminating the budget deficit over the next several years, a limitation of this nature is especially unfortunate. Therefore, I am instructing the Department of the Treasury to work closely with the Congress to provide the Secretary of the Treasury with authority in minting gold coins to use gold from sources, including the Nation's reserves, that the Secretary deems necessary or appropriate.

Congratulations are due to all of those in the House who worked so long and hard to bring us to this point. And we can now look forward to a lot more hard work, but today America can feel that a true tax reform is within its grasp. We must not disappoint the American people. We must move forward from here with all deliberate speed to pass a tax reform bill that will spur economic growth, create jobs, and give America's families the long overdue tax relief that they deserve. In this last week, we have begun to put into place a solid, progrowth framework of lowered marginal tax rates and spending restraints. And together, they promise to make our economy fit and trim and competitive for the future.

Now, Phil, Warren, and Fritz, you who have given your names to Gramm-Rudman-Hollings bill, also deserve our congratulations. From now on when the public hears the names Gramm, Rudman, or Hollings, they'll think deficit reduction. And Connie Mack and Dick Cheney, who followed quite quickly in the House, you deserve our thanks. All of you here today who have given so much time and hard work to this bill have earned your country's thanks. The Government Gargantua has been gorging on taxpayer dollars for too long. We plan to get it slimmed down into shape by the end of the decade.

For years we've been warning that the growing deficit reflects a dangerous increase in the size of government. Polls, too, demonstrate public concern. Now Gramm-Rudman-Hollings locks in a long-term commitment to lowering and eventually eliminating deficits. It's my hope that history will record last week as the time when the relentless expansion of the Federal Government was finally halted and put into reverse. But we can't afford to be complacent. It's going to take a lot more hard work and many more difficult decisions if we're to live up to the promise of this moment. The law now puts a time limit on governmental overspending. It mandates a balanced budget. But while Gramm-Rudman-Hollings gives us some guidelines and directions, it doesn't take us to our destination. It's essential as we embark on this journey toward a balanced budget that we keep a clear sense of our priorities and hold our first purposes firmly in mind.

We must not allow Gramm-Rudman-Hollings to become an excuse to avoid the tough decisions entailed in cutting back on runaway domestic spending. We will not only be held responsible for cutting the deficit; ultimately, we will be judged on how we reduce the deficit. Will we, for instance, continue to fund welfare for the rich? Will we continue to insist that low-income taxpayers subsidize programs for people who make 10 or 11 times as much money as they do?

Gramm-Rudman-Hollings won't make our decisions any easier, but it will make our choices crystal clear for all to see. Last year, for instance, we said the United States Government had no business running a railroad -- and running it, by the way, hundreds of millions of dollars in the red.

We proposed eliminating Federal subsidies to Amtrak, but intense lobbying pressure kept money flowing. Next time around, no program will get a free ride. We can abide by the letter of the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings law and still violate its spirit.

If we try to accomplish deficit reduction by tax increases or through just deep cuts in defense that endanger our national security, we will have failed in our paramount duty to the American people -- the duty of good and responsible government. Raising taxes in order to reduce the deficit is robbing Peter to pay Paul, and Peter went bankrupt a long time ago. Whether excess spending is financed through taxes or borrowing, it puts a heavy burden on the private economy and slows the engines of prosperity. In fact, by slowing economic growth, a tax increase might well make the deficit bigger, not smaller. And I want you all to know that when I sat at my desk in the Oval Office and signed Gramm-Rudman-Hollings, I kept my veto pen ready in the top drawer. It's sitting there right now waiting for any tax increase that might come my way.

We should also remember that when we passed Gramm-Rudman-Hollings, we didn't absolve ourselves of our first responsibility as the elected representatives of this country to provide for the national defense. The last thing we want to do is return our country to the weakened, vulnerable state in which we found it in 1980. It was a stronger and reinvigorated national defense that allowed the United States to move swiftly and confidently, liberating Grenada from communism and bringing the terrorist murderers of Leon Klinghoffer to justice. It was this renewed sense of purpose and commitment that gave confidence to friends and allies around the globe, and particularly to those struggling for freedom against Soviet-imposed regimes.

And it was our determination to proceed with the modernization of our nuclear deterrent that, through Geneva, has improved the prospects for real arms reduction. Maintaining a strong national defense is not only our obligation to America, it's our duty as the last, best hope of mankind to the cause of human freedom. I feel confident that if Congress abides by its already established agreement for real growth in defense, we can meet our national security requirements.

I hope that each of us will pledge to follow through in the spirit of Gramm-Rudman-Hollings to see that government does only that which it must do and no more. And I hope that we'll all work together to secure the deficit cutting gains that we make by adopting a balanced budget amendment to the Constitution. So, as I said, the real work of controlling Federal spending has only just begun. We've taken a dramatic step forward; let's keep the momentum going.

Amid all the hubbub and hustle this time of year always brings, we should not forget the simple beauty of that first Christmas long ago. Joseph and Mary, far from home and huddled in a place barely fit for habitation, felt the universal love that binds all families together and a unique awe at the special purpose for which God had chosen them. Gathering around them first the shepherds and later, the Magi -- poor and rich, humble and great, native and foreign -- each bowed before the King whose dominion knows no boundaries. Above them was the Star, the guiding light which would shine down through the centuries for everyone seeking the Way, the Truth, and the Life.

Today, as we celebrate the birth of Christ in our homes and churches, among family and friends, and by our many different traditions, let us accept and share the generous gifts of joy, peace, and love given on that first Christmas. May we honor them in our hearts and keep them through the year.

The Soviet Union has both publicly and through confidential diplomatic channels continued to press its proposal for a moratorium on all nuclear explosions that it made public on July 29. For our part, the President has long advocated a dialog with the Soviet Union to arrive at the improved verification procedures necessary for any testing limitations. It was the President who extended an unconditional invitation to Soviet experts to visit the U.S. nuclear test site to measure the yield of a U.S. nuclear test, with any instrumentation devices they deemed necessary. This initiative was designed with the hope that it might set in motion a process that could increase confidence and cooperation between our nations regarding limitations on nuclear testing. The U.S. would, of course, welcome Soviet willingness to agree to reciprocal visits to nuclear testing sites.

It is through measures of this type that a basis could be created to develop and institute the type of verification measures needed to make effectively verifiable the pending treaties dealing with nuclear testing, namely, the threshold test ban and peaceful nuclear explosions treaties. This is an issue, however, quite separate from that of a moratorium on nuclear explosions.

As we have stated many times previously, the U.S. has learned through experience that moratoria cannot be counted on to lead to the enhanced security desired. The Soviet Union broke a nuclear testing moratorium a quarter of a century ago with the most intensive nuclear test series in history -- some 40 explosions over a period of several weeks. We made clear when the Soviets announced their moratorium the reasons for our nuclear testing limitation policy, as well as for continuing the U.S. testing program. U.S. testing is required to ensure the continued credibility and effectiveness of our deterrent and to ensure the reliability and safety of the U.S. arsenal.

While we are actively investigating technologies that may one day make the U.S. less dependent on offensive nuclear weapons for our security, nuclear weapons will remain, for the foreseeable future, the key element of our deterrent. In such a situation, where both the U.S. and our allies must rely upon nuclear weapons to deter aggression, nuclear testing will be required. A comprehensive test ban, however, is a long-term objective of the U.S. in the context of achieving broad, deep, and verifiable arms reductions; substantially improved verification capabilities; expanded confidence-building measures; greater balance in conventional forces; and at a time when a nuclear deterrent is no longer as essential an element as currently for international security and stability. The United States is currently involved in discussions with the Soviet Union in most of these areas.

The Japanese Government has agreed to further reduce its tariffs on wine. In all cases, we will continue to work with the concerned Governments to pursue the reduction or elimination of the trade barriers to wine. I am optimistic that more progress can and will be made.

Additionally, I would like to point out that three other countries not cited in the reports have taken action to liberalize their import restrictions on wine. Last winter, as part of our implementation of Title IX, we discussed our concerns about barriers to wine trade with the representatives of many countries. Since that time, the Philippines removed its ban on wine imports, Jamaica eliminated its wine import licensing restrictions, and Switzerland opened its quota for bulk red wine imports to all countries thereby providing access for U.S. products.

As you will note in the enclosed reports, our wine exports face a number of barriers that impede trade but that are not necessarily inconsistent with existing international trade rules. Notably, several countries maintain high tariff barriers. Under current law, I have no tariff-cutting authority to negotiate reductions in foreign tariffs, a problem that also confronts other U.S. exports. As I said in my speech of September 23 on international trade, this is an area where I look forward to working with the Congress to put into place legislation that will help us promote U.S. exports.

I have today approved S. 1264, the ``Arts, Humanities, and Museums Amendments of 1985.'' The main purpose of this legislation is to extend for 5 years the authorizations for the National Endowment for the Arts and the Humanities, which was proposed by the administration in legislation submitted to the Congress last April. S. 1264 also extends the authorizations for the Institute of Museum Services and contains another amendment to the Museum Services Act about which I wish to comment. Section 201 of the bill contains a clause stating that the National Museum Services Board ``may not include, at any time, more than three members from a single State.'' I have been advised by the Attorney General that this provision applies only to future appointments and that it does not require me, and could not constitutionally require me, to remove any of the present members of the Board in order to comply immediately with that clause.

This week the Congress adjourned for the holidays, and today I'd like you to join me in considering the main legislative achievements of 1985. There were many, including the passage of a vital farm bill, but I'd like to draw your attention to three of truly historic importance.

None is of greater significance than the passage 4 days ago in the House of a tax reform bill, a bill which calls for the most sweeping overhaul of the income tax system in more than 40 years. The House bill is broadly based upon the proposal first put forward by our administration. It includes sharp cuts in both personal and corporate income tax rates, a large increase in the standard deduction, and an enlargement of the personal exemption. To help the needy, the bill would remove some 6 million low-income workers from the income tax rolls altogether. It's clear that in working on this bill, the House took to heart what I said in my speeches and you said in your thousands of letters and telegrams: It's time to promote economic growth and give the family a break. Historic as it is, the House bill, unfortunately, contains serious flaws; these the Senate must deal with when the Congress returns to Washington early in 1986. I know you join me in looking to the Senate to perform its work quickly and to make absolutely certain that the final bill is unequivocally profamily, projobs, and profuture.

The passage of the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings amendment, a measure to bring Federal spending under control once and for all, represented a second historic achievement. This legislation mandates steady decreases in the Federal budget deficit every year for 5 years, with the result that in 1991 the Federal Government will have a balanced budget at last. All my political life I've urged the Government to stop spending more than it takes in. So, it was with great pleasure that I signed this measure into law just 9 days ago. It's my hope that history will record that day as the moment when the relentless expansion of the Government was finally brought to a halt. But although Gramm-Rudman-Hollings tells us that we must cut the deficit, it does not altogether tell us how to do so. And that means we still have our work cut out for us.

Will we fund wasteful, pork barrel programs at the expense of our national defense? Will we kill off our prosperity with a tax increase? No matter how intense the political pressures become, the answer to both of these questions must and will remain an unmistakable no. Defense spending must depend not upon this or that guideline, but one consideration alone: the size of the threat with which our adversaries confront us. To sacrifice our defenses in order to balance the budget would be to abdicate the paramount duty of the Government to the people.

As for a tax hike, the lesson is clear: When government raises taxes, incentives for achievement are undermined and economic growth is stifled. My friends, we simply cannot allow that to happen again. I want you to know that my veto pen is inked up and ready to go. I'm just waiting for the first tax hike that has the temerity to come across my desk. We intend to meet the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings requirements in the only proper way -- by seeing to it that government fulfills its few and legitimate functions more efficiently at the same time that we eliminate government waste.

The final legislative achievement I want to mention concerns foreign affairs. It involves the emergence in the Congress of a new mood, a new point of view. During this past year, the Congress repudiated isolationism and weakness and reasserted America's legitimate world role on behalf of human freedom. Indeed, in July, Congress voted aid to freedom fighters in Cambodia, Afghanistan, and Nicaragua and repealed a ban on aid to the freedom fighters in Angola. This effort marked the appearance of a sober-minded realism, a new willingness to see clearly and to confront the dread effects of Communist expansion upon innocent peoples like those of Afghanistan and Nicaragua. And it's especially significant that aid to freedom fighters was also approved by the Democrat-controlled House. I'm convinced that a new, bipartisan foreign policy consensus is emerging, one based upon realism and which unites Democrats and Republicans alike in support of a strong national defense and help for freedom fighters around the globe.

As so many of us prepare to celebrate Christmas, we can take comfort in the knowledge that, although we must continue our efforts to improve it, the legislative process established by the Founding Fathers is still working. Yes, as 1985 draws to a close, we Americans can take stock of our nation with pride: inflation is down, jobs are up, our country is at peace, and the American spirit is proud and bright.

Secretary [of Agriculture] Block and all the Members, those with us today and those who worked so hard on this but couldn't be here. Thank you all for the Herculean effort you've put forth on behalf of America's farmers.

The plight of so many of our farmers has been a major concern of this administration and of responsible Members of Congress on both sides of the aisle. The level of concern, however, was much higher than the level of agreement on how best to deal with the problem. It's taken extraordinary hard work and cooperation, not to mention the tenacity of a mule, to maneuver these bills through Congress. The two pieces of legislation being signed into law today represent divergent approaches, but on balance, they're a step forward for American agriculture. They underscore the commitment of the legislative and executive branches to make things better for America's farmers, yet we must recognize, even while signing these bills, that there are no quick fixes.

It gives the Secretary of Agriculture the flexibility needed to maintain farm price supports at levels consistent with market realities. Unrealistic price supports put many farmers out of the running.

Under this bill, farmers will be eased into a market-oriented policy with generous income supports to ensure the viability of the transition. I believe more progress could have been made in keeping down costs, but I recognize that many Members of Congress have made a good-faith effort in this regard. With the signing of this legislation, we are moving away from the failed policies of the past. Our farmers must share in the growth and prosperity that is spreading throughout America.

This bill includes laudatory conservation measures, provisions for the training of food stamp recipients, and other positive features. On the negative side, it maintains costly and counterproductive government intervention in the dairy industry; encourages surplus production; and mandates export subsidies, which could well backfire on us. It will hurt sugar-producing nations that are our friends and allies. And, ironically, it could actually provide taxpayer subsidies to our adversaries. I intend to work with Congress to rectify these problems, especially in the area of trade.

The second bill being signed today is the Farm Credit Amendments Act of 1985. This law enables the farm credit system to pool its considerable resources in a self-help effort. It establishes a stronger and more complete regulatory oversight system, and it authorizes a backstop system of Federal assistance, although we believe that it will never be necessary. This reform will ensure a steady supply of credit to America's farmers and assure the investors of the safety and soundness of the system. What we do today recognizes that the health of American agriculture is essential to the well-being of the American economy. If things are not going well down on the farm, things cannot continue to go well in our cities and towns.

Before I tell you about these bills, I want to mention one thing that's personal. I don't mind saying that, because of your letters and what I've been told and seen myself, few things have made a greater impression on me the past few years than the problems of the farmer. My guiding thought throughout our efforts to put together a truly helpful farm bill has been: We're nothing without the farmers. They're the backbone of this country. And everything we do to help them helps our country and its future. So, with all that in mind, I signed the bills this morning, and now I want to tell you about them.

The 1985 farm bill is, in my opinion and the opinion of a bipartisan majority in the Congress, a clear and obvious improvement over existing farm programs. Perhaps the most helpful thing it does is establish predictable long-term policies so that our farmers will be able to make realistic plans for investment and production. The farm bill gives the Secretary of Agriculture the flexibility he needs to maintain farm price supports at levels that reflect the realities of the market. This will help put our farmers back in a more competitive position in world markets. With this bill, we hope to ease American agriculture away from the heavy hand of government and toward a more market-oriented system. We're trying to free farmers from the influence and directives of government and encourage them to produce for the public market basket and not for government storage bins. The bill also contains income supports that will ease the problems that occur during the transition to a market economy.

The farm bill is comprehensive. It includes some very good conservation measures and provisions to train food stamp recipients. But there are problems with the bill, too. It continues the truly unhelpful Federal involvement in the dairy industry. It also expands government intervention in the area of export subsidies. In fact, the bill mandates subsidized export sales, meaning citizens of other countries could pay less for American grain than American consumers. Now, these provisions are totally counterproductive, and we'll be working with the Congress to make appropriate changes next year.

The second bill I signed today is the Farm Credit Act Amendments of 1985. This will enable the farm credit system to pool its resources and reorganize with an eye to improving their ability to supply reasonable credit. It will make for a stronger farm credit system with a stronger oversight setup. It also provides a backstop system of Federal assistance should that ever become necessary.

I want to note here that the farm bill of 1985 is not exactly what we wanted, but in government you can't let the perfect be the enemy of the good. You can't let your desire for a superior product lead you to kill a bill that's really pretty good. We worked closely with Congress on both these bills. And, as I said, a majority of Republicans and Democrats in both Houses came together to declare these bills the very best they could do. And we've accepted their honest efforts.

I believe that the 1985 farm bill will bring about a long-awaited rebirth and renewed opportunities for American agriculture. It is clear that Congress has heeded the message that our farm policies need fundamental reforms. This bill begins that reform. I believe that these two bills will help lead to a healthy, sustained recovery for those who are engaged in the proud and peerless way of life called American farming. This is the season for new beginnings. And I truly believe today marks a new beginning, a new season of hope for all of American agriculture.

Mr. Johnson. Thank you, Mr. President. We do have some farm broadcasters and farm editors and writers out on a telephone hookup with us, and so, let's go to those questioners. Our first stop will be in Chicago -- Orian Samuelson with WGN. Orian.

Q. Thank you very much, Jim. And, Mr. President, thank you for this opportunity. My question deals with cost, Mr. President, because your administration has been concerned about cutting the budget and budget deficits. How do you reconcile that concern with spending $52 billion -- $2 billion over your limit -- on a government farm price support program?

The President. Well, because this is what is necessary if we're to do the job. And I would have to tell you that we have -- in this administration, in these last few years -- while we have been trying to reduce government spending elsewhere, we have spent more with regard to the farm problems than has ever been spent by any American Government heretofore. This particular bill, the $52 billion, is over a 3-year period. And it's true, we had set the figure at -- as we said -- $50 billion.

But we believe that we can live with an increase of this particular amount. But, also, it is necessary if we are to solve the farm problem in the right way. And that is, as I said in my remarks, to get farming more market-oriented and less of a heavy hand of government. But since it's government that's been responsible for many of the farmers' problems, it's also only fair that government now not just abandon but make an effort to help the farmers through this transition.

Q. Thank you. Mr. President, during the congressional debate on the farm credit bill, there were many questions about whether they were talking about enough money or whether they could move it quickly enough to where it's needed. What confidence do we have that the farm credit act really will solve the financial problems being faced by farmers?

The President. Well, we believe that these bills do contain what is necessary to help them. For example, the farm credit bill. The program that we're helping supplies a third of the total credit to farmers in the United States. And we have made that program more practical now and brought it together where the resources can be directed to the points of greatest need. And I think that, based on our previous experience with things that didn't work too well, I think that we now have a farm program that has eliminated many of the faults of the past and that will bring farming, as we say, back out into the market economy. But recognize also that, with regard to our fights against deficit spending and all, that nothing could be more helpful to that than to take a great industry like agriculture and make it more independent and more capable of realistic earnings and growth.

Q. Mr. President, earlier this year, Secretary Block came to Indiana to unveil plans for the conservation reserve. Now that this program is part of the farm bill, what will it mean to American agriculture?

Q. Mr. President, the big question bouncing around my area at the present time is: Will this farm legislation benefit the small family farmer, or will it simply further subsidize the large-scale farming operations?

Q. Thank you, Jim, and thank you, Mr. President, for this opportunity. Mr. President, is the farm credit act that you signed this morning just an institutional bailout for the farm credit banks or will this bill really help farmers?

The President. Well, this bill will help farmers in the sense that here is a combined source for about one-third of all of the farm credit in America. And it has been managed in such a way that it was scattered and there would be some parts of it with plenty of funds but in an area where there was no demand for them; while in other areas, the way it was locally managed, there wasn't enough for the problems at hand. This has now been brought together under a single administration. And it is now set up so that the money can be directed from all of the resources to wherever it might be needed most. And we think that this, as I say, since it provides a third of the credit that farming needs, it is going to now be able to be much more practical and much more effective.

Mr. Johnson. I'd like to point out that the fact is that we've gone through five questioners and time is about out. President Reagan does need to leave very soon. Before we do break away, though, I would turn to Secretary Block and see if you have any comments to make at this time with President Reagan right here.

Secretary Block. Well, my only comments would be that we're just delighted that the President would come over here. And Mr. President, as you talked about those snapshots of that soil erosion -- I remember well that Cabinet meeting when they came across the table to me. And I do believe that we have done something about soil erosion in this legislation that I'm proud of and I know you are, too. Not only the conservation reserve, which will take this erosive land out of production and set it aside for future generations, but also in this conservation package there's included a provision that effectively says that we believe in conservation so much in this country that if we provide farm program benefits to farmers in future years out there, those farmers are going to be obligated to protect the land. They're not going to be allowed to abuse the land as long as the Government is providing that kind of helping hand. I don't think that's too much to expect, and I think it's also part of this process of trying to save this land for future generations.

I have today signed H.R. 2100, the Food Security Act of 1985, into law. This legislation reauthorizes virtually all of our farm programs, from the major commodity price support programs to research, credit, food stamp, and export promotion. It represents the culmination of a year-long effort to establish a sound policy to guide U.S. agriculture for the rest of this decade.

Farmers and ranchers, hard-working men and women who till the fields and tend the herds, have always been an important part of our heritage and of our economy. Today, however, our farmers and ranchers and the thousands of small towns and communities in which they live are currently suffering through difficult times. These difficulties have been caused in part by the very same government programs that were designed to help American agriculture. Earlier this year, my administration proposed a market-oriented farm bill designed to correct past farm policies that have often worked at cross purposes. We have encouraged farmers to produce more commodities by artificially propping up prices while, at the same time, forcing farmers to set aside more and more land to reduce production so prices would not drop. As a result of years of such counterproductive farm policies, the American farmer has become less competitive in the international marketplace, the cost of our farm programs has risen to unsustainable levels, and farm income has stagnated. Clearly, our past policies have failed.

Planting decisions are partially uncoupled from government program income benefits by making those benefits available if only 50 percent of a farmer's acreage is planted into a price-supported commodity. Planting decisions on the remaining 50 percent of the land will be based on market signals, not government benefits.

American agriculture is the most efficient in the world. This legislation will help our farmers use that efficiency to regain export markets without sacrificing the income they need to operate effectively in our domestic economy.

Unfortunately, however, the bill did not make all of the reforms we requested. By failing to totally uncouple farm income support from planting decisions, and by keeping support prices artificially high, we will encourage more and more farmers to become dependent upon our farm programs.

A mandatory 3-year payment-in-kind export promotion program which will give away $2 billion worth of commodities to encourage U.S. exports. A program of this size and nature threatens to precipitate an agricultural commodity trade war with our allies. Moreover, it may well be impossible to fulfill the $2 billion goal over the next 3 years without subsidizing exports in a manner which will be contrary to the national security interests of the United States.

A mandatory reduction in the size of the sugar quota that threatens to severely disrupt the economies of the Caribbean Basin countries and the Philippines. This provision is inconsistent with the foreign policy objectives of our country and may also be violative of our obligations under international trade agreements. I find it difficult to ask other countries to bear the cost of our sugar program while encouraging them to maintain a stable course toward development with democracy.

The inclusion of a dairy assessment tax, which will tax all milk producers to fund a program that will force the Government to pay farmers to liquidate their dairy herds. The Government is also required to buy meat above our needs in order to keep prices up while dairy herds are being liquidated.

These programs represent the worst in the way of policy. My administration will seek modifications of these programs next year. Although I have serious reservations about these and other provisions of the conference agreement, I have signed this bill into law because it represents a step in the right direction toward a sound agricultural policy. It promises to make American farm products more competitive in the international marketplace, and it begins to break the link between high government price supports and production decisions. Most importantly, the bill will ensure adequate supplies of reasonably priced food for American consumers and the beginning of renewed hope for America's farmers and our rural communities. They have suffered far too long because of the mistakes of the past. Because I believe this bill represents a promise of a better future, I have signed it into law.

America's current trade problems have caused some to wonder whether this country may not be in danger of losing its reputation as a supplier of high quality products at competitive prices. As America's strong economic growth has led to increased demand for goods and services, imports have become more attractive because of the relative strength of the dollar. U.S. exports have become less attractive to foreign buyers for the same reason. Recently, however, increased growth in the economies of our trading partners and movement of the dollar toward a more sustainable equilibrium give us reason to expect that our trade deficit should ease in the near future. Tough foreign competition, in the last few years, has presented our manufacturers and our work force with a stiff challenge.

But America's producers are responding to that challenge, and it is time for consumers both here and abroad to take a fresh look at what America has to offer. Those who do will find the traditional variety, high quality, and dependability that ``Made in the U.S.A.'' has come to symbolize. They also will find this quality at more competitive prices.

Made in America Month also provides an opportunity for American firms and workers to resolve to take greater advantage of new competitive opportunities both here at home and in overseas markets. We Americans do not shrink from competition; we believe in competition -- fair competition. Historically, competition constantly creates pressure for innovation, product improvement, and customer satisfaction. The open marketplace makes the consumer the king, and we are all consumers.

In response to Congressional requests as set forth in Public Law 99 - 145, I am forwarding herewith classified and unclassified versions of the Administration's report to the Congress on Soviet Noncompliance with Arms Control Agreements.

Representatives, and George Bush, President of the Senate. The original was not available for verification of the content. The text of the President's unclassified report was included in the White House press release.

Preparing the budget is never an easy task, for it requires the balancing of competing priorities and the sacrificing of some goals in order that our overall agenda can go forward. This year's budget was no exception, especially in view of my decision to meet lower deficit targets without increasing taxes or cutting into defense preparedness.

American people, and their elected representatives, to accept the comprehensive program I will be submitting on February 3. As we move forward in that effort, I know I can count on you to be an able and forceful advocate. Only by working together can we achieve those goals that brought us here in the first place.

December 27, 1979, when a massive Soviet force crossed the Afghan frontier to support a faltering Marxist regime, the Afghan resistance has grown increasingly effective. The Soviet-supported regime in Kabul has failed to gain even a modicum of popular support or international acceptance. The Soviets and their Afghan surrogates have resorted to barbaric methods of waging war in their effort to crush this war of national liberation. Indiscriminate air and artillery bombardments against civilian areas, savage reprisals against noncombatants suspected of supporting the resistance, and the calculated destruction of crops and irrigation systems have ravaged the Afghan countryside. Thousands of young Afghans are being shipped to the Soviet Union for reeducation in summer camps, universities, and specialized institutions.

The Afghan people, however, are unswerving in their determination to resist the invader. The resistance fighters are more numerous, better armed, and more effective than ever before. Unable to trust Kabul's forces to counter the enhanced resistance, the Soviets have begun using their own troops in a more active combat role. But the effort has availed them little. Last summer, when fighting was at its peak, resistance forces repeatedly attacked Soviet lines of communication, convoys, barracks and facilities, and mounted their largest, longest, and best coordinated offensive operation of the war. The resistance has also drawn together into a political alliance, which can present Afghanistan's cause to the world in unambiguous terms and coordinate all aspects of the liberation struggle.

Since 1980 the United States has strongly advocated a negotiated political settlement, the only reasonable alternative to the bleak prospect of an open-ended military struggle. Seven United Nations resolutions passed by growing and overwhelming margins since that year show that the United States is not alone in this view. These resolutions call for the withdrawal of foreign troops, the restoration of Afghanistan's independent and nonaligned status, self-determination, and the voluntary and safe return of the refugees. The United States reiterated its support for the U.N.-sponsored talks during the November summit meetings in Geneva. We also indicated that the continued Soviet occupation of Afghanistan remains an obstacle to overall improvement in our relationship. Although we welcome any suggestion that the Soviets are prepared to back U.N.-led peace efforts, we will await positive developments on the ground and concrete evidence of Soviet willingness to agree to a timetable for withdrawal of their troops.

The victims of this war also command American attention. The United States has played, and will continue to play, a major role in the humanitarian efforts to alleviate the suffering of the 2 to 3 million Afghan refugees now living in Pakistan. Since 1980 we have spent over $430 million in aid. In the face of deteriorating conditions inside Afghanistan caused largely by the increasingly widespread Soviet reprisals against civilians suspected of opposing the regime, we have allocated, in the current 2-year timeframe, almost $25 million in assistance to the brave people who remain inside Afghanistan.

When the Soviet Union invaded Afghanistan 6 long and bloody years ago, few in the West knew much about that distant land and its proud people. That certainly has changed, as the Afghan people, in their determination to defend their liberty, have added new chapters to the long annal of human courage in the face of tyranny. Forged in a similar crucible two centuries ago, the United States stands squarely on the side of the people of Afghanistan and will continue its support of their historic struggle in the cause of liberty.

Today I'd like to talk to you about a matter of vital importance to our country and the world: the struggle for a free Afghanistan. It's been 6 years since the Soviet Union invaded that nation, 6 years of utter hell for the Afghan people who still fight on in the name of the ideals upon which our own nation was founded: freedom and independence. To demoralize and defeat the Afghans, the Soviets have unleashed the full force of their modern weaponry. Poison gas has been razed down from the air upon Afghan settlements. Massive attack helicopters have been used against mere villages. Hundreds of thousands of innocent civilians have been injured or killed, and countless tiny mines have been strewn across the countryside to maim and blind Afghan children.

Today Soviet troops inside Afghanistan number nearly 120,000. And in the face of this brutal onslaught, the Afghan people still refuse to surrender -- is surely a miracle. And in this holiday season of renewed faith in miracles, it is surely fitting for us to honor and pray for those brave men and women. These courageous people have shown the world that the Soviets can never achieve the outright subjugation of the Afghan mind and spirit that they seek. The Afghan people are too proud, too fiercely determined to fight on. The Soviets understand this. They know that, in a sense, the battle for Afghanistan has shifted from the mountains of Afghanistan itself to the wider field of world opinion. So it is that the Soviets are prolonging the war and blacking out news about the daily atrocities which they're committing. They're waiting for world attention to slip, for our outrage to wane. Then, they believe the support which the free world has been providing to the freedom fighters will dwindle. The Soviets at that point will have effectively cut off the freedom fighters' lifelines, and although the mujahidin may never surrender, the Soviets will have achieved indisputable control of the country. An entire nation will have been strangled.

My friends, in the name of human freedom, we cannot, we must not, allow that to happen. From the first, the United States has insisted on a settlement of the Afghan conflict that ensures the complete withdrawal of all Soviet troops. We're doing all that we can to see that a settlement comes about. Indeed, in my discussions with Mr. Gorbachev in Geneva, I made it clear that the presence of Soviet forces in Afghanistan represent an obstacle to the improvement of American-Soviet relations. As long as the Soviets insist upon a policy of aggression, they must face the fact that free men will oppose them. The Soviet Union has always presented itself as a champion of anticolonialism and national liberation; history presents a different picture.

But if, at any time, the Soviets choose to withdraw from Afghanistan, we will place no barriers in their way. The sixth round of United Nations negotiations aimed at achieving a political settlement in Afghanistan has just come to an end with no significant change. If the Soviets want progress, they must simply put forward a timetable for the withdrawal of their forces from Afghanistan and for the restoration of the rights of the Afghan people. As I said, the United States will do everything in its power to make this the course which the Soviets choose. Indeed, we're prepared to serve as a guarantor of a comprehensive Afghan settlement so long as it includes the complete withdrawal of foreign forces within a fixed timetable; ensures genuine independence, not de facto Soviet control over the Afghan people and their government; and allows the millions of Afghan refugees to return to their homeland in safety. Only then can the process of national reconciliation and rebuilding Afghanistan begin and the killing of Russians and Afghans alike come to an end.

My friends, I want to ask for your help to make sure that those who struggle in Afghanistan receive effective support from us. Indeed, such support is a compelling, moral responsibility of all free people. What takes place in that far-off land is of vital importance to our country and the world. Certainly the struggle in Afghanistan is of great strategic military importance. Yet the most important battle involves not guns, but the human spirit -- the longing to be free and the duty to help the oppressed. If the free world were to turn its back on Afghanistan, then, in a sense, the free world would become less free and less humane. But when we support the Afghan people, we become caught up in and ennobled by their struggle for freedom. Isn't that what America is always -- what it has always stood for and what we should stand for in 1986 and beyond?

Schedule 7 attached thereto with the corresponding new Schedule 7 attached hereto. The rates of pay so established are effective on the first day of the first applicable pay period beginning on or after January 1, 1985.

Order, as set forth at Schedules 1 through 7 attached hereto, are effective on the first day of the first applicable pay period beginning on or after January 1, 1985. The adjustments in rates of monthly basic pay and allowances for subsistence and quarters for members of the uniformed services under section 4 of this Order, as set forth at Schedule 8 attached hereto, are effective on October 1, 1985.''.

Americans and Japanese alike have much to be thankful for on this first day of the New Year, not least our shared friendship and respect. In both countries, this is an opportunity to be with our families, to look back upon the accomplishments of the past year and ahead to the challenges of the coming year. We are grateful for the bounty that we enjoy and are committed to sharing it with those less fortunate. Most importantly, our families can celebrate this holiday in safety, knowing that we are at peace.

In 1985, we moved a bit closer to the ideal of a lasting, global peace. People around the world began to recognize the value of moving toward a day when we can rely for our security on defensive instead of offensive weapons. And the United States, with the help and advice of our allies, made a serious effort at beginning a dialog with the Soviet Union on issues of concern to all countries, such as arms control and human rights, as well as issues of more regional concern, such as the occupations of Afghanistan and Cambodia, that must be settled in order to achieve global peace and stability. The United States entered into that dialog confident in the support it had at home and abroad. Continued support from our friends and allies in the months ahead will be vital in order to achieve the objective of building a more stable and constructive relationship with the Soviet Union. There is much work to be done, but I promise that the effort will be made.

The strength of the ties between our two countries helped us to put in motion long-needed changes in our trade relations. While these changes will require time to take effect, our shared commitment to preserve the world's free trade system was an essential bulwark against the protectionism that would deprive us of the prosperity for which we and those before us have labored. The cooperative spirit of the relationship gives me great confidence that we will reach our mutual goals. The growing international role of Japan is one of the most welcome trends of the eighties and holds much promise for the last half of the decade. The United States deeply values our consultation and cooperation in dealing with global issues and welcomes a partnership with Japan that threatens no one and holds promise for so many. I look forward to returning to Tokyo for the economic summit in May.

The President. Well, Senator Tower, Secretary Muskie, General Scowcroft, I'm grateful to all of you for agreeing to serve on this Board. I know it'll take a lot of your time, but your experience and expertise in this inquiry are extremely important in evaluating the National Security Council's staff operations and providing recommendations on how it should operate.

The purpose of your undertaking is to review past implementation of administration policies and to conduct a comprehensive study of the future role and procedures of the National Security Council's staff in foreign and national security policy. I would like you to focus on that staff and, one, develop policy; two, coordinate with other agencies; and, three, implement the President's policies; and, four, oversee the implementation of these policies by others. I hope that you would take particular care to look into the question of whether and under what circumstances the National Security Council staff was and should be directly involved in the operational aspects of sensitive diplomatic, military, or intelligence missions, such as the Achille Lauro, the TWA hijacking, and Grenada and Iran.

In addition, I have directed the National Security Council staff not to participate in the actual operations associated with such activities pending the outcome of the report by the Special Review Board. You'll have the full cooperation of all agencies of the executive branch and the White House staff in carrying out your assignment. And I want to assure you and the American people that I want all the facts to come out about learning of a possible transfer of funds from the sale of arms to Iran to those fighting the Sandinista government. We acted to learn the facts, and we'll continue to share the actions we take and the information we obtain with the American people and the Congress.

Reporter. Mr. President, when the Attorney General said you were not fully informed and you said you were not fully informed, did that mean that you never knew anything about contra funding with Iran sales money?

The Board shall conduct a comprehensive study of the future role and procedures of the National Security Council (NSC) staff in the development, coordination, oversight, and conduct of foreign and national security policy; review the NSC staff's proper role in operational activities, especially extremely sensitive diplomatic, military, and intelligence missions; and provide recommendations to the President based upon its analysis of the manner in which foreign and national security policies established by the President have been implemented by the NSC staff.

To the extent permitted by law and subject to the availability of appropriations, the Office of Administration, Executive Office of the President, shall provide the Board with such administrative services, funds, facilities, staff, and other support services as may be necessary for the performance of its functions.

Today, in Geneva, senior U.S. and Soviet negotiators in the nuclear and space talks began a special series of informal meetings designed to move the negotiations forward before the next round begins in January. The United States intends to make use of these sessions, which will continue through December 6, to try to build upon the progress made in the just completed sixth round of negotiations.

Following the Reykjavik meeting, the U.S. moved promptly to table in Geneva concrete, new reductions proposals reflecting these areas of agreement, as well as other details necessary to achieve our longstanding goal of deep, equitable, and verifiable nuclear arms reductions. We also tabled in Geneva the new U.S. proposal in the defense and space area, which had been presented to the Soviets in Reykjavik. On November 7 the Soviet Union, for its part, made new proposals in Geneva that partially reflect the achievements reached at Reykjavik.

It is our intention now to build upon this new progress in Geneva by seeking a clear understanding with the Soviet Union concerning where we now have common ground on NST negotiating issues and where we continue to differ, as well as by ascertaining how the two sides might be able to broaden these areas of common ground. The President hopes that the Soviets now share our commitment to achieving real arms reductions, while ensuring a stable military balance. If they do, these informal discussions will be able to set the stage for concrete, new results when the seventh NST round begins in Geneva on January 15.

Aplastic anemia is a potentially fatal disease that results from the bone marrow ceasing to produce formal elements of the blood -- the red blood cells, the white blood cells, and the platelets. The disease is responsible for the deaths of 2,000 Americans each year. One-half of the cases of aplastic anemia result from unknown causes. The other half are the result of certain drugs such as anti-inflammatory drugs or anticonvulsant drugs, or chemicals such as benzene or arsenic, or radiation. Aplastic anemia also is a complication of certain anticancer drugs.

Until recently, the onset of aplastic anemia led inexorably to death. Now, however, more and more patients survive the disease. New drug treatments and bone marrow transplantation in certain cases have led to this improving picture.

The hope for the future is research. The Federal government supports a national program of research into the causes, prevention, and treatment of aplastic anemia under the auspices of the National Heart, Lung, and Blood Institute. The scientists in that Institute and in other research laboratories across the country are working to bring to light the hidden secrets of this disease.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this second day of December, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

Epidermolysis bullosa is a group of hereditary, blistering disorders that involves the skin and mucous membranes, especially mucous membranes of the mouth, eye, and gastrointestinal tract. Symptoms of the disease can resemble severe burns and can be very painful and debilitating. The disease can lead to scarring, malnutrition, anemia, and even premature death.

As many as 50,000 Americans, most of them children, are affected by epidermolysis bullosa. The disease not only disables people physically and emotionally, it also places a severe financial burden on their families.

Basic research is just beginning to reveal the underlying causes of epidermolysis bullosa. Recent developments in biology, biochemistry, pathology, immunology, and genetics are all being employed to study the disease. The main objectives are to understand the basic mechanisms that lead to this distressing disorder and to develop therapies directed at correcting these effects.

Federal government and private volunteer organizations have developed a strong and enduring partnership committed to research on epidermolysis bullosa. I am confident that this concerted effort will ultimately uncover the cause and cure for this devastating disease.

In the annals of American history, only a few events are so well-known and so deeply rooted in national remembrance that the mere mention of their date suffices to describe them. Of these occurrences, none could have had more significance for our Nation than December 7, 1941.

On that Sunday morning, 45 years ago, the Imperial Japanese Navy launched an unprovoked, surprise attack upon units of the Armed Forces of the United States stationed at Pearl Harbor, Hawaii. This attack claimed the lives of 2,403 Americans, wounded 1,178 more, and damaged our naval capabilities in the Pacific. Such destruction seared the memory of a generation and galvanized the will of the American people in a fight to maintain our right to freedom without fear.

Every honor is appropriate for the courageous Americans who made the supreme sacrifice for our Nation at Pearl Harbor and in the many battles that followed in World War II. Their sacrifice was for a cause, not for conquest; for a world that would be safe for future generations. Their devotion must never be forgotten.

We have not forgotten, nor will we. We live in a world made more free, more just, and more peaceful by those who will answer roll call no more, those who will report for muster never again. We do remember Pearl Harbor.

American should have the opportunity to pursue an education beyond the high school level. Colleges and universities enhance the mental and moral development of their graduates. The future of our country depends on equal access to education for all students, including members of minority groups and the economically disadvantaged. All educators should be aware of and support efforts that recognize and offer educational opportunities to underprivileged students.

City University of New York has implemented two programs -- College Discovery for community college students and SEEK (Search for Elevation, Education, and Knowledge) for senior college students -- that provide specialized counseling, remedial instruction, and tutorial services enabling nearly 14,000 disadvantaged students a year to receive the benefits of a college education.

For these reasons and more, the ability and opportunity to read are of fundamental importance to everyone. The National Commission on Reading, the Librarian of Congress, and others have recently reported that an alarmingly large number of Americans are not able or motivated to read. The Center for the Book in the Library of Congress also has noted the importance of focusing national attention on the importance of reading and strengthening national and local efforts to give all Americans the beauty, the promise, and the gift of reading.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this third day of December, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

Thank you everyone, and let me say a special hello to an old friend and trusted adviser, the cochairman of the Republican National Committee, Betty Heitman. Betty will be retiring from the RNC, and I just want to thank her for a job well done, especially for her efforts on behalf of women. And to all of you here today, welcome to the White House complex. I always feel a little funny saying that about the White House over there and this great big granite monster over here and calling it part of the White House. It ought to be the other way around.

It's a pleasure to see all of you, the representatives of America's more than 3 million women entrepreneurs. We're meeting at a time of unparalleled optimism in our country -- optimism about the future, optimism about the direction in which our nation is going, and optimism among all Americans about our own lives. I'm going to talk in a few minutes about our agenda for the next few years, but let me say here that if I have one message for you today, it's this: that America has a great future ahead. We have a future of more opportunity, more growth. We have a future of a stronger America and a freer world. And that's what we're building toward, and this is what we can achieve. The last 6 years have been only the beginning. We're just starting to climb to the mountaintop, where we can look out over the promise of our future.

Now, it'd be easy to stand up here and take credit for starting America on that path -- for the low inflation and the low interest rates and the creation of more new jobs in the last 4 years than Europe and Japan combined -- but as I've said many times since our recovery began, the credit belongs not just to an administration, it belongs to the American people. We trusted the American people, and they did the rest. I always have said mainly my philosophy about government has been, for many years, just get out of the way of the people, and they'll do the rest. I can't think of any group of Americans that deserves more credit than the group I see in this room -- America's entrepreneurs, and in this case, entrepreneurs who happen to be women.

But thanks to you, we've come far since the days of skyrocketing inflation and economic stagnation, when the once-powerful American economy was the weakling of the industrial world. Yes, we're strong again, but our work isn't done -- far from it. We have an agenda for the next 2 years, an agenda for setting America on the path to even greater growth and greater opportunity for a generation yet to come. Getting Federal spending under control is part of that agenda, and that means giving the President what 43 Governors in our nation have: a line-item veto. It means a balanced budget amendment to the Constitution. And it means that pulling a tax increase out of the hat is not going to be this year's version of the big spender's escape trick. There's no way on God's good Earth that I will agree to an unraveling of what we've done with tax reform. Tax rates have come down, and they're going to stay down.

But that's not all. We've taken giant steps toward making jobs grow faster by making exports grow faster. The dollar is down. We've been tough with unfair trading practices around the world. And we're moving to a new round of trade talks. But we've got to do more, and it must be a bipartisan effort. For 40 years, America has been the leader in building the open world economy on which our peace and prosperity are built.

That's why today more than 10 million American jobs are tied to imports, exports, or both. And foreign trade involves one-fifth of our economy. That's compared to 12 percent when the Smoot-Hawley tariff shut down our international trade and sent us into the Great Depression. None of you here are old enough to remember that. [Laughter] Well, I don't believe that either Democrats or Republicans want to return to those Depression days. It's time not for new protectionism but for new cooperation for growing American exports in a growing world economy.

Around the world, our agenda is one of peace and freedom. We cannot let recent events distract us from the cause of those brave fighters for freedom around the world. [Applause] Bless you. Yes, you just did make my day. [Laughter] Nothing that's happened makes those causes any less just or vital to our country and all it stands for. And as we work for freedom, we must also work for peace.

Some have been kind enough to say that Mr. Gorbachev and I made more progress towards eliminating nuclear ballistic missiles in 2 days in Iceland than our negotiators made in 2 years in Geneva. Well, that's progress we intend to build on. And, yes, we do dream of the day when we can have a world free from nuclear terror, and nothing is more important in building toward that world than our strategic defense against ballistic missiles. Some have said we ought to scrap it. Well, I say strategic defense is our insurance policy for peace. We're going to continue research and development on our Strategic Defense Initiative.

But let's, if I could, turn for a moment to the revelations of the past week and to my announcement yesterday. As I said yesterday, much in this case is hard to understand, and all Americans are entitled to have their questions answered -- you know I'm talking about Iran. That's why I am determined to get to the bottom of this matter and to get all the facts out.

Let me review for you what we've done. First, we went immediately before the public when we uncovered the kind of activity in question, and this included the Attorney General's preliminary report. Now, with my full support and encouragement, the Attorney General is asking the court to appoint an independent counsel -- we used to call them prosecutors -- so that any possible wrongdoing will be revealed and prosecuted. Also unprecedented has been our cooperation with Congress. We've cooperated fully with congressional inquiries, and we'll continue to cooperate. And I've endorsed the idea of consolidating congressional investigations, so that Congress can pursue its work even more effectively. I've also appointed a Special Review Board to investigate the activities of the National Security Council staff. The men on this Board are distinguished Americans of absolute integrity and have had experience in every area of the making of our foreign policy. I intend to make their recommendations and conclusions available to Congress and the public.

Finally, as I announced yesterday, I've asked Frank Carlucci to become the new Assistant to the President for National Security Affairs. Mr. Carlucci is a former Deputy Secretary of Defense, a former Deputy Director of the CIA, and a former Ambassador; and he is among our most distinguished and experienced public servants. So, in short, the machinery is in place to seek answers to the questions that are being asked, to fix what needs fixing, and to restore complete confidence to the conduct of our foreign policy. All of this we intend to do, and that is my pledge to you and to the American people.

I know that some people dismiss all this and say that women have tended to stay in areas in which they traditionally had a role. Well, those who say that ought to take another look. Women-owned businesses are springing up fastest in fields where women are relative newcomers, fields like manufacturing, high tech, and finance. Many of you are examples of that. Fourteen years ago, Joyce Eddy was an antique dealer in Georgia, and today she's no longer selling antiques. No, her company, Habersham Plantation, manufactures reproductions of early American furniture and sells through more than 200 dealers throughout the country. Marjorie Balaz started only 10 years ago. With a $7,000 investment she set up Balaz's Analytical Laboratory in Mountain View, California. Her company has won an international clientele for its research in chemical processing of integrated circuits and has set industry standards for ultrapure water. The Balaz's laboratory is a leader in the high technology field. And there are many other leaders here: Laura Sloate, whose New York investment and research firm has grown to manage more than $150 million. In the traditionally male-dominated world of finance, nothing can stop Laura Sloate -- not that she's a woman, and not that she's blind.

Yes, all of you are leaders. All of you are helping America to grow and remain the land of opportunity for all. You know, I spent a large part of my life in a profession where there was no question about the equal status of women and men, and that's the way I believe it should be in all lines of work. You're helping to make that happen. You're also -- by building your companies -- helping to keep the doors of opportunity open wide for everyone in our country and helping to lead America into the future.

Reagan. It's been a great pleasure to welcome President Arias and distinguished members of his government here today. The good will evident in our meetings underscores the enduring bond between our countries and between all peoples who cherish democracy and human freedom.

Costa Rica and the United States stand together, foursquare in our commitment to democracy in this hemisphere. The progress we've witnessed in the Americas in recent years has indeed been heartening. It wasn't that long ago when Costa Rica was Central America's only democracy. Today we look with satisfaction at the impressive development of democratic institutions in Guatemala, Honduras, and El Salvador. The despair of yesterday has been replaced, for the most part, by the promise of tomorrow.

Yet over this fragile democratic promise looms the shadow of Communist dictatorship in Nicaragua, where a totalitarian, expansionist regime violates the human rights of its people and threatens the peace and freedom of its neighbors. Hundreds of thousands of Nicaraguans have already fled the hunger, repression, and assassination in their own land, seeking safety in Costa Rica and Honduras. This challenge cannot be ignored without imperiling the peace, stability, and freedom in all of Central America.

Arias, you have earned the respect of free people everywhere with your courageous defense of the right of the Nicaraguan people to liberty. Despite threats, insults, and provocation, Mr. President, you have not shrunk from your firm stand against totalitarianism next door. As the leader of the region's oldest and strongest democracy, your words have special significance and carry moral weight. As you've said: Democratization is the key to peace in Central America.

Well, the United States agrees. Promoting and protecting democracy has the full backing of the Congress and the American people. The establishment of a Soviet beachhead on the mainland of the Americas, a base camp for terrorism and the subversion of democracy, remains unacceptable. There has been no deterioration of our commitment, no weakening of our resolve. Let there be no mistake, the free people of Central America will not be abandoned to Communist domination. Our support for freedom in your region, President Arias, remains unflinching. Costa Ricans and the other free people of Central America can have faith that they will not be abandoned in the face of this deadly threat to your security and freedom. Central America belongs to the future, and the future is democracy.

Cooperation, friendship, and respect have been hallmarks of the U.S.-Costa Rican relationship for many years. Our discussions today reaffirmed that our relations will continue on a high note. The United States, as was made clear in today's meetings, remains Costa Rica's steadfast friend and ally. President Arias, I wish you a safe journey home, and I look forward to our next meeting and to the day when democracy reigns throughout Central America. Thank you. God bless you.

Arias. Mr. President, I'm very pleased by this frank and sincere dialog. The discussion of political and economic problems, the solution of which affects both our countries, was constructive and encouraging. For many years Costa Rica has been bordered on the north by oppression and violence. My country is not a party to the problems of Central America, but the problems of Central America are part of our problems.

We wish to keep Costa Rica out of Central American armed conflicts. We do not want violence to cross our borders. We hope that our brothers and sisters in the region can enjoy our peace. We think that only democracy can guarantee reconciliation between peoples. Accordingly, we have proposed an alliance for freedom and democracy. Only if we endeavor to enable our peoples to enjoy democracy, only if we encourage the downfall of all tyrants equally, can we prevent threats to peace throughout the world from growing in the Americas.

The challenge Costa Rica faces extends beyond the Central American problem. We aspire to higher levels of development. Only the absence of extreme poverty is a guarantee of peace and a shield against violence. We wish to overcome the seed of political uncertainty and economic crisis by strengthening both our democracy and our economy. Today, more than ever, we must strive for general well-being and prevent the spread of poverty.

Today, more than ever, we must direct our sacrifices with a full sense of history. Today, more than ever, we need international solidarity and fair treatment in trade and finance, because we are the boundary between peace and war and between freedom and oppression.

The democracy in which many American nations live today cannot be consolidated without economic development and social justice. Before any political or economic conditions can be imposed on the democracies of the Americas, there must be a commitment from the Western World to strengthen democracy in all our nations.

In the Americas, peace must be democratic, pluralistic, tolerant, and free. While dogmatism and intransigence persist and there is no dialog, peace will be impossible. Working together for democracy, freedom, and development is working together for peace.

President, once again, I wish to tell you how pleased I am with the numerous areas of agreement in our talks. I leave convinced that this ongoing dialog between ourselves will help perpetuate the excellent friendship between our two countries. Thank you again very much.

Since our campaign in 1980, you have been a valued and trusted member of my senior staff. Under the most trying circumstances, you stepped into one of the Nation's most demanding jobs and have always been an articulate, honest and respected voice for our Administration. You are the longest serving Presidential spokesman since the respected Jim Hagerty and with nearly 2,000 briefings behind you, you have a well-deserved international reputation for coolness under pressure, for professionalism, and effectiveness at times of crisis and calm.

It's hard to imagine what it will be like around here without you. You will be missed and thought of often, and I am very pleased you have agreed to my request to be available from time to time. Please don't stray too far from a telephone! Nancy joins in wishing you, Laura, and your family all of life's blessings and in my hope that our paths will cross often in the years ahead.

I am today submitting my resignation as Assistant to the President and Principal Deputy Press Secretary. It has been a distinct pleasure to serve as your chief spokesman for six years. I will leave the White House February 1, 1987 when I join Merrill Lynch as Senior Vice President for Communications.

President, you have given me the opportunity to be part of a great and important undertaking. Your leadership has made America once again safe, secure and economically sound. Americans are again proud to be Americans. From ``A New Beginning,'' you have led the Nation forward into an era of hope, promise and opportunity. You have put an indelible stamp on our Nation's history.

Smith spoke with the President at Rancho del Cielo last week and informed him of his desire to return to California to attend to pending family business. The President is deeply grateful to Dr. Smith for his loyal and dedicated service and for the great personal sacrifices he and Mrs. Smith made in moving to Washington. A successor to Dr.

Dr. Turner accompanied Mrs. Reagan on many of her trips to drug treatment centers, and he played a key role in the development of the administration's policy against drug abuse. A successor to Dr. Turner will be named in the near future.

December 5, 1986, marks the eighty-fifth anniversary of the birth of Walt Disney. ``Uncle Walt,'' as he was affectionately known to his moviemaking colleagues in Hollywood, was just that to several generations of American families: a warm, generous uncle who sat us on his knee and told and retold us stories of comedy, imagination, and adventure. He was a superb animator, a technical wizard, an astute manager and businessman, but above all he was a man who never lost touch with his child's heart and sense of wonder.

But if he is both legend and folk hero today, it wasn't always clear that he was destined to achieve so much. Walter Elias Disney was born in Chicago in 1901. His family soon moved to Missouri, and he worked at a variety of jobs. He returned to Chicago in 1917 and studied photography and art, but he never graduated from high school. After serving in World War I as a Red Cross ambulance driver, he joined an advertising firm in Kansas City as an apprentice cartoonist.

The real harbingers of his future success in this period, however, were the cartoons he produced in a makeshift studio he built for himself above his father's garage. In 1923 he went to Hollywood with $40 in savings and, with his brother Roy, converted another small garage into a studio and set to work. He put together two silent movies with a new cartoon character named Mickey Mouse, but he was unable to get them released commercially. With Steamboat Willie in 1928 -- a sound film with Disney's artwork and his own voice for the diminutive hero's -- Mickey Mouse and Walt Disney had an instant hit, the first of many.

Achievements and awards followed in droves. Disney won 30 Academy Awards. He produced the first full-length animated film, Snow White and the Seven Dwarfs, in 1937; launched numerous technical innovations in sound and color; produced the first television series in color in 1961; found new and effective ways of combining live actors with cartoon characters in films like Song of the South and Mary Poppins; and everywhere, in classic movies from Fantasia to The Jungle Book, he celebrated the power of delight through music.

The standards of excellence Walt Disney upheld in animation extended to his later productions, from nature films to movie versions of ancient fables, tales of American heroes, and stories of youthful adventure. His love for technology and the future, his desire to entertain and educate, and his sense of childlike wonder led him to establish two popular amusement parks, Disneyland and Disney World, which today draw visitors from around the globe.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 5th day of December, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

President said he would consider the recommendations of Senator Dole and others for a special session of Congress and was reserving judgment at this time. The President told the leaders that it was important to expedite and consolidate the number of congressional inquiries being planned. He stressed his commitment to cooperate with the Congress in the conduct of its investigation and to get all the facts so that the issue could be put to rest. The congressional leaders discussed with the President their respective plans for how they intend to organize their investigative committees. The meeting concluded with a brief discussion on the presentation of the fiscal year 1988 budget and other matters to be considered in the initial weeks of the 100th Congress.

I'm speaking to you today from Camp David, and because the atmosphere here is a bit more informal than everyday Washington, I thought it would be a good opportunity to think and reflect with you about those crucial foreign policy matters so much in the news lately. It's also a chance to do something I've wanted to do throughout the course of these events: and that's share some personal thoughts with you, to speak to you, the American people, from the heart.

First of all, the Middle East is critically important to our nation's security. Right now it's a major trouble spot that could easily set off the sparks of a wider conflict. Much of our effort has been aimed at stopping terrorism -- putting an end to the bombing of innocent civilians and the kidnaping of hostages, especially our own citizens -- and bringing about an end to the bloody war between Iran and Iraq.

When word came to me that individuals in Iran, including some members of the Government there, had asked through an intermediary in a third country for a meeting with a representative of our government, I said yes. And even though these were responsible elements in Iran that might be able to assist us in stopping the violence and possibly helping us get back the hostages being held in Lebanon, there was a risk involved. But I believed then and believe now there was a greater risk in doing nothing, of not trying.

I gave the order to proceed. We had some notable success: There was some reduction in terrorism, and three of our hostages were released -- one at a time -- and others were about to follow. Then someone in the Government of Iran leaked information about our contacts with Iran to a newspaper in Lebanon. You know the rest.

This effort to establish a relationship with responsible moderates in Iran came to light and was broken off. But I think you can see the purposes behind our policy: to end the war in the Middle East, to prevent Soviet expansionism, to halt terrorism, and to help gain release of American hostages.

But now I want to speak to you asout something else, not the policies themselves but how they were carried out. And while we are still seeking all the facts, it's obvious that the execution of these policies was flawed and mistakes were made. Let me just say it was not my intent to do business with Khomeini, to trade weapons for hostages, nor to undercut our policy of antiterrorism. And let me say again, I know the stories of the past few weeks have been distressing. I'm deeply disappointed this initiative has resulted in such a controversy, and I regret it's caused such concern and consternation. But I pledge to you I will set things right.

That's what I am doing now. When our Iranian initiative came to light, I spoke to you from the Oval Office and explained it. When revelations regarding a transfer of money from Iran to those attempting to fight the Sandinista government were reported to me, they were immediately shared with you and the Congress. I then appointed a distinguished, independent board chaired by former Senator and Ambassador John Tower to review our National Security Council staff apparatus. And to ensure a complete legal inquiry, I urged the appointment of an independent counsel. They used to be called special prosecutors, and that's what they are. They just changed the title. And finally, I have stated we will cooperate fully with the Congress as they undertake their proper review.

If illegal acts were undertaken in the implementation of our policy, those who did so will be brought to justice. If actions in implementing my policy were taken without my authorization, knowledge, or concurrence, this will be exposed and appropriate corrective steps will be implemented. I will continue to make all the facts known surrounding this matter. We live in a country that requires we operate within rules and laws -- all of us. Just cause and deep concern and noble ends can never be reason enough to justify improper actions or excessive means.

In these past 6 years we have done much together to restore the faith and confidence and respect of our people and our country. We've done so not by avoiding challenges or denying problems but when confronted with these problems dealing with them directly and honestly. We will continue to do so. Until next week, thanks for listening, and God bless you.

Good evening, and welcome to the White House. Tonight we gather in this grand old house to pay tribute to six men and women to whom we Americans and, indeed, millions around the world find ourselves deeply in debt. Others in the life of our nation have seen to our material needs -- built our roads, constructed our cities, given us our daily bread. Still others have seen to the life of the mind -- founding our universities and expanding knowledge in every field. But these six -- these six are artists. And as such, they've performed a different and singular task: to see to the deepest needs of the heart.

As a young man, Anthony Tudor began a London career as a clerk in a real estate firm. And then in 1928, at the age of 19, Mr. Tudor attended ballets staged by the great Russian impresario, Diaghilev, and saw Anna Pavlova perform. Within weeks Mr. Tudor had presented himself to Marie Rombert, a noted instructor, to begin his life in dance. That life in dance has now amounted to nearly six decades -- six decades that rank Mr. Tudor with George Balanchine and Frederick Ashton as one of those who brought ballet forward, who made it modern, a part of our own idiom and time. In dealing with themes once thought unsuitable for dance, in extending the classical ballet vocabulary into new modes, Mr. Tudor has expanded the possibilities of ballet itself, giving this magnificent medium new relevance, new vibrancy, and new life. Anthony Tudor, on behalf of those who love ballet the world over, I give you our thanks.

During World War II Mr. Menuhin gave more than 500 concerts, including performances on ships, in hospitals and camps. In more recent years, he has founded and directed musical festivals in Switzerland and England. And throughout his career, Mr. Menuhin has expanded the violin repertoire bydreviving neglected scores and introducing works by composers such as Bartok, Bloch, and William Walton.

By age 50, he would be forced to free himself from an addiction to drugs. But there has always been something in him that could not be held down, something that finds life-giving beauty in rhythm and melody and tone. Today Ray Charles is known the world over for his infusion of gospel fervor into rhythm and blues and rock and roll and for the quality -- the sheer lilting, rolling musicial quality of his singing. One hit alone, ``Georgia on My Mind,'' has sold over 3 million copies. And, Ray, I don't mind telling you that your version of ``America the Beautiful'' has brought a tear or two to my eyes. ``The important thing in jazz,'' Mr. Charles has said, ``is to feel your music -- but really feel it and believe it.'' Ray Charles, in giving of yourself so completely to your music, you've given of yourself to us, and we thank you.

Perhaps it's the preeminent work of the artist to speak to us about reality. For true art is never created out of nothing; it's already there, just unseen and unappreciated, waiting for the craft of the artist to show it to us. We walk from place to place unthinkingly. Then we see the beauty of a dancer upon a stage, and we never look at the human form in quite the same way again. Even the everyday routine of family life contains immense drama and humor; and in watching a program like the one we've been talking about, ``I Love Lucy,'' for a moment we can all enjoy it together.

Thank you. I don't know why, but it seems to sound better. [The President was referring to lengthy applause.] Thank you. [Laughter] Well, welcome to the White House. You may not have thought this building was a part of the White House; that's what they call it. Maybe White House complex would be better, but that sounds like a neurosis. [Laughter] Well, anyway, it's a pleasure to be here with you today. As you know, we're here to honor the top guns of the Federal Establishment, the best of the best in serving the American people.

When our administration came to Washington 6 years ago, we promised the American people a government that stopped doing what it shouldn't be doing and did well whatever was left. Our honorees today are helping to fulfill that promise. They lead the leaders of the Federal Establishment. They've been chosen the most outstanding members of the Senior Executive Service. We should always remember that their work is important, not only in the immediate sense of what they do but in a broader way as well. Yes, their jobs may be managerial or technical, but in a broader sense their work is to help ensure the success of the greatest experiment in self-government in the history of the world -- an experiment called the United States of America.

And just in case you're thinking that when I went over to Ireland a few years back I sneaked in a side trip and kissed the Blarney Stone, let me tell you about just a few of our awardees. Among them is Frederick Rall, who's been called the father of the modern Air Force. Then there's John Simpson, the Director of the Secret Service, the man who planned protection for all the Presidential candidates in 1984, for the Los Angeles Olympics, for the 40th anniversary celebrations at the United Nations, and who currently serves as President of Interpol. And there's one of the world's outstanding researchers on the workings of the human brain, Dr. Frederick Goodwin. To give you an idea of the impact of Dr. Goodwin's work, I'm told he's in the top one-tenth of 1 percent of all scientists most frequently cited in scholarly writings.

I could go on and on, but -- some of you are leaders in the critical work of getting Federal spending under control. Some of you are leading in rebuilding America's defense. Charles Nemfakos is helping to bring the 600-ship Navy to reality -- under budget. Others are helping to formulate and implement policy at the highest levels of diplomatic, military, and trade issues. Still others are enforcing the laws of our country, while others are making Federal programs give good service to their clients. I'm very proud of every one of you. And I know your colleagues and your families are proud.

As a result of intensive negotiations in the wake of President Reagan's October 27, 1986, decision to retaliate against Taiwan for unfair trade practices under section 301 of the Trade Act of 1974, the President today announced that the United States and Taiwan have come to terms on implementing the agreement on the importation and sale of U.S. beer, wine, and cigarettes in Taiwan. This agreement will provide significant market access in Taiwan for these U.S. commodities and should mean close to $150 million in sales in the first year for the beer, wine, and cigarette industries of the United States.

This market opening agreement provides for smooth importing procedures by permitting U.S. exporters of beer, wine, and cigarettes to make a single payment of a monopoly tax in lieu of import duties and other taxes. Moreover, the tax will be low enough to allow U.S. products to be very price competitive. The agreement allows for a wide range of U.S. promotional and advertising activities and guarantees direct access by American producers to all of Taiwan's 70,000 retail outlets. It also provides broader product co]%erage for wine to include coolers and champagne.

For too many years U.S. beer, wine, and cigarette exporters faced significant barriers in the Taiwanese market, including a ban on the importation of U.S. beer; an extremely high, mandatory price differential between the retail price of domestic and imported products; and restrictions on imported products being sold at all retail outlets where competing domestic products are sold. This settlement with Taiwan successfully addresses these serious trade complaints raised by this administration and will accomplish the President's goal of obtaining access for U.S. firms to Taiwan's $1 billion annual retail beer, wine, and cigarette market. The President has directed the United States Trade Representative to take all necessary actions to implement and monitor this agreement. The section 301 proceeding will therefore be terminated.

More than two million Americans -- men, women, and especially children -- suffer from a disorder known as alopecia areata. It is a serious disorder of unknown origin that usually produces small, coin-shaped patches of hair loss on the scalp. In some cases, the disease can progress to the total loss of scalp or body hair.

Basic research is just beginning to reveal the underlying facts about alopecia areata. However, new research findings and new approaches to diagnosis and treatment are needed. Working together, the Federal government and private voluntary organizations have developed a strong and enduring partnership committed to research on alopecia areata and other disorders of the skin and its components. Through these efforts, we hope one day to uncover the cause and cure for this distressing disease.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this eighth day of December, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

During the past four years the United States has embarked on a new era of economic growth and prosperity. Millions of new jobs have been created, inflation is at its lowest point in 20 years, and the purchasing power of the average family has risen by close to 8 percent. But along with this new prosperity have come new challenges to American business. In the early years of our expansion our economy moved forward, while much of the rest of the world's lagged. The resulting strength of the dollar lowered the price of imports, making them more attractive to Americans, who then had extra money to spend. At the same time, it raised the prices buyers overseas had to pay for American goods. It is ironic that the very health and vitality of the United States economy led to our importing more than we export.

Already there are signs that this problem should lessen in the near future. American industry is rising to the challenge, producing more efficiently than ever before. The dollar is in better balance with major foreign currencies, and, even more important, our trading partners are taking a new look at what they can do to quicken their economies and rely less on the great locomotive of American prosperity. Now is the time, therefore, for consumers both here and abroad to take a fresh look at what America has to offer. American technology and management are second to none, and the skill and resourcefulness of the American worker are the envy of the world. Not only does ``Made in the U.S.A.'' symbolize excellence of quality and design, but our products are now available at more competitive prices.

It is not only American products that merit a second look. Our commitments to freedom of enterprise, individual responsibility, and restraints on government power and taxation -- some genuinely ``made in America'' ideas -- have resulted in an economic renaissance in this country that stands as an example of hope for people everywhere. A world in which state-imposed barriers to commerce are removed, and in which all individuals are free to reach their greatest potential, will be a world in which all nations can bloom and prosper.

Before that day, people could but dream of flight or imitate it by floating in balloons. But forever after, thanks to Orville and Wilbur Wright, man could travel the skies as he had the continents, rivers, and seas throughout the ages.

The benefits of manned flight have been incalculable. Today, our world is linked by a global air transportation system that enables us to travel safely and efficiently virtually anywhere in a matter of hours. Aviation technology has built on the foundations of manned airplane flight to provide advances in science, medicine, and many other fields. And mankind has ventured beyond the skies into space.

Just as the principles of flight that the Wright Brothers harnessed still apply, so too their spirit -- invention, exploration, originality, innovation -- continues to motivate all those who would expand knowledge for the good of man.

Reagan. President Mobutu and I have had the opportunity to review and renew one of our oldest and most solid friendships in Africa, that between the United States and the Republic of Zaire. Cooperation between the United States and Zaire under President Mobutu's leadership stretches back through 20 years and 5 United States administrations. In that time American leaders have learned to place a particularly high value on President Mobutu's insights and counsel.

Mobutu has brought a consistent voice of good sense and good will to the international councils where African issues are considered, from the United Nations to the Organization of African Unity to the nonaligned movement. He has stood uniformly for the peaceful settlements of disputes, but has not shrunk from his responsibilities when action was appropriate. In 1983, for example, he dispatched troops to assist Chad in defending itself against Libya's criminal aggression.

Much of our discussion today focused on Zaire's heroic effort to complete its program of economic policy reform. As you know, Zaire has been engaged for nearly 4 years in a series of painful sacrifices and adjustments designed to rationalize and revive its economy and to develop the potential of its private sector. We have tried to help by supplementing our regular development assistance with special funds earmarked for African States who are undertaking serious steps toward reform. We've also encouraged our business community to look at the growing investment opportunities in Zaire and will continue to do so. Unfortunately, Zaire's determined economic efforts have been greatly complicated by the severe drop in world market prices for its exports.

President Mobutu and his people face a heavy foreign debt burden. We have encouraged Zaire to hold firm to the responsible, economic reforms it is attempting, while promising to do our best to ease the way.

President Mobutu and I also examined the regional situation, especially in southern Africa, where we share the goals of a rapid, peaceful end to apartheid; the independence of Namibia; and national reconciliation and removal of all foreign forces stationed in Angola. President Mobutu brings great prestige and influence to bear on the range of southern African problems, and I welcome his recent efforts in seeking solutions to these issues. After today's meeting, we can be more confident that the future of U.S.-Zairian relations will remain close, prosperous, and productive. President Mobutu and his country's friendship with the United States is most appreciated. And we're proud and pleased to have him with us here today.

Mobutu. Mr. President, on behalf of my wife and of my entire delegation, I should like to thank you most sincerely for your warm and friendly welcome as extended to us by you, personally, and by members of your Cabinet ever since we arrived here in Washington. Together we have surveyed all issues that relate to the bilateral relationship of our two countries, and I go home in full awareness that I have the full support of your government and can assure the people of Zaire that they can count on you and on your government. Again, Mr. President, thank you very much for all that has been done to facilitate our stay.

The President. Today we renew our allegiance to those human rights which all free men cherish and which we Americans, in particular, hold so dear. It's love of freedom that binds a people who are so richly diverse. It unites us in purpose, and it makes us one nation. At birth, our country was christened with a declaration that spoke of self-evident truths, the foremost of which was that each and every individual is endowed by our Creator with certain unalienable rights. And our creed as Americans is that these rights -- these human rights -- are the property of every man, woman, and child on this planet and that a violation of human rights anywhere is the business of free people everywhere.

When talking about human rights, we're not referring to abstract theory or ungrounded philosophy. Jefferson, who penned our great Declaration of Independence, years later wrote: ``Freedom of religion, freedom of the press, freedom of the person under the protection of habeas corpus and trial by juries impartially selected -- these principles form the bright constellation which has guided our steps through an age of revolution and transformation.'' Well, our country does not have an unblemished record. We've had to overcome our shortcomings and ensure equal justice for all. And yet we can be proud that respect for the rights of the individual has been an essential element, a basic principle, if you will, of American Government.

Military regimes and authoritarian dictators held power in much of the non-Communist world. A traumatized United States was overwhelmed by self-doubt and uncertainty. Our optimism today flows from renewed confidence in our principles and from the trend of history which is now clearly on the side of the free. Since the beginning of the decade, we have witnessed one of the greatest expansions of democracy on record. Latin America, once the bastion of the caudillo, the Latin strongman, is now, for the most part, democratic territory.

Ninety percent of the people live in countries that have returned or are in the process of returning to democratic rule. I've always felt that the Americas, placed as they are between the two great oceans, were put here to be found by people with a special love of freedom. Democracy and human rights are the birthright of all Americans. We should not be satisfied until every country in this hemisphere is free and living at peace with one another. Incidentally, when I said all Americans, I'm speaking of all of the people from Tierra del Fuego at the tip of South America to the North Pole. We are all Americans.

Indeed, we've learned through painful experiences that respect for human rights is essential to peace and, ultimately, to our own freedom. A government which does not respect the rights of its own people and laws is unlikely to respect those of its neighbors. In this century democratic governments have not started wars.

Our confidence today also comes from the realization that the mystique of communism has, at long last, been shattered. Young intellectuals can no longer be seduced by a philosophy that has so blatantly and demonstrably failed. The only thing produced in abundance by Marxism-Leninism has been deprivation and tyranny.

From Ethiopia to Cuba, from the Soviet Union itself -- which is beginning to fall even further behind the Western democracies -- to Vietnam, throughout the Communist world, the cupboards are empty, and the jails are full. This is the natural consequence of a fatally flawed philosophy. The other day, someone told me the difference between a democracy and a peoples democracy. It's the same difference between a jacket and straightjacket.

We're honored this morning to have with us Mr. Yuriy Orlov and Mr. Natan Shcharanskiy, who, along with other brave individuals, took it upon themselves to monitor Soviet compliance with the human rights provisions of the Helsinki awards [accords]. Mr. Orlov, Mr. Shcharanskiy, and their colleagues, people of extraordinary moral courage, have suffered -- many are even now in labor camps or Siberian exile -- for the ideals that we proclaim today. Mr. Anatoly Marchenko, who we are saddened to hear recently died while in prison, was a martyr for the cause of human rights. The Soviet Union, along with 34 other European and North American nations, freely signed the Helsinki accords 11 years ago.

Soviet Government, despite a few gestures this year -- gestures that reflect posturing more than flexibility -- continues its systematic violation of human rights. The new Soviet emigration law, for example, purports to ease restrictions. Yet for far too many the opposite is true. The restriction of emigration, the suppression of dissent, the lengthy separation of families and spouses, the continued imprisonment of religious activists in Ukraine and throughout the Soviet Union are the orders of the day. These realities remain unacceptable, and we will continue to do our utmost to press for change and to bring our moral and diplomatic weight to bear on behalf of those brave souls who speak out within the Soviet bloc. We and our allies are, for example, doing this at the meeting of the Conference on Security and Cooperation in Europe, which is now taking place in Vienna.

Also with us this morning is Armando Valladares, a remarkable Cuban poet. His heartrending ordeal in Castro's gulag -- detailed in his book ``Against All Hope'' -- is an outrage against civilization. Even more outrageous, the horrors and sadism Mr. Valladares endured are not unique, not some freak accident, but intentional government policy which continues to this day. Many others suffered and continue to suffer the same grotesque brutality. Also with us is Senor Ramon Grau Alcina, who arrived in our country less than 3 months ago, after 21 years of imprisonment in Cuba. His crime: helping parents arrange to get their children to safety before the Castro regime was able to fully grab power. And recently, the Castro regime smashed a tiny, domestic human rights group with an iron fist. All of its members have been imprisoned except one. Its leader, Dr. Ricardo Bofill Pages, has sought asylum in the French Embassy in Havana.

What happened in Cuba is now happening in Nicaragua. An unmistakable pattern: repression, attacks on the church, the closing down of newspapers, the destruction of independent unions, and the construction of concentration camps and prisons on a scale never imagined. The Sandinista regime has repeatedly hampered the Organization of American States attempts to investigate charges of human rights violations. A short time ago a message was smuggled out of a Sandinista prison which revealed stories not dissimilar to those of Mr. Valladares.

The violation of human rights, whether in Kampuchea or Paraguay, Afghanistan or North Korea, whether it be the murder of Baha'is in Iran or the repression of ethnic Turks in Bulgaria, is the rightful cause of all free peoples. We remain deeply concerned, for example, about the denial of human rights in Africa. The system of apartheid and the state of emergency in South Africa are unconscionable and must be ended. The brutality and repression in Ethiopia, Angola, or any other repressive African regime are of no less concern.

Whatever the regime, if progress is to be made, it will require not only support from governments but the active commitment of citizens, individuals unhampered in their humanitarian activities by politics or affairs of state. I've always been an advocate of this kind of personal involvement, knowing that energetic, dedicated individuals inside and outside the government are essential to solving problems. Amnesty International, which is celebrating its 25th anniversary, has always sought to mobilize the world, government officials and private citizens, on behalf of political prisoners and in defense of human rights. One of that organization's guiding spirits, Ginetta Sagan, who is with us today, has been a vital force for decency, humanity, and freedom throughout the world in these last three decades. Unlike so many others who opposed the Vietnam war, for example, Ginetta did not look the other way once the Communists assumed power. She has made serious efforts to call the Government of Vietnam to task for their massive violations of human rights. In Chile, Poland, and so many other countries, this woman has saved lives and championed the cause. Ginetta, would you stand? You are the kind of hero every American can be proud of. Thank you for all you've done.

The President. You know, she doesn't want me to tell you this, but I know a little about her that I think you should know. During the latter days of the Second World War, Ginetta was a courier for the resistance forces in Italy and in February 1945 was captured. She knows firsthand the suffering, the torture, the despair of those imprisoned by despots. Her tormentors, Fascist secret police, tried to break her body and her spirit. They told her no one knew she was alive, that she was utterly alone, isolated. At the darkest moment of her ordeal, a guard kicked open the door of her interrogation cell and threw in a small round loaf of bread. Inside that loaf she found a matchbox that contained a tiny piece of paper on which was written one word: Courage.

Today that's our job, our duty. America must continue to be a beacon of hope, sending this message to the oppressed of all nations. Those who suffer for freedom are not alone. We think of them, and we are with them. And that's what Human Rights Day is all about. I want to thank each and every one of you for what you're doing to further this cause. Now, I thank you, and God bless you. And I understand it's time for me to sign the proclamation.

December 15, 1791, our young Nation celebrated the ratification of the Bill of Rights, the first ten amendments to the Constitution of the United States, which gave legal form to the great principles our Founding Fathers had set forth in the Declaration of Independence less than a generation earlier. As we celebrate that occasion some 195 years later, it is well to recall those principles, which endure today as they have for nearly two centuries. They endure because they rest on a simple but profound truth, that each of us is created with equal moral dignity, that every individual is endowed by nature and nature's God with inalienable rights to life, liberty, and the pursuit of happiness. On this foundation of individual rights and self-government our Founding Fathers created a great Nation, setting it on the course of liberty that continues to this day.

As we look around the world, however, we see a very different history. Some nations, to be sure, have followed a course similar to our own and today enjoy the liberty that we Americans have long cherished. But others have never known genuine liberty, while still others, especially in our own century, have lost the liberty they once enjoyed.

Thirty-eight years ago, the Universal Declaration of Human Rights was adopted by the United Nations General Assembly. Yet many of the governments that voted for that Declaration are flagrantly ignoring the principles they affirmed on that momentous occasion. The Soviet Union continues its repression of Catholics in Lithuania and Ukraine, and of other religious activists. Hundreds of thousands of Jews are still being denied the right to emigrate, while Soviet armies, for the seventh year now, have brutally repressed the people of Afghanistan. In Berlin, the world marked the 25th year of a wall built not to protect people but to keep them in their place. In Poland, workers will sadly mark the fifth anniversary of martial law and will mourn those who suffered for their defense of human rights.

Unfortunately, no continent has been spared the pain of human rights violations. In South Africa the manifest injustices of the apartheid system of racial discrimination persist. Refugees continue to flow from the communist nations of southeast Asia. And the world is listening increasingly to the tragic stories of those who have suffered so long in the Cuban gulags just 90 miles from our shores -- and in the emerging gulags of Nicaragua.

Yet despite this reign of repression, there is reason for hope. In our own hemisphere in this decade the movement has been toward freedom, not toward repression, as country after country has brought into being the institutions of democracy.

History demonstrates that there can be no genuine peace without respect for human rights, that governments that do not respect the rights of their own citizens are a threat to their neighbors as well.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this tenth day of December, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

Francisco, CA, 1975 - 1981. Dr. Hutton is a member of numerous medical societies and has published extensive articles on the management of battlefield and mass casualty situations. He is a noted nautical photographer whose pictures have been published on several covers of Yachting magazine.

Since earliest times, we Americans have joined together to help each other and to strengthen our communities. Our deep-rooted spirit of caring, of neighbor helping neighbor, has become an American trademark -- and an American way of life. Over the years, our generous and inventive people have created an ingenious network of voluntary organizations to give help where help is needed.

Way gives that help very well indeed, and truly exemplifies our spirit of voluntarism. United Way has been a helping force in America right from the first community-wide fund raising campaign in Denver, Colorado, in 1887. Today, more than 2,200 local United Ways across our land raise funds for more than 37,000 voluntary groups that assist millions of people.

Way of caring allows volunteers from all walks of life to effectively meet critical needs and solve community problems. At the centennial of the founding of this indispensable voluntary group, it is most fitting that we Americans recognize and commend all the good United Way has done and continues to do.

Christmas season accumulate as this great holiday approaches. Preparations are made in homes and churches and shops in every city and town, and the land is full of traditional signs and symbols of its coming: Fresh snow resting lightly on the holly bush, package-laden crowds crushing the storefronts and bus stops, strings of lights gleaming from the housetops, chestnut vendors and street corner Santas, school plays with children dressed -- hardly needing the costume -- as angels, and choirs joining heart and voice in joyous song.

Because of these traditions, no Christmas celebration truly stands alone. For most of us, the holidays bring back such a trove of memories, evoked by things as simple as the scent of pine or the painted scene on a greeting card, that our Christmases become not separate events on a calendar but a chain in which all are linked together as one. This is as it should be, for Christmas is a holiday that we celebrate not as individuals nor as a nation, but as a human family -- and not merely as a family living in this age and time, but as a family linked through history, in ways we still cannot fully comprehend, to that First Christmas in Bethlehem.

Walter J. Stoessel was a dedicated and talented public servant. With pride, competence, and grace, he represented our country as Ambassador to Poland, the Soviet Union, and the Federal Republic of Germany. He earned the respect and admiration of those with whom he worked, and he was an effective and articulate advocate of our foreign policy goals. As Assistant Secretary of State for Europe, Under Secretary of State for Political Affairs, and Deputy Secretary of State, Walter Stoessel served his country with distinction and a deep sense of patriotism. He was motivated by the goal which all diplomats share: making the world a better place for their fellow men. I will miss Walter Stoessel's wise counsel. Nancy and I extend our deepest sympathy to Mary Ann and their family.

Well, to all of you at the White House, to all those listening on the Ellipse, and to the millions more joining us this evening by way of radio and television: Good evening, and welcome to the lighting of the National Christmas Tree. A special word of greeting to some special people with me here at the White House, members of the Washington, DC, Big Brothers and Big Sisters programs. In these programs, grownups give of their time to youngsters, each adult getting together regularly with a boy or girl -- a little brother or a sister -- taking him or her to the park or zoo, or on a camping trip, or maybe just answering questions about life. My friends, I can't tell you how honored Nancy and I are to welcome you here this evening to this, the home that belongs to all Americans. For in this Christmas season, you remind us all of the greatest gift we can give to each other is the gift of ourselves.

Now, my friends, beyond the White House lawn -- South Lawn, across the street on the Ellipse, in the darkness, there stands a tall shaggy shape -- our National Christmas Tree. In a moment Byron Whyte will join Nancy and me in pressing the button, and that dark shape will come alive, blazing with color and light. But before we light the tree, let's just talk for a moment about why Christmas trees have become such an important part of the Christmas celebration.

For some Christmas just marks the birth of a great philosopher and prophet, a great and good man. To others, it marks something still more: the pinnacle of all history, the moment when the God of all creation -- in the words of the creed, God from God and light from light -- humbled himself to become a baby crying in a manger. To everyone Christmas is a time of happiness and cheer, a time of peace and good will and glad tidings.

I've spoken long enough for a wintry evening like this. It's time to push the button used by every President since Calvin Coolidge in lighting our National Christmas Tree. And Nancy and Byron, let's see if we can't turn this cold dark evening into one of light and warmth.

Well, it really is great to have you here. Whenever I'm talking to ALEC, I feel like I'm among family and can let my hair down a little. Let me take a moment here to thank you, Roy, and all of you here at ALEC for the warm letter of support that you sent me. I can tell you truthfully, you really made my day. I can't possibly thank you enough for the support that you've given this administration or for the tremendous work you're doing in your home States. And I want to congratulate you on your outstanding program of drafting model legislation covering everything from tort reform to juvenile justice and to balanced budgets and to drugs.

But another change that would have been inconceivable just 6 years ago, and almost impossible without the help of all of you in this room, is the revolutionary new tax reform that is the law of the land. America now has the most modern tax code in the industrialized world -- one that is progrowth, pro-opportunity, and profairness. And it's designed to keep America expanding and prospering through the end of the century. One of the most important aspects of tax reform, however, isn't economic, but it's psychological. It's the complete discrediting of high marginal rates, and a new consensus is formed that when it comes to taxes, flatter is better. Poor Karl Marx.

I signed the tax bill I pointed out that when our Founding Fathers designed this government, of and by and for the people, they never imagined the income tax as we've come to know it. As a matter of fact, back then, in 1913, when it was being debated right here in Washington, one Senator was literally laughed out of politics because in the debate he stood up and said that if they passed this thing that they were talking about, it was conceivable that someday the government could even be taking as much as 10 percent of what a citizen earned.

The tax cuts of 1981 and this year's tax reform are the first important steps back to economic liberty. But there is much more to be done. We shouldn't forget that deficit spending represents a form of indirect taxation, and all Americans pay for it with slower growth and often, higher future taxes. It's become clearer every year when budget time rolls around that the budget process in Washington is completely broken down. Well, it's time we fix it. And the solution is the line-item veto and the balanced budget amendment. And you don't balance a budget by laying heavier and heavier tax burdens on the American people; that doesn't balance the budget, it just sinks it. And there's only one way to balance the budget, and that's spending restraint. And just like with tax reform, you and the State legislatures are going to have to carry a lot of water on the balanced budget amendment. And this time you've got an added advantage.

Well, so it is that yet another fundamental, long-lasting, and dramatic change has taken place. Power has stopped flowing to Washington and begun to flow back where it belongs -- to the States. This country is great, and our freedom is sure as long as we continue to have a federation of sovereign States. And to those who, over the last half century in Washington, have worked and worked trying to make the States administrative districts of the Federal Government -- no way, that's no way to preserve what the Founding Fathers gave us. Well, if there is a revolution that is taking place here in Washington, it is that we have continued to try and limit the scope of the Federal Government. So, now it's time for resources, initiatives, and public initiative to shift back to the States still more definitely, still more dramatically; in other words, to alter the balance of power permanently in favor of levels of government that are closer to the people.

As you may know, the working group on the family recently reported to me. We're still studying the report, and we'll have much more to say about it later. But for the moment, I want to read you a passage from its opening section. It's some food for thought, so to speak. They say it's time to reaffirm some home truths that the commitment of love, loyalty, and hard work that parents make to their children is the bedrock of our society. A profamily policy is one that would support those who make this commitment and not undermine and be hostile to them or send a message that we're neutral. Just common sense, I guess, much like tax reform or balanced budgets. But how far do we have to travel before our government policy really reflects this home truth?

Five years ago, on December 13, 1981, the people of Poland were subjected to martial law. Once again, as so often in their proud history, Polish patriots faced a cruel setback in their quest for human rights. That day will be remembered as a dark day in the heroic but tragic history of Poland. It is a day of painful memories for the families of Solidarity members who suffered much these past 5 years -- many lost lives, were jailed, or had to live in hiding, separated from their wives, husbands, and children. My heartfelt thoughts remain with them. America will never be indifferent to the future of Poland. Special ties of kinship, worship, and love of liberty, and the contributions of Poles to American independence and progress, remind us forever that our peoples share a faith in freedom, spiritual strength, and human dignity.

After the imposition of martial law in 1981, the United States sought ways to express our solidarity with the Polish people. We welcome the recent amnesty of most political prisoners. This important step, however, does not solve all problems facing Poland today. They can be overcome only with the participation and support of the Polish people. We hope, therefore, that the amnesty will be an important first step toward a meaningful dialog between the Polish people and their government. To encourage this process, we decided to enter into dialog with the Polish Government. We truly hope that future developments will allow improvement in the relationship between both governments. On this anniversary, we commemorate the sacrifices and the great spiritual strength of the courageous Polish people, and we look to a future in which their heritage can breathe freely for the good of Poland.

With the New Year just a few weeks away, Washington is starting to get ready for the 100th Congress, which will be sworn in this January. The most important challenge facing that Congress will be joining with us in keeping a growing America on the road to a brighter future, the road that you and I and all Americans started on just 6 years ago. That was when we said that the way to make America grow was not by feeding government more of your tax dollars but by the way that America has always grown: through the ingenuity, energy, and determination of the American people.

Together we set out to cut your taxes and cut the growth of government spending so that you could get on with the important work of building a better future for yourself, your family, and all America.

We first cut tax rates with our 1981 tax cut. Since the lower tax rates in that bill took effect, America has created over 12 million new jobs. We've had 48 straight months of economic growth and one of the longest periods of uninterrupted growth in the last 50 years. And after a decade-long decline, the American family's real income has been rising again and rising faster. Yes, thanks to our first tax cut, there are more and better jobs, more new businesses, and more new opportunities in America today than ever before in our history. But that's just the beginning; because earlier this year, with your help, Congress pushed aside the special interests and the tax-and-spend crowd, rolled up its sleeves, and shaped the tools that will help you and all Americans build on that record. That's when Congress passed the new tax reform bill, which will cut the top tax rate from 50 percent to 28 percent and for 8 out of 10 Americans will mean a top rate of no more than 15 percent.

That's why I was disappointed this week to hear some talk from the new Congress that we should stop the climb, turn around, and start back in the direction we've come from. Even before they take their oath of office, some in the new Congress are talking about breaking faith with the American people and taking back part of tax reform before it has taken effect. Yes, they say that to reduce the deficit they want to keep some people's tax rates high.

Well, we know where that road leads. First, they take one step towards raising taxes and then another and then another, and pretty soon every family in America is paying more to the Government again and we're back to the days of high taxes and no economic growth.

Well, you can be sure I'm not going to let that happen. I hope that instead of trying to return to the tax-and-spend policies of the past, the new Congress will work with us in getting the growth of Federal spending under control.

We've begun to make progress here, too. The figures are coming in now for the spending the Government is actually doing this year, and the news is good. When this year is ended, the deficit will be down by $50 billion. Yes, this year, for the first time in two decades, the Federal Government will spend less, after taking out inflation, than it did last year. That's an historic step on the road to a balanced budget, and it couldn't have happened without the Gramm-Rudman legislation.

Now it's time to take a second step. On January 5th we will send next year's budget up to Capitol Hill. It'll be the Federal Government's first trillion-dollar budget request. It will be lean enough to meet the Gramm-Rudman deficit targets, but it will also meet the Government's commitments. We will be spending more than ever before in such areas as support for America's elderly, law and drug enforcement to protect America's young people, and health care for America's finest -- for our veterans. And yet in the coming budget, after taking out inflation, the Federal Government will spend less in the coming year than it will this year. That will be 2 years of real falling spending. We in the administration have worked hard to meet the new, earlier deadline for sending this budget to Congress. I hope Congress will work just as hard to meet its required deadlines and not let them slip by, as has happened too many times in the past. And I hope the new Congress will take a constructive approach to this firm but fair budget. We're bound to disagree here and there, but let's work together for the good of the country to iron out our differences.

The leadership of the outgoing 99th Congress gave America lower tax rates and began the process of putting the lid on spending. As we look to the new year, this is the challenge for the leadership of the incoming 100th Congress: to build on that record and help lead America into the future. I hope they'll accept that challenge.

Since our administration came to Washington, we've made a special cause of making the future better for young lives. We've worked for lower taxes and fewer regulations, so that young people could have futures of hope and opportunity in a growing economy. We've worked to make quality the top priority in education, so young people would have the tools to take advantage of those opportunities. We've worked for an America that was so strong that no one would dare challenge us, so that our young people today and in the future can live in a world at peace. And with Nancy taking the lead, we've fought drug and alcohol abuse, so that they can enjoy that world of peace and opportunity to the fullest. That's why I'm so pleased to be with you today and to sign this proclamation. I can't think of any group of Americans that has done more to save young lives than those mothers and others who have made the battle against drunk and drugged driving a national crusade.

Each year alcohol-related crashes injure more than a half a million Americans, or one American every minute, every day, day in and day out, throughout the year. And what this means is that two out of every five Americans will be involved in an alcohol-related crash at some point in their lives.

Well, that's why 2 years ago I signed a law that put the Federal Government on the side of a 21-year-old minimum drinking age nationwide. We knew all too well that when it came to saving young lives -- and all lives -- the higher drinking age was not a fad or experiment but a proven success. Almost every State that had raised the drinking age to 21 had seen a significant drop in teenage driving fatalities -- drops as high as 25 to 30 percent.

Last year the number of drunk drivers killed in crashes was down 26 percent from 1980. This was more than twice the drop in all driving deaths in the same time. Put another way, the Department of Transportation estimates that because of the drop in drunk driving deaths 5,000 more Americans lived through this past year.

It's we ourselves, we Americans, in our homes, with our friends, in our communities. The designated driver program is one thing we can do. When a group goes to a party, a ball game, a restaurant, or a bar, one doesn't drink. He or she drives the others home safely. I hope that restaurants, bars, and arenas all over America will sponsor designated driver programs. And designated driver program or not, if you see a friend who's had too much and is heading for the car, be a real friend -- stop him or her and drive them home yourself. We can all save lives if we remember that friends don't let friends drive drunk. And if he asks why you're doing it, just say it's because you care.

There are other ways to show we care. I'm announcing today our new The Road To Winning program. The Road To Winning will be a public-private partnership between State governments and communities. It'll bring professional and college athletes into schools to talk about drugs, alcohol, and safe driving. It'll help America's winning athletes show America's young people The Road To Winning -- a safe and productive life.

I have a special message for America's young people. The holiday season is here. It's a time for getting together with family and friends, for gathering around a tree and exchanging gifts, for remembering our faiths, and for celebrating. There's no happier time of the year, so let's work together to keep it that way. When you go to holiday parties make sure someone in your group doesn't drink, so he or she can drive everyone else home safely to those who love them. In this festive season, Nancy and I both ask you -- for yourselves, for your family, for your country -- keep alcohol and cars apart. Just say no to tragedy. Just say yes to happy holidays and a happy new year for everyone that you care about.

Driving by people impaired by alcohol or other drugs is one of our Nation's most serious public health and safety problems. Each year, drunk and drugged drivers cause tens of thousands of highway fatalities and hundreds of thousands of injuries. In 1985, for instance, more than half of all highway deaths were alcohol-related.

Each of us must help reduce this carnage through an awareness of what can be done, a commitment to do the right thing, and a refusal to tolerate drunk and drugged driving. We need to detect and stop impaired drivers before they cause an accident. We must insist upon strict law enforcement and swift and sure penalties and ensure that the privilege of driving is withdrawn when a drunken driver deliberately endangers others. We must not wait until personal tragedy strikes to become involved.

More and more informed, concerned citizens are getting involved in generating awareness, education, and action to remove drunk and drugged drivers from our roads and highways. With the continued involvement of private citizens working together, and action at all levels of government, we can begin to control the problem of drunk and drugged driving.

America, do hereby proclaim the week of December 14 through December 20, 1986, as National Drunk and Drugged Driving Awareness Week. I call upon each American to help make the difference between the tragedy of alcohol-related motor vehicle accidents and the blessings of full health and life. I ask Americans to show concern and not to permit others to drink or take drugs and drive.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 15th day of December, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

It is clear, however, that existing regulatory law, patched together over more than 50 years, creates a diverse and often discordant network of legal authorities, statutory obligations, and private responsibilities and liabilities. The time has come to look at the underlying legislation itself, as one means of ensuring that we in government have done all we can to improve America's productivity and international competitiveness.

I am reestablishing the Presidential Task Force on Regulatory Relief under the chairmanship of the Vice President, and I am directing it to review existing Federal regulatory programs and to develop legislative or other proposals to further eliminate or reduce unnecessary regulatory and paperwork burdens upon the American public and improve American productivity and competitiveness.

Task Force will consist of the Vice President, as chairman; the Attorney General of the United States; the Secretary of Commerce; the Secretary of Labor; the Secretary of the Treasury; the Director of the Office of Management and Budget; the Chairman of the Council of Economic Advisers; and the Assistant to the President for Policy Development. Other Cabinet and agency heads will be invited to participate as appropriate.

Task Force will seek your help in identifying and developing proposals for further reducing unnecessary regulatory and paperwork burdens. Each of you should provide the Task Force with all the information and assistance it may require. In making and executing Task Force recommendations, you should adhere to the regulatory principles stated in Section 2 of Executive Order No. 12291 and Section 1(d) of Executive Order No. 12498.

Task Force will evaluate selected regulatory programs, including financial regulation, natural gas regulation, transportation regulation, procurement regulation, drug regulation, export controls, regulatory barriers to innovation and international competitiveness, Federally imposed paperwork, and such other areas as it may deem appropriate. The Task Force will review these regulatory areas in order to determine whether statutory or administrative changes are appropriate.

Task Force, or the agencies that it designates, will develop and draft proposed legislation, proposed reforms in existing regulations, or suggest other means of implementing its recommendations. The Task Force will submit its initial recommendations to me within nine months.

Task Force is to act as a catalyst for change to focus public and congressional attention on the need to eliminate or reduce excessive, unproductive regulation and paperwork, and to make existing regulatory programs more efficient and effective. In so doing, the Task Force will complement your ongoing efforts to achieve progress in these areas and to enhance America's international competitiveness.

There is an urgent need for full disclosure of all facts surrounding the Iranian controversy. I want to get this information out. We must get on with the business at hand and put this issue behind us. It is my desire to have the full story about Iran come out now -- the alleged transfer of funds, the Swiss bank accounts, who was involved -- everything. The law provides a process for Congress to obtain this information from Vice Adm.

Congress passed legislation 16 years ago authorizing the Senate and the House of Representatives or any committee or subcommittee to grant special limited immunity to any witness, so that the witness must give testimony that is pertinent to a congressional inquiry. This limited immunity also protects the witness by providing that such testimony cannot be used against him in any criminal proceedings. At the same time, the law still permits prosecution based on all evidence other than the testimony given before Congress.

Secretary of Defense and other administration officials, had determined that high levels of imports could potentially erode U.S. capabilities to manufacture critical machine tool product lines. At that time, I directed that discussions be held with Japan, Switzerland, Taiwan, and West Germany leading to voluntary import limitations in critical product lines. I further directed that a domestic action plan be developed to supplement the industry's own modernization efforts.

Japan and Taiwan have agreed to voluntarily restrain the level of their machine tool exports to this country for a period of 5 years beginning in January 1987. I appreciate the willingness of Japan and Taiwan to discuss these questions of common importance in a cooperative and constructive manner. Japan has agreed to limit its exports of machining centers, computer-controlled and noncomputer-controlled lathes, computer-controlled and noncomputer-controlled punching and shearing machines, and milling machines. Taiwan has agreed to limit its exports of machining centers, computer-controlled and noncomputer-controlled lathes, and milling machines. These agreements will allow the U.S. industry to increase its share of the domestic market and preserve critical production capabilities.

Baldrige and Ambassador Yeutter have informed West Germany and Switzerland that their machine tool exports to the United States should not exceed specified limits. In this regard, I have directed the Department of Commerce and the U.S. Customs Service to monitor machine tool imports to determine whether these limits are being exceeded. If we determine that exports of these machine tools exceed these limits and undermine the integrity of the machine tool revitalization program, I am prepared to take unilateral action under U.S. law.

The combined effect of the actions announced today will create new market opportunities for U.S. machine tool manufacturers of about 3,300 units provided that demand remains constant. In 1985 these machines were imported at a value of $155 million. Over the 5 years of the VRA [voluntary restraint agreement], U.S. machine tool manufacturers could increase domestic sales by about 16,500 machines. The imported value of these machines would be $775 million. These additional sales would represent an overall increase from 35 percent to 44 percent in market share for this portion of the U.S. machine tool industry.

In the critical computer-controlled product lines (NC lathes, machining centers, and NC punching and shearing machines), capacity utilization is expected to rise by more than 40 percent. These boosts in capacity utilization and additional revenues should allow the industry to funnel more investment into research, development, and facilities, thereby regaining its former vitality. According to industry experts, new investment in plant and equipment could total $115 million over the 5-year period.

We do not anticipate that domestic machine tool prices will rise significantly as a result of the actions announced today because of continuing strenuous competition among U.S. and foreign firms and because of the existence of significant excess production capacity in the United States and abroad. Further, these initiatives will continue to allow a significant foreign presence in the U.S. machine tool market. As a result, U.S. purchasers will continue to be able to purchase competitively priced tools from foreign and domestic sources.

Due to the industry's vital importance to the national security, we have developed a domestic action plan to facilitate the industry's recovery effort. By integrating the industry more closely into the defense procurement process, U.S.-based companies will have a better idea of prospective DOD requirements and be better able to make efficient production and investment decisions. By designating the machine tool industry as a major focus for DOD concentration, the industry will have a better opportunity to obtain funding from MANTECH and other Defense Department programs for advances in critical technologies.

The revitalization of the domestic machine tool industry is primarily the industry's own responsibility. Throughout the course of the voluntary import restraint program, we will closely monitor the industry's performance to ensure that it is taking the required initiatives to improve its competitive position.

I will miss his wise counsel, most recently exemplified by his presence with me in Reykjavik, and his expertise on East-West relations. He has had a distinguished Foreign Service career and was a major player in the important arena of United States-Soviet relations. He is regarded with great respect and admiration by all of us who know him. I wish him the very best, expressing my personal gratitude for his outstanding service for over 5 years in this most challenging assignment.

Nancy and I were deeply distressed and concerned to learn about Bill Casey's condition. He is a talented, dedicated, and able public servant, whose service to this administration and to our country is deeply valued.

While he is hospitalized, the Central Intelligence Agency will maintain its normal operations under the careful procedures Bill developed in the event of his temporary incapacity. Our thoughts and prayers are with Bill and his family.

Burns continue to be one of the leading causes of accidental death and injury in our Nation. Each year, burns kill approximately 12,000 Americans and injure more than two million, of whom 70,000 need hospitalization. Tragically, children, the elderly, and the disabled are especially vulnerable to burn injuries, and almost one-third of all burn victims are under age 15. Further, survivors may experience serious scarring, loss of muscle tissue over joints, and accompanying physical disabilities and adjustment difficulties.

Thankfully, significant research advances have improved burn surgery and treatment, aided rehabilitation, shortened hospital stays, and much increased the burn survival rate. Among the most important therapeutic advances are techniques for early burn excision and wound closure, the development of artificial skin to cover large burn areas, better ways to prevent and control infection, and improved ways to restore fluid balance and provide adequate nutrition.

Much remains to be learned, however, about the body's underlying responses to burn injury -- for instance, the body's infection-fighting system, factors leading to tissue breakdown and energy loss, hormonal changes, and the life-threatening effects of shock.

We can all be truly grateful to the many Americans who devote themselves to treating, caring for, and rehabilitating burn victims; to all those involved in the vital work of burn research; to the dedicated fire fighters who risk their own lives daily to protect others; and to everyone who promotes burn awareness and prevention.

America, do hereby proclaim the week of February 9 through February 15, 1987, as National Burn Awareness Week. I call upon all government agencies, health organizations, communications media, and the people of the United States to observe this week with appropriate ceremonies and activities.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this eighteenth day of December, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

We are pleased to hear of Mr. Sakharov's release from internal exile and the pardon of his wife, Yelena Bonner, on charges of slandering the Soviet state. We welcome this as a personal victory of courage for the principles of human rights that the two have come to exemplify in the Soviet Union.

While we are pleased with these developments, we note that the system of abuses of human rights continues. There are countless others who remain incarcerated for no reason other than their desire to express their viewpoint. It is these infringements of human rights that we call upon the Soviet Union to correct.

I have urged and now welcome the appointment of such a distinguished jurist as Lawrence Walsh to serve as Independent Counsel. With the appointment of an Independent Counsel and with the efforts of the Senate and House Select Committees and the Special Review Board I established, all of the facts will come before the American people at the earliest possible time. I have done everything in my power to make the facts known, and I welcome and support the addition of the Independent Counsel to this factfinding process. Mr. Walsh has my promise of complete cooperation, and I have instructed all members of my administration to cooperate fully with the investigation in order to ensure full and prompt disclosure.

President decided today to proceed with full-scale development of the small intercontinental ballistic missile and to begin development of a mobile, rail garrison basing mode for Peacekeeper. These two programs are an integrated package to modernize ICBM's. The decision authorizes research and development only.

In response to congressional direction to consider alternate basing modes and deployment areas for Peacekeeper, the President has decided that a basing mode be developed to place missiles on railroad cars during peacetime at military installations around the country. During times of national emergency, the Peacekeeper missiles could be moved to classified locations.

The main operating base for Peacekeeper rail garrison would be at F.E. Warren AFB, WY, where there is already a sizable investment in Peacekeeper support facilities. Garrisons would be located at F.E. Warren AFB and at other Defense installations throughout the continental United States. After considering the alternatives for satisfying the military-related requirements, the President has decided that the candidate installations for these garrisons should include 10 additional Air Force bases. Information on these candidates will be provided in the near future. The President has also decided to develop the small intercontinental ballistic missiles, weighing approximately 37,000 pounds and carrying a single reentry vehicle, in hard mobile launchers in two basing modes. These modes are called hard mobile launcher at Minuteman facilities and hard mobile launcher in random movement.

The total quantity of systems to be produced and the extent to which the missiles are to be deployed will be dependent upon the size of the Soviet threat and progress reached on arms control agreements.

Vice Chairman will serve as Acting Chairman of the JCS in the Chairman's absence. He will outrank all other officers of the Armed Forces except the Chairman but is not considered by law a member of the Joint Chiefs of Staff unless serving as Acting Chairman. The Vice Chairman, who must be confirmed by the Senate, will serve a 2-year term and can be reappointed.

The holiday season is a time of gift giving and merrymaking; a time when millions help churches, synagogues, and organizations like the Salvation Army and Toys for Tots provide for the less fortunate among us, a time when huge turkey dinners are cooked, parents find themselves staying up late wrapping toys, and children's eyes are filled with more and more excitement every day -- a time, indeed, when all the world seems taken up with plans and celebrations and family.

That last word, ``family,'' is one that I'd like to consider for a moment. To be sure, family is very much on our minds during the holidays, as children and grandchildren, parents and grandparents, gather to share the happiness of the season. We know how good it feels to be with our families -- how it warms and comforts us, how it gives us strengh and joy. But I wonder whether we always give our families all the appreciation they deserve. Consider, for example, that the philosopher-historians Will and Ariel Durant called the family ``the nucleus of civilization.'' They understood that all those aspects of civilized life that we most deeply cherish -- freedom, the rule of law, economic prosperity and opportunity -- that all these depend upon the strength and integrity of the family. If you think about it, you'll see that it's in the family that we must all learn the fundamental lesson of life -- right and wrong, respect for others, self-discipline, the importance of knowledge, and, yes, a sense of our own self-worth. All of our lives, it's the love of our families that sustains us when times are hard. And it is perhaps above all to provide for our children that we work and save.

Some have suggested that in today's world, the family has somehow become less important. Well, I can't help thinking just the opposite: that when so much around us is whispering the little lie that we should live only for the moment and for ourselves, it's more important than ever for our families to affirm an older and more lasting set of values. Yet, for all that, in recent decades the American family has come under virtual attack. It has lost authority to government rule writers. It has seen its central role in the education of young people narrowed and distorted. And it's been forced to turn over to big government far too many of its own resources in the form of taxation.

Even so, the family today remains the fundamental unit of American life. But statistics show that it has lost ground, and I don't believe there's much doubt that the American family could be, and should be, much, much stronger. Just last month, I received a report on this from my Working Group on the Family, providing recommendations for giving the family new strength. Our administration will be giving these recommendations serious consideration in the days ahead. But for now we might all do well to keep our families in mind, to make certain that we don't take them for granted. For perhaps at no other time of the year are we able to enjoy our families so thoroughly or see so clearly their importance to ourselves and our country.

And let us remember that in the midst of all the happy bustle of the season there is a certain quietness, a certain calm: the calm of one still night long ago and of a family -- father, mother, and newborn child.

Teachers help us learn to read, to write, and to count -- and how to study. By word and example, teachers impart moral and civic values. During our most formative and impressionable years, teachers help us understand ourselves and the world around us.

Our teachers in public and private schools, from preschool through elementary, secondary, and beyond, deserve the gratitude of our Nation for their wisdom, sacrifice, community service, and devotion to their students. Teachers prepare us for the future; and anyone who today works, dreams, imagines, creates, and contributes to the well-being of our country can thank devoted teachers who provided help, knowledge, and inspiration along the way.

Prayer, of course, is deeply personal. Many of us have been taught to pray by people we love. In my case, it was my mother. I learned quite literally at her knee. My mother gave me a great deal, but nothing she gave me was more important than that special gift, the knowledge of the happiness and solace to be gained by talking to the Lord. The way we pray depends both on our religious convictions and our own individual dispositions, but the light of prayer has a common core.

Perhaps, in our own prayers we would do well to remember the words of the heavenly host on that one still night so long ago, each of us in our own way giving glory to God and asking in all earnestness for peace on Earth, and good will toward men.

America has lived through many a cold, dark night, when the cupped hands of prayer were our only shield against the extinction of courage. Though that flame has flickered from time to time, it burns brightest when we are willing, as we ought to be now, to turn our faces and our hearts to God not only at moments of personal danger and civil strife, but in the full flower of the liberty, peace, and abundance that He has showered upon us.

Indeed, the true meaning of our entire history as a Nation can scarcely be glimpsed without some notion of the importance of prayer, our Declaration of Dependence on God's favor on this unfinished enterprise we call America. Our land today is more diverse than ever, our citizens come from nearly every nation on Earth, and the variety of religious traditions that have found welcome here has never been greater. On our National Day of Prayer, then, we join together as people of many faiths to petition God to show us His mercy and His love, to heal our weariness and uphold our hope, that we might live ever mindful of His justice and thankful for His blessing.

December 19 the United Nations General Assembly took an historic step to adopt sweeping reforms of its organization and methods of operation. These reforms are designed to strengthen the organization's effectiveness and efficiency in carrying out its important political, economic, and social objectives. Our success in reaching this agreement reflects the recognition by all member States of the need to restore and strengthen that capability in order for the United Nations to fulfill the promise of its founding principles and continue to act as a force for international peace, freedom, and progress. With the support of Congress, my administration has long advocated such reforms, so we are very pleased that these measures have finally been adopted. I am particularly gratified that the reforms include agreement to use consensus in deciding on budget levels and program priorities. This new procedure will assure broad-based support for the vital programs and activities of the United Nations around the world.

In my speech to the General Assembly in September, I spoke of the crisis of confidence that was facing the United Nations and urged the member States to seize the moment to turn the rhetoric of reform into reality in order to secure the future of the United Nations. And I said that if the necessary reforms were adopted, the United States, ``which has always given the U.N. generous support, will continue to play a leading role in the effort to achieve its noble purposes.'' The United Nations is important to the United States, and we are committed to working closely with other member States and with the Secretary-General to see that the reforms are faithfully implemented and to secure the organization's future.

Sec. 2. The heads of Executive departments and agencies may determine that certain offices and installations of their organizations, or parts thereof, must remain open and that certain employees must report for duty on December 26, 1986, for reasons of national security or defense or for other public reasons.

American people will not know the full story of what happened in the Iran arms sales matter or the alleged diversion of funds to the contras. However, that doesn't mean that substantial portions of the facts as gathered thus far cannot be made known.

The Senate Select Committee on Intelligence has been holding hearings for 3 weeks. They've taken testimony under oath and have reviewed documents that were furnished by the National Security Council, the CIA, the Defense Department, and other executive branch departments and agencies. As the committee prepares a report of its findings and conclusions, I urge them to make that report available to me for declassification as promptly as possible. To be sure, that report will not have all the answers, but it will be the most complete statement available. And I call on the committee to release it so the American people can judge for themselves.

Government must go on, and I pledge to the American people that I will continue to do everything possible to get to the bottom of this matter. I also pledge that I'll continue to fight for a safer world, for more jobs, for a growing economy, and for all the other issues important to the American people. We can get to the bottom of the issue on Iran. We can continue to move ahead on the critical issues before us. The Congress can do the same. And in a spirit of cooperation and working together, we can achieve both.

Now with that said, let me just say that I appreciate this opportunity to speak with you again and to personally receive your report, the report of the White House Conference on Small Business. The last time we met in August I reminded you of my first small business venture -- renting out a canoe for 35 cents an hour on the Rock River back in Dixon, Illinois, where I was lifeguarding. Contrary to what some of my young staffers may have thought when I said that, I want to clear the record now. I was not outfitting the Lewis and Clark expedition. [Laughter] It was, however, many years ago. Growing up in America in those days and watching the changes that have taken place -- it's given me a perspective that has served me well these last few years. The changes, however, are perhaps not as significant as the constants -- the things that have been part of the American character since long before I was on the scene. From the first days of our Republic, and perhaps before, a spirit of enterprise was apparent in our land. Alexis de Tocqueville, a young Frenchman who toured our young country 150 years ago, wrote about it. ``America,'' he said, ``is a land of wonders, in which everything is in constant motion and every change seems an improvement.'' He wrote, ``No natural boundary seems to be set to the efforts of man; and in his eyes what is not yet done is only what he has yet attempted to do.'' This daring, unabashed willingness to tackle new challenges, this can-do mentality from which innovation springs, has been at the heart of American progress.

More significant to our natural well-being than our treasure of natural resources or our vast expanses of land, today it is you and the small business men and women you represent who are the champions of enterprise on which our country truly depends. Today 47 percent of the private sector work force is employed by firms with less than 500 employees. In the past 8 years, small business has generated nearly two-thirds of the net new jobs in our country. And it's in small companies where so much of the job training is done, taking in two-thirds of the new entrants into the work force. You play and will continue to play a vital, indispensable role in our economy. If the United States is to remain competitive, to remain prosperous, to remain an economic leader among the nations, the ingenuity, efficiency, and creativity of small business and individual enterprise must be maximized. The competition we face in the world marketplace will not go away. The challenge is real, and it's not going to be met by schemes, gimmicks, or shortsighted protectionism. There's only one answer. It's about time we rolled up our sleeves and make up our mind that America, simply put, is going to beat the competition. Now, as I say, that depends so much on you and those others like you in the 15 million nonfarm small businesses throughout our country. Healthy, robust small business and keeping America out front are one and the same goal.

I told you last August, an active Small Business Administration, a lean and mean SBA, will continue to play a role in our administration even in these times of budget restraint. Today it's my pleasure to announce that I intend to nominate as new Administrator for the Small Business Administration an individual who knows small business and knows the Nation's Capital. He's served in the United States Senate, and through his leadership, hard work, and human concern has earned the respect of everyone who knows him. I'm talking about Senator Jim Abdnor of South Dakota, and it will be an honor to have him aboard. Together, we're going to ensure that small business men and women have a strong voice in the Nation's Capital.

I know your report, which I received today, is aimed at doing just that. I look forward to using your report in working with Congress. I'd been told that high on the list of your concerns is the sad state of liability insurance -- a festering problem that's crying out for action. The liability system is broken; it needs to be fixed. And I pledge in the upcoming 100th Congress I'll work with you and the Congress to fix it and remove this cloud that's smothering some of America's most productive and enterprising citizens. I look forward to reviewing your other recommendations and following through where possible. You can certainly count on our administration, for example, to fight and -- if we stand together -- beat back attempts to shackle and overregulate you, which I understand is also one of the items that you listed. One of the greatest strengths of our economic system lies in your ability to make decisions, your flexibility especially when it comes to contracts and conditions of employment.

No one should miss the meaning of what's happening in Europe -- or maybe I should say what's not happening in Europe. There, government has so burdened business with restrictions, guidelines, and obligations that in recent years the job picture has remained stagnant -- virtually no growth in the number of jobs in those, our trading partners. In the United States over 12 million jobs have been created just since the current recovery began. This, again, points to the fundamental truth that the best thing government can do for the people and for business is simply get its hands out of your pockets, get out of your way, and let you get on with doing what you do best.

You know, I don't remember whether I told you this in August or not. Sometimes government reminds me of the lady who ran a pretzel stand just outside an office building -- and if I've told you this before, just forgive me. You know, life begins at 40, and so does the tendency to tell stories over and over again. [Laughter] Every day a fellow who was in that office building would stop by her stand, and he'd put a quarter in her plate. And he never took a pretzel.

Seriously, though, keeping our economy growing and the number of jobs increasing continues to be a top priority of our administration. And I want each of you to know that your role in achieving this goal is not taken for granted, not by a long shot.

I thank you for the part you're playing in keeping our economy healthy and expanding, and thanks also for your part in preparing this report. I've 2 years left in the job, and your effort will certainly help me set the priorities of what needs to be done. And now I think it's time to get the report.

The crisis between the United States and Libya that led to my January 7, 1986, declaration of a national emergency has not been resolved. The Government of Libya continues to use and support international terrorism, in violation of international law and minimum standards of human behavior. Such Libyan actions and policies pose a continuing unusual and extraordinary threat to the national security and vital foreign policy interests of the United States. For these reasons, I have determined that it is necessary to maintain in force the broad authorities necessary to apply economic pressure to the Government of Libya to reduce its ability to support international terrorism.

President today announced the appointment of Ambassador David Abshire as Special Counsellor to the President. Ambassador Abshire will serve on temporary assignment as the White House coordinator for the Iran inquiry. He will assume his duties here January 5, 1987, and will continue with some NATO duties until his successor is confirmed. In that capacity, which will have Cabinet rank, he will head a team that will coordinate White House activities in all aspects of the Iran matter. He will coordinate White House responses to congressional and other requests for information in a timely manner, working with senior members of the White House staff, assisted by representatives from key White House staff offices.

President is pleased and grateful for Ambassador Abshire's willingness to undertake this important special assignment and looks forward to working with such a talented and dedicated public servant. Ambassador Abshire has served at NATO with the utmost distinction and success. He has a well-deserved reputation as a respected and articulate advocate of our foreign policy goals.

Nancy and I sincerely hope that you and your family have been enjoying this holiday season. Christmas and Hanukkah provide all of us with special moments to cherish and remember. The new year, which will be with us in just a few days, offers us a chance to reflect on the year we've been through and to set our sights for the year ahead.

Having been blessed with a long life, my perspective on 1986 is different than that of many of the commentators. I believe this year, 1986, will be remembered by you for some important and long-lasting events that the political pundits don't remember or may not have noticed. 1986, for example, may have been the year when you, someone in your family, or someone you know started a small business.

It's estimated that over 600,000 new businesses were incorporated this year, most of them small operations headed by men and women with a dream. With our recovery in its fourth year, economists may well point to 1986 as a year of steady growth and low inflation. To you, perhaps, that meant your take-home pay was going further, or it might have meant that in 1986 someone in your family found a job. So far this year more than 2 million jobs have been created. In 1986 a higher percentage of our population has been employed than ever before.

Looking ahead, the forecasters are projecting that next year we will enjoy even stronger economic growth. They suggest that the gross national product will rise by a healthy 3.2 percent, which should translate into lower unemployment, more jobs, and higher take-home pay. Some other positive economic news portends good things ahead. We're turning the corner on the trade deficit problem. This is also the year Congress, with a little prodding from the rest of us, finally got its act together and reformed the tax system and lowered the rates. It was widely reported that tax reform was an impossible dream. Working together we showed the cynics our system still works.

And also this year we've made some tangible progress on some other things I know you're personally concerned about. Our battle against the evil of drug and alcohol abuse, for example, has scored some impressive victories. Record amounts of illegal drugs have been intercepted before reaching the street; local, State, and Federal agencies are cooperating as never before. And beyond enforcement, people from every walk of life are joining our crusade to help others achieve a drug-free life. You could well remember 1986 as the year when a friend or loved one, with all of us doing what we could to help, straightened up his or her life and got off illegal drugs or alcohol. One thing history will certainly record is that this was the year that Americans brought some of the top leaders of organized crime to justice. We began our offensive against the mob early in the administration; and it's taken time, patience, and hard work. But this year, after long arduous preparation, we moved against the kingpins of racketeering. Last month, after a dramatic 10-week trial, 8 crime leaders -- heads of what's called the commission -- were convicted. We can all be proud of those law enforcement professionals responsible for this major defeat of the underworld.

A fine writer and social commentator from the American Enterprise Institute named Ben Wattenberg has written a book entitled ``The Good News Is the Bad News Is Wrong.'' Well, in it he pointed out that while daily news reports in recent years have focused on negative events and predictions of gloom and doom, our country and our people actually have been moving forward, problems solved, opportunity opening. Living in a time of great change as we do, it's easy to be apprehensive, especially about events on the international scene. The Iran controversy has certainly been a disappointment for all of us; nonetheless, I am committed to getting all the facts and fixing whatever went wrong. And 1986 has been a good year for the cause of human freedom and good for the cause of world peace.

This year relations between the United States and the Soviet Union advanced. When I met with General Secretary Gorbachev in Reykjavik, it was clear the differences between our positions on arms reduction had narrowed considerably.

In the year ahead, both sides are in a good position to build on what has been accomplished. As the song puts it, it was a very good year. Well, Nancy and I hope 1986 was a very good year for you and wish you an even better 1987.

Seven years ago, on December 27, 1979, the world awoke to find that the Soviet Army had invaded its nonaligned, independent neighbor, Afghanistan. This stark act of aggression shattered many illusions about the Soviet Union. The murder of then-President Hafizullah Amin by invading Soviet forces quickly dispelled the Soviet claim that a limited contingent of Soviet troops, currently numbering 116 - 118,000 troops, was invited into Afghanistan by a friendly government. The Afghan people did not invite the Soviets to bomb and burn their villages, to maim and orphan their children, to rewrite their history, and to spurn their religion and culture. They did not invite the Soviets to destroy their fields and lay waste to vast portions of their country.

That, in the face of this brutal onslaught, the Afghan people still refuse to surrender is evidence that freedom cannot be bought, stolen, or wrenched from those determined to defend it. But the Afghan people alone cannot hope to defeat Soviet power. They need the support of governments and peoples everywhere. The Soviets must be made to understand that they will continue to pay a higher and higher price until they accept the necessity for a political solution involving the prompt withdrawal of their forces from Afghanistan and self-determination for the Afghan people.

Last month 122 nations joined together in a resounding endorsement of a U.N. resolution calling for a political settlement predicated on the prompt and complete withdrawal of Soviet troops. If the Soviets truly want peace, let them present at Geneva a realistic timetable for the withdrawal of their troops from Afghanistan. The United States, which has always supported a negotiated political solution to the war in Afghanistan, will place no barriers in the Soviets' way should they decide to negotiate seriously an end to their occupation of Afghanistan. But empty gestures, such as the talk about peace and a settlement and sham ``withdrawal'' in October of a few Soviet regiments, will not bring an end to the killing and destruction. Only a comprehensive settlement which ensures genuine independence, nonalignment, and the safe and honorable return of refugees can bring about the process of national reconciliation and the rebuilding of Afghanistan.

As long as the Soviets and their Afghan surrogates continue to wage a war which threatens extermination of an entire people, that people will have the support of the international community -- and our support -- for their resistance. The tragedy in Afghanistan makes it clear that none of us can take our own freedom for granted. All free nations must do what they can to preserve liberty from assault. Let us pledge at this joyless anniversary marking 7 years of Soviet occupation to renew our efforts in seeking together a free and independent Afghanistan and peace on Earth.

We laughed and shook our head, but in a way understood the local official in Thailand who refused to believe some cockamamie story about a plane that was flying around the world on one tank of gas. [Laughter] And we've cheered when, just past Sri Lanka, Voyager broke the record for the longest nonstop flight. And then when we saw you coming back home -- so ungainly, yet so graceful, flying into the desert landing strip at Edwards Air Force Base -- well, that was just about the best Christmas present America could have had. And, of course, waiting for you back home was the man whose brilliant design, determination, and entrepreneurship got the Voyager program off the ground -- Dick's brother, Burt Rutan.

For those of us old enough to remember, the flight of the Voyager brought us back to the days of those magnificient men and their flying machines. And you reminded us all that aviation history is still being written by men and women with the spirit of adventure and derring-do. On December the 23d, 1986, the name Voyager joined the distinguished family of airborne technological breakthroughs that began with the Wright Flyer and includes the Spirit of St.

Rutan has inspired a Nation with his record-setting, non-stop aerial circumnavigation of the globe. A veteran of 325 combat missions during the Vietnam conflict, Dick Rutan had already proven himself a patriot and a hero. The historic flight of the Voyager demonstrated that he is also a man of vision -- and a man with the skill, determination, and just plain courage to make his vision a reality.

Rutan is the driving force behind the brilliant voyage of the aircraft he designed and built. His initiative, originality, and entrepreneurship have shown us anew the remarkable results that individual determination and enterprise can attain, no matter how formidable the challenge. The record-setting flight of the Voyager is an inspiration to all America.

Rutan. Wow! [Laughter] Now, it's quite an honor to receive these citations, but there's something very significant about what happened. And that is that this was done by individual citizens, citizens of this great land. And we did so because we had the freedom to pursue a dream, and that's important. And we should never forget, and those that guard our freedoms, that we should hang on to them very tenaciously and be very careful about some do-gooder that thinks that our safety is more important than our freedom. Because freedom is awful difficult to obtain, and it's even more difficult to regain it once it's lost. So, let's never forget how important it was, and we should hang on to it. Another thing I want to say is that because of the individual freedoms that we have, out in this room right here, the majority of you are Voyager people, Voyager volunteers -- people that gave of themselves for nothing, that they wanted to do something significant. And all of you that were involved in this thing, I want you all to stand up right now, and I want to applaud you and accept this medal on your behalf because I'm proud to death of you: the Voyager crew, ladies and gentlemen. [Applause] Thank you very much.

The President. All right. Well, to you and the many ground crew and volunteers who shared in the Voyager vision, you're all heroes, exemplifying the voluntarism, the enterprise, the imagination, and just plain courage that make this country great. And you all make us proud to be Americans. I couldn't help but think when Dick was standing here and talking about the freedom we have and for Americans and individuals to do things of this kind -- I was kind of thinking it was pretty funny that an ex-officer of horse cavalry was here standing, handing out medals to somebody that had flown around the world on a single tank of gas. [Laughter] Thank you, and God bless you.

Jeana Yeager. I don't know really what to say other than we're very proud of this, and I wish there was one other person here that has really contributed to this program. He's been with us since the day we first cut the glass on the airplane. That's Mr. Bruce Evans. But between him and everybody else, thank you.

Rutan. I hope I can do this. I've had tears in my eyes many times during this flight, and I'm very close right now. I wanted to mention that this aircraft was developed by a handful of private citizen-Americans who were operating in an environment that allowed them the freedom for us to create that airplane and to flight-test it and to reach around the world with it. And I want to thank Ronald Reagan for providing and maintaining this environment that was devoid of government regulations that would have made this thing impossible in any other country that I can think of.

I'm serious. We have an application for airworthiness and an application for the tail number on the airplane. [Laughter] And that's the only two pieces of government regulations that we had to do, to do this job. There were dozens of volunteers helping for the world flight. It required a lot of weather support and so on. But the actual building of the airplane was done over an 18-month time period with less than four people, average, working on it to assemble the airplane. And I want to thank Dick and Jeana, Bruce Evans, Mike and Sally Melville, John Runtz, and the others who helped us launch that airplane and make my dream come true. Thank you very much.

President today is taking trade policy actions on two cases involving the unfair practices of our trading partners. The first case involves agricultural trade with the European Community (EC). The President announced today that he is increasing import duties on U.S. imports of certain European agricultural products in direct response to the failure of the European Community to offer adequate compensation for lost U.S. feed grain exports to Spain. He has directed U.S.

President's action follows the expiration of an interim agreement concluded last July with the EC, intended to allow time until the end of 1986 to reach a permanent compensation arrangement for U.S. exports of feedgrains to Spain. However, the EC failed to offer acceptable compensation in the negotiations. The President expressed regret that the European negotiators had not shown sufficient flexibility to reach a satisfactory settlement, despite the additional 6 months the United States had allowed for the negotiations. He indicated that the time had come to respond in kind to the European measures, in accordance with U.S. rights under international rules of the General Agreement on Tariff and Trade (GATT). Therefore, U.S. duties on certain agricultural products will be set at 200 percent. The U.S. Trade Representative has been directed to monitor the effects of the U.S. action to ensure that they match the damage caused by the EC restrictions.

President reaffirmed that the United States would prefer a negotiated solution rather than having to resort to trade restrictive actions to resolve disputes and hopes that a settlement can be reached prior to the imposition of duties. He further indicated that the United States is prepared to restore the preexisting tariff rates at any time that there is agreement with the European Community to provide adequate compensation for U.S. feed grain losses.

The second case involves the pending section 301 case against the Government of Brazil for acts, policies, and practices involving restrictions on informatics trade and investment and denial of adequate and effective intellectual property protection. Brazil has recently announced measures to improve the administration of its informatics law and narrow the scope of its market reserve. Specifically, Brazil has agreed to establish an ad hoc group to review specific U.S. company complaints, has promulgated some administrative reforms, and has liberalized the importation of some previously restricted informatics products, subject to periodic revision.

As a result of these positive undertakings, the President has decided to suspend the procedural and administrative reforms parts of the section 301 case and to monitor Brazil's implementation of those reforms.

President has also determined that while Brazil's investment environment is improved, it is not yet fully open to U.S. investment opportunities. In addition, the Government of Brazil has recently submitted legislation which provides some intellectual property protection for computer software, but the legislation has numerous features inconsistent with international standards. The President has, therefore, decided to delay further U.S. remedial action for 6 months to monitor Brazilian progress in making necessary improvements in the investment climate and to secure passage of intellectual property legislation consistent with international standards. Thus, action on both the investment and intellectual property portions of the section 301 case will be postponed until July 1, 1987.

In addition the President has instructed United States Trade Representative Clayton Yeutter to conduct a series of public hearings on Brazil's informatics policy and to solicit private sector recommendations as to what further action could or should be taken to foster the opening of the Brazilian informatics market. The scheduled dates of the hearings will be published in the Federal Register 30 days prior to event.

I was saddened to hear of the death of former British Prime Minister, the Earl of Stockton, Harold Macmillan, one of the United Kingdom's most distinguished postwar leaders. The American people share in the loss of a voice of wisdom and humanity who, with eloquence and gentle wit, brought to the problems of today the experience of a long life of public service. We will miss him, and we extend to Lord Stockton's family and the British people our warmest sympathy.

In response to the inability of the Government of Canada to collect an export charge on exports of certain softwood lumber products to the United States of America until at least January 8, 1987, I have decided that expeditious action is required, and, pursuant to Section 301(a), (b), and (d)(1) of the Act, to increase temporarily the rates of duty on imports from Canada of the softwood lumber products provided for in Appendix A to this Proclamation. I am authorizing the Secretary of Commerce to determine when the Government of Canada begins to collect the export charge and, when he has made that determination, to take all necessary and appropriate steps to end the temporary surcharge I have today proclaimed.

Subpart B of part 1 of Schedule 2 of the Tariff Schedules of the United States is modified, with respect to products of Canada imported into the United States by adding an additional duty of 15 percent ad valorem to those products listed in Appendix A to this Proclamation. These changes shall be effective with respect to articles entered, or withdrawn from warehouse, for consumption on or after December 31, 1986.

The Secretary of Commerce is hereby authorized to terminate the temporary increase in the rates of duty on the articles subject to this Proclamation upon publication in the Federal Register of his determination that such termination is justified by actions taken by the Government of Canada with respect to this matter.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this thirtieth day of December, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

I direct the Secretary of Commerce to determine when the Government of Canada begins to collect the export charge and, when he has made that determination, to take all necessary and appropriate steps to end the imposition of the temporary surcharge I have today declared.

Fulfillment of the objectives and commitments in the Understanding is of critical importance. Therefore, I intend to take or to authorize all appropriate action in response to any future failure by the Government of Canada to meet the objectives and commitments of the Understanding.

Today the Governments of Canada and of the United States of America have signed an agreement on trade in certain softwood lumber products. This agreement will enhance the ability of our softwood lumber industry to compete by negating the impact of Canadian provincial practices which the U.S. Department of Commerce preliminarily determined to be subsidies.

This agreement successfully addresses the problems which led the U.S. softwood lumber industry to file a petition under the countervailing duty law with the Department of Commerce. As a result, the U.S. industry is withdrawing its petition and the Department of Commerce will terminate its investigation.

Under the agreement, the Government of Canada will impose a 15 percent tax on exports of softwood lumber to the United States. This tax may be phased out as the Canadian provinces increase the charges imposed on softwood lumber production. The Government of Canada has informed us that because of administrative reasons they cannot begin to collect the export charge provided for in the Understanding until at least January 8, 1987.

Since the investigation being conducted by the Commerce Department was terminated today, there will be at a minimum a nine-day period during which the Canadians are not collecting the export charge. The temporary surcharge I have declared is necessary to prevent an increase in exports of certain softwood lumber products from Canada which would have the effect of undermining the objectives of the Understanding.

